
<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47015 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shaymiyev Addresses Supreme Soviet Session </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shaymiyev Addresses Supreme Soviet Session </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0805A Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA in Russian 10 Jun 94 pp 
1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0805A </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Speech by President M. Shaymiyev at special 20th session of </F>
the Supreme Soviet of the Republic of Tatarstan; date not given] 
  [Text] Esteemed People's Deputies! 
  Probably no one needs to be persuaded that there will be 
economic reforms in the Republic of Tatarstan only if there are 
the corresponding social and political prerequisites. If the 
social processes occurring in the republic are considered from 
this viewpoint, an unequivocal conclusion may be drawn: All the 
necessary prerequisites for a resolution of the economic 
problems in Tatarstan are today to hand. We are talking 
primarily about the increasing trend toward a strengthening of 
civil peace and interethnic harmony. We had also noted the 
positive nature of this factor in constitutional development 
earlier. Reality is confirming its value by the day. Everything 
that contributes to a stable atmosphere and the formation of the 
civil society and a multiparty system will receive the maximum 
support from us. It is a question of respect for the sovereignty 
of the multinational people of Tatarstan and the priority of 
human rights, regardless of nationality, sex, or religious 
belief, and the assurance of the rule of law and constitutional 
legality. Today, more than ever, especially as we move toward 
the 50th anniversary of Victory Day, we all need the organic 
connection of the generations and their mutual responsibility to 
one another and the creation of a kind of association of 
patriotic forces and the incorporation in them of all those who 
love their native land and work on it and all those for whom the 
words "I am a citizen of Tatarstan" have profound moral meaning. 
  Proceeding from this, I deem necessary an acceleration of 
the 
elaboration and adoption of a republic program of patriotic 
upbringing based on the best traditions of our people. The 
creation of new mechanisms and procedures for notifying the 
public of the most important events of domestic and foreign 
policy occurring in the republic also is pertinent. And mention 
has to be made of an increase within the framework of the law in 
the responsibility of the news media and an improvement in the 
work of radio and television. In a word, reforms need to be 
given the go-ahead in the ideological sphere. 
  A most important condition of economic transformations in 
the 
Republic of Tatarstan is the development of relations with 
Russia. The strategic goals in this direction are clear, they 
have been set forth both in the republic constitution and in the 
Russian Federation and the Republic of Tatarstan treaty of 15 
February 1994. I believe that it is possible to speak with a 
full sense of responsibility about the consensus of the public, 
which has recognized this treaty, that has taken shape. The past 
three months have shown in various aspects--constitutional, 
personal, national--the soundness of our policy and the absence 
of any alternative to it. No, the treaty has not automatically 
removed all current problems. But its role lies elsewhere--being 
the instrument of their solution. There was a most active debate 
on this and other matters in the course of the working visit of 
B. Yeltsin, president of the Russian Federation, to Tatarstan. 
The visit was essential for both the Russian and the Tatar 
sides. And the fact that this trip took place following the 
signing of the Social Accord Treaty lends the visit particular 
political significance. The range of problems discussed, raised 
largely on our initiative, and of the decisions on them was 
quite broad. The economic and financial theme was represented by 
plans pertaining to the Kama Truck Plant and the Yelabuga 
Automobile Works--in respect to which decisions have already 
been adopted--and the defense and oil-refining complexes. 
Agreement was reached on the Russian side's participation in the 
restoration of the Kazan Kremlin historical and architectural 
monument. Assistance to representatives of the Tatar diaspora in 
Russia and an expansion of the international relations of the 
Republic of Tatarstan were discussed specifically and 
fruitfully. We thereby succeeded, aside from the solution of 
political questions, in involving the Russian Federation 
Government in the current implementation of federal and joint 
programs on the territory of our republic. And the central place 
in the negotiations was occupied by the question of the 
effective realization of the Russo-Tatar accords, of course. 
  Attaching importance to the realization of the treaty and 
the 
intergovernmental agreements, Boris Yeltsin and I formed a 
bilateral commission composed of representatives of the supreme 
executive of both parties for supervision of the progress of 
fulfillment of these agreements. Members of the commission, 
which is headed on our side by M. Sabirov, prime minister of the 
Republic of Tatarstan, include V. Likhachev, vice president of 
the Republic of Tatarstan, R. Muratov and F. Khamidullin, deputy 
prime ministers, and Sh. Arslanov, minister of foreign economic 
relations of the Republic of Tatarstan. On the Russian side the 
president entrusted leadership of the commission to O. 
Soskovets, first deputy chairman of the Russian Federation 
Government. This commission has been instructed to draw up 
proposals for the decentralization of the economy of the Russian 
Federation on the basis of the example of the Republic of 
Tatarstan. This is a continuation of the agreements that we 
achieved at our suggestion immediately following the signing of 
the treaty. 
  This attention to the treaty is perfectly explicable. The 
innovative role of the Republic of Tatarstan in the reform of 
Russia and its contribution to the building of a renewed 
federation today is a generally recognized fact. The recent 
meetings between the leaders of the Republic of Tatarstan and 
the leadership of Turkey, Poland, and Austria and business 
circles of the United States, France, Germany, Bulgaria, 
Hungary, Lithuania, and the CIS countries and numerous 
publications in the national and foreign press point to this. 
  The treaty has evoked interest also as a possible approach 
and procedure for the settlement of regional conflicts in 
Ukraine, Moldova, and Georgia and in Russia itself. 
  Esteemed people's deputies! 
  Throughout the second session, the economic situation has 
been discussed keenly and with concern by the people's deputies 
and by the entire population of the republic, I would say. The 
spectrum of positions and opinions is most wide--from acceptance 
of the measures presented by the government through their 
complete rejection. This is understandable since even venerable 
scientists and experienced practical experts have proven 
incapable of making a precise analysis of what is happening in 
the Russian economy and in the CIS as a whole at this time and 
of presenting a prescription for recovery. Each speech heard 
here today, therefore, whether it be liked or not, should be 
perceived as a set of proposals geared to the recovery of the 
republic's economy. They will undoubtedly be studied and 
adopted, as far as possible, for the formulation of the 
appropriate anticrisis documents. There is on the part of 
certain deputies an aspiration to politicize the situation and 
to attempt to discern in the explorations of the president, the 
government, and its individual members insurmountable 
contradictions in an evaluation of the course of the reforms 
that should, in their opinion, bring about the immediate fall of 
the government or something else besides. To expect such an 
outcome and to connive at this in every possible way is to 
utterly oversimplify the ways of extrication of the economy from 
the pre-crisis state. Yes, indeed, the situation is very 
complex, and it requires of all of us an objective appraisal and 
a balanced, skilled approach in trying to overcome it. Whereas 
the government has thus far succeeded by half-measures in 
mitigating or eliminating the emergent problems of the 
transitional period, it is now necessary in a number of areas to 
fundamentally alter our approach, advancing the reforms, and to 
adapt to the market. 
  Having opted, as distinct from other regions, for the path 
of 
a gentle entry into the market, we have in these years created a 
sparing regime for the entire populace of our republic, and the 
state authorities have undertaken here reforms with a human face 
in a more stable economic situation. 
  And what we have all encountered today, the absolute 
majority 
of regions of the Russian Federation, if not all, encountered 
two years ago. And the population of these regions is 
experiencing the costs of the mistakes made in the course of the 
reforms. We told the people honestly that the difficulties of 
the transitional period would confront us also. We have thus far 
tried to push them away as far as possible. But how, since we 
are all in a single economic space, can it be otherwise. And 
this day has now come. 
  In their politicized speeches some deputies are interpreting 
the ongoing processes in their own way, unfortunately. They 
proposed that the economic reforms be conducted otherwise, they 
say. But they were not heeded, and this is the result. But they 
are for one reason or another silent about the results where 
reforms have been undertaken in accordance with analogous 
proposals. And it is, after all, roughly according to their 
format that the reforms have been undertaken in almost all 
regions of the Russian Federation. And? We are today expressing 
discontent at the mistakes that have been made and because of 
which, being in a single economic space, our economy also is 
suffering. If you have something to say, therefore, you should 
say it objectively, not one-sidedly. 
  In a word, this means urging us on toward a worse situation, 
that to which, according to their logic, we should have aspired 
and that which we should have reached more rapidly. No, we did 
not do this. And the people understood us and understood us 
right. 
  What, then, is happening at this time? The peak of the 
arrears crisis, which has exposed all commodity producers, 
having shown the extent to which they are prepared for survival 
under the conditions of a reduction in the timeframe of the 
transitional period, has now arrived. The entire economy faced 
the dilemma: 
  to consent to a wholesale mutual offsetting of accounts and 
via hyperinflation alleviate the position of the commodity 
producers and, through them, facilitate the accomplishment of 
many current social tasks, preserving here, and also for the 
future, many inefficient works, on which practically everyone 
relied and still relies; 
  the second path is a strict policy of curbing the rate of 
inflation within the framework of that promised the IMF and, via 
radical measures, putting the commodity producers under survival 
conditions. It is now clear to all that it is this version that 
has been chosen. There is no doubt that the uncertainty in terms 
of time in the actions of authorities of all levels and the 
inevitability of the attempts to combine these two versions made 
the position of the basic commodity producers even worse. 
Today's situation in the economy is not an individual Tatar 
phenomenon, it is a phenomenon that has encompassed without 
exception all of Russia and the CIS. In a word, the entire basis 
of the USSR. 
  When an arrears crisis hits, it affects first and foremost, 
naturally, territories with a powerful industrial-energy 
potential and specific works. 
  The slump at major works means not only a shortfall in tax 
revenues, it signifies primarily the reduced incomes of the huge 
number of people employed there. There is no doubt that this is 
causing a deterioration in the social position of a large part 
of the population, of the industrial regions particularly. 
  The decline in production is substantial everywhere. The 
decline here in Tatarstan in the period January through May 
amounted to 30 percent; production constituted 70 percent of 
last year's level. In Nizhniy Novgorod--66.9 percent, Penza--64 
percent, Mordvinia--55 percent. Production in the period January 
through April in Tatarstan was at the level of 70.2 percent, in 
Saratov--61.1 percent, Udmurtia--70 percent, and 
Chelyabinsk--64.7 percent. In Bashkortostan, it was 78 
percent--somewhat lower [as published] because it managed to 
maintain oil production thanks to the existing large 
oil-refining capacity. This is what is happening in the national 
economy and economics as a whole. 
  There is no doubt that unless inflation is subsequently 
permitted to a moderate extent and there is selective support 
for the agro-industrial complex and individual sectors of the 
economy, the situation as a whole could prove not only critical 
but profoundly critical. And a real crisis in the economy could 
erupt in our republic also. 
  The edicts of the Russian president that we discussed during 
the meetings of heads of the republics proceed, therefore, from 
a recognition of the situation that the Russian economic space 
as a whole has now encountered. I believe that as a result we 
succeeded in speeding up somewhat B. Yeltsin's adoption of a 
number of edicts on the economy. But this does not indicate that 
there will be wholesale payments and that inefficient works will 
be preserved. There will be nothing of the sort because these 
edicts are being accompanied by the implementation of measures 
pertaining to the bankruptcy and the sale of inefficient 
enterprises. No one state and no one person is in a position 
today of continuing to support unprofitable production. There is 
no other solution. 
  We speak a great deal about the problems of the 
military-industrial complex, yes, there truly are such, and they 
need to be studied, but the decline in production in four months 
of the current year is connected primarily with the reduction in 
production in the oil and petrochemical sectors. They account 
for 39.4 percent of the decline and the military-industrial 
complex, on the order of 7 percent of the total decline, 
although the military-industrial complex also experienced a 
reduction in volume in the four months of 47 percent. Arrears in 
the petrochemical complex constitute approximately R1.5 
trillion, and if we consider that in the first quarter this 
complex accounted for almost [figure illegible] percent of the 
republic treasury receipts, thus also the problem of the tardy 
payment of the wages of persons in the publicly funded sectors, 
the shortfall in the receipt of monies for support of the 
agro-industrial complex, and much else. This is to what 
attention needs to be paid first and foremost. 
  This is an example that shows how important it is for the 
government to know, on the basis of a more in-depth analysis, 
how to find the key aspects on which the fate of the budget and 
the resolution of social problems depends. I believe that this 
is understood and that purposive work will be done. 
  Speaking of the priority measures for economic recovery, I 
agree entirely with Deputy T. Abdullin, who proposed an 
investigation into the movement of finances and their resources 
in the republic. There was virtually no mention of this in the 
report, unfortunately, yet this question is at this time fateful 
for the economy of Tatarstan. If we wish to abandon the high 
lending rate and concentrate within the republic our own credit 
resources and make efficient use of the finances that are formed 
on the territory of the republic, the study and resolution of 
the movement of finances is a key, urgent measure of economic 
recovery. 
  There are questions of a strategic nature here also, and I 
will speak of these later. Deputy A. Yefremov spoke in his 
speech about the drain of money to other regions. These 
questions are all interlinked and require very serious, skilled, 
and competent intervention. 
  Or take the circulation of bills: First, it is largely 
thanks 
to its introduction that we have in recent years succeeded in 
having the least decline in production--in the period 1991-1993 
it constituted 36.8 percent for the Russian Federation, 28 
percent for the Republic of Tatarstan. We managed to provide for 
the turnover of mutual payments in the amount of R500 billion 
via bills of exchange in 1993 alone. 
  Much can and needs to be done via bills of exchange in the 
current year also. We are already into the sixth month, but a 
fundamental approach to a further expansion of the sphere of the 
circulation of bills has yet to be formulated, unfortunately. 
The prime minister and government members are not managing to 
overcome the psychological barrier connected with the work with 
securities. Is there really any explanation for the scandalous 
fact of the nonpayment for a medical diet in medical 
institutions adduced by Deputy I. Mustafin, whereas there is 
this entire turnover within the republic, and bill circulation 
is being ignored. For according to information from the minister 
of health, it is a question of debts of the Ministry of Health 
to the Public Catering Administration of R32 billion, no more, 
no less. 
  It is about such specific measures, of decisive 
significance, 
that we should be speaking when we deal with the priority steps 
of stabilization of the economy. The bill of exchange system is 
a very useful financial instrument performing an important role 
in an economy in which the banking and financial systems are 
insufficiently developed as yet. It should undoubtedly be under 
the control of the National Bank of the republic, and care to 
ensure that it not contribute to a sharp rise in inflation 
should be taken here. 
  I believe that the adoption of a program in support of 
enterprises has been dragged out unjustifiably. It is the third 
time that I have spoken officially on this problem, which is one 
of the most urgent. There is some rejection of that to which we 
must aspire since we have embarked on the path of a market 
economy. This being what we should arrive at via all-around 
support for medium- and small-sized business and enterprise, and 
we should, via this, secure the well-being of the rest of 
society. 
  Note the percentage increase from year to year in the 
proportion of income tax from individuals. Two years ago it 
constituted 6 percent, last year, approximately 11 percent, and 
now it constitutes 17.5 percent of our tax base on the revenue 
side. This is the part of the tax base that the treasury is 
confident it will receive. It is growing and will continue to 
grow. 
  In four months we received on average as income tax from 
individuals in the republic an average [as published] R11,000 
from wages. From the persons that are employed in the 
entrepreneurial structure this figure constitutes R53,500. 
Economics requires calculation, profound analysis, and an 
ability to determine priorities. We are talking today about 
measures for the recovery of the republic's economy. And the 
administration chiefs should be clear in their own minds that 
the main source of the formation of local budgets should be for 
many of them income from enterprise, medium- and small-size 
business, not subsidies. Enough of soliciting subsidies. When it 
comes to allocating subsidies, the government must act 
differently. We need to make provision for the direct dependence 
between the amount of subsidies, which we give many cities and 
districts each year, and the extent of the development of market 
structures and how they are developing enterprise and medium-and 
small-size business. 
  Look, the Kama Truck Plant has suffered a big disaster, but 
Naberezhnyye Chelny continues to live, and lives pretty well. 
Count up what the income from entrepreneurial activity is there. 
Everyone needs to bolster and increase the revenue side of his 
budget. Yes, whether some people like it or not, the real estate 
market has, as M. Sabirov's report said, to begin to operate at 
full strength. There is no market economy without a real estate 
market. A change in the nature of the work of the banks and 
financial services is needed. 
  I have dwelt merely on certain aspects concerning urgent 
measures--there are many of them, unquestionably. The main thing 
now, having adopted them, is to concentrate on their immediate 
solution [as published]. The government needs to be afforded an 
opportunity to realize what it is proposing. We cannot permit 
ourselves a lengthy warm-up period. I believe, therefore, that 
the deputies will support the government and permit it to 
realize all that it has devised with regard to the observations 
made during the discussion of this matter. I believe that this 
is at this time the front of activity and, simultaneously, the 
fate of the government. 
  A program of Tatarstan's socioeconomic progress, which will 
require in-depth study and time, if only until the fall, is 
undoubtedly needed for determination of the prospects of our 
development. After all, it is not the question of a program as 
we have become accustomed to understanding it but of a clear, 
precise, and practical program, specific for all executants, 
which we should follow every day. All our actions should be 
undertaken in accordance with this long-term program of republic 
economic and social progress. 
  We have thus far succeeded, thanks to the Program of Social 
Protection of the Populace, in holding back the process of a 
decline in the living standard of our population. The main 
indicator of determination of the living standard of society as 
of this time is the ratio of per capita income to the magnitude 
of the subsistence level. 
  In April of this year it was as follows: 1.99 for the 
Republic of Tatarstan, 1.55 for the Russian Federation. These 
indicators vary by the month, but the difference has never yet 
been less than 0.5 in favor of the Republic of Tatarstan. This 
indicates that the living standard in Tatarstan is 20-25 percent 
higher than in the Russian Federation on average. 
  A social consequence of the transitional period of the 
economy en route to the market is the stratification of the 
population in terms of income level. The main mechanism of 
realization of this policy also [as published] is the program of 
targeted social assistance, which has been in effect in our 
republic for more than a year. 
  Today the deputies have been asking: What have we gotten 
from 
"an increase in the minimum wage in the republic to R30,000 
compared with the R14,600 for Russia." It is said here that the 
average monthly wages of a person working in the national 
economy in Russia are approximately 20 percent higher than in 
Tatarstan. 
  I also have to make things clear in regard to what comes 
next. These are not comparable figures. It needs to be 
considered that the level of the average wage for Russia is 
greatly influenced by the regions of the Far East and the Far 
North, the high amount of the earnings in which is determined by 
weightings and extra payments. If, however, we take the 
Volgo-Vyatskiy and Volga regions, the level of the average wage 
among the 13 territories in Tatarstan is in second place, 
whereas the prices of bakery and meat and dairy products with us 
are lower, except for Ulyanovsk. And you know that our cities 
come second and third among 110 cities of the Russian Federation 
in terms of cheapness of the consumer basket. The public should 
know this. 
  How are we to act today, when the economic situation is 
becoming increasingly complicated and the government is 
proposing that minimum pay be established in the amount of 
R50,000. We need to get a clear picture first and foremost of 
whether we will adhere to the policy of prevention of the 
wholesale impoverishment of our society or not. Our methods have 
been justified thus far. Here are the figures of the Center for 
Information Science, Administration, and Forecasting for 28 May: 
The subsistence level according to the procedure for our 
republic is R46,500, according to the procedure for the Russian 
Federation, R49,000--this on our territory. Whatever, the 
minimum wage must be in the range of this amount. Otherwise the 
living standard of society will decline even more. 
  The terms "poor" and "destitute" have appeared in the press 
frequently as of late. There have been attempts to exacerbate 
the social situation in this way. Nonetheless, it is a warning 
signal, and the government must remember this. It has submitted 
its proposal concerning a rise in the minimum wage. This matter 
has been framed correctly, I believe. Who are the main opponents 
of an increase to raise minimum wage to R50,000? The leaders of 
enterprises that are operating inadequately, I believe. 
  We are putting this condition to the commodity producers: 
The 
Supreme Soviet and the government do not agree that some of them 
cannot pay those whom they have hired the subsistence minimum. 
It is our people that are working there! In this case we must 
tell them; you do not have the right to deprive them of the 
subsistence minimum. And if you are not in a position to provide 
people via their wages with the minimum without which it is 
impossible to manage, thought needs to be given to the 
competency of such commodity producers. 
  I agree that there are many issues here, particularly in 
respect to the publicly funded organizations. The budget deficit 
is considerable, as it is. I believe that the difference in 
respect to the payment of pensions that has come about should be 
assumed by the Retirement Fund, and in respect to the 
unemployed, by the Employment Fund, which should begin to 
operate properly. The enterprises, on the other hand, should 
look after those whom they have hired. 
  Unemployment is a particularly important problem. But the 
market society in which there is no unemployment does not exist. 
There is a greater or lesser number of unemployed, but this is a 
somewhat different issue. 
  Unfortunately, some people are exaggerating this matter, as 
though the phenomenon were typical only of Tatarstan. Here are 
recent figures: Unemployment in Tatarstan constitutes 0.36 
percent, in Bashkortostan--0.82 percent, in Mariy El--3 percent, 
in the Chuvash Republic--4.3 percent, in Udmurtia--3.9 percent, 
in Nizhniy Novgorod--1 percent, in Samara--0.67 percent, and in 
the Russian Federation--1.6 percent, of the total size of the 
able-bodied population. Yes, there is, in addition, concealed 
unemployment. But account has to be taken of one fact: If the 
enterprises cannot give their employees the minimum, this should 
be done via the employment authorities in the procedure 
established by law. Such are the laws of the market, and such 
are the functions of the state under the conditions of the 
market. Catering for the subsistence level is our duty. We are 
organs of state power. We could, I believe, support the proposal 
of Deputy G. Kobelev and, having modified it, put the question 
of the minimum wage on the agenda of the next session. But a law 
on the minimum consumer budget must be adopted today or 
tomorrow. Otherwise we would be binding the government hand and 
foot because the subsistence level includes expenditure on 
public utilities, transport, food, and much else. 
  In conclusion I would like to say this. The government has 
proposed urgent measures for economic recovery and has 
simultaneously submitted for your consideration a list of all 
the enforceable enactments that it needs to realize these 
measures. I have calculated that we will have to draw up and 
adopt 15 bills, 12 decrees of the Cabinet of Ministers, and two 
presidential edicts. But time is pressing. I believe that, in 
accordance with the government's request, you will entrust to 
the president the adoption of the edicts legislatively 
enshrining the realization of the urgent measures pertaining to 
economic recovery in order for the government to have something 
to take as a basis prior to the Supreme Soviet's adoption of the 
corresponding laws. Commissions of the Supreme Soviet should 
join in the elaboration of these legislative instruments also. 
  I would like to make particular mention of the Program of 
Socioeconomic Progress. This program is essential. The republic 
needs a medium-term comprehensive and balanced program of 
embarkation on the path of socioeconomic progress. 
  The long-term goal of the program is a rise in the living 
standard of the average inhabitant of Tatarstan, and for this, 
the creation of a healthy market economy with growing potential. 
  To this end it is essential: 
  --to preserve the state's capability for maintaining law and 
order, ensuring the safety of the citizens, and defending 
property; providing for the transfer of state property to as 
great an extent possible to the private sector; and, what is 
particularly important, providing for the necessary minimum 
living standard for the transitional period. 
  This program should ensure the creation in Tatarstan of a 
mixed economy with a large and stable private sector and a 
solvent public sector. 
  May this proposition be the answer to the question: What 
kind 
of republic economy do we ultimately envisage? 
  A great deal of work is being performed on the creation of 
the program. Foreign specialists and well-known scientists and 
practical experts of Tatarstan are working on it. I believe that 
we will be able to offer it for your consideration by the fall. 
  Thank you for your attention. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47016 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tatarstan Premier on Stabilizing Economy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tatarstan Premier on Stabilizing Economy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0783A Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA in Russian 7 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0783A </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Republic of Tatarstan Prime Minister N. Sabirov </F>
at extraordinary 20th session of the Republic of Tatarstan 
Supreme Soviet of the 12th term on 6 June 1994: "On the Plan of 
Priority Measures for Stabilizing the Economy of the Republic of 
Tatarstan"] 
  [Text] Esteemed people's deputies! 
  In execution of the laws passed by the Republic of Tatarstan 
Supreme Soviet and edicts of the president of Tatarstan, the 
Cabinet of Ministers of the republic has been making purposeful 
efforts to reinforce the economic independence of the Republic 
of Tatarstan, to enhance structural changes in the economy, and 
to develop a system of social protection for the citizens of the 
Republic of Tatarstan. 
  So far, structural changes in Tatarstan have proceeded at 
the 
pace and in keeping with the schedule determined by the policy 
of state regulation of the process of transition to market 
relations which is accepted here--the policy which has been 
called a "soft" entry into the market economy. Time has shown 
that this was a justified policy. Over this period the residents 
of the republic have managed to better prepare for the complex 
conditions of the future market economy and have not lost 
interest in economic reforms that are being conducted. By now 
the feasibility of such a policy has also been acknowledged in 
Russia; by now they have also started to operate in Russia in 
the mode of what they call "containing moderate inflation." By 
now it is already possible to say that the policy of state 
regulation of the process of transition to a market economy has 
proven itself. 
  However, this was the very initial stage of structural 
changes. We are now entering the next stage, in which more 
radical actions are required. 
  It was precisely from this standpoint that we have developed 
over the last few months the draft "Main Directions for the 
Economic Development of the Republic of Tatarstan in Keeping 
With the New Constitution of the Republic of Tatarstan." This 
programmatic document, whose text has been presented to you, 
esteemed deputies, analyzes the status and potential for 
economic development in the Republic of Tatarstan, specifies the 
main tasks facing each sector and the economy as a whole, and 
indicates ways to solve difficult problems that will arise in 
the social and cultural areas of the life of the people with the 
establishment of market relations. The draft Main 
Directions...were developed by a group of scientists of the 
republic and specialists of the Cabinet of Ministers. I would 
say that the document has been presented to you, so to say, for 
the "first reading"; it needs major revisions and the 
participation of all who would want to submit their proposals 
and remarks. 
  "The Action Program of the Republic of Tatarstan Government 
for Organizing the Execution of the Treaty Between the Russian 
Federation and the Republic of Tatarstan 'On Delineation of 
Jurisdiction and Mutual Delegation of Powers Between Organs of 
State Power of the Russian Federation and the Republic of 
Tatarstan'" is the second most significant document for the 
operation of the government which has been developed and 
approved by the Cabinet of Ministers. The successful 
implementation of this program...depends to a considerable 
degree on the continuous operation of the relevant coordinating 
and monitoring organ, for example, a bilateral commission for 
execution of provisions of the interstate treaty and 
intergovernmental agreements. During a visit of President of the 
Russian Federation B. Yeltsin to the Republic of Tatarstan, 
President of the Republic of Tatarstan M. Shaymiyev made a 
proposal, and the decision was made to set up such a commission 
headed by O. Soskovets, first deputy of the Russian Federation 
Government [title as published], and M. Sabirov, prime minister 
of the Republic of Tatarstan. 
  The third document is a natural continuation of the two 
above. The Cabinet of Ministers was instructed to develop this 
document by a decree of the Republic of Tatarstan Supreme Soviet 
dated 21 April 1994; consideration of the draft has been put on 
the agenda of the current session. At issue are "Priority 
Measures for Stabilizing the Economy of the Republic of 
Tatarstan." 
  What is the explanation for the need to take these measures 
at this particular time? 
  First, the explanation is that we are embarking on a period 
of radicalization and acceleration of economic reform. 
  Second, a new period of structural changes raises a number 
of 
issues in the social sphere, too. 
  Third, output is continuing to decline in the industry of 
the 
republic. 
  We can no longer reassure ourselves with the fact that this 
decline is smaller than in most regions of the Russian 
Federation. 
  Compared to the corresponding period of last year, the 
decline in the volume of production of output came to 29.8 
percent in January through April 1994. The decline was greatest 
at enterprises of the defense complex (47 percent), 
machine-building (34.6 percent), chemistry and petrochemistry 
(34.1 percent), the construction materials industry (48.8 
percent), and light industry (43.4 percent). 
  The generation of electricity fell by 25.8 percent, oil 
output--by 25.9 percent, output of gas--by 16.7 percent, 
polyethylene--by 18.5 percent, synthetic rubber--by 37.4 
percent, car tires--by 32.3 percent, and trucks--by 61.6 percent. 
  The volume of capital construction declined considerably. 
Some 76,400 square meters of total floor space in residential 
buildings were commissioned out of all sources of financing (24 
percent less than during the corresponding period of last year). 
Builders of single-family houses commissioned 237 houses with a 
total floor space of 23,200 square meters (12 percent less). 
  Output of consumer goods fell by 10.5 percent, and of 
nonfood 
goods--by 26.7 percent. To be sure, examples could be given in 
this instance which indicate the beginning of some kind of 
stabilization. For example, the volume of output of foodstuffs 
increased somewhat (3.5 percent); the production of sugar, 
butter, cheese, flour, cereals, and a number of other foodstuffs 
was up. 
  The situation at defense enterprises located in the republic 
continues to deteriorate. Compared to 1991, the volume of 
production at these enterprises in comparable prices fell by a 
factor of almost two. In the process, the relative proportion of 
military output at one-half of enterprises fell by a factor of 
four to five on average, and by a factor of two to three at the 
remaining enterprises. As of 1 May 1994 the external debt of 
enterprises, scientific research institutes, and design bureaus 
came to R165 billion. 
  The process of conversion is not developing easily, either. 
The proportion of products manufactured in 1993 and mastered 
under conversion programs ranges between 0.7 and 10 percent at 
seven enterprises and between 16 and 20 percent at six 
enterprises; only at three enterprises does it exceed 25 percent. 
  The general nonpayments crisis which has spread to the 
Russian Federation and CIS countries has been an unfavorable 
influence on the entire economy of our republic. The volume of 
accounts payable by the enterprises and organizations of the 
republic on the whole came to about R4 trillion as of 1 May; 
accounts receivable come to about R3 trillion. Overdue arrears 
in the payment of wages by enterprises and organizations 
increased. 
  Critical situations bordering on bankruptcy have developed 
at 
some enterprises as a result of the short-sighted economic 
policies of their managers in adjusting to market conditions. 
They include Polimerfoto, Santekhpribor, the Almetyevsk 
Spiral-Seamed Pipe Plant, the imeni Lenin Scientific Production 
Association, and Radiopribor. 
  The nonpayments crisis was the main reason for a shortfall 
in 
the intake of revenues by the republic budget. In the republic 
as a whole just over R500 billion was taken in in five months of 
this year, or less than 18 percent of the yearly total. The 
republic budget took in 16 percent of the yearly total instead 
of the computed 41.6 percent. The tentative shortfall over five 
months exceeded R500 billion. As a result of this, funding was 
provided at the rate 25-30 percent of the needs of sectors. 
  For the first time, arrears in the payment of wages to 
employees of institutions and organizations financed from the 
budget over a long period of time developed in the republic. 
Capital construction was funded at minimal rates; there were 
delays in the payment of subsidies for the output of animal 
husbandry and in settlements for products sold at regulated 
prices. 
  Owing to the joint actions of the government and assistance 
from a number of financial organs of the Republic of Tatarstan 
and the Russian Federation, funds were procured and existing 
arrears in the payment of wages to employees of institutions 
financed from the budget were eliminated through April 
inclusive. The government settled on its debts to construction 
personnel through the Capital Construction Administration of the 
Cabinet of Ministers for 1993 and in part for the first quarter 
of this year. Monetary funds were also provided for the payment 
of a proportion of arrears in subsidies for the delivered 
products of animal husbandry, which made it possible to pay 
wages to the employees of kolkhozes and sovkhozes for February 
and March, and in part for April. The remainder will be paid for 
in bills of exchange within days. 
  Esteemed deputies! 
  The existing situation predetermines the need to take urgent 
decisive measures to cure the economy, enhance economic reforms, 
change the orientation of property, and support 
entrepreneurship--I would say productive and creative 
entrepreneurship. What measures are proposed to this end? 
  In the area of privatization, denationalization, and support 
for entrepreneurship, the task is being set to convert up to 70 
percent of state and municipal property into private property 
before the end of 1994. To this end it is necessary: 
  --to adopt the State Privatization Program for 1994 and for 
the long term until 1997, as well as the Republic of Tatarstan 
Law "On Amendments and Additions to the Republic of Tatarstan 
Law 'On Transformation of State and Municipal Property in the 
Republic of Tatarstan (On Denationalization and Privatization)'"; 
  --to complete the conversion of enterprises in the sphere of 
material production to joint-stock operations; 
  --within three to five months to sell at auctions and 
through 
competitions up to 50 percent of the enterprises in trade, the 
service sector, and public catering; 
  --to carry out the secondary emission of shares at 
privatized 
enterprises. 
  In 1994-1995 it is planned to put up for sale on 
international markets the shares of the joint-stock companies 
Tatneft, Nizhnekamskneftekhim, Nizhnekamskshina, the Chistopol 
Watch Plant, Orgsintez, the KVPO [expansion not identified], the 
KMPO [expansion not identified], and others. It is planned to 
include in the process of privatization new facilities and 
enterprises whose privatization was previously banned or which 
did not take part in privatization; to expand the listing of 
facilities whose privatization is mandatory due to the addition 
of real estate and parcels of land occupied by privatized 
enterprises; to organize the conduct of priority privatization 
of enterprises subsidized by the state, as well as bankrupt and 
unprofitable enterprises and those with low profit margins; to 
sell through investment competitions and sales sessions 
previously unsold blocs of shares which have been retained as 
state (municipal) property. 
  It is planned to effect in stages the transfer of 
sociocultural facilities and municipal and consumer services 
assigned to privatized enterprises with the right of full 
economic administration to the balance sheets of municipal 
enterprises specifically established for this purpose; to create 
in the republic a market for housing in 1994-1995; to organize a 
system of agencies for the acquisition and sale of housing, 
mortgage (lien) banks, condominiums (association of owners of 
housing), and other institutions of a market infrastructure in 
the housing sphere. 
  We should develop a mechanism and embark on the sale of land 
to be privately owned, including sales to foreign individuals 
and legal entities, and pass the "Law on Concessions and 
Concession Operations." Furthermore, it is necessary to attract 
strategic investors through investment and commercial 
competitions and to step up post-privatization support for 
enterprises and the formation of stock market institutions. 
  We should also speed up the adoption of a most important 
document--the Program of State Support for and Development of 
Entrepreneurship, the draft of which has already been handed out 
to you. 
  Esteemed people's deputies! 
  With a view to creating conditions giving manufacturers an 
incentive to produce competitive products and stabilizing the 
economy of the republic as a whole on a competitive basis, it is 
necessary to seriously revise our financial and credit policy. 
In this area the government proposes: 
  to reduce the rates of the profit tax by 10 to 15 percent as 
of 1 July 1994; 
  to reduce the tax rate by 0.5 percentage points for each 
percentage point of the growth of output of products or types of 
services, which will facilitate the growth of the output of 
products; 
  to reduce property tax to 0.1 percent of the taxable base, 
primarily for enterprises of the military-industrial complex; 
  to develop and enact on 1 January 1995 the Law of the 
Republic of Tatarstan "On the Tax System in the Republic of 
Tatarstan," building into it a further reduction in tax rates, a 
decrease in the number of taxes, and differentiation and 
simplification of collection procedures; 
  to enact the developed and submitted draft Edict of the 
Republic of Tatarstan President "On Statutory Penalties for 
Violations of Tax Legislation," which is aimed at ensuring 
timely and complete intake of payments to the budget, the tax 
inspectorate being granted the right to collect tax arrears of 
enterprises and organizations without recourse; 
  to provide for the collection of contract penalties from 
commercial banks which have exceeded the maximum duration for 
processing of payment documents in the amount of 1 percent for 
each day of delay; in the event of above-the-norm time of action 
on payment documents, the above sanctions against banks shall be 
doubled; 
  to envision an opportunity for enterprises to pay 90 percent 
of the arrears to the budget while leaving 10 percent at their 
disposal, creating out of them a reserve to meet urgent needs, 
primarily to pay wages; 
  to grant the Cabinet of Ministers the right to exempt 
enterprises from the assessment of fines and sanctions against 
them in the event they are not financed from the budget in a 
timely manner. 
  The Credit Commission is being created under the government 
with a view to the efficient use of credit resources. Use of the 
circulation of bills of exchange in the Republic of Tatarstan is 
being expanded substantially. A system of measures to enhance 
the influence of banks on the economy is envisioned. 
  The number of state government staffs will be reduced. The 
level of wages of executives in all types of economic 
operations, including the banking system, will be influenced 
through the tax system. 
  Accomplishing the task of curing the economy is hampered by 
the fact that the progress of structural transformations at 
large enterprises that manufacture more than three-quarters of 
the republic's industrial output is extremely slow. A special 
fund needs to be established in order to speed up structural 
transformations at such enterprises. The moneys of funds for 
scientific research and experimental design work, part of the 
money of the employment fund, and a proportion of foreign 
exchange proceeds should be subordinated to the same objective. 
The State Committee of the Republic of Tatarstan for the Economy 
has developed methods for the competitive selection of business 
projects with the greatest market effectiveness. The 
implementation of many projects that have already been selected 
must ensure the sufficiently quick recoupment of funds and the 
replenishment of budget revenues. 
  An effort to inventory the existing prior accomplishments in 
scientific development and experimental design work was also 
undertaken in the republic, together with examination of the 
potential for using them for the scientific-technical 
development of economic sectors in the Republic of Tatarstan. An 
expert review of all submitted conversion and innovation 
projects was also administered. 
  The main emphasis in innovation and conversion policies has 
been laid on: 
  --development of processing sectors of the agro-industrial 
complex, perfection of oil production technologies, and 
development of oil-refining sectors; 
  --reinforcement of the equipment pool of health care, 
development of the construction industry, reinforcement of the 
equipment pool and raw material supply of light industry; 
resolution of ecological issues and accomplishment of tasks in 
the rational use of nature; 
  --development of electronics and data processing, 
introduction of a "cellular" communications system throughout 
the republic, support for accelerated production of instruments 
and automation devices for various fields of operation, new 
structural and functional materials and up-to-date technologies 
of fine synthesis; 
  --creation of civil aviation and merchant marine. 
  Jointly with the Russian Federation Ministry of Defense and 
the Russian Federation Ministry of the Economy it is necessary 
for us to: 
  --determine shortly assignments for the production 
(development) of defense materiel, pay arrears for military 
products manufactured in 1993, and make advance payments on 1994 
orders; 
  --finance special-purpose federal conversion programs 
(production of the Tu-204, Tu-200M, and Tu-330 aircraft, Mi-38 
helicopter, and a number of others); 
  --introduce a mechanism of reorganization (bankruptcy) of 
enterprises of the military-industrial complex. 
  The Cabinet of Ministers believes that the fundamental, 
long-term interests of Tatarstan require that we support 
enterprises that have promising programs and are capable of 
becoming pillars of its economy within the next three to five 
years, including from the standpoint of expanding the exports of 
the products of machine building. These are primarily 
aviation-related enterprises--the KAPO [expansion not 
identified], the KVPO, the KMPO, and Elektronpribor. The 
programs of the KOMZ [expansion not identified], the imeni 
Gorkiy Plant, Terminal, and Elekon may also be viewed as 
promising. Besides, the KMPO, Elekon, as well as Soyuz, 
Aviamotor, and the imeni Tupolev ANTK [expansion not identified] 
have largely geared their conversion programs to solving the 
problems of introducing progressive (industrial) technologies in 
the agro-industrial complex, which also necessitates providing 
assistance to them. 
  Therefore, the government is abandoning the principle of 
distributing resources to all enterprises and is switching to 
concentrating resources on effective programs, i.e. providing 
selective support. 
  In addition to the joint measures with the Russian 
Federation 
enumerated above, the measures of the Republic of Tatarstan 
Government with regard to individual large 
associations--Tatneft, Nizhnekamskshina, Nizhnekamskneftekhim, 
YelAZ [Yelabuga Automotive Plant], and others--are also geared 
toward selective support. The holding company 
Tatneftekhiminvestkholding must start operations. 
  The formation of industrial and finance groups must become 
an 
important instrument for supporting a structural policy and 
making an adjustment to the market economy. There are 
interesting proposals to this end. 
  Dropping volumes of material production, capital 
construction, and other sectors, as well as changes in the 
structure of output of the military-industrial complex and the 
growth of rates for transportation services have entailed a 
reduction in the volume of freight carriage by public-use motor 
vehicles. Compared to 1990, the volume of carriage in 1993 fell 
by 53.5 percent. The decline has continued this year. For this 
reason the government considers it feasible to break up the 
existing motor vehicle pools, create alternative structures with 
various forms of ownership, and auction off some of the existing 
pool of vehicles and equipment of large trucking enterprises. 
  In recent years the formation of a new agrarian structure 
began based on large state, collective, and joint-stock 
agricultural enterprises, associations, and agrarian companies. 
The development of farming which draws on private property and 
expansion of the individual sector are underway. A legal 
foundation for land legislation currently exists, which may lay 
the groundwork for the emergence of a mixed economy in rural 
areas. The process of privatization is underway in the food and 
processing industries, with their monopoly position with regard 
to rural areas being simultaneously weakened. 
  At the same time, despite a certain growth in the volume of 
product output, agriculture is experiencing difficulties. 
  The transition to a mixed market economy and incentives for 
entrepreneurial operations call for speeding up the 
transformation of kolkhozes and sovkhozes, with this process to 
be completed in 1994 and 1995. Implementation of land reform 
will also be accelerated. 
  In conjunction with changes that occurred after the adoption 
of the Constitution of the Republic of Tatarstan, it is 
necessary to make amendments and additions to legislative 
documents, envisioning in them the right to buy and sell land, 
the size of private holdings of land, and so on. 
  The State Fund for purchasing seasonal agricultural products 
will be established with a view to timely conduct of settlements 
for them. It will be possible to make advance payments for the 
acquisition of grain, sugar beets, potatoes, vegetables, seeds 
of oleiferous crops, grass meal, wool, and so on. 
  It is also expected to keep state support for the rural 
producers of goods in the form of selective breeding, seed 
production, pedigree maintenance, improvements in the fertility 
of land, the acquisition of mixed feed for large livestock 
breeding complexes and poultry farms, the development of 
science, cadre training, road construction, the social 
infrastructure, and gas and power supply in rural areas. 
  With a view to accelerated development of the sectors of 
agricultural production, it is planned to expand the practice of 
establishing joint ventures with the use of foreign capital. The 
production of wheat for table use in keeping with intensive 
technologies will be organized in order for the republic to be 
self-sufficient in it. It is planned to complete the 
construction of a plant near Kazan in order to produce oil and 
fat products from our own raw materials. 
  It is envisioned to cancel certain republic-level management 
structures, as well as to cut back the management staff of the 
Ministry of Agriculture and Foodstuffs of the Republic of 
Tatarstan in order to perfect the management system of the 
sector and expenditures for its maintenance. 
  It is proposed that effective 1 July of this year the 
regulation of prices for foodstuffs, with the exception of meat 
and dairy products, bread and baked products, and baby foods, be 
canceled in order to stabilize production of foodstuffs and 
their supply to the population of the republic, to protect jobs, 
and to replenish the resources of the budget in a stable manner. 
  It is necessary to sharply increase the number of sales 
outlets of enterprises of the food and processing industries in 
cities and rayon centers within a short period of time in order 
to improve the supply of an expanded assortment of foodstuffs to 
the population and the quality of service, as well as in order 
to speed up distribution of goods. It is planned to put in order 
the outside acquisition of foodstuffs with a view to giving an 
incentive to such enterprises. 
  It is proposed that a set of measures aimed at stabilizing 
the state of affairs in capital construction be carried out in 
order to preserve and develop the investment potential of the 
republic and perfect its operations in the environment of 
structural changes which are underway in the economy. 
  Housing will be built with budgetary funding mainly in order 
to provide housing for low-income citizens, those residing in 
dilapidated and condemned housing, handicapped veterans and 
participants in the Great Patriotic War, and others with acute 
needs. Heat supply, water supply, sewage treatment, and gas and 
power supply will be developed on a priority basis in the area 
of municipal facilities construction. In the area of building 
health-care, public-education, and cultural facilities, funding 
will be allocated solely for the completion of facilities under 
construction. 
  It is envisioned that facilities for production purposes 
will 
be funded from the budget only on the basis of the competitive 
presentation of projects, taking into account their high 
effectiveness, construction schedules, and the need of the 
market in the product it is expected to produce. In the process, 
funding will be allocated primarily to develop enterprises 
associated with the production of consumer goods, completion of 
the production of building materials in progress, carrying out 
of the conversion program, and resolution of ecological issues. 
The construction of large facilities will be carried out on the 
basis of holding preliminary tenders for contractor 
organizations. 
  It has been proposed that special attention be paid to the 
problem of reducing the volume of unfinished construction 
projects, primarily at facilities that are fully or partially 
financed from the republic budget. It is planned to speed up the 
process of inventorying unfinished facilities under 
construction. Based on the results, a listing of acutely needed 
construction projects in progress and measures for their 
completion will be specified, proceeding from the realistic 
potential of financial support. All other facilities without 
arranged funding and with no promise of prompt completion will 
be sold at public trading sessions, both on the condition that 
their specialization be preserved and for further use at the 
discretion of the buyers. 
  The laying of a legislative foundation for investment policy 
is among priority measures. A number of draft laws of the 
Republic of Tatarstan have been developed: "On Investment 
Activities in the Republic of Tatarstan," "On Mortgages," and 
"On Investment Tax Credit." 
  We must develop and implement comprehensive measures in 
order 
to attract foreign investment, in particular, pass the Law of 
the Republic of Tatarstan "On Free Economic Zones in the 
Republic of Tatarstan." This would invigorate our foreign 
economic activities to a considerable degree. 
  A competitive selection of investment projects of a 
production, social, and scientific-technical nature will be made 
on an annual basis with a view to the subsequent attraction of 
foreign investment in the projects selected. At present, 
preparations are underway for an investment forum in Vienna that 
will be held by the UN Specialized Industrial Development 
Organization (UNIDO) and to which the Republic of Tatarstan has 
been invited. 
  The creation of certain new structures--investment 
companies, 
investment banks, and companies for insuring investment--is 
planned in order to support investment activities. 
  The establishment of enterprises with foreign investment is 
one of the forms of attracting foreign capital. At present, we 
have more than 120 such enterprises. However, despite the rapid 
growth of the number of joint enterprises, their contribution to 
structural changes in the economy, implementation of large-scale 
investment projects, and production of competitive goods and 
services remains insufficient. They also need support from the 
state and certain relief. 
  It is planned to take a set of measures in order to draw 
foreign investors into the process of privatization, to 
stimulate the acquisition of enterprise stock by foreign 
investors and their participation in auctions and competitions 
in order to acquire the facilities put up for sale at them. In 
conjunction with this we will have to select the most 
prestigious units of real estate to be sold for hard currency, 
with their cost tentatively appraised in prices accepted in 
Western countries. Facilities under construction will also be 
included among such facilities. 
  We should introduce in practice the transfer of property by 
way of concession in order to attract foreign capital. To this 
end it is necessary to urgently approve the Law "On Concession 
Contracts Signed With Foreign Investors," the draft of which has 
been developed. 
  A concession contract amounts to leasing minerals, parcels 
of 
land, enterprises, and other facilities owned by the state or 
municipalities for operation under certain conditions. 
  Foreign investors demand guarantees for the return of 
capital 
and generation of profits. For this reason the government of the 
Republic of Tatarstan proposes, as one of the priority measures, 
to pass the Law "On Pledges and the Pledge Fund of the Republic 
of Tatarstan" and to establish the pledge fund of the republic, 
which will make it possible to give foreign investors reliable 
guarantees when they invest capital in the development of the 
economy in the Republic of Tatarstan. 
  Esteemed deputies! 
  As we complete the presentation of key measures to stabilize 
the economy of the Republic of Tatarstan, the following should 
be said. 
  First. Budget revenues can be increased by R60 billion by 
implementing conversion and innovation programs. 
  Second. The sale of up to 50 percent of enterprises of 
trade, 
the sphere of services, and public catering through auctions and 
competitions during the second half of the year will tentatively 
contribute to the budget upwards of 250 billion extra rubles. 
  Third. Restoration of the monopoly on production and trade 
in 
vodka and liquor products and sale of accumulated stocks at 
somewhat reduced retail prices will allow us to make up the loss 
of excise revenue to the budget in the amount of about R120 
billion. 
  Fourth. The introduction of heat, water, and gas metering 
will make it possible to reduce the size of state subsidies by 
more than R30 billion. 
  Fifth. Reform of the management structure and cutbacks in 
the 
number of employees on the staff of state organs by 10-15 
percent and of the quantity of official passenger cars will 
reduce budgetary expenditures by R20 billion. 
  Sixth. Streamlining of the number and remuneration of 
employees in the sphere financed from the budget, repeal of 
departmental acts concerning wages, and extension of a uniform 
pay scale rate to enterprises at which subsidies from the budget 
account for a considerable proportion will make it possible to 
save more than R100 billion in budgetary funds. 
  Seventh. Recovery of existing arrears from enterprises will 
make it possible to collect additionally no less than R100 
billion. 
  Therefore, the measures enumerated above will make it 
possible to substantially reduce the budget deficit and support 
manufacturers. 
  Esteemed deputies! 
  As I stressed earlier, implementation of the measures to 
cure 
the economy that have been offered for your attention will be 
closely associated with the resolution of a number of social 
issues, and with the need to defend both the employed population 
of the Republic of Tatarstan and those not involved in active 
labor. 
  In implementing the principles of the social policy which is 
being pursued in the Republic of Tatarstan, the Republic of 
Tatarstan Cabinet of Ministers hereby proposes to establish the 
indicator of a minimum consumer budget as a social norm 
determining the standard of living of the population. The draft 
Law of the Republic of Tatarstan "On the Minimum Consumer Budget 
in the Republic of Tatarstan" has been developed in conjunction 
with this. The introduction of the indicator of the minimum 
consumer budget as a social benchmark calls for making 
amendments and additions to the Program of Targeted Social 
Protection for the Population of the Republic of Tatarstan. With 
this in view, a draft of the Decree of the Republic of Tatarstan 
Supreme Soviet "On Amendments and Additions to the Program of 
Targeted Social Protection for the Population of the Republic of 
Tatarstan" has been prepared. 
  The growth trend in unemployment requires that the Program 
for Facilitating the Employment of the Population which has been 
developed by the government be approved. The program provides 
for allocation of easy credit to create jobs not only at state 
enterprises but also in the sphere of small and medium-size 
businesses. 
  In view of the unceasing stream of refugees and forced 
migrants entering the republic, as well as for the purpose of 
overcoming the unfavorable consequences of spontaneously 
developing migratory processes, it has become acutely necessary 
to regulate the latter. To this end it is planned to promptly 
complete the development of the draft Law of the Republic of 
Tatarstan "On Refugees and Forced Migrants," as well as to 
complete the establishment of the Migration Service of the 
Republic of Tatarstan. 
  Esteemed people's deputies! 
  The measures developed by the government to cure the economy 
were extensively discussed on the eve of the session. Group 
conferences were held in the rayons and cities of Tatarstan. 
People's deputies, managers, practitioners, economic scholars, 
employees of defense enterprises, and trade unions took part in 
the discussion. A joint conference of the Presidium of the 
Academy of Sciences of Tatarstan and the collegium of the State 
Committee for the Economy was held. An expanded meeting of the 
Cabinet of Ministers was held with the participation of the 
Republic of Tatarstan president and the chairman of the Republic 
of Tatarstan Supreme Soviet. 
  On the whole, the proposed measures gained support during 
these meetings. Also, a great many businesslike proposals, 
pieces of advice, and critical remarks were voiced, a great 
proportion of which the government took into account. 
  Successful implementation of "Priority Measures for 
Stabilizing the Economy of the Republic of Tatarstan" which have 
been developed by the Cabinet of Ministers calls for preparing 
specific regulatory acts on a tight schedule: laws of the 
Republic of Tatarstan, edicts of the Republic of Tatarstan 
president, and decrees of the Republic of Tatarstan Cabinet of 
Ministers. 
  I appeal to you, the Republic of Tatarstan Supreme Soviet, 
with a request to expedite your portion of work. For its part, 
the Cabinet of Ministers will take all the necessary steps in 
order for the programmatic document under review today to have 
an impact as soon and as effectively as possible. 
  Thank you for your attention. 
  Ikhtibarygyz echen rekhmet [phrase transliterated from 
Tatar]. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47017 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tatarstan Decree on Stabilizing Economy </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tatarstan Decree on Stabilizing Economy </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0821A Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA in Russian 11 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0821A </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["Decree of the Supreme Soviet of the Republic of Tatarstan: </F>
On Priority Measures To Stabilize the Economy of the Republic of 
Tatarstan"] 
  [Text] The Supreme Soviet of the Republic of Tatarstan 
resolves: 
  1. To assume as a basis the "Priority Measures To Stabilize 
the Economy of the Republic of Tatarstan" drawn up and presented 
by the Government of the Republic of Tatarstan. 
  2. To instruct the Cabinet of Ministers of the Republic of 
Tatarstan to study the proposals and observations submitted by 
the people's deputies and also the findings of the standing 
commissions of the Supreme Soviet of the Republic of Tatarstan, 
to adopt the necessary measures, and to report at the next 
session of the Supreme Soviet of the Republic of Tatarstan. 
  3. That the Government of the Republic of Tatarstan shall, 
in 
accordance with the Constitution of the Republic of Tatarstan, 
the treaty of the Russian Federation and the Republic of 
Tatarstan "Delineation of Terms of Reference and the Mutual 
Delegation of Authority Between Organs of State Power of the 
Russian Federation and Organs of State Power of the Republic of 
Tatarstan," and the "Priority Measures To Stabilize the Economy 
of the Republic of Tatarstan," that have been assumed as a 
basis, draw up a State Program of Economic and Social Progress 
of the Republic of Tatarstan and present it to the Supreme 
Soviet of the Republic of Tatarstan in October 1994. 
  4. To exclude in connection with the adoption of this decree 
clause 2 of the decree of the Supreme Soviet of the Republic of 
Tatarstan of 21 April 1994 "Procedure of the Implementation of 
the Law of the Republic of Tatarstan 'Budget System of the 
Republic of Tatarstan for 1994.'" 
  To consider clauses 3, 4, and 5 of the said decree clauses 
2, 
3, and 4 respectively. 
  [Signed] F. Mukhametshin, chairman of the Supreme Soviet of 
the Republic of Tatarstan 
  Kazan, 8 June 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47018 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   8 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tatarstan Premier's Economic Plan Critiqued </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tatarstan Premier's Economic Plan Critiqued </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0793A Kazan RESPUBLIKA TATARSTAN in Russian 8 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0793A </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan RESPUBLIKA TATARSTAN </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yelena Taran: "Will Glass Recycling Centers </F>
Rescue the Economy of the Republic?"] 
  [Text] Had the government of the republic come up with such 
economic stabilization measures as recently as two years ago, 
the prime minister would have perhaps become a national hero, 
and deputies would have greeted each new proposal of the Cabinet 
of Ministers with loud applause. However, at the current, 20th 
extraordinary session of the Supreme Soviet, the deputies 
listened to M.G. Sabirov's report even without particular 
attention: Either they knew ahead of time what he was going to 
say, or they had already decided for themselves how they were 
going to vote. 
  Indeed, in the opinion of many deputies the proposed 
measures 
for rescuing the economy are...about two years late. One would 
think that the prime minister also understands this; responding 
to questions from the members of parliament, he admitted that 
the government also needed time to adapt itself to the market 
economy and to rise to the understanding of its postulates. 
  The government proposes to reduce the tax on profits by 10 
to 
15 percent. However, this will hardly make the position of 
enterprises easier since profits have dropped to minimal levels. 
The striving to attract foreign investment may remain mere 
wishful thinking: Foreign businessmen are somehow not 
particularly eager to invest funds in enterprises which are 
burdened by unpaid credit and a tremendous social 
infrastructure. Besides, noted Deputy I. Sultanov, would 
investors want to buy the shares of our enterprises if the state 
has controlling interest, or if the state has only one share, 
but it is the "golden share?" In addition, the deputies 
themselves appear to not be particularly interested in the 
inflow of foreign capital since, according to an apt remark by 
Deputy G. Kobelev, they are unable to spare half an hour in 
order to review the amendments of the Republic of Tatarstan 
president to the law on foreign investment. 
  The accelerated small-scale privatization is another remedy 
which the government of the republic has prescribed to our 
economy. It has been planned to sell up to 50 (!) percent of 
shops, cafes, and consumer service enterprises within three to 
five months. In the opinion of a number of deputies, the 
intentions of the Cabinet of Ministers are dubious, and here is 
why. In the two previous years we succeeded in privatizing no 
more than 15 percent of trade facilities, consumer services, and 
public catering, despite the menacing decrees, programs, and 
edicts of the president; we have not completed their 
commercialization (that is, have not even opened accounts for 
them); we have kept trade directorates and associations as the 
bastions of the old system of organization in the sector. How 
are we to restructure, within this short period proposed by the 
government, things that in individual countries and regions of 
the Russian Federation were restructured over years? 
  However, as they criticized the government, the deputies in 
all honesty did not make a great constructive contribution 
themselves. Let us set aside the concern with hormonal 
contraceptives and glass recycling centers which was voiced by 
the deputies (both are important in their own right, but was it 
worthwhile to talk about them in the course of discussing the 
program?). 
  The deputies suggested that prior to making decisions the 
Cabinet of Ministers compute financial flows, the amount of 
money that we take out of the republic, and the financial 
resources we could find and earn at home. Of course, it is not 
wartime, but the situation is difficult, and as A. Shtanin put 
it, it would be good to "scrape the nooks" just as we did in 
those hungry years. It is hard to disagree with T. Abdullin, who 
brought to the attention of the prime minister the fact that the 
government, carried away by centralized credit, is increasing 
the external debt of the republic. This may cause us to be 
simply unable to pursue an independent economic policy in the 
immediate future. Deputy I. Salakhov sees the resolution of 
problems as rooted in the decentralization of management and 
property, and Deputy A. Yefremov--as rooted in restoring 
elementary order and eliminating mismanagement. 
  Republic of Tatarstan President M. Shaymiyev, speaking in 
summation, asked the parliament to give the Cabinet of Ministers 
an opportunity to carry out the planned measures. In particular, 
he invited the attention of the Cabinet of Ministers to the need 
to support entrepreneurship and develop the circulation of bills 
of exchange. At present, the situation is such that commercial 
structures are beginning to play a leadership role in generating 
budgetary revenues, and may be helpful in solving the problem of 
unemployment and organizing efficient production facilities. Why 
are we being cautious--do we fail to fully understand, or are we 
afraid of the market economy toward which we are proceeding? 
  Incidentally, individual deputies badly wanted to shift the 
discussion of the issue of measures to stabilize the economy to 
a different area, namely, to engage in a debate on the 
resignation of the government. Moreover, some just could not 
wait to see how the president and the Cabinet of Ministers, the 
prime minister and his deputies would clash in full view of the 
entire republic. Thank God, the spectacle did not happen on the 
first two days. Let us hope that it will not happen during 
subsequent days either: Our situation is too difficult for 
political games to be staged. 
  The current session also considered a package of laws and 
decrees on social issues, of which a raise in the minimum 
remuneration for labor to R50,000 was the principal. Previously 
the deputies greeted all proposals of the government as to the 
growth of the "minimum" with "hoorays" and were even proud of 
this indicator in Tatarstan being higher than in Russia, whereas 
this time the arguments of Deputy Prime Minister R. Muratov got 
through to the parliament with difficulty. The deputies are 
primarily concerned about enterprises being unable to ensure 
this level of minimum salaries, and this bringing about a new 
wave of hidden and obvious unemployment and reductions in budget 
revenues. Wage outlays will have to be passed on in the 
self-cost of products, whose prices have approached world levels 
to begin with. 
  President M. Shaymiyev made an absolutely unambiguous 
statement on this: Whether we allow the further impoverishment 
of the population to occur will depend on whether we go for a 
raise in the "minimum." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47019 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tatarstan Decree on Social Protection </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tatarstan Decree on Social Protection </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0821B Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA in Russian 11 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0821B </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["Decree of the Supreme Soviet of the Republic of Tatarstan: </F>
On Revisions and Addenda to the Program of Targeted Social 
Protection of the Population of the Republic of Tatarstan"] 
  [Text] For the improvement and development of the Program 
of Targeted Social Protection of the Population of the Republic 
of Tatarstan the Supreme Soviet of the Republic of Tatarstan 
resolves: 
  1. To make the following revisions and addenda to the 
Program 
of Targeted Social Protection of the Population of the Republic 
of Tatarstan approved by the decree of the Supreme Soviet of the 
Republic of Tatarstan of 23 March 1993: 
  to make the preamble to the Program read as follows: 
  "The Program of Targeted Social Protection of the Population 
of the Republic of Tatarstan was drawn up in accordance with 
Decree 1552-XII of the Supreme Soviet of the Republic of 
Tatarstan of 9 July 1992 'On Progress of Fulfillment of the 
Decree of the Supreme Soviet of the Republic of Tatarstan of 19 
April 1991 "On Measures for Social Protection of the Population 
of the Republic of Tatarstan."' It is an integral part of the 
socioeconomic policy being pursued by the Government and the 
Supreme Soviet of the Republic of Tatarstan. 
  "Social protection of the population of the Republic of 
Tatarstan provides for a sum total of legislatively enshrined 
legal, economic, and social safeguards ensuring observance of 
the most important social rights and the creation of the 
conditions for the achievement of a socially acceptable living 
standard of the populace. It incorporates the realization of 
state social safeguards (minimum wage and minimum pensions, 
grants, and other social payments), the preservation of current 
and the creation of new jobs, support for enterprise, targeted 
social support of the urban and rural population and other 
sociodemographic groups, the pursuit of an effective 
financial-credit and tax policy, the structural reorganization 
of the economic system, and the creation of market mechanisms. 
  "The socioeconomic situation in the republic in the first 
half of 1994 has been characterized by a continuing decline in 
output in industry, a nonpayments crisis, an ineffective 
financial-credit and tax policy, and the lagging of the rate of 
growth of personal income behind the requisite level. 
  "A trend toward a relative decline in the rate of growth of 
personal income has been observed since the start of the current 
year. 
  "Average wages in the Republic of Tatarstan in December 1993 
constituted R128,100, in April 1994, R142,700 (in the Russian 
Federation R141,200 and R171,500 respectively). 
  "Per capita income in December 1993 constituted R81,700, in 
April 1994, R90,200 (R84,000 and R124,000 respectively in the 
Russian Federation). The living standard assessed as the ratio 
of per capita income to the value of the subsistence minimum 
showed a tendency to increase in 1993, but it declined in the 
first quarter of 1994. The main reason for the decline in 
society's living standard is the insufficient growth of personal 
income. 
  "The proportion of the population with income no lower than 
the subsistence level constitutes 11.2 percent, and above the 
subsistence level, but below the minimum consumer budget, 56 
percent, and 4.3 percent of the population is in the category of 
people with a high and very high income. 
  "As of the start of realization of the Program of Targeted 
Social Protection of the Population of the Republic of Tatarstan 
the numbers of the populace in receipt of compensation payments 
constituted 57.6 percent, in March 1994, some 5.8 percent. 
  "In connection with the fact that the subsistence level 
determines the minimum permissible level of man's material 
security and characterizes the poverty line, it cannot be a 
reference point in the socioeconomic policy of the republic, it 
may be merely a stopping device. The need for the establishment 
of such a reference point is now urgent. The indicator of the 
minimum consumer budget should be such"; 
  that the section "Stage I of the Program of Targeted Social 
Protection of the Population of the Republic of Tatarstan" 
should read as follows: 
  "Stage I of the Program of Targeted Social Protection of the 
Population of the Republic of Tatarstan. 
  "The Program of Targeted Social Protection of the Population 
of the Republic of Tatarstan is based on the following 
principles of active social policy: 
  "the principle of a rise in the living standard of the 
population of the Republic of Tatarstan; 
  "the principle of equality in the social support of the 
urban 
and rural population; 
  "the principle of the employer's compulsory fulfillment of 
the guarantees of an employee wage level not less than the 
minimum consumer budget; 
  "the principle of the targeted nature and anticipation of 
assistance for inhabitants entitled to it; 
  "the principle of the comprehensiveness of assistance 
providing for the possibility of the allocation simultaneously 
of several types of assistance (monetary, in-kind, in the form 
of services or privileges); 
  "the principle of the independence of the local authorities, 
enterprises, and organizations in the rendering of social 
assistance to the public; 
  "the principle of a social response on the part of the 
government to a change in the living standard of the population 
of the republic. 
  "The following are envisaged for realization of the Program 
of Targeted Social Protection of the Population: 
  "the establishment as social norms determining the living 
standard of the rural and urban population and various 
sociodemographic groups of an average aggregate income per 
family member, including income from subsistence farming, and 
values of the subsistence level and the minimum consumer budget; 
  "a state guarantee assuring the employee a wage not less 
than 
the minimum consumer budget; 
  "a state guarantee assuring a level of income of families 
with children up to the age of 16 (for trainees of general 
educational institutions, up to the completion of their tuition 
and employment, but for no longer than two months following 
graduation from educational institutions) and of pregnant women 
as of 20 weeks of pregnancy in accordance with the minimum 
consumer budget, but not less than the subsistence level of 
these categories; 
  "a state guarantee assuring a level of income not less than 
the subsistence level for: 
  "nonworking recipients of all types of pensions, depending 
on 
the amount of the pension, with regard to the extra payments, 
increases, and sums of compensation established by current 
legislation; 
  "students and trainees studying with time off from work in 
general institutions of higher, secondary, and elementary 
vocational training; 
  "graduate students undergoing tuition with time off from 
work 
in a graduate studentship at general institutions of higher 
vocational training and research institutions. 
  "mothers on postnatal leave caring for a child until it has 
reached the age of three and nonworking women raising a child up 
to the age of three (or other relatives actually caring for the 
child); 
  "nonworking able-bodied persons caring for a handicapped 
child up to the age of 16 and raising three and more children up 
to the age of 16 (for trainees not in receipt of a grant, up to 
the age of 18); 
  "nonworking able-bodied persons caring for a Group I invalid 
and elderly persons who are in need of outside care (according 
to the findings of a medical institution) or who have reached 
the age of 80; and 
  "citizens deemed in the established procedure to be 
unemployed and also citizens undergoing, as assigned by the 
employment office, vocational training and retraining and skills 
improvement and in receipt of unemployment benefit (a grant); 
  "provision of children up to the age of two with special 
dairy foods and blends per doctors' prescriptions free, 
regardless of the family's per capita aggregate income; 
  "a health-improvement schedule for handicapped children, 
orphaned children and children under guardianship (in care), and 
children from families in which one parent or both are Group I 
and II invalids on free passes to sanatoriums, health and 
fitness centers, recreation centers, and children's 
health-improvement camps in accordance with medical evidence 
with 100 percent compensation of the cost of their travel by 
urban mass transit and river and rail transport and 50 percent 
of the cost of travel of the persons accompanying them to the 
locations of the health-improvement establishments from the 
resources of the republic budget of the Republic of Tatarstan; 
  "a gradual transition from the subsidizing of agricultural 
products and the services of passenger transport and housing and 
public utilities and enterprises supplying the public with fuel 
to targeted social support with regard to the social norms 
established in the subsistence level, for which the phased 
alignment in the course of 1994-1995 of the cost of foodstuffs 
and the amounts of the payment for municipal services and 
housing, fuel, and passenger transport (other than air, river, 
and railroad) with their actual cost is contemplated; 
  "an improvement in the mechanism of the allocation of 
targeted public assistance and the structure of administration 
of questions of social protection. For the comprehensive 
realization of the social protection of the populace the 
creation of city and district social protection centers 
coordinating the social security, social protection, and labor 
and employment authorities, territorial information centers, and 
other off-budget funds (branches of the Retirement Fund of the 
Russian Federation for the Republic of Tatarstan, the Employment 
Fund of the Republic of Tatarstan, the Tatar Regional 
Intersectoral Branch of the Social Insurance Fund of the Russian 
Federation, hospital funds, and public social support funds) and 
their provision with personnel; 
  "the introduction of supervision of observance of the 
interests of tenants (regardless of the forms of ownership of 
the accommodations they use) in the rendering of housing and 
municipal services; 
  "the formation of republic, city, and district data banks 
pertaining to the social protection of the population and the 
creation of territorial information centers in cities and 
districts in interaction with the tax authorities of the 
republic; 
  "the systematization of privileges for veterans and the 
handicapped and their enshrinement in legislation of the 
Republic of Tatarstan; 
  "an improvement in the system of the taxation of public 
organizations of veterans and the handicapped and their 
enterprises and also the republic and local funds for the 
targeted social support of the population and their enshrinement 
in legislation of the Republic of Tatarstan. 
  "Targeted social support provides for the allocation to 
needy 
inhabitants of the republic of sums of compensation (in monetary 
form or by check) and/or in-kind support in the form of basic 
necessities and services. 
  "Sums of compensation are paid to needy groups of society at 
enterprises and in organizations and at social protection 
(social security) authorities of cities and districts. The 
procedure of the payment of compensation is established by the 
Cabinet of Ministers of the Republic of Tatarstan. 
  "The Program of Targeted Social Protection of the Population 
of the Republic of Tatarstan is financed from resources of the 
funds for social support of the populace [line missing] Social 
Support of the Population of the Republic of Tatarstan and 
subsidies from the republic and local budgets and also 
off-budget funds (branches of the Retirement Fund of the Russian 
Federation for the Republic of Tatarstan, the Employment Fund of 
the Republic of Tatarstan and the Tatar Regional Intersectoral 
branch of the Social Insurance Fund of the Russian Federation, 
and so forth), and other sources as they so decide. 
  "The executive authorities of cities and districts may in 
individual cases decide questions of an increase in the amount 
of compensation for the inhabitants, for meals for trainees and 
students included, from the resources of local budgets and 
social support funds and also render the needy supplementary 
social assistance. 
  "Enterprises, organizations, and institutions, regardless of 
forms of ownership, may render their employees and their 
families social support (early pensionable retirement, pension, 
benefit, and meal supplements, and supplementary privileges and 
benefits) from their own funds. 
  "In the event of the infringement of the rights of the 
citizens in the allocation of sums of compensation and other 
types of social protection that have occasioned the nonreceipt 
or the receipt in less than the due amount of monetary or 
in-kind support and the nonallocation or allocation to less than 
the full extent of due services and privileges, the citizens may 
lodge an appeal against the actions of officials and social 
protection (social security) authorities with the local 
administration or the state authorities or in legal form. 
  "The Republic Commission for Realization of the Program of 
Targeted Social Protection of the Population of the Republic of 
Tatarstan shall coordinate the activity of the off-budget funds 
whose resources are channeled into the social protection of the 
populace for their more efficient use and shall examine and 
harmonize the decisions of the executive authorities influencing 
the social policy being pursued in the republic." 
  2. That the Cabinet of Ministers of the Republic of 
Tatarstan 
shall provide for the development of a mechanism of realization 
of the Program of Targeted Social Protection of the Population 
of the Republic of Tatarstan with regard to the revisions and 
addenda specified by this decree. 
  3. To recognize as invalid Decree 2003-XII of the Supreme 
Soviet of the Republic of Tatarstan of 20 October 1993 
"Revisions and Addenda to the Program of Targeted Social 
Protection of the Population of the Republic of Tatarstan." 
  [Signed] F. Mukhametshin, chairman of the Supreme Soviet of 
the Republic of Tatarstan. 
  Kazan, 8 June 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47020 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   8 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Distribution of Tatarstan Wage Fund Noted </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Distribution of Tatarstan Wage Fund Noted </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0793B Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA in Russian 8 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0793B </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by the Republic of Tatarstan Center for Social </F>
Problems: "What Wages Do We Receive?"] 
  [Text] The Center for Social Problems would like to offer 
for the attention of readers a graphic depiction of how, to 
whom, and in what proportion the monies of the labor 
remuneration fund are distributed. 
  Thus, if we take the average wage in April, R142,750, in 
keeping with the rules in effect as of today the following 
withholdings will be made from this amount: trade union dues--1 
percent, or R1,428, the pension fund--1 percent (R1,428), and 
income tax--12 percent (R17,130). Total withholdings come to 
R19,986, and R122,768 will be issued to the individual. However, 
it should be taken into account in this instance that, as an 
average statistical citizen, every one of us is a consumer of 
goods and services which are part of the subsistence minimum. 
  This means that, when buying these goods and services, 
everyone who draws a salary (1.52 million) pays out of his 
earnings value-added tax (VAT) in the amount of R5,995, or 4.2 
percent of our average wage. Besides this, we should not forget 
about yet another indirect tax which we, once again as the 
average statistical citizen, pay out of our salaries--the excise 
tax on wine and vodka products. These payments come to R8,870 
per month, or 6 percent of our average wage. Summing up the 
total, we see that only R109,703 remains of the wage issued to 
us (R122,768). 
  Now let us move on to the indicator of the standard of 
living. The average per capita income in our republic comes to 
approximately 0.6 average wages. Therefore it is possible to 
consider that, after all withholdings, the average per capita 
income comes to R64,700 (107,903 times 0.6), whereas the 
standard of living will be equal to 1.43 (64.7 over 45.38). 
  Additional outlays are incurred by the labor compensation 
fund in order to pay employees who are on forced administrative 
furloughs or working short work weeks. There are almost 200,000 
such people in the republic, of whom, according to data from the 
Republic of Tatarstan State Committee for Labor, no fewer than 
60 percent receive wages at the level of the minimum labor 
compensation on a monthly basis out of the labor compensation 
funds of enterprises. Therefore, no less than 2 percent, or 
R2,855 per one employed person per month, are withdrawn from the 
labor compensation fund to pay for incomplete employment. 
  If we take into account this additional burden on each 
employed person, too, the remainder of the wage will come to 
R105,048, and the real value of the standard of living--1.38. 
  Taking into account everything stated above, this low 
indicator of the standard of living confirms yet again the 
crisis condition of the socioeconomic situation in the republic 
which was stated at the 20th session of the Republic of 
Tatarstan Supreme Soviet. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47021 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tatarstan Edict on Envoy to Russia </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tatarstan Edict on Envoy to Russia </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0831A Kazan RESPUBLIKA TATARSTAN in Russian 15 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0831A </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan RESPUBLIKA TATARSTAN </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["Edict of the President of the Republic of Tatarstan on the </F>
Plenipotentiary of the Republic of Tatarstan in the Russian 
Federation"] 
  [Text] In accordance with Article 111 of the Constitution 
of the Republic of Tatarstan and for the purposes of 
implementing Article 8 of the Treaty of the Russian Federation 
and the Republic of Tatarstan "On the Limitation of Subjects for 
the Conduct and Mutual Delegation of Powers Between the Organs 
of State Authority of the Russian Federation and the Organs of 
State Authority of the Republic of Tatarstan, I resolve: 
  1. To establish a plenipotentiary of the Republic of 
Tatarstan in the Russian Federation, with the location in the 
city of Moscow. 
  2. To approve a statute on the plenipotentiary of the 
Republic of Tatarstan in the Russian Federation. 
  3. The Cabinet of Ministers of the Republic of Tatarstan 
will 
adopt a resolution that ensures the implementation of this edict 
and will also introduce its own valid decrees and directives in 
conformity with it. 
  [Signed] President of the Republic of Tatarstan M. 
Shaymiyev. 
  Kazan 
  Kremlin 
  13 June 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47022 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tatarstan Edict Names Envoy to Russia </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tatarstan Edict Names Envoy to Russia </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0831B Kazan RESPUBLIKA TATARSTAN in Russian 15 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0831B </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan RESPUBLIKA TATARSTAN </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["Edict of the President of the Republic of Tatarstan on </F>
Appointing N.G. Aminov Plenipotentiary of the Republic of 
Tatarstan in the Russian Federation"] 
  [Text] In accordance with Article 111 of the Constitution 
of the Republic of Tatarstan and for the purposes of 
implementing Article 8 of the Treaty of the Russian Federation 
and the Republic of Tatarstan "On the Limitations of Subjects 
for the Conduct and Mutual Delegation of Powers Between Organs 
of State Authority of the Russian Federation and Organs of State 
Authority of the Republic of Tatarstan," and following the 
directions of the Statute "On the Plenipotentiary of the 
Republic of Tatarstan in the Russian Federation," which was 
confirmed by Edict of the President of Tatarstan No. 384 of 13 
June 1994, I resolve: 
  To appoint Nail Galeyevich Aminov plenipotentiary of the 
Republic of Tatarstan in the Russian Federation. 
  [Signed]President of the Republic of Tatarstan M. 
Shaymiyev. 
  Kazan 
  Kremlin 
  13 June 1994 
<H5>  * * * * </H5>
<H5>  Nail Galeyevich Aminov was born in 1945. He is a native of </H5>
Kazan. He graduated from the Kazan Chemistry and Technology 
Institute and the Academy of Social Sciences. He is an economic 
sciences candidate. 
  He began his work activity as an electrician at the Kazan 
fur 
combine. He worked in Kazan from 1964 to 1968 at the 
agricultural institute and at the medical instruments plant. 
After completing the institute, he was assigned to the city of 
Sterlitamak in the Bashkir ASSR [Autonomous Soviet Socialist 
Republic], where he worked at the Avangard plant. Afterwards, he 
worked in republican organs of the Bashkir ASSR--as the chief of 
a department of the Council of Ministers and deputy minister and 
minister of housing and municipal services of the republic. 
  In 1990, N.G. Aminov was elected deputy of the Supreme 
Soviet 
of the Russian Federation; he worked on the staff of the Supreme 
Soviet as the chairman of a subcommittee, the deputy chairman of 
a committee, and the manager of a department. In 1993, he was 
appointed deputy chairman of the Goskomfederatsiya [State 
Federation Committee] of Russia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47023 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tatarstan Delegation Visits Komi </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tatarstan Delegation Visits Komi </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0806B Kazan RESPUBLIKA TATARSTAN in Russian 9 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0806B </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan RESPUBLIKA TATARSTAN </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Tatarstan Delegation in Republic of </F>
Komi"] 
  [Text] A delegation of the Republic of Tatarstan was in the 
Republic of Komi on 6-8 June. Headed by Vice President of the 
Republic of Tatarstan V. Likhachev, it came for the final stage 
of preparations of a Treaty of Friendship and Cooperation 
between the two republics. The delegation took part in a festive 
ceremony for the installation of Yu. Spiridonov in the post of 
first head of the Republic of Komi, which was held in the state 
republic opera and ballet theater. 
  The signing of a treaty on cultural cooperation between the 
Republic of Tatarstan and the Republic of Komi was held 
yesterday in the small hall of the Supreme Soviet of the 
republic. It was signed by Minister of Culture of the Republic 
of Tatarstan M. Taishev and Minister of Culture of the Republic 
of Komi A. Beznosikov. A news conference was held afterwards. 
  Taking part in the ceremony in the signing of the treaty and 
the news conference were: From the Tatar side--Vice President of 
the Republic of Tatarstan V. Likhachev, and I. Terentyev, 
manager of the department of international relations of the 
staff of the president of the Republic of Tatarstan; from the 
Komi side--First Deputy Chairman of the Supreme Soviet of the 
Republic of Komi I. Kulakov, and the deputy head of the Republic 
of Komi, V. Torlopov. 
  Yesterday, the Tatarstan delegation departed Syktyvkar for 
home. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47024 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tatar Environment Ministry Holds Conference </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tatar Environment Ministry Holds Conference </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0806C Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA in Russian 9 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0806C </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vadim Rakhimov: "There Is Less and Less </F>
Surrounding Nature, and More and More Environment"] 
  [Text] The Ministry of Environmental Protection and 
Natural Resources of Tatarstan has called a republic conference 
of workers of environmental protection organs for the first time 
in the year and a half of its existence. 
  Coordinated and urgent activity to save the environment is 
what is needed now. This thought was predominant in all the 
speeches at the conference. Of course, on the whole, it brought 
to mind the unforgettable meetings of party economic management 
aktivs: a statement of the facts, miscalculations and successes 
(alas, there are not many of the latter), and comparative 
percentages. For a certainty, these are the shortcomings of an 
initial effort. 
  In his speech Minister A. Shchepovskiy that the department 
was just beginning to develop methods and ways of executive and 
monitoring activity based on the implementation of priority 
tasks--providing residents of Tatarstan with fresh drinking 
water, resolving problems of industrial and everyday wastes, 
including toxic and radioactive wastes, and establishing an 
integral system of monitoring in the republic. The ecological 
department published the first state report on the status of the 
environment of the Republic of Tatarstan in 1993, and a 
Tatarstan Green Book was issued in which analysis of materials 
concerning the ecological situation was systematized and 
presented for the first time. A Tatarstan Red Book will also 
come out soon. 
  Problems that require priority attention were also 
highlighted at the conference. These are the ecology of 
agriculture, saving forest resources and restoring the purity of 
natural waters, and cleansing the atmosphere in cities. 
  For example, due to erosion there is an average annual loss 
of 70 tonnes of humus per hectare of land. In addition, a good 
third of the mineral fertilizer is washed away, which pollutes 
reservoirs and rivers. An ecological chemical analysis of the 
topsoil in the republic showed that in half the rayons the land 
is especially oversaturated with harmful elements from the 
Mendeleyev table, among which are lead, mercury, strontium, and 
arsenic. In addition, the aftereffects of the compounds of 
agrochemical processing of the soil do not emerge immediately, 
but after many years. 
  For a half century our undoubtedly valiant oil workers, 
engrossed in increasing a well's output, were not overly careful 
with the land, but now they are being forced to compensate for 
the regrettable costs of irresponsible land use in hundreds of 
billions of rubles. But is it not late to reanimate the 
benefactress? Judging by the speech of A. Iskhakov, head of 
administration of both Aznakayev and Aznakayevskiy Rayon, this 
agricultural area, given all the bounties acquired from four oil 
and gas producing administrations located there, can be referred 
to as an ecological disaster zone. According to doctors' 
findings, the water there is unsuitable for drinking, and the 
air is polluted to a maximum. No matter how the oil workers try 
to improve the ecological situation in the rayon, its condition 
remains threatening for the health of the population. 
  The ecological problems in our republic are becoming 
aggravated by the elimination of production and consumption 
wastes. Up to 2.5 million tonnes are formed in a year in the 
republic. Among them are not only raw materials byproducts (10 
percent), but also especially harmful poisonous chemicals, 
containing mercury, calculated in the tens of tonnes. The 
Ministry of Environmental Protection and Natural Resources of 
the Republic of Tatarstan examined the technical and economic 
justification of a plant project for the processing of wastes. 
And as soon as it appears, it apparently will begin to work on 
Kazan's needs. But what will the situation be with the needs of 
the rayons? 
  The reports of representatives of Goskomsanepidnadzor [State 
Committee for Sanitary and Epidemiologic Inspection] concerning 
the effect of an unfavorable environment on our health were sad. 
It was especially emphasized that the general ecological 
condition is reflected in the rate of childbirth and the health 
of the next generation. The death rate in the republic last year 
exceeded the birth rate. Infant mortality reached 22 percent per 
1,000 newborn. In comparison with 1990, the adult population has 
begun to get sick a third more often. 
  Indeed, we have lost the time when we were still able to be 
charitable toward nature. There is now a need for efficient 
consolidation of all scientific and practical forces to 
stabilize the process of barbaric use of nature and to relieve 
the current condition of the nature that we have desecrated. 
There are certain rays of hope: The Republic of Tatarstan 
Academy of Sciences has turned to these problems in real earnest 
and created an interdisciplinary council on ecology that is 
coordinating the activity of five departments of the academy. In 
addition, a special Institute of the Ecology of Natural Systems 
has been organized that will have to prepare maps of the 
ecological condition in the republic. It is clear that the 
republic Ministry of the Environment and Natural Resources is 
still in the stage of formation and that the burden of concerns 
that has fallen on it are excessive at the present time. 
Moreover, they have to be resolved with the meager sum that is 
available. The Ministry of Environmental Protection and Natural 
Resources was allocated R7 billion, but 20 times more is needed 
to carry out the paramount tasks. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47025 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tatar Soviet Chairman on Recent Session </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tatar Soviet Chairman on Recent Session </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0822B Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA in Russian 11 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0822B </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Tatarstan Supreme Soviet Chairman Farid </F>
Mukhametshin, by ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA staff correspondent Dmitriy 
Mikhaylin, special to IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA; place and date not 
given: "Farid Mukhametshin: 'There Were No Sensations...."] 
  [Text] [Mikhaylin] Farid Khayrullovich, the 20th session of 
Tatarstan's Supreme Soviet, about which there had been so much 
talk and of which so much had been expected, finally took place. 
Did it meet your personal expectations? 
  [Mukhametshin] Yes, both the people's deputies and republic 
voters, and especially economic managers, had been waiting for 
this session. Waiting with some anxiety, especially with respect 
to the main issue--the government program for getting the 
republic's economy out of the crisis. 
  The government was unable to prepare such a program. But as 
the first step it offered "Priority Measures on Stabilization of 
the Republic of Tatarstan Economy." Later, these measures, after 
taking into account people's deputies' proposals and comments, 
ought to grow into a normal economic program. 
  Of course, one month (and this is how long the Supreme 
Soviet 
gave the government at the previous session) is not enough to 
prepare such a program. They needed to analyze the state of the 
economy, appraise the potential of the republic itself and of 
implementing the economic aspects of the treaty and agreements 
with Russia, and look into real opportunities of attracting 
foreign investment. 
  There were no sensations at the session, of the kind many 
had 
expected and predicted--such as the government's resignation. 
Nevertheless, the deputies did some serious work; in the near 
future all their proposals and suggestions will be summarized 
and submitted to the government for consideration in developing 
the big program. 
  [Mikhaylin] So it will still be a program of anticrisis 
measures? 
  [Mukhametshin] It was outlined quite well by the president 
in 
his speech; he said, in particular, that it will be a program of 
the Republic of Tatarstan's socioeconomic progress. It will be 
broader than merely an anticrisis program. The subject here is 
not only the stabilization of the republic's economy, but also 
its progress. 
  [Mikhaylin] While it is under preparation, can the 
government 
be guided by the "Priority Measures...," which were adopted as 
the basis? 
  [Mukhametshin] Yes; by adopting this document as a basis, we 
gave the government the "green light." And generally, as one 
deputy put it, we should support even the smallest steps on the 
part of the government toward economic stabilization. 
  About 10 draft laws necessary for the implementation of 
these 
measures have been submitted to the Supreme Soviet now, along 
with draft presidential edicts, which should be put into action 
in the very near future. Then the government, on the basis of 
the "Priority Measures..." developed by it and approved by the 
parliament, will be able to work normally. 
  [Mikhaylin] The "auxiliary" measures apparently also include 
granting additional powers to the president, do they not? 
  [Mukhametshin] The president needs them precisely in order 
to 
speed up the adoption of anticrisis measures. The Supreme Soviet 
has certain procedures for adopting laws: discussion in 
commissions, adoption in the first draft, second draft, and so 
on. Such a painstaking process produces quality laws, but it 
does stretch out the process of their adoption. We do not have 
all the time now. Therefore, the president was given the right 
to issue laws aimed at stabilization of the republic economy. 
  [Mikhaylin] Now let us go back to the beginning: What is the 
substance of the economic stabilization measures adopted by the 
parliament? 
  [Mukhametshin] If you recall, at the previous Supreme Soviet 
session, during the discussion on the republic budget for the 
current year, the deputies raised the issue of the state of the 
republic economy and the need to take urgent measures to 
stabilize it. A corresponding decree was adopted, which set the 
work in this direction in motion. It boils down to a compromise 
between the need to radicalize the reforms and our proclaimed 
policy of "soft" entry into a market, protecting both goods 
producers and the consumers, that is, the population. Therefore, 
it is only natural that questions of social protection were 
considered simultaneously with the discussion of "Priority 
Measures...." 
  Our situation has changed dramatically as compared to last 
year. Altogether, last year was not a typical one for us: The 
treaty with the Russian Federation was not yet signed, which 
means that we shared taxes to a considerably lesser extent; we 
sold oil at sufficiently high world prices, while this year they 
dropped; the level of oil production also has dropped. There are 
also a number of factors that enable us to speak of serious 
economic decline. 
  Therefore, now, whether we want to or not, we will have to 
live "frugally," count every budget penny. It will also be 
necessary to reduce the government, reduce the state vehicles 
pool.... 
  [Mikhaylin] Apparently this "frugality" will also affect 
some 
social programs? 
  [Mukhametshin] It is clear that no new social programs will 
be implemented in the near future. But neither will those 
programs we had approved when closing the budget be completely 
folded. Moreover, during the recent visit of the Russian 
president, an agreement was reached that some programs will be 
elevated to the status of federal programs and will be paid for 
from the Russian budget. 
  [Mikhaylin] At the previous session of the parliament, and 
even earlier, there was much talk about worsening relations 
between it and the government. Have your positions been brought 
closer at this session or, on the contrary, has the schism 
deepened even more? 
  [Mukhametshin] Well, I would not put it this way. There is 
always some criticism inherent in relations between the 
parliament and the government. After all, the Supreme Soviet is 
a body elected by the people, and it simply is its 
responsibility to oversee and criticize the government for some 
or other shortcomings. 
  It is another matter that by vesting certain powers in 
socioeconomic issues with the president, we, I think, diminish 
the role and the place of the government itself. This can happen 
in two instances: when the government is not doing its work 
properly, or if the task is to shift the burden of 
responsibility for dealing with these tasks onto the 
president.... 
  [Mikhaylin] What stage of its life is Tatarstan entering 
now? 
If in the past it was a "soft" entry into a market and defining 
relations with Russia, what strategic goal does the republic 
leadership set for itself now? 
  [Mukhametshin] Recently, before signing the treaty with 
Russia, we devoted too much attention to politics--fighting for 
sovereignty, additional powers, defining the status, and so on. 
We spent more than two years on this. 
  The time has come when we have to pay the closest attention 
to our own economy. This is where the deputy corps will focus, 
and the government, too, I think. 
  The time has come to search for a model of economic reforms 
in Tatarstan, kicking the market mechanism into full gear. We 
have to stop talking about getting the reforms going and 
actually do it. 
  The substance of reforms, in my opinion, should boil down to 
getting enterprises of all forms of ownership--both private and 
the remaining state sector--to work; in adjusting the tax system 
in such a way that would produce an increased tax flow into the 
budget but at the same time would not place an undue burden on 
goods producers. As a third defining measure of this new 
economic policy, we must adjust the flow of finances, so that 
money would not just make more money, but participate in 
economic revival, activating the formula "money--goods--money." 
The fourth measure should be redistribution of labor resources 
between sectors, between enterprises, and so on--in order to 
avoid a sharp increase in unemployment. 
  The "soft" entry into a market has done its part. The 
reforms 
did not hit our citizens as badly as has happened in many other 
regions of Russia. Now, however, we have to quickly and firmly 
launch new economic mechanisms, because this is precisely a case 
in which delay is equivalent to death. 
  [Mikhaylin] And the last question which we cannot fail to 
touch upon--the leaving in effect until 1 January 1995 of the 
law "On Extraordinary Measures of Combating Crime...." 
  [Mukhametshin] Yes, this is indeed a serious question. Many 
deputies demanded its repeal, but most interestingly, did not 
offer anything instead. At the same time, we cannot leave the 
crime situation as is. There probably are some abuses on the 
part of the militia. But this law not only gives the militia 
rights--it places responsibilities on it. 
  We constantly monitor the implementation of this law; we 
believe that it should not make a single innocent person suffer. 
Because otherwise a law written with the aim to help people will 
actually turn against them. We cannot allow this, just as we 
cannot allow the economic reforms that we are about to begin 
implementing to deal a blow to the well-being of our citizens. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47026 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Far East Customs Leadership on Tasks </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Far East Customs Leadership on Tasks </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0822A Vladivostok KRASNOYE ZNAMYA in Russian 11 Jun 94 p 
2 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0822A </F>
<F P=104>  Vladivostok KRASNOYE ZNAMYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Selected questions and answers from the Far Eastern Customs </F>
Directorate's press conference, by Vitaliy Mogil; place and date 
not given: "The Customs: Figures and Facts"] 
  [Text] Since the time the Far Eastern Customs 
Directorate [FECD] was set up, there probably has not been as 
large-scale and representative a press conference as the one 
held last Wednesday. All the top customs men, headed by FECD 
chief Oleg Sviridov, came to the meeting with journalists. 
  There were many questions, and many people to answer them. 
Therefore, without getting specific about particular persons, we 
will relate the most interesting parts of what was said at the 
press conference. 
  [Question] What return does the kray get from customs 
activities? 
  [Answer] Since the time the decree came out allowing to 
transfer 10 percent of the customs duties collected into the 
local budget, Maritime Kray has received R6.664 billion and more 
than $3 million. 
  [Question] What violations does the customs encounter most? 
  [Answer] In the Far Eastern region, the prevalent type of 
violation is illegal export of foreign currency. Over the first 
quarter of 1994 alone, the FECD uncovered such violations in the 
amount equivalent to R1 billion. At the Russian-Chinese border 
there are frequent attempts to take Russian currency out of the 
country. Over the same period, the "catch" comprised R50 million. 
  [Question] We frequently hear about corruption in customs. 
Is 
there a struggle to "keep the ranks clean"? 
  [Answer] We have to admit that the customs has not avoided 
this sad fate. Incidents of corruption have occurred in almost 
all major FECD units. Over 1993 in the entire Far Eastern 
region, criminal proceedings for abuse of official position were 
initiated against six officers, and 299 persons were subjected 
to disciplinary measures. This does not mean that "everyone is 
on the take"--more often it is instances of violating the 
Customs Code. By the way, we have set up a special unit to watch 
over the work of customs units. 
  [Question] Bribe-taking is associated with low pay. How much 
are customs officers paid? 
  [Answer] The average salary of a customs officer in Maritime 
Kray is R290,000. 
  [Question] This is not a lot. Nevertheless, there is 
competition for jobs in the customs organs. 
  [Answer] Competition is a mandatory condition in order to 
get 
a job at the customs. This is the directive of the Main Customs 
Administration. It is true that in some specializations there 
are up to 10 applicants for a job. Our goal is to make a 
guaranteed social protection of our staff more valuable than 
high salaries. 
  [Question] What effect has the increase in custom duties had 
on the state of the automobile market? Who benefits from this 
increase? 
  [Answer] With the introduction of new custom duties in 
February-March, the automobile market in Maritime Kray went into 
a lull. A pick-up began in April after a certain cable from the 
State Customs Committee, which envisaged customs relief until 1 
July for cars imported for the purpose of commercial activities. 
We can predict that after this date the duty will at least 
double. This undoubtedly will cause a slump in the automobile 
business. Who benefits from it is anybody's guess, but it 
certainly is not the treasury. After all, in the first quarter 
of 1994 the Far Eastern customs alone delivered to the treasury 
R6.792 billion in "car" money. 
  [Question] Did the customs participate in Operation Fishing 
'94? 
  [Answer] Very actively. In cooperation with two border 
protection districts, our organs uncovered 11 customs 
violations. The work was done mostly in the area of the Kuril 
Ridge and South Sakhalin and zeroed in on illegal export of 
fish--as a rule, by the way, by our compatriots. 
  [Question] On the problem of plundering of the national fish 
resources. Do the Japanese authorities show interest in this 
issue? After all, illegal exports of fish also affect the 
interests of that country. 
  [Answer] Alas, this problem has not been looked into on 
either the government or any other level. Our Japanese 
colleagues are more concerned about the smuggling of arms and 
drugs, which is acquiring an increasingly larger scale. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47027 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Maritime Communists Note Korean Visit </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Maritime Communists Note Korean Visit </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0806A Vladivostok VLADIVOSTOK in Russian 9 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0806A </F>
<F P=104>  Vladivostok VLADIVOSTOK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by VLADIVOSTOK news department: "Maritime Communists </F>
Remark Broadly on President Kim's Visit"] 
  [Text] VLADIVOSTOK correspondents have been able to 
establish that the events associated with the first official 
visit to Russia, and to Vladivostok in particular, of Kim 
Yong-sam, the first civilian president of the Republic of Korea, 
were far greater than the official press reported in this 
regard. In the range of political parties and movements that did 
not deprive themselves of the pleasure of expressing their 
attitude to the Russo-Korean summit, the communists, who did not 
renounce their principles, could also be heard. 
  Representatives of the now numerous communist parties set up 
pickets on Tuesday at the building on Aleutskaya Street, 45a, 
where the consulate general of the Republic of Korea is located, 
at the very time when a meeting between the Korean delegation 
and leaders of the kray was beginning in the House of 
Negotiations on Sanatornaya Street. 
  Grouping themselves under a red flag, the activists passed 
out their own "Statement" to the staff of the consulate general 
of the Republic of Korea and also eagerly distributed it to the 
representatives of the press. The document, which was signed by 
kray committees--KPRF [Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation], RKKP [not further identified], and the VKPB 
[All-Union Communist Party of Bolsheviks]--announces a "resolute 
protest against the slanderous campaign unleashed by certain 
circles of South Korea," and also expresses "full support of the 
policy of building socialism in the DPRK." 
  Other documents turned over to VLADIVOSTOK correspondents 
indicate that the local communists are steadfastly following the 
course of communist construction in Russia as a whole. Thus, a 
"Joint Statement of the Political Parties and Organizations of 
Russia" (from the VKPB to the VLKSM [All-Union Leninist 
Communist Youth League]) and a "Statement" of the Secretariat of 
the VKPB Central Committee were disseminated under the windows 
of the consulate general. These very curious texts have a very 
unambiguous political slant; for example, there are passages 
like this: "The All-Union Communist Party of Bolsheviks is proud 
of the fact that a candidate for membership in the VKPB Central 
Committee is Captain S.P. Subbotin who, while defending the 
Korean sky from vultures, executed the first ram attack in a jet 
aircraft, knocking down 11 American aircraft, of which two were 
"flying fortresses." Also appearing quite natural in this 
connection is the expression "full support and solidarity with 
the heroic Korean people who monolithically united around the 
Labor Party of Korea headed by the experienced leader Comrade 
Kim Il-Song..." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47028 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tatarstan Statute on Housing Privatization </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tatarstan Statute on Housing Privatization </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0835A Kazan RESPUBLIKA TATARSTAN in Russian 11 May 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0835A </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan RESPUBLIKA TATARSTAN </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Republic of Tatarstan statute: "On the Order and Conditions </F>
of Privatization of the State and Municipal Housing Fund in the 
Republic of Tatarstan," place and date not given] 
  [Text] 1. The present statute establishes unified 
regulations on the territory of the Republic of Tatarstan for 
privatization of residential apartments in buildings of the 
state and municipal housing fund, the conditions for payment of 
compensation in the form of a supplemental sum of nominal 
privatization investments to citizens of the Republic of 
Tatarstan having inadequate housing conditions, as well as the 
basic principles for payment of expenditures for the maintenance 
and repair of privatized housing accommodations. 
  2. The basic principles of privatization of the state and 
municipal housing fund are: 
  --voluntary acquisition of housing for ownership; 
  --free transfer to citizens of the housing accommodations 
which they occupy in buildings of the state (municipal) housing 
fund, regardless of the size of the overall living space and the 
consumer qualities of the residence; 
  --retention of the principles of the former system of 
operation, repair and servicing of the privatized housing fund; 
  --payment of compensation in the form of a supplemental sum 
of nominal privatization investments to citizens of the Republic 
of Tatarstan who do not have housing or who have housing below 
the average, actually achieved level in the republic (16.2 
square meters of living space per person), regardless of the 
form of ownership in which the housing is held. 
  Every citizen of the Republic of Tatarstan who lives in 
housing accommodations which are not subject to privatization or 
whose housing conditions are below the average level of housing 
provision in the republic (16.2 square meters of living space 
per person) has the right to receive compensation in the form of 
supplemental privatization payment means. 
  A citizen has the right to receive compensation one time, 
regardless of the form of ownership of the housing 
accommodations which he occupies. 
  Compensation is established in the following amounts: 
  For citizens who do not have housing (renters in houses of 
the individual housing fund and in houses of ZhSK 
[housing-construction cooperatives] or those subletting in 
buildings of the state and municipal housing fund, who do not 
have other registration)--40,000 rubles (R) of nominal 
privatization vouchers (investments); 
  For citizens who do not have housing, and who are being 
housed in specialized buildings (buildings of the Ministry of 
Social Provision of the Republic of Tatarstan, Ministry of 
Public Health of the Republic of Tatarstan, Ministry of Internal 
Affairs of the Republic of Tatarstan, who do not have a 
permanent registration outside these institutions)--R40,000 of 
nominal privatization vouchers (investments); 
  For citizens who do not have housing and who are living in 
dormitories (with the exception of seasonal and temporary 
workers, persons working under urgent labor contracts, as well 
as citizens who have settled there in connection with their 
education)--R40,000 of nominal privatization vouchers 
(investments); 
  For citizens living in housing accommodations which have 
been 
found (in accordance with the order established by the effective 
legilsation) to be unsafe and old--R40,000 of nominal 
privatization vouchers (investments); 
  For citizens living in closed military cities and in 
service-related housing accommodations--R30,000 in nominal 
privatization vouchers (investments); 
  For citizens having overall living space of 5 or less square 
meters per person--R30,000 in nominal privatization vouchers 
(investments); 
  For citizens provided with overall living space of over 5 
and 
up to 10 square meters per person (inclusive)--R20,000 in 
nominal privatization vouchers (investments); 
  For citizens provided with overall living space of over 10 
and up to 16.2 square meters per person (inclusive)--R10,000 in 
nominal privatization vouchers (investments). 
  Every citizen of the Republic of Tatarstan living in a 
building of a housing-construction cooperative has the right to 
receive compensation in the form of supplemental privatization 
payments of funds in the amount of R10,000 in nominal 
privatization vouchers (investments). 
  3. The right to privatization of housing accommodations in 
buildings of the state and municipal housing fund is granted to 
citizens who are permanently registered in these housing 
accommodations, including citizens who are temporarily absent, 
and who in accordance with the effective legislation have 
retained their right to the housing accommodations. 
  Citizens who have reserved housing accommodations have the 
right to privatization of housing at the place of reservation. 
  4. Housing accommodations may be privatized only with the 
written consent of all the adult citizens jointly living in 
them. The privatized housing accommodations pass to joint 
ownership of all the citizens jointly living in them, including 
minors. 
  Minor citizens are necessarily included in the list of 
owners 
of the housing accommodations. 
  When citizens move to other housing accommodations in the 
state (municial) housing fund in the order of improving their 
housing conditions, in accordance with the effective legislation 
and its occupancy under rental agreement, the citizens have the 
right to dissolve the privatization contract for the housing 
accommodations previously occupied. 
  The privatization agreement on housing accommodations may be 
dissolved upon mutual consent of the parties to the agreement, 
and in case of a dispute--in judicial order at the claim of one 
of the parties. 
  A citizen who has dissolved a privatization contract for 
housing accommodations in accordance with the procedure 
established by legislation retains the right to free 
privatization of the housing accommodations of the state 
(municipal) housing fund which he occupies under rental 
conditions. 
  5. Housing accommodations in buildings subject to capital 
repair are privatized on a universal basis. 
  6. Housing accommodations which are in an emergency state, 
or 
those located in dormitories, specialized buildings and 
buildings in closed military cities are not subject to 
privatization. 
  Local Soviets of People's Deputies, in conjunction with 
enterprises, institutions and organizations, and with 
consideration of the opinion of trade unions (represented by 
their appropriate bodies), and in their absence--by 
representatives of the workers themselves who have been duly 
elected and authorized in accordance with the legislation of the 
Republic of Tatarstan, determine the relative share (list) of 
service housing accommodations not subject to privatization. 
  Privatization of housing accommodations (apartments) in 
buildings which are historical and cultural monuments is 
performed in accordance with the Statute on the Order and 
Conditions of Privatization of Buildings Which are Monuments of 
History and Culture. 
  7. Housing accommodations in communal apartments are 
privatized with the consent of all the apartment renters. In 
this case, the residential rooms become the property of the 
residents, while the kitchens, corridors, baths, etc. remain the 
objects of common usage. 
  8. Reception of citizens and formulation and issuance of 
documents establishing their rights is performed, as a rule, by 
the housing operation enterprises or subsections (henceforth 
ZhEO), sectorial (departmental) enterprises, organizations, or 
institutions which are the balance holders of the residential 
buildings of the state housing fund and the ZhEO of the local 
Soviets of People's Deputies--the owners of the municipal 
housing fund. 
  Centers (agencies, bureaus) on privatization of the state 
and 
municipal housing fund may be formed in cities (rayons) to 
perform work on formulating documents in the privatization of 
housing. 
  9. The local Soviets of People's Deputies create territorial 
commissions for implementing control over and organizing the 
processes of privatization of the housing fund. 
  The Commission on Privatization of the Housing Fund acts in 
accordance with the Statute on the Commission on Privatization 
of the State and Municipal Housing Fund, ratified by the 
Republic of Tatarstan State Committee on Administration of State 
Property. 
  10. In the preliminary period, prior to operational 
introduction of the law, specialists at the ZhEO formulate a 
draft Agreement on Transfer of the Housing Accommodations to the 
Ownership of Citizens for each housing accommodation which may 
be privatized. 
  The draft agreement is signed and registered with the head 
of 
administration of the city (rayon), and also passes registration 
with the agencies of technical inventorization. 
  Upon completion of the preliminary work, the ZhEO notifies 
the population of the territory regarding the time of operation 
and the location of the center for receiving citizens. 
  11. Citizens submit an application for privatization of the 
housing accommodations to the appropriate ZhEO, signed by all 
the adult citizens jointly residing there. 
  Considering the fact that each citizen has the right to 
acquire for ownership free of charge, in the order of 
privatization, housing accommodations in buildings of the state 
and municipal housing fund only one time, if the citizen changes 
his place of residence, a document must be appended to the 
application, confirming that the housing accommodations which he 
formerly occupied were not privatized. 
  12. A specialist checks to see that the application has been 
filled out correctly, compares the data indicated in the 
application with the corresponding data of the previously 
prepared draft agreement. If there are no discrepancies, he 
issues one copy of the formulated agreement to the applicant. 
The second copy of the agreement remains at the ZhEO, and the 
third is forwarded to the agencies of technical inventorization 
for implementation of state accounting of the housing fund in 
accordance with the established procedure. 
  13. If there is a discrepancy between the data submitted by 
the applicant and the data in the draft agreement, the materials 
on privatization of the given housing accommodations are 
forwarded to a territorial commission for review and adoption of 
a decision. In this case, the resolution of the question of 
privatization of housing must be made no later than in a month's 
time from the day the documents are submitted to the ZhEO. 
  14. Payment for services on formulating the necessary 
documents for transfer of housing to private ownership is 
performed by the citizens according to a unified rate in the 
amount of 0.4 times the minimum labor wage. 
  15. If the rights of the citizen are violated in resolving 
questions of housing privatization, he has the right to appeal 
to the Commission on Privatization of the Housing Fund or to a 
court. 
  16. The rules of accounting of citizens, including those 
living in privatized housing accommodations, who require 
improved housing conditions, and the granting of housing 
accommodations in the Republic of Tatarstan are defined by the 
effective legislation. 
  17. Owners of privatized housing accommodations in buildings 
of the state and municipal housing fund are the users of the 
building in the portion of the technical equipment and places of 
common usage, while those united into partnerships or other 
associations are the co-owners of the living space 
commensurately occupied in this building. 
  18. Servicing and repair of privatized housing 
accommodations 
(apartments), buildings having privatized housing accommodations 
(apartments), and privatized residential buildings are performed 
with adherence to the existing regulations and standards of 
operation and repair of the housing fund. 
  19. The state ZhEO's retain the responsibilities for 
servicing, routine and capital repair of privatized housing 
accommodations (apartments), residential houses having 
privatized housing accommodations (apartments) serviced by them 
prior to the beginning of privatization. 
  20. Owners of housing accommodations (apartments) in a 
multi-apartment building are obligated to participate in common 
expenses for servicing and repair of the structure (residential 
building), its technical equipment and territory surrounding the 
building in accordance with the Agreement on Transfer of Housing 
Accommodations to the Ownership of Citizens. 
  21. For purposes of the rational maintenance, servicing and 
repair of privatized housing accommodations, the owners may form 
partnerships and other associations which act on the basis of a 
charter. 
  22. Prior to the moment of formation of a partnership of 
apartment owners (co-owners of the building), the relations 
between the apartment owners and the ZhEO under whose economic 
management the multi-apartment residential building is held, in 
regard to servicing and repair of the residential building, the 
building grounds, and the privatized apartment, are structured 
on the basis of a contract for servicing the residential 
building, the building grounds and the privatized apartment. 
  According to the contract, the ZhEO promises to perform the 
entire set of operations on maintainence, current and capital 
repair of the building and its grounds in accordance with the 
requirements of the Regulations for Use of Housing 
Accommodations, Maintenance of Residential Buildings and Their 
Grounds on the conditions defined for buildings in the state and 
municipal fund, and also: 
  --to perform preventative inspection of the 
sanitary-technical equipment in the apartment twice a year; 
  --to repair the sanitary-technical equipment at the request 
of the apartment owner, using the owner's materials, or for 
additional payment if the ZhEO's materials are used. 
  The owner promises to make monthly payments for the services 
of the ZhEO and for the municipal services, along with the 
payments (apartment rent and payment for municipal services) 
which are established for renters of state and municipal housing. 
  An accounting of monthly payments for servicing the 
building, 
municipal and other services provided to the apartment owner is 
appended to the agreement. 
  23. Owners of privatized housing accommodations must pay tax 
in accorance with the effective tax legislation. 
  24. A partnership of apartment owners is a co-owner of a 
multi-apartment residential building, and the conditions of 
co-ownership must be defined by the Agreement on Joint Ownership 
of a Residential Building and Share Participation in its 
Maintenance. 
  The balance-holder of the building, acting in the name of 
the 
building's owner, and other legal persons who are co-owners of 
the building must conclude the indicated agreement. 
  25. After the Agreement on Joint Ownership of a Residential 
Building and Share Participation in its Maintenance has been 
concluded, at the decision of the co-owners of the house the 
ZhEO delegates part of its rights and responsibilities in 
servicing and repair of the building and the building grounds to 
the partnership. 
  The partnership may: Act in the role of contractor in 
concluding agreements with subcontractors for municipal 
services; Ensure participation of the building's co-owners in 
payment of all expenses associated with the maintenance and 
operation of the building's ownership, commensurate with their 
share of ownership in the building; Ensure timely payment of 
monies intended for this purpose; Represent the interests of the 
co-owners in state and other institutions, etc. 
  26. After all the apartments in a multi-apartment 
residential 
building are privatized, the residential building, with the 
exception of built-in and added-on non-residential facilities, 
may be handed over for ownership of the citizens united into the 
partnership. And only in this case is the house transferred from 
the balance sheet of the ZhEO to the balance of the partnership. 
  Transfer of ownership of a structure--residential 
building--is performed by the balance-holder in cooperation with 
the owner or his authorized agency, in accordance with the 
effective legislation. 
  27. The relations between the contractor--the partnership of 
apartment owners, and the subcontractor--the ZhEO or other 
organization, regarding the repair and servicing of the building 
and its grounds are built on a contractual basis. 
  28. The intra-apartment communications networks, engineering 
structures and facilities are not subject to privatization. 
  29. The owners of privatized housing accommodations bear 
responsibility for their maintenance and repair in accordance 
with the effective legislation. 
  30. Control over the technical condition and timely repair 
of 
the privatized housing fund is implemented by the local Soviets 
of People's Deputies. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47029 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Moscow's Chechnya Policy Critiqued </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Moscow's Chechnya Policy Critiqued </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0824A Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian No 23, 10 Jun 
94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0824A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Nikolay Troitskiy: "The Kremlin's Gift to </F>
Chechnya"] 
  [Text] As soon as the leadership of the RF [Russian 
Federation] expressed its readiness to regulate relations with 
Chechnya, immediately the president of the insurgent republic, 
instead of mutual compromises, burst out with a series of 
extravagant accusations addressed at Russia. Aside from 
imperialist ambitions, he also charged Moscow with being guilty 
of "nuclear blackmail." The dialogue, without even having begun, 
was disrupted. Why did Dudayev act in such an illogical manner? 
  Sudden interest in negotiations with Groznyy was sparked in 
the Moscow upper echelons only after Ruslan Khasbulatov again 
surfaced on the political scene. The federal bureaucrats were 
thrown into such frenzy that they got tangled up in their own 
strategy. There is an official plan for regulating relations 
with Chechnya: Consultations with all the political forces in 
the republic, holding elections of the bodies of power there 
according to Russian laws, and then signing a treaty with the 
publicly elected leaders. Such a position was announced in the 
message of the RF President and in the decree of the State Duma. 
It is adhered to by Sergey Shakhray, who was appointed head of 
the Russian delegation at these negotiations. Another scenario 
directly contradicts the official line, and it is being 
supported by entirely official persons--Federation Council 
Chairman Vladimir Shumeyko and the president's chief of 
administration, Sergey Filatov. They propose immediately opening 
negotiations at the highest level--between Yeltsin and Dudayev, 
and with no preliminary conditions. 
  The reason for such inconsistency by Moscow is simple: Those 
surrounding Yeltsin have decided that the anti-Dudayev 
opposition will be headed by Khasbulatov. Then he will become 
head of the republic, and the treaty will have to be signed 
specifically with him. In order to prevent such an 
unpleasantness, the Kremlin is ready to agree to any concessions 
to Dudayev. 
  But an embarrassing thing happened. Dudayev did not agree to 
any concessions. He too, it is true, was also disturbed by 
Khasbulatov's growing popularity, but the Chechen leader simply 
declared--once again--Ruslan Imranovich as being an "enemy of 
the people" and prohibited him from living in Chechnya. After 
that, Filatov announced with puzzlement that he does not 
understand why Dudayev is undermining the dialogue, and at the 
same time expressed regret that they have still not been able to 
exclude Shakhray from the negotiations. Since Dudayev had once 
said that Shakhray also does not suit him, it turns out that the 
Kremlin is ready to make further concessions to the Chechen 
president in the hope that he will become more conciliatory. 
  The authorities of the "great power" are acting in a 
surprisingly undignified manner. We get the impression that it 
is Moscow which is begging for a union with Groznyy, while there 
they are merely lazily waving away the annoying flirtations. 
Then again, that is how it is. Dudayev did not demand either a 
meeting with Yeltsin or a treaty with Moscow. He is entirely 
satisfied with the existing state of affairs. 
  In the past three years, a "free economic zone" has 
spontaneously been formed in the republic: First raw materials 
and goods were freely moved to Chechnya, and then just as freely 
went to the far abroad. In a parallel course, currency capital 
comes and goes freely--with considerable profit for Groznyy and 
without the slightest benefit to the Russian budget. 
  As long as the workers of the president's administration are 
trying to persuade the Chechen general to engage in negotiations 
and helping him to eliminate his competitors, Dudayev is 
invulnerable. He can bargain forever, first breaking off and 
then renewing the dialogue, and always imposing more and more 
new conditions. Shakhray's plan of action presents a much 
greater danger for the general: Dudayev will not win in a new 
election, and Khasbulatov's chances are much more realistic. But 
since it is specifically this circumstance which frightens 
Moscow and introduces disorder into the ranks of the federal 
bureaucrats, Shakhray's plan is unrealizable. Thus, Khasbulatov 
has not yet returned to politics, while Dudayev has already 
extracted maximum benefit for himself from this bugaboo. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47030 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94030" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   31 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Dudayev on Shakhray Resignation, Meeting With Yeltsin </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Dudayev on Shakhray Resignation, Meeting With Yeltsin </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0772A Moscow SEGODNYA in Russian 31 May 94 p 10 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0772A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SEGODNYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Dzhokhar Dudayev, president of Chechnya, by </F>
Natalya Gorodetskaya; place and date not given: "The Defense 
Shield of the USSR Should Be Restored Urgently"] 
  [Text] The Chechen Republic of Ichkeria. Territory: 
16,000 square km. Population: approximately 1.2 million. Main 
industrial sectors: oil production and refining, production of 
drilling rigs and automated control systems. Decline in 
industrial production in 1993: 25.7 percent, in the 
agro-industrial complex, 10 percent. The budget in 1993--R500 
billion--was deficit-free. Main difficulties: the economic 
blockade on the part of Russia--frozen bank accounts, Chechnya 
has not received a single ruble for two years, and the Russian 
Federation's arrears for oil in 1993 constituted R30 billion. A 
government program, the emphasis in which was placed on 
self-reliance, was drawn up last year. 
  Previously the oil industry constituted up to 80 
percent of the total volume. Now approximately 3 million tonnes 
are being produced, and virtually no oil is being received for 
refining currently (potential for 20 million tonnes a year). The 
question of the temporary closedown of certain types of 
operations like, for example, the production of polyethylene, 
phenol, and certain types of oils is being studied. It is 
contemplated switching production to the manufacture of fuel ($6 
million of equipment has been purchased). On account of the loss 
of sales markets, the Molot Plant, which used to supply all of 
Russia with drills, is switching to the manufacture of mini-rigs 
(trials are under way in the republic). The production of 
building materials and consumer goods in the republic has 
increased, which has afforded an opportunity, generally, to slow 
the decline in production. 
  Agriculture. An increase in the numbers of livestock, 
poultry, and so forth is being stimulated in the private sector. 
The prices of agricultural products are free. In order to secure 
state supplies of grain, meat, milk, and vegetables the 
government has undertaken to pay up to an additional 30 percent 
per ruble of the price asked by the seller. The agro-industrial 
complex is in a reform phase--it is contemplated creating state 
farms in place of the kolkhozes and sovkhozes (there will be no 
private ownership of the land). 
  Average wages are R60,000 (payment has been held up for 
several months), pensions, R42,000. Of the R25 billion received 
by the National Bank in 1994, R17 billion have been channeled 
into the payment of pensions. But many retirees have received no 
money since August-September of 1993. The rational consumer 
basket costs R42,000. Officially registered unemployed: 200. 
  From a SEGODNYA interview with Taymaz Abubakarov, 
minister of economics and finance of the Chechen Republic of 
Ichkeria. 
  "The foundations of the USSR are in Chechnya, and 
Gorbachev and Lukyanov, who were unlawfully removed from power, 
could embark on the discharge of their duties here, 
therefore." 
  [Gorodetskaya] Mr. President, how do you feel in the role of 
victor? Sergey Shakhray's resignation is being linked with his 
incorrect policy in the North Caucasus, in Chechnya particularly. 
  [Dudayev] I do not feel that I am in the role of victor 
because I have never linked any issues with Shakhray either as a 
leader or as a politician or as a man. As you know, Chechnya has 
stated that we will negotiate with Russia only as a sovereign 
state--via the Foreign Ministry or between the presidents 
directly. 
  [Gorodetskaya] Do you have prior conditions for such a 
meeting? 
  [Dudayev] None. But groups of specialists should, naturally, 
meet in advance to prepare the meeting, particularly in respect 
to matters of protocol. 
  [Gorodetskaya] What would you expect from a meeting with 
Boris Yeltsin? 
  [Dudayev] Everything would, most likely, culminate in a 
communique, a joint statement. I do not believe that Yeltsin is 
ready as yet. More precisely, he himself is ready, perhaps, to 
make a decision, but his entourage and the branches of power are 
not yet prepared to adopt an unequivocal decision, and Yeltsin 
is not prepared to stand up for it. Today he has too many 
opponents who are prepared to destroy and make trouble, and no 
one has any desire to create. 
  [Gorodetskaya] What economic questions specifically would 
you 
like to discuss at the negotiations? 
  [Dudayev] We have a firm economic program. We have grabbed 
hold of the basis under the present conditions of the 
transitional period. We have substantiated production and the 
economy mathematically. 
  [Gorodetskaya] Could you provide a little more detail? 
  [Dudayev] Fragments of this program are now being considered 
overseas and have already been discussed with the top 
industrialists and billionaires. 
  [Gorodetskaya] With possible investors, that is? 
  [Dudayev] Yes, with possible investors that have taken the 
initiative and have already begun to embody it. The main issues 
are land, water, and oil. The Arab East is totally without 
water, and a liter of gasoline is now 2.5 times cheaper than a 
liter of water. We have water--eternal glaciers. I proposed that 
they run a pipeline from our glaciers. They agreed. Further, why 
should oil belong to the strong alone. It should belong to all 
regions and should be affordable at uniform prices to all 
regions and peoples. Armenia and Stavropol and so forth. I, as 
premier, have already taken control of the oil and am now 
protecting it against the petty thieves. 
  [Gorodetskaya] Of what significance is the program for the 
North Caucasus? 
  [Dudayev] It is of great significance for the entire former 
Soviet Union. All will have to repeat this. Everything should 
have a price, then there would be production. We should stop 
being lazy, therefore, and value everything: a cubic meter of 
sand in a quarry used for raw material, a cubic meter of oil, 
each tree, and only then calculate the finished product. 
Further, conduct a complete stock-taking, draw up the government 
contract, revise the taxation policy, and change the formula of 
formation of the budget. Only then will there be a normal 
economy and production in the primary phase. 
  [Gorodetskaya] The Chechen opposition declares that the 
republic's economy has been completely destroyed. 
  [Dudayev] You should not listen to the opposition because 
there simply is none. In order to guzzle down what they have 
plundered, commonplace petty thieves and looters, who committed 
crimes and took to their heels, have found a nice slot beneath 
the word "opposition." At the negotiations with the Russian 
Federation I shall attempt to raise the matter of the 
extradition of criminals that have become ensconced in Moscow 
and Russia. 
  Two and a half years ago I myself made the statement that I 
would like to have a radical opposition that had its own program 
and engaged in political struggle by civilized methods. I missed 
such an opposition. The next day a statement was made to the 
effect that, well, you asked, we are born. Now, however, all the 
so-called members of the opposition have scattered. 
  [Gorodetskaya] What about the opposition's claims that the 
Provisional Council completely controls Nadterechnyy Rayon. 
  [Dudayev] I cannot say this. They make many claims, and 
there 
is a great deal that they want, but they have no programs, no 
vision of constitutional arrangement or legal base. Their desire 
is to push their people into the executive in order to grab an 
appetizing piece and run. They operate by wolves' 
methods--roundup, capture, pullback. 
  [Gorodetskaya] Of what does your idea of the creation of a 
common Caucasus home consist? 
  [Dudayev] I do not divide the Caucasus into either north or 
south or east. 
  [Gorodetskaya] Regardless of religious belief? 
  [Dudayev] Regardless of religious belief, of language. The 
Caucasus is one. The Almighty has already divided up the Earth, 
the peoples have settled apart. Man is the direct accessory of 
this land, its attribute. There are peoples that cannot settle, 
like the Gypsies, for example. But they once had their own land, 
Atlantis, maybe, which became submerged. They will wander until 
that land rises from the water to dry land or is released from 
beneath the ice. The Caucasus is a geopolitical point of the 
world. The Almighty did not create on this green sphere more 
favorable climatic or geopolitical conditions than in the 
Caucasus. There are here the most ancient civilizations and 
culture, and we need to reckon with this, not destroy but find 
the sources of man's real development. This is why I have a 
program for the integration of the economy. 
  [Gorodetskaya] What is the reason for you choosing so 
distinctive a form of the solution of the land question--the 
land and its resources belong to the Almighty? 
  [Dudayev] The land truly does not belong to man. Nothing 
would ever satisfy us. We must reconcile ourselves to the fact 
that nothing in this world belongs to us. Only the regulation of 
property relationships. Dividing up the land--man has not 
thought up anything more absurd. 
  [Gorodetskaya] I was told that a lieutenant general of the 
Russian Air Force came and offered you his services. Is this 
true? 
  [Dudayev] Yes, I have had such offers. I believe that there 
are gifted generals in Russia, we need merely to appreciate 
them, not kill off aviation and generals for politicking petty 
thieves. But I am convinced and have stated that restoring the 
defense shield of the USSR is not only essential but urgently 
necessary to prevent everything sliding into total collapse and 
utter hopelessness. 
  [Gorodetskaya] It is said that you were, for all that, 
invited to restore this shield, that is, to head the CIS forces, 
and you have not declined? 
  [Dudayev] No, I have not declined to head the CIS forces. 
But 
I do not want to be the head, it would suit me were such a 
leitmotiv to be put on a legal basis, and I would be merely a 
participant. It is not a matter of command, it is a matter of 
self-esteem, a matter of the need to restore the defense shield. 
  [Gorodetskaya] How do you see the operations of a Russian or 
joint peacekeeping force, in Karabakh or in Yugoslavia, for 
example? 
  [Dudayev] This is my profession, I know how to perform them. 
Withdraw all the troops, all the blues and greens, I would with 
a single regiment of mine without a single weapon ensure an end 
to the war in Yugoslavia, for example. 
  [Gorodetskaya] How? 
  [Dudayev] There is no need to commit there desperadoes in 
masks and helmets or to dangle trinkets if we have come to help 
and restore balance on humane, legal foundations. We need to go 
with the intent to make peace, but were just one of my 
subordinates to be killed, 100 heads in response. 
  [Gorodetskaya] You constantly speak out against the United 
Nations, the Security Council. Are you not afraid of Chechnya 
finding itself isolated? 
  [Dudayev] Of course it is isolated. International 
institutions of the United Nations type know full well that the 
Chechen have for 300 years now been a proving ground. Who has 
said a sympathetic word about us, not to mention words of 
protection. If they would at least leave out the vilification 
and provocations. It will reach the point where I also permit 
myself to reveal the mechanisms of international incidents. The 
present status of the United Nations is one of an entirely 
illegitimate formation organizing its activity on an unlawful 
basis. Let us start with the name--United Nations--but not all 
states are members. The UN Charter still contains the "hostile 
states" concept. 
  [Gorodetskaya] Which states have recognized Chechnya? 
  [Dudayev] Georgia was the first. We do not want to publicize 
these states as yet. Were I to need the recognition that the 
world community needs, I can assure you that I would obtain 10 
acts of recognition in 10 days. But we do not need such 
recognition. Everyone at one time recognized Georgia. Where is 
the first lawfully elected president now? 
  [Gorodetskaya] How do you view the fact that Ruslan 
Khasbulatov, the former speaker of the Russian parliament, is 
not only living in Chechnya but canvassing the people for the 
rapprochement of Chechnya and Russia? 
  [Dudayev] If the people accept his campaign, I have nothing 
against such campaigning. 
  [Gorodetskaya] I was told that approximately 200,000 
Russians 
have left Groznyy. 
  [Dudayev] Everyone is entitled. They have left, they are 
coming. 
  [Gorodetskaya] But there are, after all, problems when it 
comes to skilled personnel. 
  [Dudayev] A nation should be taught via difficulties. The 
main thing is that the right path be chosen. Spare me a legacy 
where all are scholars, and no one wants to work. 
  [Gorodetskaya] Russia has been assailed as of late not only 
for what it has done but for unrepentance also. Were Russia to 
apologize to the peoples, the Chechen included, and give 
assurances that this would not recur, how would mutual relations 
be built? 
  [Dudayev] How would it apologize, and what would 
follow--crocodile tears? Russia must cure itself. It must first 
guarantee its own state, its own statutes, and its own law and 
their efficacy and the viability and effectiveness of the 
branches of power. The State Duma is an illegitimate organ of 
power, no one knows what the Duma is, they thought up a Duma and 
went and dashed off to think. The Federation Council is a 
hybrid, and it is not known where this comes from. The 
authorities are not working, no branch of power is in control of 
the situation. There is collapse, robbery, and chaos, the 
economy has been completely destroyed, production has been 
halted. And Russia would guarantee? What? It cannot guarantee 
anything at home--they shot up the White House from 
large-caliber machine guns. There is no constitution. There is 
no law on citizenship, but everyone votes. Citizenship was taken 
away overnight. I have the right to say: "I am a citizen of the 
USSR, here is my USSR passport, by what right have I been 
deprived of it?" 
  [Gorodetskaya] You believe that the USSR can be restored? 
  [Dudayev] Restored, no, but renewing it and creating a new 
union is a real necessity. 
  [Gorodetskaya] Would Chechnya join such a union? 
  [Dudayev] We would join a legal union, but not an 
adventurist 
union. I believe that all the former republics would join. 
  [Gorodetskaya] There was a fleeting report that Mikhail 
Gorbachev was invited to Groznyy to discharge the duties of 
president of the USSR. This was a false report, surely? 
  [Dudayev] It was not. A research center placed documentary 
material on my desk. The government studied this material and 
concluded that the Chechen Republic is today the sole exponent 
of the legal base of the former USSR. Some 92 percent of 
citizens voted for preservation of the Union. We respect the 
right of the citizens. We rejected the ballot in the Russian 
Federation, we did not take part. The USSR passports have been 
preserved. We are guided by Union laws where they do not 
conflict with the laws of the republic. We are preparing a 
currency, and exclusively the notes issued on the territory of 
the Soviet Union will be valid on our territory. All the 
attributes of the USSR--the coat of arms and the anthem and the 
flag--are present in the office of the president and will soon 
be introduced as the official attributes of dual citizenship--of 
the USSR and the Chechen Republic of Ichkeria. The foundations 
of the USSR are in Chechnya, and Gorbachev and Lukyanov, who 
were unlawfully removed from office, could embark on the 
discharge of their duties here, therefore. We have not made 
official inquiries, merely made an offer. If they agree, we will 
remain the sole guarantors of the succession of the USSR. If 
they decline, even better. We could then assume the debts of the 
USSR. By all means, and we would guarantee that we would divide 
them equably among all republics and peoples of the USSR and pay 
them off. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47031 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94031" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   8 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kalmykia President Ilyumzhinov Profiled </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Kalmykia President Ilyumzhinov Profiled </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0824A Moscow ROSSIYA in Russian No 22, 8 Jun 94 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0824A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Olga Senatova and Aleksandr Kasimov, Institute </F>
for Humanitarian-Political Studies: "This Nasty Word 
'Constitution'"] 
  [Text] As we know, Kirsan Ilyumzhinov, who was 
elected President of Kalmykia on 11 April 1993, promised during 
his electoral campaign to introduce presidential rule in the 
republic, to disband the Supreme Soviet and to get rid of the 
opposition. These promises have been fulfilled, unlike the 
promises to create a free economic zone, to promote industry, 
and to make Kalmykia a center of world trade and tourism. 
  On 26 April 1993, the republic's Council of Ministers and 
the 
heads of rayon administrations laid down their powers. The 
president undertook the formulation of the government and the 
appointment of presidential representatives to the rayons. Only 
two of the 13 former heads of administration became such 
representatives. 
  The disbanding of the Supreme Soviet took place rather 
quietly and in an apparently painless manner for the republic. 
At its last session, the Supreme Soviet simply adopted the 
decision to disband itself--only two deputies voted against it. 
Work had been performed with each deputy. The president had met 
with practically all of them, and, pressuring some and promising 
something to others, he achieved the necessary outcome of the 
voting. A professional parliament comprised of 25 members was 
created on the basis of the Supreme Soviet. The list was 
presented by the president and consisted primarily of his 
supporters. During the 11 months of its existence, the 
parliament never once spoke out against the president, even on 
the most minor matters. In 1994 the republic press began calling 
this a puppet parliament. The parliament members did not take 
offense at this, which was not surprising. After all, there have 
beem known cases of repeal of certain parliament decisions which 
the president did not like for some reason. 
  The rayon level was left without even any formal 
representative institutions. The president's representatives 
became the masters there. The structure of power in the republic 
turned into a pyramid, subordinated to the president, whose 
slightest whims were not only carried out by the structures of 
executive power, but also legitimized by the quasi-parliament. 
  After the elections, the opposition in the republic found 
itself shattered and demoralized. The parties of democratic 
orientation--the RPRF [Republican Party of the Russian 
Federation] and the DPR [Democratic Party of Russia], initially 
spoke out in support of the president, agreeing even to 
voluntary self-dissolution (this was one of the principles of 
candidate Ilyumzhinov's pre-electoral program). The Cossacks and 
the religious associations followed suit. Finding themselves in 
the real opposition to the president were the "Slavs of 
Kalmykia" movement, the Kalmyk organization of the CPRF 
[Communist Party of the Russian Federation] and the Free Party 
of Kalmykia--the party of the Association of Farmers of 
Kalmykia, the only one of the listed organizations which had a 
material base and some influence. 
  Already by the Fall of 1993, it was becoming clear that the 
large-scale projects for flourishing of the republic's economy 
according to Ilyumzhinov were experiencing a collapse. 
Ilyumzhinov was not able to add to his authority also among the 
regional leaders. He continued to be perceived as an outsider, 
primarily because his goals and intentions remained unclear. 
  During the Moscow events of 21 September - 4 October 1993, 
Kirsan Ilyumzhinov tried to play solo. It seems the Kalmyk 
president increased his rating, making people speak much about 
him. However, this was only at first glance, and only in the 
"western" understanding of political ratings. In the political 
space of Russia such actions led to Ilyumzhinov's total 
political defeat. 
  Ilyumzhinov lost even more after 4 October, when he in fact 
expressed full loyalty to the President of Russia. Here we 
should remember that open opposition to Yeltsin during those 
days was demonstrated only by two republic leaders--Khakasia 
Supreme Soviet representative Shtygashev and Ilyumzhinov. 
However, Shtygashev, whose position in his republic was must 
less stable than that of Ilyumzhinov, did not repent in 
anything, and the Center did not dare touch him. Yet, even if it 
had wanted to, Moscow could not have touched Ilyumzhinov. 
  By the Spring of 1994 it became ultimately clear that the 
republic was in such a difficult position as never before. 
Moreover, it became known that the credit in the amount of 14 
billion rubles (R) obtained from the RF Central Bank in November 
1992 by the commercial bank "Step," which was controlled by 
Ilyumzhinov, judging by the reporting note of Minister of 
Internal Affairs of Russia V. Yerin, had gone for conversion to 
currency funds for a group of persons headed by Ilyumzhinov. The 
compromise was set in motion after the events of 3-4 October in 
Moscow, but then the matter was frozen, not without some 
grounds, as many observers believe, in exchange for 
Ilyumzhinov's initiative. 
  As a result, the republic found itself without money, and 
people did not get their wages for several months. And here a 
political crisis ensued, triggered by the president's 
announcement about abolishing the republic's constitution. 
  On 8 February 1994 the session of parliament adopted an 
amendment to the Constitution of the Republic of Kalmykia-Khalmg 
Tangch, according to which the words "sovereign" and 
"sovereignty" were deleted from the constitution. The 
justification for this was the adoption of the new Constitution 
of Russia, which stated that Russia is a federative state. The 
decision was discussed and adopted, naturally, at the proposal 
of the president. This event did not evoke any particular 
emotion in the republic. However, already on 11 March at the 
expanded session of the parliament, the president announced that 
he would repeal the republic's constitution and would declare 
the direct effect of the federal constitution on the territory 
of Kalmykia. 
  This announcement by Ilyumzhinov could not remain without 
consequences. Heated discussions flared at the closed meeting of 
parliament which was held immediately after the expanded one. 
Six deputies spoke out against the president's announcements. 
Among these six was the editor-in-chief of the official 
government newspaper IZVESTIYA KALMYKIYI, Mankya Koneyev. 
  Ilyumzhinov suggested to Koneyev that he submit his 
voluntary 
resignation. The president's press secretary was appointed as 
the new editor-in-chief of the newspaper. 
  On 18 March, a session of the republic's parliament was held 
in Elista, devoted to the new Basic Law. A decree by which the 
Steppe Code must be approved by the Constitutional Assembly 
comprised of 300 members was adopted by a majority vote. 
  On 22 March, the draft of the Steppe Code (Basic) Law) of 
the 
Republic of Kalmykia was published in the newspapers. The code 
was developed, apparently, in record time (no more than a week). 
According to the draft, the supreme power in the republic 
becomes the president. The Legislative Assembly--the People's 
Hural--may be disbanded by the president, for example, as 
follows: "The President of the Republic of Kalmykia may disband 
the People's Hural prior to expiration of its term if the 
People's Hural does not ensure stability in society." No 
mechanism for dismissing the president was provided in the code. 
  The Constitutional Assembly was held on 5 April. The 
opposition did not participate in it. The representatives of the 
opposition parties and movements refused to propose candidates 
to the Constitutional Assembly, while 8 parliament deputies who 
had voted against the Steppe Code on 18 March did not attend. 
The assembly was held in one day and was concluded at 2:30 with 
the adoption of the Steppe Code. One person voted against 
it--the first secretary of the Kalmyk Republic Committee of the 
CPRF, and one other person abstained. Of all those who spoke, 
only one proposed amendments to the text of the code. The others 
criticized the opposition and said that the adoption of the code 
was a progressive step of world significance and that soon other 
republics would follow the example of Kalmykia. Hero of 
Socialist Labor and poet David Kugultinov presented a speech in 
which he announced that the very word "constitution" is deeply 
loathesome to him, since the constitution did not protect the 
Kalmyks during the time of Stalinism. Nevertheless, the most 
odious parts of the code were slightly re-worked. 
  On 7 April, the decree of the Constitutional Assembly was 
published in the newspapers. Thus, the Republic of 
Kalmykia-Khalmg Tanch now bears the name of the Republic of 
Kalmykia, and it must live according to the Steppe Code (Basic 
Law) of the Republic of Kalmykia. 
  That which is going on in Kalmykia is in line with the 
general tendencies of behavior of executive power in the regions 
of Russia, and reflects as if in a warped mirror all that is 
going on in the Russian center itself, at the top of the 
executive vertical. The tendency of President Ilyumzhinov toward 
theatrical effects and a certain political "Khlestakov 
mannerism" merely attract attention to the republic, and give 
the all-Russian processes a clearly apparent character. 
  We will recall that Ilyumzhinov disbanded the Supreme Soviet 
of his republic five months before the Moscow events, and after 
21 September and until the beginning of October 1993 sharply 
criticized Yeltsin specifically because he did not follow his 
lead--he did not fully take into consideration the Kalmyk 
experience. At that time these words were perceived as a 
curiosity. However, it is possible that it was specifically 
Ilyumzhinov's experience which was taken into consideration by 
presidential analysts in developing Edict No 1400. But even if 
this is not so, both cases of disbanding of the soviets were 
links in the same chain. After his election as president, 
Ilyumzhinov frankly exposed the motives for his future 
actions--"the opposition will get in the way"--and did not heed 
its admonitions about the necessity of the latter for democracy. 
It is characteristic that, in the words of Ilyumzhinov, the 
opposition may hinder the progress of economic reforms in the 
republic. All year President Ilyumzhinov spent at the top of the 
pyramid of power without any indications of hindrance from the 
opposition--and what about the reforms? 
  Not one of the president's pre-electoral promises has been 
fulfilled. Moreover, the real economic situation in the republic 
has deteriorated. The republic needs subsidies for almost 100 
percent of its budget--income from the sale of wool and other 
farm products is absent due to low purchase prices. The 
much-advertised projects for participation of foreign companies 
in the construction of an international airport and the 
provision of video and telephone services to every shepherd's 
station, as well as the idea of turning the republic into the 
capital of world Buddhism, were also from the realm of 
discussions on the topic of "it would be nice to build a 
bridge." However, a system of organs of power has been 
formulated which legitimizes a regime of uncontrolled personal 
power of the president. 
  The exotic manner of the Kalmyk president's actions hinders 
Moscow observers from seeing an analogy. Certainly, the stories 
about Ilyumzhinov's mediation during the talks between Yeltsin 
and Nazarbayev, or the next idea about holding a meeting of the 
Dalai llama, the Pope of Rome and the Patriarch of Moscow and 
All Russia give reason to smile. But, in fact, we do not really 
want to smile. 
  The executive power, which is dedicated to itself, is 
incapable of effectively resolving the real problems. Even if we 
discount the cases of outright corruption and expenditure of 
budget or attracted funds for personal needs (and such cases 
have been, are and will be)--even the most honest and best heads 
of administration are powerless under current conditions to make 
any global changes in the life of their region. They simply do 
not have the means for this. Under conditions of the absence of 
control on the part of the representative power, efforts to find 
these means at any cost may inflict tangible loss both upon the 
region and upon the state as a whole. 
  As for Kalmykia's prospects, they are bleak. A new round of 
political confrontations in the republic is inevitable. The 
national problems, which have been long forgotten for the last 
two years, will also become more acute. But the main thing is 
that now the citizens of the republic will not be lured to any 
elections by any promises. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47032 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94032" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   23 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Khabarovsk Presidential Representative on First Hundred Days </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Khabarovsk Presidential Representative on First Hundred Days </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0785A TIKHOOKEANSKAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 23 Apr 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0785A </F>
<F P=104>  TIKHOOKEANSKAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article, based on interview with Kondrat Yevtushenko, </F>
Khabarovsk presidential representative, by Igor Shkolnikov: "One 
Hundred Days After the Edict"] 
  [Text] Now, it is true, a little more has already happened. 
Since the time when the former Amur physician and then RSFSR 
people's deputy and mayor of Amursk, Kondrat Yevtushenko, by 
order of the president of Russia, replaced the not unknown 
Vladimir Desyatov in the post of representative in Khabarovsk 
Kray. But we talked already not in the "White House", but in the 
new residence on 19 Muravyev-Amurskiy, when the presidential 
representative had completed exactly 100 days in office. This, 
by tradition, is the time for the first results. And our readers 
in their letters put the question more simply: What is the, in 
memory, second representative of Yeltsin doing? 
  Yevtushenko began his activity in his new walk of life with, 
as he puts it, "especially prosaic things." However, he had to 
set aside three weeks for them. He dismissed Mr. Che--the 
assistant deputy of the former presidential 
representative--since such a post is not provided for by the 
staff list. He abolished the branch of the representation in 
Komsomolsk-na-Amure: "It is also incomprehensible on what 
grounds it was formed by my predecessor." And in general he 
brought the number of the apparatus of the representation to the 
established norm--under Desyatov there were 17 persons; now 
there are six. 
  Well, but then, Yevtushenko spreads his hands in a gesture 
of 
helplessness, the usual work began, prescribed by the statute on 
the presidential representation in the krays and oblasts. In the 
main, this is the promotion of the implementation of the edicts 
of the state leader and the decrees and directives of the 
government. 
  How? And are not those really right who suggest that his 
basic task is to keep an eye on how the edicts, decrees, 
directives, and so on are carried out by the administration of 
the kray? And after that, how lawful are the decisions of the 
local authorities themselves? No, he says. That is, not that 
they are not correct, but....they understand the situation 
incorrectly. 
  Yes, the interlocutor agrees. Remember when the institution 
of presidential representatives was created? When in many 
regions the soviets and their executive committees were either 
in clear opposition to Yeltsin or took part in the famous 
"parade of sovereignties," taking the decision of greater 
political direction. Then, really, not the shadowing, of course, 
but the monitoring by presidential representatives was regarded 
as the paramount task. 
  Now the statute, too, has been changed, and Boris 
Nikolayevich himself has publicly declared that "he will not 
tolerate two bears in a den," that is to say, governors and 
their representatives at odds with one another. And for this 
reason Ishayev and Yevtushenko are not at odds. On the contrary, 
following in the channel of "promoting implementation," they 
make the rounds together through the offices of the government 
in order to protect the interests of the kray, to speed up 
decisions at the central level pertaining to the kray. Of, for 
example, the fine-sounding decree on measures to stabilize the 
socioeconomic situation of the region during 1993-1995. And 
further negotiations were conducted in Moscow not without 
Yevtushenko's participation regarding tariffs on electric power 
and the payment of debts to the "defense sector".... 
  In short, for the sake of the fulfillment of his chief 
function, Yevtushenko estimates, of the first 100 days, he spent 
at least 30 in the capital, in meetings with ministers, state 
committee chairmen, etc. At the same time, once a month he flies 
here for a general meeting of presidential representatives, 
where experience is shared. Only there is no need, he 
emphasizes, to think that he "reads the governor's lips." But 
then rumors circulate--they say, because Ishayev recommended him 
for the post, he first of all will not "come forward," and, 
secondly, he will serve as an additional "expediter" [tolkach]. 
No, Yevtushenko's position is the following: Not to have 
conflicts over trifles, but through joint efforts to work for 
the good of the inhabitants of the kray. In this very work there 
may be disputes, but over business. 
  Incidentally, he has the right to make representations over 
local leaders, including the governor. In other words, to 
propose, if there is a reason, to punish them. Up to now he has 
not done this; there are no reasons. But to the governor 
himself, he will, possibly, submit a representation over some of 
the political figures subordinated to him. But, again, not for 
the sake of a battle with individual officials--in the name of 
the cause. 
  This springs already from his second function--from the 
reception of citizens and the sorting out of collective appeals. 
People come both on the official reception day (once a month) 
and at any other time, since to get to him is not difficult. 
Very often, alas, they turn to the wrong quarter. Regarding a 
leaking roof or worn-out plumbing. Those must be politely sent 
to the proper departments. But he tries to help those in regard 
to whom officials have violated the law. Let us say, they have 
dismissed a person without reason, and he, no matter how hard he 
tries, cannot find justice. Well, most of all, 
"petition-bearers" regarding the land question: Red tape with 
the registration of documents, difficulties in trying to get 
ownership rights.... In an amicable way, all questions connected 
with violations of laws must be decided through a court, but 
many have not yet become used to--Yevtushenko understands them. 
  All in all, not counting the collective complaints, during 
his 100 days Yevtushenko has examined fifty odd such, private, 
ones. Some he has solved, some are being solved. How? Basically 
through direct intercourse with various people, thus much more 
effectively. Then and there he saw a lot of them, and about some 
he drew conclusions. 
  Complaints about Ishayev? There are. They say, he made a 
decision, but it is not carried out. But this is already, excuse 
me, the competence of the supervisory department of the 
administration. Otherwise why does it exist? What is more, the 
kray has enough other supervisory organs. 
  Here, strictly speaking, is everything for the first 100 
days. Yevtushenko nevertheless still lives in a hotel and is 
eating in the cafeteria. However, as he himself indicates, he 
cannot get used to it--when he was a deputy, he lived for two 
years in a hotel room. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47033 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94033" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Khabarovsk Growing Dissatisfied With Trade With China </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Khabarovsk Growing Dissatisfied With Trade With China </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0785B Khabarovsk TIKHOOKEANSKAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 21 
Apr 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0785B </F>
<F P=104>  Khabarovsk TIKHOOKEANSKAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Raisa Yeldashova: "Chinese Love Has Passed...."] </F>
  [Text] Which, in general was precisely what should 
have been expected. So strong was our fascination with the 
neighboring country during the past three years that in the heat 
of "passion" both inadequate measures and abnormal contracts 
piled up. People closed their eyes to quality and to strangeness 
in the conduct of the economic partners, and so on, and so 
forth. In this spirit, A. Levintal, chairman of the Committee 
for Economic Policy of the administration of the kray, opened 
the session of the regular Council on Foreign Economic Relations. 
  The mutual cooling-off manifests itself extremely clearly. 
As 
the chief of the Amur River Steamship Line, A. Sukhov, informed 
the assembled, no one at the present time concludes contracts 
for the transportation of cargo to the Chinese or to our side 
with the steamship line; all the same, there are no cargoes in 
the port. And the point is not that it is still early--last year 
at this time there was no getting rid of businessmen. 
  Automobile crossings in Pokrovka, near Bikin, and in 
Kazakevichev also have not produced the expected effect. 
  Another symptom is the reduction in the rate of registration 
of joint enterprises with China. As the chief of the Department 
for Foreign Economic Relations of the administration, N. 
Pisarenko, reported to the assembled, there is a trend on the 
part of our neighbors to create their own enterprises 100 
percent in the territory of the kray. According to information 
of the Khabarovsk City Service for Foreign Economic Relations, 
this is done for the purpose of the further creation of joint 
enterprises on the part of the Third World--Southeast Asia. 
  Among the objective manifestations of the "fall of 
temperature" one can also include the toughening of the passport 
and visa procedure, the entry from one country to the other, and 
the prohibition by our governor of the registration of joint 
ventures in apartment houses. 
  There are, of course, many reasons for the mutual 
disappointment. We have stuffed ourselves with Chinese consumer 
goods not of the best quality and we prefer the goods of other 
countries, even if more expensive, but better. The same with 
food projects, with the exception perhaps of noodles, apples, 
and sugar. 
  The businessmen wore themselves out "beating" each other 
over 
the fulfillment of contracts, both in hard currency and in 
barter. 
  Out of 193 Russian-Chinese joint ventures registered as of 1 
April of this year (this is 43 percent of their total number in 
the kray), only a handful are engaged in production. 
Correspondingly, the volume of investments in our economy in 
this sector is insignificantly small. The Chinese partners 
contribute to the charter fund the funds they have gained in the 
kray from the sale of their products. Not to speak of the fact 
that statistics and the tax organs not cannot even find the mass 
of the joint ventures: People change their address and do not 
notify anyone. 
  Many reproaches were expressed that were aimed at the 
practice of barter contracts, which are used to lower the cost 
of the deal and the foreign exchange enrichment of the leaders 
of the firms. 
  Great uneasiness is also called forth by the massive export 
of foreign exchange from Russia by Chinese businessmen and 
speculators. As a countermeasure, it was proposed to establish 
foreign exchange taxation at the border (something like the tax 
on profits), a foreign currency duty for trading in markets, and 
so on. 
  But these are already details. What awaits us on the plane 
of 
principles? 
  At the session it was noted that the government of the PRC 
has instructed Chinese entrepreneurs to increase the quality of 
their products to make them competitive in the Russian market. 
There is a decision to reform the structures of the companies 
involved in foreign economic relations and to decrease their 
number. 
  Still another interesting step: Beginning in 1994, it turns 
out, China is introducing the licensing of import into the 
country of ferrous metallurgy products, and this is the basic 
item of our export there, at least during the past year. The 
companies that will purchase metal for rubles gained from the 
sale of consumer goods in the Russian market are exempted from 
the licensing. This is not simply a fight for the market--these 
are consequences of the reduction in the quota for the import of 
Chinese textiles into the United States. Here we are already 
talking about the survival of an industry. 
  On the other hand, by decision of the PRC Government, 
capital 
construction has been partly frozen as of November 1993. This 
has already struck painfully at firms that had concluded 
contracts for the delivery of building materials and metal to 
China. The shipped commodity got stuck in warehouses, Chinese 
foreign trade companies were proclaimed bankrupt, and ours did 
not receive the barter goods. And, obviously, no enlivening is 
foreseen in this sphere. 
  The new Chinese consul in Khabarovsk has already turned to 
the Chamber of Commerce and Industry with the request to 
organize an exhibition of their consumer goods in order to 
demonstrate what their producers are capable of doing, and to 
break our allergy to everything Chinese. 
  There are also many vaguenesses in regard to border 
crossings. According to some data, the Chinese authorities are 
inclined to think that large capital investments on their side 
of the Bikin and Kazakevichev crossings are inexpedient. And, on 
the contrary, they are actively building ships of the 
"river-sea" type. 
  Incidentally, having spoken at the Council on Foreign 
Economic Relations, Ye. Shchukin, the chief of the Khabarovsk 
Customs Service, remarked that his service from the very 
beginning expressed doubt about the effectiveness of the 
construction of crossings in places where the Chinese side does 
not have large settlements and large expenditures are necessary 
for the construction of normal roads. And spoke in favor of the 
expansion of the existing crossings. 
  But these are all positions of our neighbors. But is there 
an 
objective necessity for cooperation with Khabarovsk Kray? 
  Judging by everything, there nevertheless is. As follows 
from 
the speech of N. Pisarenko, the expansion of the sale of 
products in China is regarded by many entrepreneurs as one of 
the variants of the way out of the crisis. Our cutters and 
boats, furniture, machine tools, and cable, not to mention metal 
and other materials, "go." On the other hand, the kray will have 
a difficult time without some Chinese products, above all, food 
products. It is another matter that all this Russian-Chinese 
business must go into a civilized framework. How to do 
this--that is the question. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47034 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94034" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   6 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Khabarovsk First Quarter 1994 Socioeconomic Statistics </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Khabarovsk First Quarter 1994 Socioeconomic Statistics </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Published 

<F P=102>   944F0788A Khabarovsk TIKHOOKEANSKAYA ZVEZDA in Russian 6 May 
94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0788A </F>
<F P=104>  Khabarovsk TIKHOOKEANSKAYA ZVEZDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Khabarovsk Kray statistical administration: </F>
"Khabarovsk Kray Socioeconomic Situation in First Quarter 1994"] 
  [Text] The most important economic and social indicators 
showing the general results of the first quarter of 1994 are 
given in the table below: 


                               January-March 1994       January-March 1994 as 
                                                        % of January-March 
                                                        1993 

Volume of industrial output,   721.0                    79 
R billion--in comparable 
prices 

Capital investment utilized,   110.2                    55 
R billion 

Commissioned through all       78.7                     122 
sources of 
finances--housing, thousand 
square meters of total area 

Moved by common carrier: 

--cargo, thousand tonnes       5,011.3                  70.0 
(not including by sea) 

--passengers, million (not     66.6                     105.2 
including by sea or rail) 

Retail turnover, including     269.6                    6.4 times 
public catering, R billion 

--in comparable prices         33.4                     79.8 

For-fee services provided, R   52.1                     8.9 times 
billion 

--in comparable prices         2.6                      43.9 

Per capita monetary income     475.7                    10.2 times 
of the population, R 
thousand 

Composite consumer price                                132.8 
index 

Foreign economic activities: 


--exports, $ million           97.1                     - 

--imports, $ million           34.2                     - 

Profit in public economy       49.7                     - 
(January-February), R 
billion 


  INDUSTRY. The volume of industrial production 
declined in January-March 1994 by 21 percent. Production is 
declining because of instability in mutual clearing between 
enterprises, shrinking demand for output, and lack of sufficient 
funds to purchase raw material and components. 
  There are production stoppages at 50-70 percent of kray 
enterprises monthly; losses amount to 15 percent of the standard 
work schedule; 75 percent of losses stem from difficulties in 
selling output, and 23 percent are caused by lack of raw 
material and components. 
  In the fuel and energy sector, the volume of production 
declined by 18 percent, including electric power generation--by 
4 percent, coal production--by 29 percent, primary oil 
refining--by 25 percent, and, correspondingly, the output of 
automotive gasoline--by 37 percent, diesel fuel--by 30 percent, 
and boiler oil--by 19 percent. 
  Metallurgical enterprises cut steel-smelting by 16 percent 
and production of rolled metal by 48 percent. Gold production 
increased by 41 percent. 
  In machine building, the volume of production fell off by 46 
percent, including production of gas turbines--by 76 percent, 
metal-cutting machine tools--by 62 percent, traveling cranes--by 
78 percent, and accumulator batteries--by 20 percent. 
  In the timber, woodworking, and pulp and paper industry, the 
outtake of commercial wood dropped by 37 percent, production of 
lumber--by 42 percent, plywood--by 77 percent, wood-chip 
board--by 55 percent, wood-fiber board--by 19 percent, 
cardboard--by 50 percent, and cellulose--by 73 percent. 
  In the construction materials industry, production declined 
by 38 percent, including that of brick--by 18 percent, 
preassembled ferroconcrete components--by 39 percent, and rolled 
roofing materials--by 48 percent. 
  The output of consumer goods fell by almost 30 percent, 
including foodstuffs--by 25 percent, and nonfood items--by 38 
percent. The output of basic foodstuffs is characterized by the 
following data: 


                            Actually produced      January-March 1994 as % 
                                                   of January-March 1993 

Meat, including category    3,196                  83 
I subproducts, tonnes 

Sausages, tonnes            2,797                  82 

Ready-to-cook meat          488                    86 
products, tonnes 

Whole-milk products,        14,419                 87 
tonnes 

Canned fish, thousand       2,288                  2.9 times 
standard cans 

Flour, tonnes               39,801                 95 

Cereal, tonnes              4,863                  92 

Bread and bakery items,     28,043                 82 
tonnes 

Confectionery items,        5,180                  67 
tonnes 

Macaroni items, tonnes      1,777                  66 

Margarine, tonnes           1,972                  62 


  Production of alcoholic beverages declined by 22 percent. 
  A difficult situation arose with respect to production of 
light industry goods. In January-March their output declined by 
52 percent. 
  The average wage in industry over March amounted to 
R261,000 and increased as compared to January by 20.5 
percent. 
  CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION. In the first quarter of 1994 
enterprises of all forms of ownership in the kray utilized 
R110.2 billion of capital investment. Capital assets worth R19.1 
billion were commissioned. 
  The main source of financing capital construction is 
enterprises' own funds (more than 48 percent of all capital 
investment). Centralized funds financed out of the republic 
budget comprised 26 percent, local budgets--18 percent, 
preferential credits--7 percent, and investment funds--0.3 
percent. 
  State enterprises and organizations accounted for the 
greatest share of utilized capital investment (62 percent), 
followed by joint-stock companies (36 percent as compared to 6.1 
percent in the first quarter of 1993). 
  Within the scope of capital investment, R57.3 billion, or 52 
percent, was used for construction of production facilities. 
  In the agro-industrial complex [APK], R4.5 billion of 
capital 
investment was utilized, which is four times less than in the 
first quarter of 1993. Of the total volume of investment in the 
APK, state budget funds comprised one-third. 
  Housing construction accounted for R35.3 billion. 
Enterprises 
and organizations of all forms of ownership, utilizing all 
sources of financing, built housing with a total area of 78,700 
square meters, which is 22 percent more than over the 
corresponding period of last year. A total of 1,292 apartments 
were built; at the same time, 125,600 families are on waiting 
lists for housing. 
  AGRICULTURE. The total volume of agricultural 
production in the first quarter of this year fell off by 11 
percent as compared to the first quarter of 1993. 
  Kolkhozes, sovkhozes, and agricultural enterprises (on the 
basis of sovkhozes) produced 6,800 tonnes of meat (livestock and 
poultry sold for slaughter) in live weight, which is 8 percent 
below last year's level; 12,200 tonnes of milk (6 percent less); 
and 66.3 million eggs (19 percent less). 
  Production of meat declined at the farms of six rayons, most 
significantly among them the farms in Komsomolskiy Rayon--by 41 
percent; that of milk--in all rayons with the exception of 
Bikinskiy and Imeni Sergeya Lazo; and of eggs--in all except 
Sovetsko-Gavanskiy Rayon. 
  Over three months of the current year, milk yield per cow 
amounted to 483 kg, which is 24 kg more than over the 
corresponding period of last year. 
  The yield per laying hen amounted to 50 eggs, which is six 
eggs less than last year. 
  The herd of productive livestock in kolkhozes, sovkhozes, 
and 
agricultural enterprises (on the basis of sovkhozes) continues 
to decline. As of 1 April of 1994 it consisted of 63,200 head of 
horned cattle (90 percent of the first quarter of 1993), 
including 25,000 cows (89 percent); 164,100 swine (96 percent); 
and 3.736 million head of poultry (85 percent). 
  Production of calves declined by 9 percent, that of piglets 
increased by 14 percent. 
  Horned cattle mortality increased by 3 percent, and swine 
mortality--by 17 percent. 
  The drop in the output of animal husbandry products resulted 
in a smaller volume of procurement of milk and eggs--by 5 
percent and 23 percent, respectively--and amounted to 10,200 
tonnes and 48.2 million units. There was 0.5 percent more 
livestock and poultry procured than in the first quarter of 
1993--a total of 6,200 tonnes (in live weight). Farms in six 
rayons reduced the quantities of livestock and poultry sold to 
the state, most significantly among them the farms in Amurskiy 
Rayon--by 67 percent; of milk--the farms in 11 rayons, among 
them Ulchskiy--by 89 percent, and Tuguro-Chumyakanskiy--by 65 
percent; and of eggs--the farms in all rayons except 
Sovetsko-Gavanskiy. 
  As of 1 April there were 1,850 peasant (private) farms in 
the 
kray; they were allocated 45,500 hectares (25 hectares on 
average per farm). The greatest number of peasant (private) 
farms were registered in Imeni Lazo Rayon--467, and Khabarovsk 
Rayon--367. Along with new peasant farms being formed, 244 farms 
went out of business since 1992. 
  In the first quarter of 1994 1,524 families received land 
for 
collective orchards and vegetable gardens. 
  TRANSPORTATION AND COMMUNICATIONS. The volume of 
cargo shipping by all categories of transport decreased as 
compared to the first quarter of 1993 by 30 percent and amounted 
to 5.0113 million tonnes. In rail transportation, cargo 
shipments declined by 26.8 percent, in automotive--by 44.6 
percent, and air transportation--by 25 percent; at the same 
time, 31 percent more cargo was moved by river transport 
enterprises. 
  In pipeline transport, 49,300 tonnes of petroleum products 
(20 percent less) entered the pipeline at the point of 
origination. 
  In rail transport the volume of loading of almost all most 
important categories of cargo declined, including bituminous 
coal--by 38.3 percent, oil and petroleum products--by 26.5 
percent, timber--by 26.2 percent, and grain and products of 
milling--by 24.9 percent. Loading of chemical and mineral 
fertilizer declined dramatically--by 97 percent. Loading of 
cement increased by 3.5 times. 
  In the first quarter of this year, 226,000 tonnes of 
cargo--63 percent less than in the first quarter of last 
year--were delivered to the Vanino railroad transfer station, 
which is a gateway shipping point for cargo destined for the 
regions of the Far North and areas equated to it. 
  In air transportation in the first quarter, as compared to 
the first quarter of last year, despite rate deregulation the 
passenger flow increased by 9 percent, and in automotive 
transportation--by 3 percent. Automotive carriers moved 68.038 
million passengers, and air carriers--576,000 (105 percent and 
128.1 percent, respectively, as compared to the first quarter of 
last year). 
  Because of the insufficient pool of the rolling stock and 
its 
poor technical condition, the situation with respect to city and 
suburban transportation services for the population remains 
difficult. 
  Each month more than 16 percent of scheduled bus, trolley 
bus, and streetcar runs in Khabarovsk are not performed. 
  Expenditures for repairs of roads and structures amounted to 
R2.879 billion. 
  Over the first quarter of 1994, communications services 
enterprises earned R27.4608 billion from their main activities. 
Communication services provided for the population accounted for 
R5.9335 billion of earnings. 
  The physical volume of most important categories of 
communication services declined considerably: newspaper and 
magazine subscription and retail sales--by 28.3 percent; 
letters, postcards, and small parcels--by 33.2 percent; and 
money transfers--by 28.5 percent. On the other hand, 1.7 times 
more declared-value parcels were sent than in the first quarter 
of 1993. 
  THE CONSUMER MARKET. In the current year the trade 
sector continued to adapt to new conditions. Retail turnover, 
including public catering, for January-March amounted to R269.5 
billion, which in current prices is 6.4 times more than the 
corresponding period of last year, and in comparable prices--20 
percent less. State-owned trade enterprises accounted for 52 
percent of the turnover (65 percent in January-March 1993), 
privately owned--34 percent (7 percent), and consumer 
cooperatives and enterprises of other types of ownership--14 
percent (28 percent). The turnover structure has changed as 
compared to the first quarter of 1993. The proportion of 
foodstuffs increased from 61 to 64 percent, and the proportion 
of nonfood items dropped from 39 to 36 percent. 
  Public catering turnover amounted to R20 billion and 
declined 
in comparable prices by 20 percent. This was caused by the 
decline in the number of public catering enterprises. 
  Continuous market saturation with goods is characterized by 
the current inventories in trade; there were R163 billion worth 
of inventories, which is enough for 59 days of trading. A year 
ago this indicator was equal to 45 days. 
  The volume of for-fee services provided to the population 
amounted to R52 billion, which is 8.9 times more in current 
prices than last year, but 56 percent less in comparable prices. 
The volume of services provided for the population by privately 
owned enterprises accounted for 3 percent of the total volume of 
services. 
  Consumer services account for 12 percent of the total volume 
for for-fee services. Their actual volume was R6.1 billion. In 
current prices this is 7.3 times more than over the 
corresponding period of last year. However, the real volume of 
consumer services declined by 50 percent. 
  FOREIGN ECONOMIC ACTIVITIES. In the first quarter, 
the kray's foreign trade turnover amounted to $131.3 million. 
Kray enterprises exported $97.1 million worth of products as 
compared to $39.7 million over the corresponding period of 1993. 
  The geography of shipments abroad changed somewhat. While in 
the first quarter 1993 the greatest share of exports went to 
China (33 percent), during the period under review these exports 
accounted for only 5.6 percent. Japan remains constant as a 
traditional consumer of timber; exports to this country in the 
first quarter comprised 67 percent as compared to 27.5 percent 
in the first quarter of 1993. Exports to the Republic of Korea 
dropped somewhat from 8.6 percent to 6 percent. Exports to the 
United States grew from $40,000 to $2.2 million; to 
Australia--from $2.1 million to $7.9 million. Contacts with 
Israel, Turkey, and other countries are expanding. 
  The structure of exports remains practically unchanged with 
minor fluctuations. The proportion of timber comprised 56.7 
percent, ferrous metals--14.4 percent, oil products--12.8 
percent, and nonferrous metals--3.6 percent. It should be noted 
that the proportional share of deliveries of various 
transportation equipment purchased outside the kray borders has 
dropped (from 4.1 percent to 0.6 percent). 
  Imports were brought from 23 countries and their value in 
the 
first quarter amounted to $34.2 million. Goods from China 
account for the greatest proportion of imports--69.5 percent, 
from the Republic of Korea--10.9 percent, and from the United 
States--6.3 percent. 
  The bulk of imports are light industry goods (48.3 percent) 
and foodstuffs (46.7 percent). The rest of imports are 
represented by a variety of goods. 
  PRIVATIZATION. Since the beginning of the year 
107 enterprises (facilities) have been privatized, and overall 
since the beginning of privatization--1,046 enterprises. In the 
current year, 33 percent of privatized enterprises were in 
industry, 29 percent--in the trade sector, and 18 percent--in 
consumer services. 
  Enterprises privatized through conversion to joint-stock 
holding comprised 38 percent of the total (41 enterprises). Of 
the three versions of privatization, labor collectives preferred 
the second option, which allows them to keep the controlling 
share. 
  "Small-business" privatization is carried out mainly by way 
of selling enterprises through commercial bids (74 percent) and 
auctions (12 percent) and by buying out leased property (14 
percent). 
  The greatest number of facilities sold were in 
Khabarovsk--48, and Komsomolsk--23; among the rayons: 
Vaninskiy--10, Amurskiy--six, and Nikolayevskiy and 
Solnechnyy--five each. 
  Privatization of enterprises generated in the first quarter 
(including money received for enterprises privatized earlier) 
R4.893 billion in monetary revenue and brought in 115,900 
privatization vouchers. 
  Of the total revenue, R389.7 million [as published], or 80 
percent, was transferred into the budgets of all levels. 
  In January-March 1994, 9,439 apartments in the kray with a 
total area of 480,700 square meters were transferred to the 
private ownership of citizens. Apartments were privatized in 
almost all rayons, except Nanayskiy and Imeni P. Osipenko. 
  The Khabarovsk universal exchange Bizon, which operates on 
kray territory, in the first quarter conducted 24 tradings at 
which 197 deals were concluded. The exchange's turnover 
comprised R738.8 million. 
  PRICES. As compared to December 1993, consumer 
prices for consumer goods and for-fee services in March 
increased by 32.8 percent, including by 28.5 percent for 
consumer goods and by 92.5 percent for for-fee services. 
  Over the quarter the rate of price increases for consumer 
goods and for-fee services declined, and in March amounted to 
6.3 percent (12.8 percent in January, and 10.8 percent in 
February). 
  Prices for producer goods rose by 26.1 percent. Of 
foodstuffs, the greatest price increases were registered with 
respect to bread and bakery items, flour, and eggs--1.5-fold; 
macaroni items, cereals, legumes, and canned 
vegetables--1.7-2.2-fold; milk and milk products, sausages, fish 
products, confectionery items, vegetables, and potatoes--by 
30-40 percent. At the same time, prices for butter, vegetable 
oil, margarine, meat and poultry, tea, and salt rose by 6-20 
percent. Prices for citrus fruit dropped on average by 15 
percent. 
  Prices for nonfood items rose as compared to December 1993 
by 
31.4 percent. Prices for goods for children continued to rise: 
those for footwear, clothing, and underwear went up 
1.5-1.7-fold, including a threefold increase in prices for 
preschool children's footwear. 
  Prices for fabrics, footwear, furniture, clothing, and 
underwear, electric goods, hosiery and knitwear, fur and items 
made of it, rugs and carpeting went up by 20-50 percent; those 
for headgear (except made of fur), metal utensils, and 
jewelry--1.6-twofold; and office supplies--3.3-fold. 
  Of construction materials, prices increased the most with 
respect to wood-fiber board, cement, and roof slate--2.3-fold. 
  Gasoline prices went up 1.7-fold, with the price per liter 
reaching R267. 
  Prices for the same goods differed perceptibly in March 
between kray's cities and rayons. The gap between maximum and 
minimum prices measured a factor of 1.6 with respect to butter, 
2.7 with respect to milk, 1.4--eggs, 1.5--sugar, and 1.6 with 
respect to bread. 
  Prices and fees for for-fee services for the population 
increased in March by 92.5 percent as compared to December 1993, 
which is 50 percentage points higher than the rate of increases 
in consumer goods prices. 
  The cost of communications services went up the most 
(2.6-fold), and among them subscriber fee for residential 
telephone services and telegraph services--3.3-fold. 
  The cost of passenger transportation more than doubled, 
while 
suburban train fares increased 3.2-fold. 
  While the cost of municipal services increased 1.9-fold, 
rent 
in municipal housing increased eightfold. 
  The cost of stay in sanitariums, resorts, fitness 
facilities, 
and health care institutions, cultural facilities, parents' 
share of the cost of keeping children in preschool facilities, 
and consumer services increased 1.6-1.9-fold. 
  Following the increase in fuel and energy prices, expenses 
for freight transportation increased (1.8-fold). Freight rates 
went up especially perceptibly in air (2.4-fold) and rail 
(1.8-fold) transportation. 
  Prices for producer goods in March as compared to December 
1993 increased by 40 percent. 
  In electric power generation, as well as the timber and 
woodworking industry, prices increased 1.8-fold; in the 
petroleum refining industry, and lifting and transportation 
machine-building--by 40 percent. The cost of production of 
wood-chip board increased 2.4-fold. 
  Wholesale prices for consumer goods rose at a somewhat 
lesser 
rate than those for producer goods. 
  Prices in bread-baking and meat-packing industry increased 
by 
20 percent. The greatest price increases were noted in the dairy 
industry--by 40 percent, including for milk and fermented milk 
products--1.6-fold. 
  The rate of price increases declined in light industry (97.9 
percent) and liquor distilling (97.8 percent) industries. 
  FINANCES. Overall, the kray's economy over two 
months of the current year produced about R50 billion in 
profits; as compared to the corresponding period of last year, 
profits increased 2.1-fold. The slow growth in profits stems 
mainly from the problems in product distribution and the 
shortage of financial resources at a score of enterprises. 
  Almost 31 percent of enterprises in all sectors of the 
economy operated at a loss. 
  The greatest proportion of unprofitable enterprises was in 
the municipal services sector (46.7 percent), transportation 
(41.9 percent), material and technical supply (35.7 percent), 
and trade (35.4 percent). Vyazemskiy Rayon enterprises operated 
at a loss--the proportion of unprofitable enterprises here 
comprised 56.3 percent--as well as those in Verkhnebureinskiy 
(52.9 percent), Nikolayevskiy (47.6 percent), Komsomolskiy (40.0 
percent), and Okhotskiy (46.2 percent) Rayons. 
  The insolvency problem in the economy remains acute. 
  According to data received from enterprises and 
organizations 
in industry, agriculture, transportation, and construction on 
the territory of Khabarovsk Kray, their total liabilities to 
supplier enterprises in February 1994 amounted to R759.3 
billion--an 8.7-percent increase as compared to January of this 
year. Past due liability to suppliers amounted to R426.3 billion 
(58.1 percent of the total liability). 
  Industrial enterprises account for 71.8 percent of all 
liabilities, construction--13.3 percent, transportation--13.2 
percent, and agriculture--1.7 percent. A considerable share of 
past due liabilities results from not receiving timely payments 
for products shipped to consumer enterprises. 
  Customer liability for the goods shipped amounted to R659.0 
billion, including R379.7 billion (57.6 percent) past due. 
  Industrial enterprises account for the greatest share of 
customer liability (70.4 percent). 
  The financial situation of enterprises and organizations is 
exacerbated by the poor state of mutual clearing in the economy. 
Total accounts payable amounted to R806.4 billion and increased 
as compared to January of this year by 6.1 percent, including 
past due accounts payable--R381.9 billion (47.3 of the total 
due). 
  Industrial enterprises account for the greatest share of 
accounts payable owed (75.8 percent). Debts to suppliers amount 
to R586.4 billion, of which 49.1 percent are past due. 
  Loan debt amounted to R10 billion, and the debt of bank 
credit--R189 billion. 
  The volume of enterprises' back pay and other pay-related 
liability is growing. 
  As of 1 April obligations with respect to the issuance of 
consumption funds at industrial, construction, and agricultural 
enterprises amounted to R42.7 billion. 
  Enterprises in Khabarovsk, Komsomolsk-na-Amure, and 
Sovetsko-Gavanskiy and Amurskiy Rayons account for a 
considerable share of money not paid out on schedule. Back pay 
owed to workers in industry amounts to R25.7 billion, in 
construction--13.6 billion, and in agriculture--R3.5 billion. 
  The greatest amounts are owed to their employees by the AO 
[joint-stock company] Sea Resources in Sovetskaya Gavan--about 
R2.7 billion; AO Shipbuilding Plant in Komsomolsk--R2.0 billion; 
industrial-construction association Khabgrazhdanstroy--R395 
million; and AO Heating Equipment Plant--R385 billion. The main 
cause of past due liabilities are the high rate of inflation and 
low payment discipline in the economy, which makes it more 
difficult for enterprises to form the necessary financial 
resources for production expansion and social development. 
  THE POPULATION'S INCOME. The monetary income of 
the population over the first quarter of 1994 amounted to R764 
billion and increased 10-fold as compared to the first quarter 
of 1993. Of the total amount of monetary income, the population 
spent about R370 billion on purchases of goods and services, 
which is eight times more than in the first quarter of last 
year; taxes, various contributions, and other types of expenses 
amounted to R87 billion; and R200 billion were deposited in bank 
accounts and used to purchase securities. 
  The main source of monetary income for the majority of the 
population is wages. The average monthly wage in kray economic 
sectors in the first quarter amounted to R239,000 and increased 
as compared to December 1993 by 2 percent. 
  The average wage in industry in March amounted to R261,000, 
in construction--R275,000, in sovkhozes--R162,000, in 
transportation--R374,000, in communications--R403,000, in health 
care and social security--R211,000, education--R177,000, culture 
and arts--R173,000, and in science and science-related 
services--R184,000. 
  EMPLOYMENT. In the first quarter, 568,000 persons 
were employed in the kray's economy. The nonstate sector, where 
currently more than 20 percent of the labor force are employed, 
is beginning to play an increasingly greater role. 
  The number of workers in the main sector of the social 
complex--education, health care, housing and municipal 
services--has increased. There is a stable growth in employment 
in the credit industry and state insurance, tax inspectorates, 
notary offices, and legal services, evidence that an 
infrastructure typical of a market economy is beginning to form. 
The number of workers in science and science-related services 
and design organizations has declined. 
  A total of 12,600 persons were without work and actively 
looking for it in the first quarter. Of them, 9,302 had the 
official status of unemployed. As compared to the beginning of 
the year, the number of unemployed increased by 60 percent. 
  The problem of unemployment is especially acute for women 
(about 70 percent of all officially registered unemployed). 
Young people under 30 accounted for 3,473 unemployed (37 
percent). Of the total number of officially registered 
unemployed, 81 percent receive unemployment benefits. The number 
of those who have been unemployed for more than four months has 
increased: By the end of the quarter their share in the total 
number of unemployed was 35 percent. 
  EDUCATION. There are 234,000 pupils continuing 
education in general education schools. Of them, 10,900 school 
students are preparing to take 11th and 12th grade graduation 
exams. 
  According to the data of a snapshot selective-sample survey, 
80 percent of those studying in city schools plan to continue 
their education in institutions of higher learning after they 
graduate. 
  To the question: "What would you like to achieve in life?" 
most place material well-being first; having a good family comes 
second, and an interesting profession--third. 
  One-third of the respondents named as their future field of 
activities management and trade. 
  Thirty-five percent of respondents have already been earning 
pocket money, and 3 percent currently combine work and study. 
  MORBIDITY. In the first quarter, 1,870 incidents 
of acute intestinal infections were registered, 98,700 incidents 
of acute upper respiratory tract infections, 28,600 incidents of 
influenza, 163 incidents of syphilis, 1,426 incidents of 
gonorrhea, and 1,493 incidents of pediculesis. 
  As compared to the corresponding period of last year, the 
incidence of venereal diseases increased: syphilis--threefold, 
and gonorrhea--twofold. 
  THE DEMOGRAPHIC SITUATION. As of 1 January 1994 
the population of Khabarovsk Kray numbered 1,608,200, of whom 
1,295,900 live in urban areas and 312,300--in rural areas. 
Overall, the kray population decreased as compared to the 
preceding year by 12,800 (0.8 percent). This is the result first 
of foremost of outward migration and the decline in the birth 
rate in the kray itself. 
  The democratic situation is not improving in the current 
year. 
  Over the three months, 3,862 people were born in the kray, 
which is 186, or 4.6 percent, less than over the corresponding 
period of last year. At the same time the number of deaths 
increased by 252 (5.1 percent) and numbered 5,206. The natural 
population decline was by 1,314 persons (876 in 1993). 
  The number of births per 1,000 population declined from 10.2 
to 9.8, or 3.9 percent as compared to the analogous period in 
1993, while the number of deaths increased from 12.4 to 13.1 (by 
5.6 percent). 
  The main causes of death still are cardiovascular disease 
(53.5 percent of the total number of deaths), trauma and 
poisoning (20.6 percent), and new growths (13.3 percent). 
  As compared to last year there has been an increase in the 
number of deaths from tuberculosis (by 14 percent), digestive 
tract diseases (by 16.5 percent), and trauma and poisoning (by 
5.8 percent). 
  A sharp increase in the number of fatalities from traffic 
accidents (a 26.5 percent increase), murders (23.4 percent), and 
suicides (18.8 percent) contributed to the growth in mortality 
from unnatural causes. 
  Over January-March 1994, 2,400 marriages and 2,300 divorces 
were registered in the kray. As compared to the analogous period 
of last year the number of marriages declined by 8.1 percent and 
the number of divorces increased by 3.7 percent. 
  CRIME. Over the first quarter of this year the 
kray internal affairs organs registered 11,600 crimes, which is 
3.4 percent less than over the corresponding period of last 
year. One in five crimes is of a grave variety. Overall, the 
number of grave crimes fell by 8.8 percent. 
  The number of murders increased by four--to a total of 134, 
and the number of rapes--by nine (49). There were 4,452 
incidents of theft of personal property, including 2,390 
apartment burglaries (a decline, respectively, of 11.2 percent 
and 11.6 percent). 
  The number of thefts from warehouses, stores, and cars 
increased by 21.6 percent. 
  The incidence of swindling increased 1.5-fold, of 
bribe-taking--by 16.7 percent. There were 320 registered 
economic crimes (a 22.6 percent increase). 
  There were 2,818 crimes committed in public places, 
including 
1,478 in the streets; 940 group crimes were registered, and 959 
crimes were committed by juveniles. 
  One in five crimes was committed by people who do not work 
and in a state of alcoholic intoxication. 
  An increase in crime has been registered in Tsentralnyy and 
Krasnoflotskiy Rayons in Khabarovsk (by 8.1 percent and 9.7 
percent), Vaninskiy (by 13 percent), Khabarovskiy (by 8.9 
percent), Nanayskiy (by 14.2 percent), Imeni Lazo (by 35.1 
percent), Vyazemskiy (by 16.8 percent), Bikinskiy (by 26.7 
percent), Verkhnebureinskiy (by 10.3 percent), Okhotskiy (by 8.2 
percent), and Ulchskiy (by 12.8) Rayons. 
  Six instances of theft of weapons were uncovered. Half of 
all 
registered crimes were solved. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47035 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94035" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tyumen Oblast Duma Session Reviewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tyumen Oblast Duma Session Reviewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0827A Tyumen TYUMENSKAYA PRAVDA in Russian 12 May 94 pp 
1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0827A </F>
<F P=104>  Tyumen TYUMENSKAYA PRAVDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vitaliy Snisarenko, TYUMENSKAYA PRAVDA </F>
parliamentary correspondent: "Duma Chronicle: Documents, Figures 
and Commentary"] 
  [Text] In previous issues, the newspaper covered the 
two-day session of the Tyumen Oblast Duma briefly and in general 
terms. Today we offer readers a more detailed and documentary 
analysis of the Duma's working agenda with commentary by our 
"parliamentary correspondent" Vitaliy Snisarenko. 
<H8>  A FEW WORDS ABOUT THE AGENDA ITSELF </H8>
  It went without saying that the key issues in the session's 
work would be the budgetary message and other socioeconomic 
parameters of the oblast's life in 1994, including one of the 
key "points," in general--the Duma's lawmaking work; it is here 
that the foundation of our future would be laid. 
  However, the fact that it was proposed that precisely these 
issues be discussed, for all practical purposes, only in the 
second part of the session caused general perplexity among 
representatives of the mass media. When the outgoing Duma 
leadership in the person of N. Baryshnikov and V. [? illegible] 
Tretyakov assigned numerical priority--and that has always been 
understood as meaning priority in importance--for the deputies 
arriving from local areas to problems of structure and staffing 
and of material and technical supply (point 5), and to the 
questions of approving estimated expenditures for the operations 
of the Duma and even of allocating money for the remodeling of 
the meeting hall (point 7). 
  To the credit of the deputies themselves, in the process of 
approving the agenda they dropped the aforementioned points from 
it. Although it should be noted that a decree "on the remodeling 
of the principal hall," with the allocation of a full $1.5 
million and "only" 80 million rubles for that "extremely 
important" undertaking, had already been drafted for the 
signature of N. Baryshnikov. 
  The Duma deputies did some counting and figured that, given 
the fact that their corps numbered only 25 members, it was 
extremely irrational to have their own 57-person business 
administration. They did some counting and cut the business 
administration: There is an analogous department of the oblast 
administration close at hand that is capable of meeting the 
needs of the Duma deputies. 
  In short, the eternal passion to spend money and inflate 
staffs continues to beat ardently: A. Korelyakov and V. Yudin 
spoke out harshly on that topic. 
  I shall express my own viewpoint. I believe that it is 
necessary, in general, to change what is, for all practical 
purposes, an obsolete staffing arrangement--with its 
departments, deputy directors and chief and lead 
specialists--for supporting new Duma. I think that each of our 
new congressmen needs a two-person staff consisting of a legal 
specialist and an economist, both of whom should be highly 
professional: taken together, they would constitute the Duma's 
intellectual apparatus, and along with them there should be a 
common technical support group for all the deputies. 
<H8>  CONCERNING THE COMPUTER DECREE </H8>
  Another draft decree had also prepared, according to which 
it 
was proposed to allocate R1,483,690,000 this year for the needs 
of the Tyumen Oblast Regional Agency for the Development of Data 
Processing and Telecommunications, which had been established 
back under V. Ulyanov. The Duma deputies also struck out this 
point. 
  Although A. Korelyakov made a proposal simply to sell the 
existing imported IBM equipment, and G. Polyakov did not rule 
out the possibility of transferring it and placing it under the 
aegis of another Duma deputy, A. Klepalov, chief physician of 
the oblast hospital, I believe that the essence of the 
fundamental objection lay elsewhere. 
  First of all, the unified Tyumen Oblast for which the 
computer system in question was intended does not exist. Second, 
it does not make sense in these times to spend scarce budgetary 
money for this project, and it is possible that the system that 
has been designated so far will prove suitable for the 
commercial and state banks: let them assume part of the 
expenditures. 
  That is what the Duma decided, resolving to think the matter 
over and return to this matter later. 
<H8>  Concerning the Draft Designs for the Tyumen Oblast Flag and </H8>
Seal, the Problem of Unity, and the Plan for the Duma's 
Legislative Work 
  The Duma decided that the draft designs for the flag and 
seal 
should be presented for consideration by the competition jury no 
later than 1 August 1994: the prize fund consists of R3 million 
and is to be indexed for inflation (the first prize is 1.5 
million, the second prize is 600,000, and there are three 
honorable mentions of 300,000 rubles each). 
  All that is fine. But in the course of the discussion of 
this 
and all the other matters on the agenda, one underlying issue 
that has not yet been resolved could be heard: the essence of it 
is that on 5-6 May the Duma, for all practical purposes, 
considered only the "southern" part of Tyumen Oblast's specific 
problems. If, in the future, the same budgetary questions with 
regard to the autonomous okrugs are designated in documents only 
by the meaningless phrase "on the one hand," that will be 
intolerable for the oblast Duma (G. Polyakov sharply underscored 
precisely this matter in his speech). 
  Well, why, then, speak seriously today about a single flag 
and seal? Why, broadly speaking, should L. Roketskiy, who for 
all intents and purposes is dealing only with the questions of 
the south, continue to bluff? After all, the fact that the 
questions of oil and gas were virtually not considered at all at 
the current Duma session--they're not ours but the okrugs'--is 
considerable, obvious and distressing nonsense. 
  And although I agree with the governor about letting the 
okrugs keep their governmental sovereignty--it is absurd to try 
to command from Tyumen in the old way, and inconvenient to 
boot--oblast-wide programs that are greatly needed by everyone 
have been halted in their development. 
  And let us, finally, ask the following ruthless question: 
where will the tens upon tens of thousands of people from the 
resettled North go--and they are already going--when the oil and 
gas start to wane? Or the northern deposits become completely 
exhausted? To whom will the dead cities and airports of the 
North then be left? 
  People won't go somewhere in the near aborad, which has 
become inhospitable for them, but to us, to the south. 
  That is why I claim that today the number-one question on 
the 
agenda for the current Duma is legislative work. And the main 
thing is to adopt, at any cost, a Law on Relations Between 
Tyumen Oblast and the Khanty-Mansi and Yamal-Nenets Autonomous 
Okrugs That Are Parts of It--a functional law that is as 
rational as possible and that has been agreed to at the federal 
level. All the remaining legal acts--on local government, on 
oblast taxes, and so forth and so on--will "flow" from such a 
law, which will be fundamental for the oblast. 
  But it is extremely difficult to resolve this matter: the 
"race of sovereignties" has gone too far,a nd too much time has 
been lost. 
  On both days of the current Duma session V. Ulyanov sat 
beside me--today he is head of the Center for Regional Strategy 
that he himself "conceived." And he showed me, dated 24 April, 
the official record of disagreements on this subject, which bore 
the signatures of the heads not only of "our" okrugs but of 
other RF autonomous entities: at the level of the Russian 
Federation, it will evidently be necessary to pass a common 
Russian law, one for everyone. 
  And so! So far the record in question bears a "No" writ 
large, without any hint of any consensual "Yes" in the 
foreseeable future. And V. Ulyanov is prepared to argue with 
anyone who cares to that the Duma will not succeed in achieving 
positive success in 1994. 
  But the Duma members have no intention of surrendering: V. 
Yudin, V. Gorodilov [? poor legibility] and Ye. Panasenkova 
answered me bluntly: "We didn't come to the Duma for that!" 
  Time will tell. In any case, for the time being, as 
paradoxical as it may seem, it is not the Duma but the governor 
who is raising and aggravating the problem of unity: it was 
precisely L. Roketskiy who spoke the word "referendum," and it 
was he who directed the Duma deputies toward Moscow, as long as 
nothing but destructive reforms are coming from there. 
<H8>  On the Budget and Social Forecast </H8>
  Both documents presented by the administration were agreed 
to 
by the Duma practically without serious amendments. And the 
reason for that lay in the following circumstances. 
  First, as L. Roketskiy noted, the budget message has not 
been 
put into final form; the reason for this lies in the 
inflationary processes and the behavior of the federal financial 
departments, which is by no means stabilizing the situation. In 
addition, all the figures will be defined more precisely in the 
process of thorough examination at working meetings with the 
constituent parts of the southern part of the oblast--its rayons 
and cities. 
  Secondly, the Duma is still not prepared for dealing in 
detail with such documents in the course of its brief sessions, 
when only during the present session were commissions on the 
budget, finances and taxes (chairman, S. Kirichuk), on social 
and economic questions (commission head, V. Yudin), on questions 
of legislative activity and law and order (F. Sayfitdinov), and 
on regional policy and local government (S. Sheregov) formed in 
a preliminary fashion. The commissions' final makeup will be 
decided before 20 May. 
  And so these commissions will deploy their "battle 
formations," and then they will see. But for the time being even 
the forecast of the social and economic future is not so 
reassuring, which, however, is the same thing that can be said 
about the present and future of Russia as a whole. 
  Although personally, for myself, I noted the obvious uneven 
spots and disproportions. When the revenue from privatization 
that is forecast for 1994 comes to only R9.5 billion, I believe 
that figure is too small and reflects only the value of the 
measure that has begun to be carried out, without taking into 
account the forward progress of the "privatized national 
complex." The forecast under the heading "timber revenues"--just 
R2.9 billion--is also too small. 
  On the other hand, under the "expenditures" section, a 
comparison of the following figures is extremely impressive. 
Whereas it is planned to spend nearly R69.1 billion for the 
operations of bodies of government and administration and notary 
offices, the figure of 76.74 billion rubles is not much greater 
than that, but it is for culture (37.275), physical culture and 
sports (5.765), social security (26.62), the mass media (1.93), 
the youth policy program (2.1) and the support of science and 
higher schools (3.04). 
  An impressive discrepancy, isn't it? 
  But the point is not even that, but the fact that we all 
would like to catch sight of the light at the end of the tunnel. 
And A. Korelyakov, member of the Tyumen Oblast Duma, literally 
pestered L. Roketskiy, governor and member of the RF Federation 
Council: "When will the depression in the country end?" The 
latter first cited general difficulties and then said, albeit 
rather floridly, in reference to oil and gas: "We in the oblast 
have maintained all our forces in order to wait it out until the 
next oil and gas boom. I believe it will occur in a year and a 
half to two years." 
  And my memory immediately suggested how exactly that 
forecast 
coincided with the end of the current RF president's term of 
office. 
<H8>  ONE SENTENCE ABOUT OTHER BUSINESS </H8>
  The Duma authorized its chairman N. Baryshnikov to sign the 
Contract on Social Accord on its behalf. 
  The deputies will demand that the RF government reduce 
tariffs on gas and electric power produced in our oblast for 
Tyumen goods producers. 
  It was decided to establish additional tax breaks with 
respect to the profits tax for enterprises that employ disabled 
persons. 
  It was also decided not simply to adopt "wholesale" for 
implementation all the "unfinished" measures of the former 
oblast soviet, but to take a close look at that legacy and only 
then to "decide and decree." 
  In one of his speeches L. Roketskiy uttered the phrase "poor 
and unimproved Tyumen," while at the same time Tyumen mayor and 
Duma deputy S. Kirichuk justifiably hopes that it is precisely 
the oblast Duma that has a duty to help turn Tyumen into a 
genuine oblast capital. 
  One gets the impression that V. Bugayev, head of the Tyumen 
Rayon administration, came to the Duma to defend and "push 
through" the interests of precisely his rayon, and not the 
oblast. 
  Ye. Panasenkova, Duma deputy and chief physician of the 
Zavodoukovsk Hospital, believes that it is necessary to hold 
closed working sessions of the Duma, since there is evidence of 
the old habit of some comrades to "work for the public." For the 
public, she believes, a press conference will be sufficient. 
  The next session of the oblast Duma is scheduled for 15-16 
June. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47036 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94036" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tyumen Industrial Production Rates Decline </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tyumen Industrial Production Rates Decline </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0825A Tyumen TYUMENSKAYA PRAVDA in Russian 14 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0825A </F>
<F P=104>  Tyumen TYUMENSKAYA PRAVDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by the Oblast Committee on Statistics: "Production </F>
is Falling, Like the Tower of Piza"] 
  [Text] Industrial enterprises in the oblast produced 4238.8 
billion rubles (R) worth of products, in effective prices. Of 
that, 60 percent were produced by enterprises held in the state 
form of ownership, 38 percent--in mixed ownership, and 2 
percent--in municipal and private ownership. 
  Most industrial enterprises reduced their volumes of 
production as compared with January-March of last year. The 
decline in production at machine building and light industry 
enterprises evokes particular concern: The "Ishimselmash" plant 
(a decline of 86 percent), the joint-stock companies "Ishimskiy 
Machine Building Plant" (82 percent), the "Electromechanical 
Plant" (63 percent), the "Zavodoukovskiy Machine Building Plant" 
(53 percent), "Krosno" (57 percent), and the "Ishimskiy Shoe 
Factory" (by 72 percent). Product output at enterprises of the 
"Russian Timber Merchants", in the fish and dairy industries and 
others has declined by more than one-third. 
  Enterprises of the "Gazprom" concern, AO "Tyumenenergo," PO 
"Yamalneftegazzhelezobeton," TOO "Turbomechanical Plant" and 
others have increased the output of industrial production. 
  In January-March of this year, the volume of oil and gas 
condensate extracted by the oblast's enterprises declined by 8 
million tonnes (13.7 percent) as compared with the analogous 
period last year. 
  There was 0.5 percent less natural gas extracted than in 
January-March of 1993. 
  The major gas extracting association Urengoygazprom reduced 
its extraction of gas by 4.4 billion cubic meters, or 5.9 
percent, as compared with the analogous period last year. 
  Production volumes of electrical power, synthetic resins and 
plastics, wood milling lathes, oil rigs, oil drilling and 
geological survey equipment, technological equipment for light 
industry, concrete mixers, prefabricated reinforced concrete 
structures and parts, building brick and other types of 
materials have declined. 
  At the same time, the rates of decline in the production 
volumes of lumber materials and plywood and timbercutting been 
reduced slightly as compared with January-February of this year. 
  Production has increased for diesel fuel, automotive 
gasoline, machines for application of mineral fertilizers, 
parquet flooring and cement. 
  The oblast's industrial enterprises produced 31.4 percent 
less consumer goods than in the same period last year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47037 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94037" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   24 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tyumen Oblast Makes Alterations in Budget System </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tyumen Oblast Makes Alterations in Budget System </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0825B Tyumen TYUMENSKAYA PRAVDA 24 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0825B </F>
<F P=104>  Tyumen TYUMENSKAYA PRAVDA 24 May 94 p 1 </F>



<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Oblast Duma decision: "On the Budget System for the Second </F>
Quarter of 1994," decision No 19 dated 6 March 1994, signed by 
Oblast Duma Chairman N. Baryshnikov] 
  [Text] For purposes of ensuring continuity in 
financing urgent expenditures in the second quarter of 1994, in 
accordance with the Russian Federation President's edict, "On 
Formulating the Republic Budget of the Russian Federation and 
Interrelations With Budgets of the Subjects of the Russian 
Federation in 1994," dated 22 December 1993, No 2268, and the RF 
[Russian Federation] law, "On Financing Expenditures From the 
Federal Budget in the Second Quarter of 1994," the oblast Duma 
has decided: 
  1. In accordance with the established standard deductions to 
the oblast budget from the value-added tax in the amount of 25 
percent, with the exception of the value-added tax on import 
goods, precious metals and stones, turned over to the State Fund 
of Russia and alloted from it, the standard deduction to the 
oblast budget and the city and rayon budget shall be established 
in the amount of 10 and 15 percent, respectively. 
  To accept the proposal of the Russian Federation Ministry of 
Finance which states that, for purposes of reducing mutual 
payments, part of the sum of transfer due to the oblast budget 
shall be replaced with a corresponding increase in the standard 
deduction from the value-added tax to 11 percent. 
  2. To hand over in the following amounts the standard 
deductions to the budget of cities and rayons of monies received 
from: 
  --the income tax on dividends and interest received from 
stocks, bonds and other securities issued in Russia, and from 
share participation in other enterprises created on the 
territory of the Russian Federation--2 percent; 
  --the income tax on video parlors, video and audio cassette 
rentals and recordings--57 percent; 
  --the income tax on casinos, other gaming houses (places) 
and 
other gambling businesses--77 percent. 
  3. The income tax from individuals shall be credited to the 
budgets of cities and rayons in the form of the difference 
between the sum of tax deducted at rates established by the 
Russian Federation President's edict, "On Regulating Certain 
Questions of Taxing Individuals," dated 11 December 1993, No 
2129, and the portion of this tax (in the amount of one percent 
of the taxable income) subject to crediting to federal budget 
revenues. 
  4. To credit to the oblast budget the revenues from the tax 
on securities operations in the portion received from payments 
for registration of the prospectus on issuing securities. 
  5. On all taxes and income not listed above, to retain the 
standard deductions to the budget of cities and rayons and the 
oblast budget which were in effect in 1993. 
  6. To adopt for financing in the second quarter of 1994 the 
institutions and measures listed on the oblast budget, and 
subventions to the budgets of cities and rayons in the volume of 
R124171 million, establishing the priority of the budget for 
current expenditures in the volume of R80842 million, and the 
budget for development in the volume of R43329 million, as 
revenues are received, in accordance with the appendix. 
  7. To re-compute in the second quarter of 1994 from the 
oblast budget to the budgets of cities and rayons the 
subventions in the volumes adopted for the first quarter of 1994. 
  8. In accordance with the decree of the Federation Council 
of 
the Russian Federation Federal Assembly, "On the Crisis and 
Solvency in the Economy of the Russian Federation," dated 7 
April 1994, No 96-1SF, the oblast administration, for purposes 
of reducing social tension, shall create a reserve fund for 
payment of wages in the accounts of budget institutions financed 
from the oblast budget for the summer period lasting up until 15 
August 1994. 
  9. To establish that for the duration of effectiveness of 
the 
present decision, fines on the above-listed institutions for 
late accounting with other enterprises and institutions shall 
not be imposed. 
  10. To recommend to the dumas of the autonomous okrugs that 
they review the question of ensuring wage and vacation payments 
to workers of the budget organizations during the summer period. 
  11. To allow the oblast administrations, for the purpose of 
ensuring timely preparation of housing-municipal services for 
winter, to utilize the credits of commercial banks if there is a 
shortage of budget funds, and to guarantee these credits with 
the oblast budget. 
  12. Under conditions of a budget deficit, the oblast 
administrations shall develop a system of mutual accounting 
which excludes the diversion of financial resources of oblast 
subjects engaged in economic activity. 
  13. In July of 1994, to hear information presented by the 
tax 
police and the tax inspection on measures being taken to ensure 
the entirety and timeliness of making payments to the budget. 
  14. Control over the fulfillment of the present decision 
shall be placed upon the oblast Duma's Permanent Commission on 
the Budget, Taxes and Finances (S. M. Kirichuk). 
  [Signed] Oblast Duma Chairman N. BARYSHNIKOV 
  (Decision No 19, 6 May 1994) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47038 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94038" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Third Session of Oblast Soviet Reviewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Third Session of Oblast Soviet Reviewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0789A Novosibirsk SOVETSKAYA SIBIR in Russian 7 Jun 94 p 
1 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0789A </F>
<F P=104>  Novosibirsk SOVETSKAYA SIBIR </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by L. Semenova: "Power or No Power?"] </F>
  [Text] The first day of the work of the third session of 
the oblast soviet proceeded in a situation of 
self-definition--of the status and character of the new 
representative organ and the style of its interaction with the 
oblast administration. 
  The debates began in the first hour of work with a 
discussion 
of an organizational question--on election of the soviet's 
deputy chairman. A candidate for this post was actually 
nominated at the last session. It was A.A. Kiselnikova, who was 
nominated as an alternate in the election of the chairman. But 
this time she was not even considered. Soviet chairman A.P. 
Sychev presented another candidacy for the deputies' 
consideration--that of V.Ya. Karpov--and he suggested that it be 
included on the list for a secret vote. The deputies know 
Vladimir Yakovlevich well, as they say, from the positive side, 
and no ill-considered questions arose regarding this. Slight 
confusion was caused by something else--the "list" consisting of 
one candidate, when we had already become accustomed to a choice 
in elections. But nobody considered this significant in and of 
itself. One is one, and if you need to have another 
one--nominate him. There were no nominations. And perhaps 
everything would have proceeded calmly to the secret voting 
booths had V. Karpov not succumbed to the temptation to give a 
political speech. His role in the soviet leadership is 
organizational, something like that of the leader of the 
apparatus, as Deputy K. Komarov observed. And this dictates the 
demand for a particular qualities in the candidate--the ability 
to work with all the deputies, regardless of their political 
image. 
  A rapid-fire discussion followed. Deputy N. Krasnikov 
"reminded" Karpov of his position when discussing the question 
of the Agreement on Social Accord, which was not supported by 
the majority of the soviet, and expressed the doubt that a 
deputy who did not agree could organize harmonious work. 
  Nikolay Grigoryevich expressed the desire that the soviet 
not 
be an arena for political battle but an organ of common sense, 
since all the deputies had come to the soviet to work on oblast 
problems. 
  A.G. Chastikin supported his colleague in this by saying--I 
became a deputy only to finally put an end to the conflicts with 
Moscow. I do not think that every individual should have to have 
a position or be able to defend it. 
  Deputies I.A. Lyuzenkov and V.Ye. Kuznetsov spoke in the 
same 
spirit. 
  V.Ya. Karpov was elected to the post of deputy chairman of 
the soviet by an absolute majority of votes. 
  To an outside observer another organizational point was 
discussed too long and too heatedly--the structure of the 
apparatus of the oblast soviet. It seemed to me that the fire of 
passions was kindled by the soviet chairman himself. 
Meticulously discussing all kinds of shifting of figures from 
one committee to another and hinting at self-sacrificing 
readiness to reduce the apparatus which was not exactly bloated 
in the first place, to shatter the life of a typist or a 
consultant. It was as though Sychev were inviting the deputies 
to work with him on the staff roster. But the deputies were too 
sluggish in getting into the argument and without any enthusiasm 
voted for the reduction that was actually proposed by Sychev 
himself. 
  They debated how best to use the funds allotted for the 
organization of deputy activity--to hire staff assistants for 
deputies or to distribute these funds so that the deputy could 
pay for his own one-time assistance within their limits. There 
is no big difference here. 
  Deputy A. Kiselnikov somewhat "tore apart" the discussion of 
the estimated expenditures of the oblast soviet. He was put on 
his guard by the fact that the salaries of apparatus 
functionaries were very modest; the chairman's, for example, is 
little more than 300,000. But they actually receive much larger 
amounts. There is a system of various increments, including 
bonuses for intensiveness of work, material aid, etc. 
  But in spite of their wishes the deputies were unable to 
find 
a great deal of excess in the actions of the soviet 
apparatus--they approved the estimate of expenditures. 
  There was a more fundamental discussion which lasted both 
days of the session--about jurisdiction and cooperation between 
the oblast soviet and the oblast administration. 
  In general Novosibirsk leaders, to their credit, have never 
become involved in dividing up power. They have calmly adopted 
the doctrine of separation of powers, dividing up responsibility 
without grievances. State organs at the regional level have 
hardly any rights at all. But it was not by their will that the 
situation changed. The new normative acts, above all the 
Constitution, without formally abolishing political slogans, 
including those about separation of powers, actually 
restructured the state mechanism, concentrating power and 
distribution functions actually in the hands of one branch--the 
executive. 
  But what about popular rule? Write it off as a grimace of 
socialism? Nothing will be written off. It is simply that this 
concept in the political lexicon has unobtrusively been replaced 
by a more amorphous one--power not of the people but of 
representatives of the people. Let this representative power 
express its interests, but it shall have no active levers of 
power. 
  But, paradoxical as it may be, at the same time the status 
of 
regional representative organs has become greater. Now the 
soviet's decisions of a legal, normative nature are being 
adopted in the form of oblast laws that are mandatory for 
execution, including by the oblast administration. 
  To be sure, the mechanism for this kind of abiding by the 
law 
is fairly complicated. In particular, the laws adopted by the 
soviet at the session are leafed through and okayed for 
publication, and thus for enactment, by the head of the oblast 
administration. But not as an official but as a state organ 
(analogous to the president). 
  Certain points of the Regulations of the Oblast Soviet which 
were discussed at the session turned out to be vulnerable. This 
document was certainly not for internal use. The chairman of the 
committee on legislation and interaction with organs of local 
self-government, V.Ye. Kuznetsov, defended the regulatory act he 
submitted for the consideration of the soviet. His cautious 
reaction to the active participation in the discussion of the 
document by the first deputy chief of the of administration, 
V.N. Kiselev, aggravated the situation to a certain degree. 
Kuznetsov perceived all of Kiselev's attempts to check one or 
another point of the document against the legal base as a 
attempt on the part of the administration to patronize the 
soviet. 
  But Kiselev zealously defended the independence of the 
administration. The wording "to hear the report from the 
administration" evoked an immediate reaction: "name the 
document." Unfortunately, the oversight functions of the oblast 
soviet today are confirmed by only one law--"On the Kray and 
Oblast Soviet and the Kray and Oblast Administration," adopted 
back in pre-October times. 
  It is difficult to understand why V. Kiselev had such a hard 
time with the word "report," especially to the people's 
representatives. For behind each deputy stand about 40,000 
voters. And certain of them have the population of more than one 
rayon behind them. 
  The debates with the administration represented by the first 
deputy chief continued even during the item-by-item reading of 
the Law "On Supporting the Activity of the Deputy of Novosibirsk 
Oblast" and they became even more heated upon the adoption of 
the Law on Legislative Activity in Novosibirsk Oblast. Oblast 
Procurator V. Tokarev, who often spoke as if in a duet with 
Kiselev, also reacted very strongly to the second document. 
  "I do not want the soviet to put itself in a ridiculous 
position," Kiselev explained his rash reaction. 
  But this could also be perceived as an attempt to distance 
himself from the soviet, assigning it a strictly advisory role 
in joint activity on oblast problems. 
  But all the passions surrounding power become less 
respectable and petty when it comes to the budget. What is power 
without money? Illusion! In order to receive anything at all it 
is necessary to invest at least something. Before dividing it is 
necessary to multiply. Or at least save up. Money arises out of 
the production of goods and services. And in the past two years 
production has had a steady tendency toward decline. Hence the 
reduction of receipts into the revenue side of the budget. After 
all, most of the receipts are from taxes, and from 
enterprises--profit tax. And although unnatural savings from 
reducing production have unnatural qualities of a reverse 
dependency of the volume of production and profit (the lesser 
the volume, the higher the profit), the absolute amount of 
profit still decreases. And costs increase. The classical items 
remain and the exclusively modern, as it were, costs "of keeping 
body and soul together" are constantly growing. For both the 
producer and the consumer. 
  In the draft budget submitted by the oblast administration 
for the consideration of the deputies one can see titanic 
efforts to reduce the budget deficit. The administration was 
able to take advantage of the rights granted to it for flexible 
use of the local taxation mechanism and submitted for the 
consideration of the soviet the oblast statute "On Rates of Tax 
on Profit and Tax on Property of Enterprises and Organizations 
and the State Duty on Registration of Enterprises With Foreign 
Investments." The oblast soviet approved this statute and gave 
its okay to further work in this area, in particular, for the 
development of differentiated taxation and the granting of tax 
exemptions in keeping with the priority areas of the development 
of the oblast economy. 
  And the oblast priorities are apparent from the picture of 
expenditures that was presented. 
  The oblast budget is to receive a total of only R970.461 
billion in 1994. This includes transfers from the republic 
budget. The expenditure side is balanced with the revenue side. 
  The following opinion was expressed at the session: Perhaps 
it is not worth it to live within our means and we should 
include all our real needs in the budget. That is, show the 
deficit in such a way as to complain to the federal authorities. 
Perhaps then they will bring our per capita consumption up to 
the average. After all, today all budget expenditures on one 
person of Novosibirsk amount to barely half of what a person 
from Omsk receives, and they cannot even be compared to what 
they get in Kemerovo. 
  Our serious politicians from the oblast soviet decided not 
to 
play those cheap games and to conduct themselves in a 
businesslike manner: to spend what they get. 
  The administration proposed a system of priorities for 
budget 
expenditures. Fully in keeping with the amendments to the 
economic policy and common sense, it suggested supporting the 
producer with any form of property. And of the producers the 
agrarians should be rescued first of all. 
  In the draft budget proposed by the administration it was 
suggested that funds be especially allotted for advance sale of 
gain from the new harvest and support of animal husbandry so 
that in the future it would have strength enough to be revived. 
It was suggested that a subsidy of R100 billion be used for 
these purposes. 
  Speaking at the session, the chairman of the Committee on 
Land Questions and Agrarian Policy, Deputy A.A. Stepanov, 
doubted the feasibility of giving priority to the agrarian 
sector, seeing in the draft budget further deterioration of the 
economic and particularly the financial situation of the rural 
commodity producer. 
  If the consolidated 1993 budget envisioned for agriculture 
13.4 percent of the overall expenditure side, in 1994 it was 
only 6.5 percent. On the whole, the expenditure side of the 
budget, taking inflation into account, increased 5.5-fold, and 
subsidies for the production of animal husbandry 
products--1.6-fold. 
  Stepanov's arguments were knocked down by representatives of 
the administration, who found other figures for 
comparison--based on the real production volume, which had 
dropped sharply in agriculture during the year. 
  But the remark was so out of the context of reality that 
nobody even bothered to object to Melnikov. 
  The next heated point of the discussion was the allotment of 
8 billion from the budget for private entrepreneurship. The 
deputies had not forgotten the first series of economic acts for 
support of private business, as a result of which state funds 
were simply squandered through private pockets. And this is why 
now the deputies demanded information about the existence of a 
program for private entrepreneurship. 
  One can understand why the deputies were so meticulous in 
discussing forthcoming expenditures. As with wisdom: The 
administration was reminded of what it had "forgotten" and thus 
shortchanged many areas. Including culture, education, etc. 
  After which followed V. Kiselev's explanation that in nature 
there are always two kinds of budgets: the budget of development 
and the budget of current maintenance. And for several years now 
we have been working exclusively on a budget for survival. 
  But not having an opportunity to work for development, we 
are 
curtailing the possibilities of survival as well. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47039 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94039" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Economic Crime Increasing in St Petersburg </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Economic Crime Increasing in St Petersburg </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0939A St. Petersburg SANKT PETERSBURGSKIYE VEDOMOSTI in 
Russian 11 Jun 94 p 8 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0939A </F>
<F P=104>  St. Petersburg SANKT PETERSBURGSKIYE VEDOMOSTI </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yuliya Shum: "Borrow From Others--Pay With Your </F>
Own: Crime Is on the Rise in the Credit-Financial Sphere of the 
St. Petersburg Economy"] 
  [Text] On 25 May the directorate for suppression of 
economic crime of the city internal affairs administration 
initiated criminal proceedings against a TOO [limited liability 
partnership] director (the person and the company's name have 
not been made public) and his deputy, who took out a R25 million 
loan at the Promstroybank. It was established during the 
preliminary investigation that the crooks used as loan 
collateral property that was allegedly theirs--a private home. 
At first the documents on the house did not raise any suspicions 
among the bank employees. However, finally the loan repayment 
dates passed, and it came out that the collateral existed only 
on paper and the house itself had long been razed, which the 
swindlers, who had by then skipped town, of course did not tell 
the bankers. 
  Another entrepreneur, the founder and director of four 
AOZT's 
[privately held joint-stock company], has managed to get large 
loans three times, using as collateral one and the same timber 
purchasing contract. The bank, which did not figure out the 
trick until it was too late, lost R420 million. The millionaire 
is wanted by the militia. 
  Several more St. Petersburg banks have sustained losses from 
a similar scheme. They reported their claims against the AO 
[joint-stock company] Kronverk to the Regional Directorate for 
the Suppression of Organized Crime [RUOP]. The RUOP has not yet 
determined, however, whether there is criminal content in the 
actions of the company's founders V.Ye. Nevyakin, O.B. Nelyubin, 
and O.B. Philippov. 
  In August 1993 the Kronverk company took out a short-term 
loan from the Sberbank [Savings Bank]--R400 million for three 
months at 180 percent annual interest rate, to buy industrial 
casein. As a guarantee of timely and complete repayment of loan, 
the borrower transferred its property to the Sberbank as 
collateral. The AO Kronverk's woodworking, ventilation, and 
electrical equipment at its production facility, several 
hangars, a casein line, vehicles, and office equipment were 
appraised at R712 million. 
  When the loan term expired, the Sberbank attempted to find 
its client. In vain--there was no answer at either Kronverk's 
telephone or fax numbers: the company had moved from the 
facility it previously occupied at 56 Bolshaya Morskaya to an 
unknown address, while its general director V.Ye. Nevyakin had 
left Russia... 
  The bank staff turned to the Vitabank, which had recommended 
Kronverk as a borrower and handled the company's operating 
account, asking whether the client ever showed up at the bank at 
all. Vitabank never replied to the inquiry. And, as the Sberbank 
staff infer, apparently not just out of considerations of 
confidentiality. According to Sberbank's security service, 
Vitabank is the first in line among creditors to recover the 
debt from Kronverk. And it is unlikely that everybody's claim 
will be satisfied, since Kronverk also received in the same 
manner hundreds of millions rubles from the St. Petersburg bank, 
the Murmansk Bank, and even the American corporation Met 
International. 
  The Americans were the first to determine that they were a 
"victim of an international financial machination" and turned to 
the commercial arbitration court under the Russian Federation 
Trade and Industry Chamber. Our compatriots are in no hurry to 
run to court, and for quite understandable reasons. 
  In order to get out of Kronverk the loan, interest, fines, 
and penalties totalling R1.5 billion, Sberbank alone will have 
to pay court costs of R150 million. Most likely it will win the 
case. As will the other creditors. But how to actually get the 
money? 
  "We have information from the law enforcement organs that 
Mr. 
Nevyakin is currently in Poland," we were told by the Sberbank 
security service. "He is apparently close to government circles 
and Lech Walesa. He allegedly is putting together a fund for 
aiding Russian entrepreneurs. There is rumor that he has a 
personal security detail that consists of four former officers 
of Polish state security... The Kronverk incident is not unique. 
The bank suffers not only when someone literally walks away with 
a loan, but also when loans are not repaid 'peacefully.' Nobody 
will probably doubt the soundness of such enterprises, 
well-known in the city, as the Vityaz restaurant chain, the 
UniRem company, or the Goryachev concern. Meanwhile, we have 
been trying for many months to get them to repay in full our 
loans, and it is not easy. 
  Quite understandably, a businessmen does not always become a 
hardened delinquent by criminal intent. Some are let down by 
business partners; some are victims of crooks; some simply lack 
entrepreneurial acumen. But this does not make it easier for the 
bankers--their interests are far from fully protected by the 
current legislation in the credit-financial sphere. 
  Knowing this, the boldest ones do not refuse their good 
friends (of course, on terms mutually profitable for both 
parties in the deal) large loans, which also are not always 
repaid. The law enforcement organs often encounter such abuse on 
the part of bankers and financiers, who later themselves became 
victims if not of a crime then at least of unlawful actions. 
Such incidents have happened in our city, too. 
  For fairness' sake it should be noted that the State Duma 
has 
already adopted amendments to the Criminal Code which will make 
entrepreneurs share the culpability of officials under such 
articles as, for instance, bribery, negligence, and abuse of 
official position. As to insolvent clients, so far the law does 
not envisage jail as a punishment measure for them. And they 
take advantage of this. 
<H5>  Commentary by the Legal Department of the St. Petersburg </H5>
Bank of the Sberbank of Russia 
  Current legislation has a number of gaps which allow the 
borrower to "effectively" use credit resources received from a 
bank he does not "plan" to repay. 
  For instance, according to the existing statute on 
joint-stock companies, the minimum charter capital is set at 
R10,000 and has not been revised. Thus, a Russian limited 
liability partnership puts at risk a negligible amount of 
charter capital. For comparison: The minimum charter capital of 
a limited liability partnership (GmbH) in Germany is DM50,000. 
  Another pitfall. Any company may participate as a founder in 
setting up another company. A mandatory point included in the 
charter documents is that the founder cannot be held liable for 
the debts of the enterprise being set up, and vice versa. 
Liability also is limited by the size of the charter capital, or 
the amount of capital contributed by the founder company in the 
new enterprise. Thus, in this situation, too, the risk to the 
"borrower" and his guarantor is minimal. 
  Next. St. Petersburg's rayon administrations still register 
enterprises at "convenience" legal addresses, most often using 
as such the rayon administration's own address. Or similar 
services are offered by companies set up either with direct 
participation or with the "blessing" of these administrations. 
This problem surfaced for the first time when the search was on 
for the notorious Amaris, Business-Navigators, and other 
enterprises registered precisely in this way. For instance, one 
can still find dozens, or even hundreds, of firms registered at 
the same address--such as 176 Nevskiy Ave., 4 Boytsov Lane, 
26/28 Kamennoostrovskiy Ave., or 50 Mayakovskiy St. The city 
procuracy has already issued a separate opinion on this issue, 
which it has submitted to St. Petersburg mayoralty; however, as 
they say, the cart has not moved an inch. 
  Another problem. The "Law on Collateral," which was adopted 
and in keeping with which various types of property--land, real 
estate, goods, and so on--may be used as collateral to secure 
the repayability of a loan, in real terms does not work. State 
organs whose job is to register collateral (for instance, GAI 
[State Motor Vehicle Inspection] regarding using a car as a 
collateral, the Property Fund for real estate collaterals, and 
so on) do not carry out this function. The "Rules for 
Registration of Tractors, Tractor Hitches, Self-Propelled Road 
Construction and Other Vehicles Subject to Registration by the 
State Technical Oversight [STO] Organs of the Russian Ministry 
of Agriculture," approved by the Russian Federation Ministry of 
Agriculture and coordinated with the Russian Federation Ministry 
of Finance, for all practical purposes are not in effect in St. 
Petersburg. St. Petersburg currently has an STO regional branch, 
which does not conduct any registration work. 
  Apparently the time has come to also bring up to the 
legislative authority the question of entrepreneurs' personal 
responsibility for their loan obligations, and not just to the 
limit of the charter capital of his enterprise but personally, 
since it is the entrepreneur who is the owner and master of his 
enterprise. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47040 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94040" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Russia's Choice Caucus Delegates Selected </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Russia's Choice Caucus Delegates Selected </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0912A St. Petersburg SMENA in Russian 7 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0912A </F>
<F P=104>  St. Petersburg SMENA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Sergey Shelin under the rubric "Parties": </F>
"Petersburg Now Has a `Choice'"] 
  [Text] Twenty-nine St. Petersburg residents will go 
to Moscow to the founding congress of the Russia's Choice party. 
They are instructed to vote for Yegor Gaydar in the party 
chairman elections. In late June the work on setting up rayon 
party organizations will begin in the city. This was decided on 
Saturday by the St. Petersburg founding conference of Gaydar's 
party supporters. 
  The exclusive nature of the event was indicated both by the 
place where the conference was held (the banking center at 58 
Nevskiy Avenue) and the small number of participants (108 
persons), as well as limited access for the press. "The people 
who gathered here are the achievers who already have the 
experience of respect, wealth, and talent," said Yuliy Rybakov, 
coordinator of the Russia's Choice St. Petersburg organizational 
committee. Gathered in a small conference hall were six Duma 
deputies, high-ranking city administration officials, bankers, 
industrialists, democratic organizations activists, 
intellectuals, and even some representatives of the artistic 
Bohemia. Among the absent was Anatoliy Chubays: He was supposed 
to attend but at the last moment his plans fell through. Also 
absent was Aleksandr Belyayev: There are conflicting rumors 
about the prospects of his joining Gaydar's party. 
  Vitaliy Sychev, the organizational committee coordinator and 
the leader of the city's Association of Privatized Enterprises, 
conducted the conference in a no-nonsense manner and at fast 
pace. By the way, the debate as to who will head the party's St. 
Petersburg branch is still on. Regional leadership organs have 
not been elected. They will be formed by the next city 
conference, which is scheduled to be held after the founding 
congress. "To what extent members of the organizational 
committee will become part of this leadership is probably 
impossible to tell right now, since to a large extent it will 
depend on how the congress goes," Mr. Sychev explained the 
situation at SMENA's request. 
  One must say that at this point the organizational committee 
leadership has a rather firm grip on the reins. The proof of 
that were elections of deputies to the congress. Two-thirds of 
those present supported the idea not to expand the 
already-coordinated list of candidates. This list, which 
consisted of 17 names, was then approved by an even more 
convincing majority. Besides them, six St. Petersburg 
politicians, who at the time signed the appeal to set up 
Russia's Choice, will go to the congress, along with as many 
respected members of the city intelligentsia invited as guests 
with the rights of a decisive vote. 
  The debate on the subject of the program and rules was of 
limited nature by default: The participants were told that the 
draft program and rules handed out to them had not been approved 
by the party leadership and a different version of these 
documents will be ready in time for the congress. Some hints of 
disagreements within the party could be picked up from the 
argument between two organizational committee members (and Duma 
deputies)--Grigoriy Tomchin and Mikhail Molostvov. 
  Mr. Tomchin is convinced that Russia's Choice must become a 
rigidly organized liberal-conservative party, with a support 
base in the large- and medium-size capital. In his opinion, 
small business cannot play a perceptible political role. Mr. 
Molostvov declared to thunderous applause that he is against 
combining liberalism and conservatism: "What we got was not a 
two-headed eagle but a many- headed hydra." He thinks that Mr. 
Tomchin is debating Gaydar in the latter's absence, since Gaydar 
is for looking for support first and foremost among creative and 
technical intelligentsia." 
  Mr. Molostvov was supported not only by democratic 
organizations activists. The idea of strengthening the liberal 
beginnings in Russia's Choice was also supported by Aleksey 
Kudrin, first deputy prime minister of the St. Petersburg 
government. ZVEZDA magazine's editor in chief, Yakov Gordin, 
said in a conversation with the SMENA correspondent: "I think 
that in the final count a compromise road will be found, with a 
serious bent towards M.M. Molostvov's position. As to large- and 
medium-size capital, in a real-life situation it can be 
protected only by a party that orientates itself towards broad 
strata." 
  Actually, Grigoriy Tomchin resolutely denies that he is 
debating Gaydar. In his firm opinion, Gaydar's reforms had been 
largely aimed precisely at creating big capital. To the SMENA 
correspondent question on whether he believes in a small 
businessman--an owner of a kiosk, store, and so on--Mr. Tomchin 
remarked: "I believe in him as a democrat but do not believe in 
him as a party functionary. Because if he comes to us as a party 
functionary, who is going to run his kiosk?" 
  This debate will certainly continue at the congress in the 
capital. There also will be debates on how strict the party 
rules should be, on how the regions will be represented in 
Russia's Choice governing bodies (St. Petersburg members insist 
on keeping the number of Muscovites in them to a minimum), and, 
of course, the actual membership of these bodies. The congress 
is expected to be held on 12-13 June. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47041 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94041" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   8,000 Joint Ventures in St Petersburg </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    8,000 Joint Ventures in St Petersburg </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0924A St. Petersburg SANKT PETERBURGSKIYE VEDOMOSTI in 
Russian 9 Jun 94 p 5 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0924A </F>
<F P=104>  St. Petersburg SANKT PETERBURGSKIYE VEDOMOSTI </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Foreign Capital Survives"] </F>
  [Text] According to figures from the St. Petersburg joint 
ventures association, there are about 8,000 joint ventures 
registered in the city (according to the new terminology they 
are called AOZT [private joint-stock companies] in the form of a 
joint venture). No more than 10-12 percent of these engage in 
production. The rest conduct commercial activity or exist purely 
on paper--so that they can be "on hand" in case the tax climate 
in Russia warms up. Under the current conditions foreign 
investors do not see any point in creating any productions of 
any kind in St. Petersburg. Promises from the federal government 
to grant exemptions to enterprises in which foreign capital 
participates have not been kept. But the number of joint 
ventures, including of a production profile, is growing. For 
example, a joint venture has been created for construction of a 
plant for producing mini-electric power plants and a plant for 
producing cigarettes under licenses. They will begin to work if 
the tax burden is lightened. 
  At the same time it is expected that there will be a 
reduction of the activity and possibly the elimination of a 
number of joint ventures of a trade profile engaging in the 
delivery of imported food. The new customs payments introduced 
effective 1 July (announced in the spring) will make food 
deliveries disadvantageous since even the least expensive 
foreign products, taking customs payments into account, will be 
priced too high for the city's rank-and-file residents. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47042 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94042" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Payment for Goodwill Games Burdens City </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Payment for Goodwill Games Burdens City </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0924B St. Petersburg NEVSKOYE VREMYA in Russian 9 Jun 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0924B </F>
<F P=104>  St. Petersburg NEVSKOYE VREMYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Igor Osochnikov: "Provincial Games?"] </F>
  [Text] Judging from the aggressiveness with which Deputy 
Mayor Vitaliy Mutko, at a news conference in the staff 
headquarters of the organizing committee of the Goodwill Games 
yesterday, discussed his trip to Moscow and the negotiations 
held in the government of Russia, he was not very satisfied with 
the results of his trip. And no wonder. 
  As it turned out, the top brass regard the Games as a kind 
caprice of the St. Petersburg authorities. 
  This pertains to several ministries, for example, the 
Ministry of Communications, which under the aegis of the Games 
is trying to run telephone lines through almost all of Russia, 
leaving St. Petersburg with only part of the funds allotted for 
solving this problem. And the departments responsible for 
providing for the security of the guests and participants in the 
Games are not much better. Thus the Ministry of Internal Affairs 
is trying to shift the entire burden of the financial costs for 
placing and keeping its additional contingent in St. Petersburg 
onto the city budget. This will amount to R46 billion and could 
never be covered by the funds already allotted by Russia, all of 
which have been used to revamp the sports facilities for the 
Games. 
  In Vitaliy Mutko's opinion, such an attitude toward the 
forthcoming sports forum on the part of Russian power structures 
must be overcome. And it is possible that this will be done in 
the next few days, since the government commission will arrive 
in St. Petersburg today. It will clarify the real costs to the 
city for preparing for the Games, which will place on the 
federal budget the costs it should rightfully bear. Perhaps the 
last "i" in the discussions of the question of who should pay 
for what will be dotted this weekend during the visit to St. 
Petersburg of Prime Minister Aleksandr Shokhin, who is 
responsible in the Government of Russia for preparing for the 
Goodwill Games. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47043 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94043" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   20 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commission To Regulate Securities Market </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Commission To Regulate Securities Market </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0924C Moscow MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI in Russian No 21, 22-29 
May 94 p C7 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0924C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Andrey Denisov: "A. Sobchak to the Securities </F>
Market: 'Regulate Yourselves!' A Regional Securities Commission 
Has Been Created in St. Petersburg"] 
  [Text] Directive No. 317-R on the creation of the 
Securities Commission under the St. Petersburg Government was 
issued by Mayor Anatoliy Sobchak. According to this document, 
the main purpose of the new organ will be to develop a system of 
measures for regulating the securities market in St. Petersburg. 
First Deputy Chairman of the Government Aleksandr Kudrin was 
appointed chairman of the commission. 
  The commission includes professional participants in the 
stock market and representatives of organs of executive power: 
the Government of St. Petersburg, the Antimonopoly Committee, 
the Main Administration of the Central Bank for St. Petersburg, 
and the Committee on Administration of Property. The 
participation of a representative of the Federal 
Counterintelligence Service is also being discussed. But, 
according to unofficial information, the Federal 
Counterintelligence Service itself is unwilling to establish 
this contact. 
  The Securities Commission will work in sections, each 
handling "its own" segment of the stock market. General 
leadership will be provided by a board that will include an 
equal number of representatives of state organs and stock market 
professionals. 
  The commission has been assigned the status of an advisory 
organ, but its authority is fairly broad: It has the right to 
organize inspections and bring in independent auditors; send 
materials to law enforcement organs for investigation; and 
publish prescriptions that are mandatory for execution by organs 
of executive power. 
  The last shows how serious the need is for a normal, 
civilized stock market. And not just in the northern capital. 
Will others follow the St. Petersburg mayor who has made such a 
radical decision? Or will St. Petersburg be a "separate" oasis 
of civilization? 
  The commission is now in its organizational period. Its 
structure, personnel, rights, and responsibilities are being 
clarified. We suggest that readers of MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI be 
kept informed of the work of the new organ. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47044 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94044" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kazan City Soviet Reviews Crime Situation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Kazan City Soviet Reviews Crime Situation </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Regional Figures Cited </H4>

<F P=102> 944F0786A Kazan KAZANSKIYE VEDOMOSTI in Russian 7 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0786A </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan KAZANSKIYE VEDOMOSTI </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed report: "In the Language of Figures: How Kazan </F>
Relates to Others"] 
  [Text] The 18th session of the Kazan City Soviet of 
People's Deputies has examined the issue "On the Course of 
Implementation of the 'Package of Urgent Measures To Fight Crime 
in Kazan for 1993-1995.'" 
  We present here the most interesting aspects of the 
report of N. Akbarov, chief of the Kazan Internal Affairs 
Directorate, and portions of the session minutes. 
  Prior to discussion of the report of N. Akbarov, chief of 
the 
Kazan Internal Affairs Directorate, charts were distributed to 
the deputies showing comparative data on the crime situation in 
Tatarstan and certain regions of the Russian Federation. 
  Over the first four months of this year, 20,581 crimes were 
registered in the republic (20,690 during the same period of 
last year). The lion's share of these crimes is attributable to 
Kazan and Naberezhnyye Chelny (6,637 and 3,894, respectively). 
One cannot fail to note, however, that 72.7 percent (last 
year--53 percent) of them were investigated in Kazan, but only 
64 percent--in Chelny. 
  The best indices of all were observed in Nizhnekamskiy and 
Bugulminskiy Rayons. Of 1,299 crimes registered in Nizhnekamskiy 
Rayon, 64 percent were investigated. In Bugulminskiy Rayon, 66.8 
percent of the 800 registered crimes were investigated--and this 
in view of the fact that the number of criminal incidents in 
Bugulminskiy (just as in Zelenodolskiy and Almetyevskiy Rayons) 
Rayon in the first four months of 1994 rose by more than 
one-fourth. 
  Naturally we cannot help but be overjoyed by the fact that 
the percentage of criminal cases solved in Tatarstan overall and 
in Kazan in particular is higher than in our neighboring oblasts 
and republics. In Nizhniy Novgorod this figure is 49.7 percent, 
in Ufa--48.8 percent, in Saratov--53.4 percent, in 
Cheboksary--39.9 percent, in Izhevsk--47.5 percent, in 
Yoshkar-Ola--47.7 percent, and in Samara--63.2 percent. 
  On the other hand, in comparison with other big cities, 
Kazan 
occupies one of the top positions with respect to number of 
crimes committed (6,637), outpaced only by Nizhniy Novgorod, 
where felons provided cases for the militia 10,629 times over 
the four-month period. 
  The Tatarstan capital also leads with respect to number of 
grave crimes committed (2,043), once again leaving the first 
prize for Nizhniy Novgorod (2,191). Overall, however, the 
republic finds itself out in front of Nizhniy Novgorod as far as 
grave crimes are concerned (5,132 and 3,971, respectively), not 
to mention other contiguous regions (Bashkortostan--3,086, 
Saratov Oblast--2,606, Chuvashia--1,614, Udmurtiya--2,260, Mari 
El--661, and Samara Oblast--3,371). 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47045 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94045" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kazan City Soviet Reviews Crime Situation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Kazan City Soviet Reviews Crime Situation </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Internal Affairs Chief's Report </H4>

<F P=102> 944F0786B Kazan KAZANSKIYE VEDOMOSTI in Russian 7 Jun 94 pp 
3-4 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0786B </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan KAZANSKIYE VEDOMOSTI </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["From the report of N. Akbarov, chief of the Kazan Internal </F>
Affairs Directorate": "Level of Crime Decreasing"] 
  [Text] Over the period that has transpired since adoption 
of the "Package of Urgent Measures To Fight Crime," the 
material-technical base of internal affairs organs has been 
significantly enhanced and the authorized strength of 
territorial militia organs has been increased, that of the key 
services first and foremost--criminal investigations, inquests, 
patrol and sentry operations. 
  In this regard, a great volume of work has been accomplished 
in bringing personnel levels up to strength. Some 2,789 
individuals entered service in the militia. The structure of 
rayon subdivisions was reorganized. Rayon internal affairs 
departments acquired the status of directorates. Twelve 
territorial divisions were converted into militia departments 
with full assortment of services enabling the militia to 
operationally respond to crimes committed in their zone of 
activity and react to reports of incidents. 
  Efforts continue with regard to introduction of the "Patrol" 
security alarm system, the first unit of which is scheduled for 
interdepartmental testing in July of this year. Work has begun 
on the establishment of an automated data base for address and 
other information pertaining to city residents. This information 
is being entered for use at the passport and visa services of 
the Kirovskiy, Leninskiy, and Moskovskiy Rayon Internal Affairs 
Directorates. 
  The strength of detachments patrolling the streets and 
public 
facilities has been increased severalfold during daylight and 
nighttime hours. 
  Integrated drills exercising preventive measures and special 
exercises are conducted constantly, involving the participation 
of all personnel. 
  The number of crimes related to motor vehicle transport has 
decreased to less than half its prior level. This is mainly the 
result of the operation of inspection stations, which have the 
right to inspect motor vehicles as well as the individuals 
inside them. 
  Some 840 crimes in the economic sphere have been exposed by 
criminal-militia units over the first four months. Greater 
incidence--by 21 percent--of thefts involving large and 
especially large amounts were uncovered. 
  Serious violations have been uncovered in the sphere of 
credit and monetary relations. Criminals use gaps in 
legislation, defects in the organization of banking procedure, 
and problems existing with respect to reciprocal accounting, to 
effect maximum advantage for themselves. As a result, 
large-scale fraud has taken place through the use of counterfeit 
bank remittances, the illegal receipt and use of preferential 
credits, noncompensated transfer of state monetary assets to 
commercial structures in accordance with a variety of fictitious 
contracts, and other mercenary abuses. 
  Five criminal cases are presently under investigation with 
respect to incidents involving the use of counterfeit 
remittances through which criminal groups attempted to steal 
over R2.5 billion. 
  Preliminary investigation is complete with respect to a 
number of former directors of the Tatoptprodtorg association, 
who abused their position by funneling monetary assets amounting 
to multi-millions to commercial structures managed by their 
close friends or relatives. 
  Of special concern is the matter of preventing and 
curtailing 
incidents of money counterfeiting. Counterfeit bills totalling 
R4,240,000 were removed from circulation. Some 129 incidents of 
sale of counterfeit bank notes were registered. A group of 
counterfeiters actively engaged in sales of counterfeit R10,000 
bills was arrested in April. The group included people from the 
Caucasus and previously convicted members of criminal groups. 
  Some 3,078 criminal cases were brought before the city 
courts--almost 43 percent more than last year. This is due 
primarily to the significantly greater workload being placed on 
militia employees in criminal investigations, inquests, 
inquiries, and other key areas. 
  Efforts to solve crimes committed during past years have not 
been terminated. A case involving the murder of a guard at the 
Spetsmontazh enterprise, on Gorkiy Highway, was solved in March, 
one year later. An individual by the name of Zinin was convicted 
of the murder. Zinin had been previously convicted on a number 
of occasions. In addition to murder, he was among a criminal 
group of five individuals (all arrested) who carried out two 
assaults against citizens in November of last year resulting in 
the death of the victims. 
  In the summer of 1993, the buried and dismembered body of a 
Mr. Gubaydullin was discovered in the garden of a house on 
Ashkhabadskaya Street. The case had been under investigation 
since August of 1992. A Mr. Yermakov was convicted of this 
crime. He had been previously convicted and resided not far from 
the place where the body was discovered. 
  A total of 153 crimes committed during previous years were 
solved over the past four months. 
  Our current operational data indicate that 21 criminal 
groups 
are now operating in the city, involving the participation of 
over 2,000 people. We assess the results of operations against 
these groups as inadequate, although just this year criminal 
charges were filed against 108 active group members. 
  Proper criticism has been directed against us with respect 
to 
a lack of professionalism and low standards exhibited by certain 
militia personnel in their work. The problem here lies primarily 
in the fact that just in the period since January 1993 through 
the present day, about 3,000 individuals have been admitted to 
the force. As a rule, these are people without legal education, 
who do not know the ins and outs of militia work. It is our 
mission to teach them how to function. 
  Disciplinary action--up to and including discharge--is being 
taken against those employees who do not desire to honestly 
carry out their responsibilities. Over the first four months of 
this year, 293 personnel received punishment by order of their 
superiors, court-of-honor deliberations were conducted for 48 
individuals, and 29 persons were discharged from the internal 
affairs organs for deeds unworthy of the calling of militiaman. 
  The criticism directed towards us by deputies in session 
during October of last year--that the militia was sometimes 
incompetent in the operational application of its rights 
afforded by the Law on Emergency Measures in the Fight Against 
Crime--is entirely justified. Incidents took place in which 
articles of this law were incorrectly interpreted, violations 
were committed with respect to drawing up and registering the 
documents stipulated by law, and close relatives of detained 
individuals were not notified in timely fashion. All this was 
noted in the materials of inspections conducted by the city 
procuracy and Tatarstan Republic Ministry of Internal Affairs. 
Over the period during which this law has been in force, a total 
of 34 such inspections took place: 22 by the procuracy, four by 
the Tatarstan Ministry of Internal Affairs, and eight by the 
city Internal Affairs Directorate. 
  Over the four months of this year, for all the individuals 
detained in accordance with Article 2 of the law--850 people in 
all--real suspicion is in evidence as to their participation in 
the commission of grave crimes. 
  Criminal charges have been filed against 40 percent of this 
number, including 199 placed under preventive arrest and 125 
released after signing a document of intent not to leave. 
  Naturally the question arises: Why were the rest detained? I 
will explain. During the initial stage of investigation of a 
crime for which the identity of the perpetrators is not clear, 
we only determine the circle of individuals privy to the crime. 
Therefore, the detention of citizens under suspicion and 
application of the detention period with respect to them 
according to Article 2 of the law does not constitute 
"bloodthirstiness" or a striving on the part of the militia "to 
revel in its power," but simply reflects hard work involved in 
solving the crime, a need dictated by the situation. 
  Nonetheless, even in view of the overall reduction in level 
of crime in the city, the situation continues to be extremely 
adverse. Crimes are acquiring sophisticated, camouflaged forms. 
A significant portion of crimes are being committed violently, 
with special cynicism and brutality. More and more frequently we 
have occasion to hear about murders that have been contracted. 
Illegal and fraudulent transactions involving apartments are 
becoming more frequent. Criminals have at their disposal large 
quantities of firearms. 
  Therefore, despite the fact that our militia personnel have 
been required for a year now to function at augmented levels and 
intensified modes of operation, I appeal to you on behalf of the 
entire militia collective to present an appropriate proposal to 
the Tatarstan Republic Supreme Soviet for extending the term of 
effectiveness of the Law on Emergency Measures in the Fight 
Against Crime, and I hope you will support us in this regard. 
  We can fight crime--and not simply resist it--only if we 
have 
the appropriate weapons at our disposal: all-encompassing 
legislation, provision with technical equipment, financial 
independence, and the support of society. Today, in the absence 
of this, we must at least have the right, afforded by law of the 
Republic of Tatarstan, to apply emergency measures. I think you 
will agree with me. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47046 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94046" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kazan City Soviet Reviews Crime Situation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Kazan City Soviet Reviews Crime Situation </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Soviet Decision on Fighting Crime </H4>

<F P=102> 944F0786C Kazan KAZANSKIYE VEDOMOSTI in Russian 7 Jun 94 pp 
3-4 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0786C </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan KAZANSKIYE VEDOMOSTI </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["Session Resolution No. 7-18c of the Kazan City Soviet of </F>
People's Deputies, Dated 19 May 1994": "On the Course of 
Implementation of the 'Package of Urgent Measures To Fight Crime 
in Kazan for 1993-1995'"] 
  [Text] The Standing Commission of the Kazan City Soviet of 
People's Deputies on Observance of Legality, Protection of 
Citizens' Rights, and Safeguarding of Law and Order and the city 
administration have examined matters concerning the course of 
implementation of the "Package of Urgent Measures To Fight 
Crime" on a systematic basis. 
  The adoption in May 1993 of the Tatarstan Republic Law on 
Emergency Measures To Fight Crime has enabled us to concentrate 
efforts on the implementation of measures used in the fight 
against crime. To achieve this end, R839.7 million was allocated 
from the city budget and rayon budgets in 1993. Some 79 
additional vehicles and means of individual protection were 
acquired for the city militia. The Sovetskiy Rayon Internal 
Affairs Directorate building was put into operation. Efforts 
continue to institute supplementary militia divisions and 
provide them organizational staffing and equipment. The 
numerical strength of the Kazan Garrison increased by 1,200 
individuals last year, enabling our law enforcement organs to 
carry out their duties in the intensified operating mode. In 
addition, it is planned this year to allocate more than R2.5 
billion to law enforcement activity. 
  The Tatarstan Republic Law on Emergency Measures To Fight 
Crime has been an important factor in improving the crime 
situation in the city of Kazan. 
  Energetic efforts by the criminal-militia services are being 
directed against the "authorities" of the criminal world 
suspected of having committed grave crimes. Forces of the Kazan 
Militia Garrison have conducted inspections, jointly with the 
Tax Inspectorate, of commercial structures controlled by various 
criminal groups. About 500 violations of various kinds--from tax 
evasion to the sale of spurious alcoholic beverages--were 
uncovered. In all instances, measures were undertaken to file 
appropriate charges against the violators in accordance with the 
law. 
  Implementation of the Law on Emergency Measures To Fight 
Crime have enabled us to put a halt to the growth of crime. 
According to 1993 results, the level of crime in the city 
decreased 5.0 percent (from 22,209 to 21,074). Over the first 
four months of this year, crime was reduced 9.8 percent from the 
level observed during the same period of last year, while the 
number of crimes solved increased by 20 percent. 
  At the same time, analysis of the program's implementation 
shows that there have been a number of defects in its execution. 
Development of a system of private investigative agencies is not 
reflected in the package of urgent measures. Some grave crimes, 
including crimes against the individual, remain unsolved. 
Personnel turnover in the Kazan Militia Garrison is such as to 
have an effect on the overall growth of professional skills and 
the state of official discipline. 
  Inadequate attention is being devoted to the prevention of 
crimes committed by intoxicated persons and juvenile delinquents. 
  There is no system for publishing and distributing law 
enforcement literature for the populace. A number of issues 
pertaining to public education and health care remain unresolved. 
  Regulation is lacking with respect to the kiosks, stores, 
and 
other places where alcoholic beverages are sold. A number of 
these are located in direct proximity to children's and 
educational institutions. 
  Proceeding from the above statements, the Kazan City Soviet 
of People's Deputies RESOLVES: 
  1. To take into consideration the information on the course 
of implementation of the "Package of Urgent Measures To Fight 
Crime for 1993-1995." 
  2. That the head of administration of the city of Kazan 
(K.Sh. Iskhakov) shall continue its efforts to further implement 
the "Package of Urgent Measures To Fight Crime in Kazan for 
1993-1995," taking into account the proposals and observations 
expressed by deputies in session of the city soviet of people's 
deputies. 
  3. That the Standing Commission for Observance of Legality, 
Legal Protection of Citizens, and Safeguarding of Law and Order 
shall: 
  3.1. Continue to monitor execution of the "Package of Urgent 
Measures To Fight Crime in Kazan for 1993-1995." 
  3.2. Develop and submit for ratification by the presidium, 
jointly with the city administration, measures for 
implementation of the proposals and observations expressed 
during discussion of the issue in question. 
  4. To ask the Tatarstan Republic Supreme Soviet to extend 
the 
term of effectiveness of the Law on Urgent Measures To Fight 
Crime, prior to adoption of legislative acts by the Russian 
Federation to intensify measures in the fight against crime. 
  4.1. To present an initiative to the State Duma of the 
Russian Federation on adopting a law to stiffen liability for 
carjacking, racket operations, and theft of personal property. 
  5. That the chief of the Internal Affairs Directorate of the 
City of Kazan administration (N.G. Akbarov) shall ensure that 
militia personnel comply with provisions of the law in the 
execution of their official duties. 
  5.1. To direct that additional proposals be drawn up on the 
establishment of a system providing operational communications 
between citizens of the city and organs of the militia. 
  6. Responsibility for the course of implementation of this 
resolution is entrusted to Deputy Chairman of the City Soviet 
N.N. Rybushkin. 
  [Signed] Chairman K.Sh. Iskhakov 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47047 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94047" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   31 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Soskovets Tour of Udmurtia, Bashkiria, Ulyanovsk Reviewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Soskovets Tour of Udmurtia, Bashkiria, Ulyanovsk Reviewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0761A Moscow ROSSIYSKIYE VESTI in Russian 31 May 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0761A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKIYE VESTI </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Igor Petrov: "Rumors of Province's Economic </F>
Death Greatly Exaggerated: Such Is the Conclusion Drawn by the 
Government Delegation That Visited Three of the Country's 
Industrial Centers"] 
  [Text] Izhevsk, Cheboksary, Ulyanovsk--"Can you believe 
it," said my exhausted colleague in surprise, settling into his 
seat on the plane taking us from Ulyanovsk to Moscow, "in less 
than three weeks we visited two republics, one oblast, 10 
plants, a sovkhoz, and two stores, and attended just one banquet. 
  "In the old days everything was organized differently: You 
would go to the oblast with the Central Committee secretary, see 
some exemplary facility where they had spent a month putting 
everything in order, then meet with the party aktiv, hear 
reports about achievements and labor feats, hand out reprimands 
and awards, go to a banquet, and then go home." 
  Indeed, First Deputy Prime Minister O. Soskovets' trip to 
Udmurtia, Bashkiria, and Ulyanovsk Oblast did not fit the old 
scenario in terms either of the scope of work or tone of the 
discussions. And if something was absent altogether, it was the 
pompous reports and window dressing characteristic of past 
years. On the contrary, local officials used the occasion to 
deluge the first deputy prime minister of the government with 
such a multitude of general and specific problems and questions 
that it would take several newspaper pages to list them. 
  The most difficult situation, in O. Soskovets' opinion, has 
come about in Udmurtia, as a result of the republic economy's 
surfeit of military plants. Twenty of Russia's largest defense 
enterprises employ over 145,000 people, who produce more than 
three-fourths of the republic's industrial output. While the 
production decline in defense industries in the country as a 
whole in the first quarter of 1994 amounted to 35 percent of the 
figure for the same period last year, in Udmurtia the parameter 
was more than 50 percent. One of the main reasons for this is 
the state's failure to pay for military orders in 1993, the 
meager funds available for conversion, and high overhead. 
  "The government sees its mistakes and is doing everything in 
its power to rectify them," O. Soskovets said at a conference in 
Izhevsk. "We can confirm that the volume of defense orders will 
remain at last year's level. After the federal budget is 
approved, we will repay 8 trillion rubles in debts to 
enterprises of the military-industrial complex. We plan to 
significantly liberalize regulations governing arms exports in 
favor of the producer plants." 
  However, under the new conditions, in the first deputy prime 
minister's opinion, the main burden will be on local government 
bodies. They will have to learn how to make effective use of 
financial resources by implementing a selective industrial 
policy. Unfortunately, this is not happening yet. 
  For example, extremely sophisticated foreign-made equipment 
for the production of 180,000 passenger cars a year was 
installed at the Izhevsk Machinery Plant more than a year ago 
and is sitting idle. The minimal capital investments needed to 
start up production are lacking. Whose concern is this first and 
foremost? Needless to say, the enterprise management and 
republic leadership. If it is impossible to mobilize centralized 
resources, no one is standing in the way of a search for 
creditors abroad. After all, metallurgical plant directors were 
able to approach foreign banks on their own, borrow funds, and 
increase steel production by seven percent. The most important 
thing is resourcefulness and a desire to tackle the problem on 
one's own above all. 
  But lack of initiative is not the only factor that has been 
and remains the scourge of many enterprise executives. There are 
also difficulties of a more objective character. The cold winds 
of competition that have been freely blowing throughout the 
country since the fall of the economic iron curtain are chilling 
and freezing life at many enterprises whose output is in 
principle essential to the Russian market. 
  Take, for example, the Cheboksary industrial tractor plant. 
The enormous plant, with 220,000 square meters of production 
space and 20,000 employees, ran up debts of 34 billion rubles 
and ultimately shut down. 
  The causes are purely market-related: Noncompetitive prices, 
lower quality, and unsuccessful marketing eventually led to the 
loss of its market. So what do we do now--consign the plant, 
which was built by leading German firms and 60 percent of whose 
equipment consists of the best Western machine tools, to the 
bulldozer, and thus condemn ourselves to eternally buying 
equipment from the Japanese and Americans in exchange for oil 
and gas? 
  That is probably one possible solution to the solution, but 
hardly the most sensible one. "We must help our enterprises win 
markets in Russia and the CIS countries," said Oleg Soskovets. 
"The idea of protectionism for domestic industry that we talk 
about so much must be given concrete substance. I realize that 
our tractors are inferior to foreign ones in many ways, but 
unless we improve them, we will always lag behind in 
technological progress. That requires that they be used, not sit 
in warehouses." 
  Characteristically, plant directors, while complaining 
almost 
to a man about Western competitors, nevertheless understand that 
the government does not intend to close off the domestic market 
to make life easier for them. Customs barriers in the way of 
certain types of imported goods, if they are established, will 
remain in place for no more than 18 to 24 months. That should be 
enough time to modernize production facilities and prepare them 
for existence in the brutal fight for markets. 
  Competition, the fight for markets, and the priority of 
output sales over production--all these things are market 
concepts that local enterprise directors are assimilating, and 
not without success. Of course, by no means all of them are able 
to cope with the difficulties of the transition period, but 
wherever a creative and initiative-oriented approach is being 
taken, the situation is gradually stabilizing and even improving. 
  We saw quite a few examples of this during our three-day 
trip. For instance, the Izhevsk Mechanical Plant has learned how 
to make motorcycles that exhibited excellent performance 
characteristics during a marathon race to Cape Town. The plant 
is now arranging deliveries of them to African countries. 
  The Dizelprom joint-stock company in Cheboksary is 
producing, 
under German license, power units that foreign customers ordered 
as soon as they appeared. Total sales have increased to $120 
million. The workers, earning a fixed salary of $120 in ruble 
equivalent, have increased quality and production standards by a 
factor of 10. 
  The automotive plant in Ulyanovsk has raised labor 
productivity by 20 percent in the past 18 months. Thanks to more 
efficient organization, motor vehicle production has increased 
from 94,000 to 115,000 and the product line has been expanded. 
The plant is able to meet virtually any requests from buyers, up 
to and including a vehicle's color. Cooperative production is 
being established with Mercedes Benz, which will result in the 
creation of 20,000 new jobs. 
  On returning to Moscow, I asked the first deputy prime 
minister for his main impressions from the trip. 
  "Above all, I was able to see once again that enterprise 
directors are on top of the situation. They are the main 
reformers today, since they work in the real economy and produce 
real products. Most of them have adapted to life under the new 
conditions. I saw no panic, only a desire to overcome the crisis 
as quickly as possible. 
  "The only thing that local officials asked of me was clarity 
in the government's economic policy. We have finally stopped 
dividing the Cabinet into promarket and antimarket members and 
reformers and conservatives, which in itself is the main 
psychological precondition for solving all our economic problems. 
  "The trip is over, but the bulk of the work lies ahead. 
After 
analyzing and systematizing the information and studying the 
records of the conferences and meetings with plant directors, 
the government will draft the necessary decrees." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47048 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94048" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Drift' in Ties With ROK Deplored </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `Drift' in Ties With ROK Deplored </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   PM3005095394 Moscow IZVESTIYA in Russian 27 May 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> PM3005095394 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow IZVESTIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Igor Golembiovskiy and Sergey Agafonov : </F>
"Moscow Cast in Role of Extra in Economic Ties With Seoul"] 
  [Text] Seoul -- This year marks the fourth anniversary of 
the establishment of diplomatic relations between Moscow and 
Seoul. This is an absurdly short period in historical terms, but 
is long enough for us to take stock. 
  The results of our stocktaking will depend on our mood, 
since 
there are not very many indisputable statements to be made -- it 
is beyond dispute, for instance, that a normalization of 
contacts is better and more civilized than a lack of contacts 
for ideological reasons; it is beyond dispute that the 
establishment of ties between Moscow and Seoul has helped to 
stabilize the situation in the region; and it is beyond dispute 
that new prospects have opened up for the development of diverse 
and mutually advantageous partnership ties with great potential. 
That is probably everything on the "obvious" list. In our 
subsequent assessments of any problem or aspect of our bilateral 
"baggage" everything will depend on interpretation. 
Particularly if it is a question not of an amorphous or 
hard-to-calculate "political dialogue" but of specific economic 
matters, which sometimes set the entire tone of our relations. 
  Judge for yourselves. Previously there was no direct trade, 
while deals done through intermediaries in third countries 
barely amounted to $10 million. Now mutual trade turnover has 
surged to $1.5 billion, and the advantages of direct contacts 
are obvious. Is that an achievement? Certainly, but on the 
other hand, statistics show that the trade turnover growth rate 
is slowing with every passing year, certain sectors are marking 
time, and the development of contacts is being held up by a lot 
of objective and subjective factors. We are doing worse than 
other countries "new" to Korea -- for instance, Seoul's trade 
turnover with China is several times more than its trade with 
Russia, and the Koreans even have more investments in Uzbekistan 
or Vietnam than they have here. What is there to be complacent 
about there? 
  Another illustration is the talk about opening a new market 
for Russia -- virtually a "gateway to the Asia region." Is this 
correct? Once again, on the one hand, it is (if you are 
thinking of the market for sales of raw materials and 
semimanufactures), but obviously it is not if we are talking 
about the market for finished goods and products. The Koreans 
would be quite right to credit themselves with having made a 
breakthrough into the Russian commodity market, but the reverse 
is not true -- there is not even any hint of reciprocity. 
  Our relations, which seem to be developing but have at the 
same time managed to get really bogged down, moving from a 
galloping beginning to a "middling" rate as we end our first 
four years, essentially consist of such "pros" and "cons." And 
although, on the eve of the Russo-Korean summit, there is a 
strong temptation to talk about what has been achieved in good 
terms and to proclaim our present situation as active and 
dynamic, we should not deceive ourselves. 
  Calling a spade a spade, it has to be admitted that our 
contacts lack any systematic, well-thought-out approach and are 
motivated -- at least on the Russian side -- by an inescapable 
sense of drift, occasionally interrupted by various sporadic and 
impromptu leadership demarches designed, as a rule, to mark 
trips and diplomatic tours. When the tours end, these demarches 
are mutually forgotten. 
  However much we may want positive news, in their years 
together Moscow and Seoul have not seen through to a successful 
conclusion or even begun any of the major projects devised and 
proclaimed at top level. Korean official statistics, for 
instance, put the number of joint undertakings with Russia at 
the modest figure of 28, and the size of Korean investment at 
$26 million. The only memorable large-scale actions have been 
the operation for massive deliveries of South Korean soap and 
washing powder during the Soviet "soap crisis" and the $1.5 
billion in loans which Gorbachev's Moscow obtained as a reward 
for its forced march toward the establishment of diplomatic 
relations. 
  Incidentally, twice as much had been promised, but Seoul 
froze the second half, since no payments on the first half had 
been forthcoming. This debt hitch, as far as the Koreans are 
concerned, has turned into a sore point that will not go away. 
Admittedly, in actual fact the problem is small in money terms, 
but very convenient for Seoul tactically. And although Moscow 
is offering in payment raw materials, weapons, or land in the 
Russian capital for Korean use for 99 years, there has been no 
progress on the debt issue, which serves as a major and 
excellent argument in altercations with Korea's Russian partners 
when the latter complain about the shortage of investment or the 
Korean side's reluctance to develop Siberia's resources or 
tackle other major projects. 
  But we should not grumble at the Koreans for their 
intractability and formal approach -- they have their own 
interests, and this is not the main problem. The problem, it 
seems to me, is that Russia has no interests, and over the past 
four years of regular contacts Moscow has still not decided 
where it stands on the main issue -- just where does the 
Republic of Korea rank in the system of Russian political, 
diplomatic, and economic priorities? For instance, the 
beautiful formulas about complementary economic potential that 
can be heard from time to time are not the goal of the process, 
just a slogan and another line in official documents. In other 
words, Russia is suffering from diplomatic and economic anemia, 
totally vague ideas about its own future interests, and a lack 
of consistent action. 
  Conversely, Seoul is using Moscow skillfully and with 
pleasure, obtaining visible and tangible benefits for itself. 
Through diplomatic relations with the USSR a bridge was built 
toward the normalization of contacts with China; Korea's 
position in the region was strengthened; a new point of support 
[tochka opory] emerged, as it were; and its room for maneuver 
was increased. South Korea is now freely and exclusively for its 
own benefit siphoning off Russia's "gray matter," transferring 
our scientific personnel very cheaply and without any great fuss 
to its own laboratories; the Koreans are gradually opening up 
the Russian raw materials market and taking what they need in 
the amounts they need. Translated into the language of 
priorities, this means that Korea has, as it were, set aside 
three "niches" for Russia -- the political niche (the function 
of providing a balance and counterweight in regional policy, 
which is very important for Seoul, hemmed in as it is by giants 
such as the United States, Japan, and China); the technological 
niche (neither the Japanese, the Americans, nor the Europeans 
are making new technology freely available to the Koreans, nor 
will they, and without this technology the "engine" of the 
Korean economy -- exports -- will rapidly grind to a halt); and 
the raw materials niche. Seoul is "trawling" through these 
three areas in line with its own needs. Current Korean interests 
make no provision for a close alliance with Moscow politically 
and are not prompting them economically to make major financial 
investments or to implement giant projects -- something, quite 
apart from anything else, for which the creaky Korean economy 
(which urgently needs fundamental restructuring) is itself 
objectively unprepared. 
  As a result we now have the kind of relationship with Seoul 
that Seoul wants. The common references to Russian musical 
chairs and vagueness are of little importance in this instance. 
The objective difficulties caused by market and semimarket 
reforms, the sad nature of Russian economic reality, and our 
political instability are all not so much a cause of delays in 
our bilateral relations, rather they are the background against 
which these delays occur. The reason is that the existing volume 
and structure of relations satisfies South Korea, it simply does 
not need any more from Moscow. And Moscow is cast in the 
unenviable role of an extra engaged in its own domestic 
squabbles. 
  Russian "traders" are currently the only people at the 
moment 
who are really deriving any professional benefit from contacts 
with Korea. However much they may be looked down upon by 
officials, there is no denying the obvious fact that these 
traders are investing tens of millions of dollars in Korea, they 
are organizing trade specialization with whole areas of Korea, 
and, finally -- unlike the Russian Government or Russian regions 
-- they have access to Korean private credit (something which 
Russian official structures can only dream about). 
  These "trader diplomats" can be accused of anything you 
like, 
but you cannot deny that they clearly target end results and 
certainty in their intentions and choice of goal. These small 
wholesale-market hustlers are, regrettably, sometimes better 
known and better respected in Korea than many official 
representatives of the country that produced them. 
  This is a paradox, but it is natural, since the invention of 
slogans and the search for ways to show that Russia is great and 
influential do not produce any real returns. Eloquent evidence 
of this is the simple fact that the Russian Embassy in Seoul is 
housed in a gloomy barrack-like building surrounded by street 
drains and with a frontage hard up against a dirty fence covered 
with garbage. The two-headed bird on the embassy plaque is 
facing away from the fence, but both the heads gaze on an 
unedifying scene, while St. George the Conqueror's lance is 
absurdly pointing at a dent in the roof in which a dirty pool of 
water has formed. Where is your pride, great Russia, and what 
is the point in puffing out your official cheeks if even this 
trivial matter of economic representation cannot be properly 
resolved? After all, it is not the "harmful Koreans" who are to 
blame, but Moscow alone which has permitted itself to be 
humiliated and has lost all face in its quest for a "new face." 
  And this wrong note, incidentally, applies not only to 
Russo-Korean ties, but also directly to Russia's positions in 
the entire Asia-Pacific region. It is high time that our 
leaders gave this some thought. Moscow's foreign policy in the 
socialist era was a high-profile appendage of the system -- it 
cost a pittance, but it carried out its ideological tasks. Now 
the regime is different, and it is not the function of an 
appendage that is important in foreign policy, but the function 
of safeguarding genuine national interests. There should be 
fewer declarations and initiatives -- nobody will shed any tears 
for them. But we simply must sort out our priorities and decide 
what our aims and tasks are. 
  As people like to say, we can do anything we set our minds 
on. But just when will we finally set our minds on doing 
something? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47049 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94049" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   31 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Resistance to Following U.S. Lead on Korean Nuclear Issue </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Resistance to Following U.S. Lead on Korean Nuclear Issue </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Sympathy Toward DPRK Urged </H4>

<F P=102> 94WP0096A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 31 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94WP0096A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Let the Other Side State Its Point </F>
of View"] 
  [Text] Vladimir Tolstikov, president of the Russian Society 
for Friendship and Cultural Cooperation With the Democratic 
People's Republic of Korea, sent a message to Russian Federation 
President Boris Yeltsin stating that "it has become clear from 
press reports that during your meeting with South Korean 
President Kim Yong-sam it is proposed to discuss the so-called 
nuclear issue in North Korea. Considering the results of the 
South Korean leader's recent travels, we can assume that he 
views discussion of this issue as one of the main objectives of 
his visit to Russia. The results of his recent trips to Japan 
and China also show that the essence of the 'nuclear issue in 
North Korea,' exaggerated by the South Koreans in the footsteps 
of their transoceanic patrons, amounts to an attempt to slander 
and discredit the DPRK and then try to crush and destroy it. The 
Russian Society for Friendship and Cultural Cooperation With the 
DPRK expresses serious alarm and the fear that the South Korean 
visitor will succeed in finding supporters in Russia for his 
unprecedentedly impudent claims. The DPRK is our sovereign ally. 
Therefore, if there truly were a need to officially discuss 'the 
nuclear issue in North Korea,' it would be entirely natural to 
invite Kim Il-song, president of the DPRK, to participate in 
such a discussion. This is a truth not requiring any special 
proof and falling within the realm of ordinary international 
practice. The ancient Greeks had an immutable rule: 'Let the 
other side state its point of view.' The Russian Society for 
Friendship and Cultural Cooperation With the Democratic People's 
Republic of Korea earnestly asks you, esteemed Boris 
Nikolayevich, to take these considerations into account and see 
to it that a state friendly to us--the DPRK--is not harmed for 
many decades to come." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47050 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94050" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Resistance to Following U.S. Lead on Korean Nuclear Issue </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Resistance to Following U.S. Lead on Korean Nuclear Issue </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Independent Russian Policy Called For </H4>

<F P=102> 94WP0096B Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 1 Jun 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94WP0096B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleksandr Zhebin, Far East Institute of the </F>
Academy of Sciences: "North and South Korea Should Resolve Their 
Problems Themselves: Compromise Between the Ruling Elites Is 
Necessary"] 
  [Text] Seoul-Moscow--Paradoxical though it may sound, 
Pyongyang was actually compelled to use the nuclear card in its 
struggle to survive. Forced into a corner, the DPRK realized in 
time that the opportunities of the 20th century were giving it a 
chance to alter the playing conditions and offer its enemy the 
following choice: either exist together or perish together. 
  International inspection teams from the International Atomic 
Energy Agency (IAEA) were called upon to clarify the nature of 
North Korea's nuclear program. However, the experience of such 
inspections in Iraq and the Republic of South Africa show that 
the methods used by the IAEA are not always effective. The 
increased attention devoted by the international community to 
nuclear facilities in Yongbyon seems excessive if only for the 
reason that these facilities are located on the Earth's surface. 
The maniacal secrecy used by the North Koreans to surround far 
less important defense programs enables us to assume that the 
nuclear program, if one exists, is being carried out in a deep 
underground location, inaccessible to satellite observation. 
  It cannot be ruled out that several nuclear devices, even of 
unpurified uranium, the manufacture of which does not require 
application of refined technologies, are already being stored 
somewhere in the womb of one or several of the numerous 
mountains covering northern Korea. 
  The facilities at Yongbyon constitute probably the second, 
or 
even third phase of North Korea's nuclear program. At present, 
this program probably envisages, first of all, the accumulation 
of stores of plutonium to build not bombs, but rather more 
compact nuclear warheads for missiles. Secondly, it is designed 
to compel the United States, Japan, and the Republic of Korea to 
be more tractable. 
  It appears the North does not have suicidal plans to use 
such 
a weapon--if one has already been built--to attack the South. At 
the same time, we can be equally assured that the Kim clan will 
resort to every means available to avoid a repetition of the 
fate that befell the Ceausescu and Honecker families. The North 
has sent a clear signal to the South, and to the West at the 
same time: Leave us alone--we will not permit you to act this 
way with our leaders. 
  It is apparent that in order to peacefully resolve the 
problem, historical compromise must be achieved between the 
ruling elites of the two portions of the country. If this takes 
place, inspections between the Koreas might prove effective. 
  A second objective of Pyongyang's use of the nuclear card is 
to obtain diplomatic recognition by the United States and other 
Western countries and ensure access to new sources of capital 
and technologies. 
  Pyongyang understands that in order to legitimize the Korean 
model of socialism, it must be made economically viable, or at 
least appear economically viable. These new sources can be found 
only in the West. But it is clear that the West will not embark 
upon the development of trade and economic relations with the 
DPRK without U.S. permission. 
  For North Korea, diplomatic relations with the United States 
will be valuable only to the extent that they contribute towards 
the withdrawal of U.S. forces from South Korea. 
  The U.S. military presence is seen in Pyongyang as the major 
obstacle to realization of its plans to reunite the country. The 
first phase of this concept envisages the organization of an 
"insurrection" by South Koreans against the "puppet clique"; the 
second phase consists of the rendering of "assistance" to the 
rebels by the North, "at their request" of course. 
  Meanwhile, there is growing discontent in Seoul with the 
fact 
that the Republic of Korea finds itself pushed aside from the 
solution to a problem of such vital importance to it as the 
nuclear issue. Seoul is also clearly irritated by the artificial 
excitation of tension surrounding the nuclear problem. The 
United States is particularly guilty of this and has been forced 
to publicly explain to the American people, including from the 
highest level, that the threat of attack by North Korea against 
the South, or of the emergence of military conflict for other 
reasons, is not very likely at present. 
  There are those who lean towards transferring the nuclear 
problem to the United Nations Security Council for its 
examination and subjecting North Korea to sanctions. Statements 
also resound regarding the possibility of a military strike. The 
logical conclusion of any sanctions could be a second Korean 
War. Taking into consideration the revolution in armaments 
following the Korean War of the 1950's, the consequences of new 
military actions on the peninsula would be catastrophic for 
Korea, and perhaps for its neighbors as well. 
  Will China, Russia, and even Japan permit the construction 
of 
another Chernobyl in direct proximity to their borders? 
  It is not very likely that the People's Republic of China 
would agree to the formation of a united Korea under the 
dominant political and economic influence of its traditional 
enemies--the United States and Japan. Especially now--with a 
socialist regime being maintained in the PRC and the Communist 
Party in power. But that is exactly what will happen if the DPRK 
swiftly collapses. 
  For China, handing the DPRK over to the "imperialists" would 
mean the undermining of its confidence and prestige in Asia, 
which Chinese political figures have fought for centuries to 
achieve. It would be far more advantageous to Beijing if the 
little North Korean bear cub continued to rather insolently pull 
on the whiskers of the huge tiger across the ocean, as if to 
convince the entire world, first of all, that the famous Chinese 
proverb about the paper tiger is correct and, secondly, that 
even a small Asian country--if it is an ally of China, of 
course, or under China's patronage--may feel a sense of relative 
security even in the face of threats from such a superpower as 
the United States. 
  This is especially true in view of the fact that now, thanks 
to United States interest in getting assistance from the PRC to 
resolve the nuclear problem, Beijing has managed to force 
Washington to tone down its rhetoric on an issue most sensitive 
to China--the human rights question. 
  In the light of China's position, the idea of convening an 
international conference on the nuclear problem raises certain 
questions. Does it make any sense for China to publicly unite 
with Russia and the United States in exerting pressure on its 
ally? Beijing has always preferred to act alone and behind the 
scenes. Will the DPRK, like any other country, agree to 
participate in a forum which threatens to turn into a trial of 
one of the participants by the others? In addition, North Korea 
is categorically opposed to the presence here of its former 
mother-state, Japan. Finally, no matter how deplorable it may 
be, not the United States nor Japan, not even China, has any 
burning desire to help Russia get more of a say in the matter of 
a Korean settlement or with respect to the Asia-Pacific region 
overall. 
  In this regard, it seems absolutely necessary for Russia to 
operationally distance itself from the politics of other states 
on the nuclear problem and to develop its own approach with 
respect to both this issue and the Korean problem overall, an 
approach which would take into account to the greatest extent 
Russia's national interests in this region. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47051 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94051" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Karasin Concerned About RF MFA Continuity </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Karasin Concerned About RF MFA Continuity </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0418A Moscow SEGODNYA in Russian 10 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0418A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SEGODNYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Grigoriy Karasin, director of the Department </F>
of Information and the Press of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs 
of the Russian Federation, by SEGODNYA correspondent Irina 
Grudinina: "The Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs Is Concerned 
at the Drain of Professionals"; date and place not given] 
  [Text] [Grudinina] Grigoriy Borisovich, how do you assess 
the situation and the mood in Russia's diplomatic service? 
  [Karasin] The main thing, in my opinion, is that since the 
1991-1992 period, which was difficult and dramatic for the 
diplomatic service, the Foreign Ministry structures have 
stabilized and interaction between subdivisions, along 
center-embassies lines, has strengthened. Whence also the more 
composed, business-oriented mood of the diplomats. 
  Russia's new foreign policy realities have made necessary a 
qualitative retuning of thinking and practice. The Foreign 
Ministry is now characterized by a state, not party, approach to 
its activity. We are actively mastering the skills of 
interaction with all the Russian state and political structures, 
considering the state of public opinion, and trying to speak 
more broadly and simply about actual foreign policy in order 
that it be comprehensible to and accepted by Russians. Doing 
this is, as you will understand, very difficult, but essential. 
  [Grudinina] Russia's foreign policy is today the most active 
zone, perhaps, where different positions clash and sharply 
worded and, at times, mutually exclusive statements are made. 
How is this being reflected in the practical activity of the 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs, is it helping or hindering? 
  [Karasin] Real pluralism and a comparison of positions and 
opinions not only do not hinder but also help considerably in 
the formation of foreign policy approaches at the state level. 
That pluralism geared to a search for the most appropriate 
approaches cannot be confused with "megaphone" statements behind 
which a responsible attitude and an aspiration to make a 
constructive contribution to Russia's foreign policy are barely 
discernible is another matter. Avowed self-publicity is an 
inevitable concomitant here also. I am convinced that foreign 
policy is far from being the sphere in which it is possible "to 
fully expose oneself" to the world just for fun. Like it or not, 
the country's foreign prestige depends on this. State-minded 
commonsense needs to be displayed here. 
  It would seem that, considering the sensitivity of the 
foreign policy theme, we could polemicize far more effectively 
within the framework of the current state 
structures--committees, councils, and other mechanisms, 
especially since a sufficient quantity of them has been created. 
  I frequently ask myself why problems of industrial 
production, agriculture, commerce, and education are not 
discussed publicly with such intensity and sharpness. Because, 
most likely, the majority understand that this is primarily 
specialists' business. Although, to be honest, there are far 
fewer "delicate moments" in these fields than in foreign policy. 
This sphere probably merits a special approach. We should treat 
it solicitously and avoid excessive revelations and public 
mistakes in the eyes of the world. Otherwise some politicians 
will be temporary winners, some will be thinking about their 
counter-play, and long-term national interests will be the 
losers. 
  [Grudinina] There are in the Foreign Ministry, most likely, 
as in other state institutions also, serious internal problems 
that disturb people and that need to be resolved. Could you 
distinguish the most important, most painful problem? 
  [Karasin] I was, I confess, expecting this question. There 
are many problems, of course, and they are, for the most part, 
typical of all public service. But there is one that disturbs 
all of us most of all. It is the question of the future of the 
country's diplomatic service. The Foreign Ministry has always 
been characterized by a continuity of the generations and strict 
professional schooling. A diplomat is not simply a government 
official but a person to whom state interests have been 
entrusted. He has to renounce the euphoria of simple solutions, 
accustom himself to painstaking work, and know the value of the 
actual and the sham result. 
  We are today observing a dangerous trend of a drain from the 
Foreign Ministry system of both experienced and young 
specialists, which raises the serious question of what Russia's 
diplomatic service will be like in three to five years and the 
more distant future. If we disregard the details, what is 
fundamental is the problem of financial support for diplomats 
working in the central machinery in Moscow. Please understand me 
correctly. In no country can diplomats be compared in terms of 
living standard with businessmen nor, to be honest, do they 
aspire to this. They derive satisfaction from service of the 
country and take pride in this, but, granted all this, they have 
sufficient for the decent support of their family. With us the 
situation is different. A well-trained graduate of a higher 
educational institution with a knowledge of two or three 
languages receives on coming to work in the Foreign Ministry 
R55,000 (for comparison: An army lieutenant receives 
R200,000-R250,000), and after 20 years' service a Foreign 
Ministry counselor receives R130,000. Is it surprising that 
under such conditions young people are being forced, primarily 
from "family considerations," to go into private structures and 
sell Snickers bars and chewing gum, getting 10-15 times more for 
this. 
  The time has come to sound the alarm. The professional 
structure, which the country needs and whose formation has taken 
several decades, could fall apart. 
  [Grudinina] We have to agree with your arguments. But the 
question as to the sum that an increase in diplomats' pay would 
cost the treasury arises. 
  [Karasin] I would like to make clear once more that we are 
talking only about the central machinery of the Foreign 
Ministry. Those who work in Moscow. And, following repeated 
cuts, there are little more than 1,500 of these remaining. I 
would say for comparison that there are in the U.S. State 
Department, with an approximately similar structure, 10,000 
diplomats. It is obvious, in my opinion, that economies in the 
diplomatic service will not resolve the problems of the state 
budget but could cause the country's interests palpable harm. It 
is indisputable also that Russia's diplomatic service needs high 
professionals no less than the armed forces or intelligence, say. 
  [Grudinina] There has been frequent talk recently of the 
need 
for an active search for off-budget sources of funding of state 
institutions. Could not the problem be resolved this way? 
  [Karasin] I am convinced that the possibilities of the 
Foreign Ministry in a search for such sources are extremely 
limited. Entangling public service, in such sensitive areas as 
foreign policy, what is more, in commerce and business is an 
extraordinarily risky and, in the long-term, unjustified 
venture. The microbes of "official enterprise" could very 
quickly eat through the entire organism of the diplomatic 
service. Everyone should concern himself with his own work, 
giving it all his efforts, time, and ability, otherwise the 
state will be the loser. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47052 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94052" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   20 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   U.S. Joint Venture To Supply Oil Products to Sakhalin </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    U.S. Joint Venture To Supply Oil Products to Sakhalin </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0394A Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 20 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0394A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleksandr Tutushkin and Vladislav Dorofeyev: </F>
"Sakhalin Gets Its Own Gasoline for the First Time"] 
  [Text] A festive ceremony is being held today in 
Sakhalin, celebrating the opening of the oil processing plant 
built by the Russian-American joint venture Petrosakh. It will 
operate using oil from the nearby Okruzhnoye oil deposit, which 
is being exploited by this same enterprise. This marks the 
completion of the development practically "from zero" of a 
non-state-owned full-cycle oil complex, complete with the entire 
necessary infrastructure. It will supply no less than one-third 
of the island's demand for oil products, which have never been 
produced here before. 
  The joint venture Petrosakh was registered on 15 July 1991 
with the Ministry of Finance of Russia. Its founders are: the 
Sakhalin firms SAMEKO (1990, Yuzhno-Sakhalinsk) and SAMETO 
(1991, Yuzhno-Sakhalinsk), as well as the Petrosakh USA company 
(1991, Dallas), which was specially created for implementation 
of the Sakhalin project. The joint venture's charter capital 
comprises $46 million, and was contributed in equal portions by 
the Russian and American sides. 
  The Okruzhnoye deposit was surveyed by the 
Sakhalinmorneftegaz association in the 1970's, and then closed 
down due to absence of funds for development. In December 1992 
Sakhalingeolkom [Sakhalin Geological Committee] issued the joint 
venture Petrosakh a license to develop the deposit for a period 
of 20 years. It is curious that two former Soviet oil 
specialists, Georgiy Mirkin and Mikhail Filshtinskiy, were 
appointed to manage the joint venture. They had worked in 
Sakhalin in the 1970's, and then emigrated to the United States. 
It was they who initiated the project for development of the 
deposit, since they knew very well that Okruzhnoye, even though 
it has heavy soil, also contains light high-quality oil, which 
was used to fuel bulldozers during earthwork performed at the 
deposit. The joint venture received the first oil from the 
reactivated well back in August 1991, and by the end of the 
summer 1992 5,000 tonnes had been extracted from two wells. In 
1994 it plans to extract 400,000-500,000 tonnes of oil, half of 
which will be shipped for export. 
  The construction of the oil processing plant began in the 
spring of last year. By that time, construction of a modular 
residential settlement housing 250 people, with offices and a 
full set of consumer services institutions, had been completed 
at the site. Also, satellite communications were established, 
roads were built, a technical service and repair base was 
created, and an airport and seasonal terminal (operating only 
when the sea is free of ice) were built for pumping petroleum 
products from shore storage collectors into tankers. Practically 
95 percent of the equipment, as well as the modular housing, 
were brought from the United States. 
  The first line of the plant, which has already been placed 
into operation, is expected to process 200,000 tonnes of oil per 
year. In the future there are plans to increase the capacity of 
the oil processing plant to 400,000 tonnes and to build a plant 
for rarification of casing-head gas. Moreover, all the oil 
products obtained will be used only for local needs. The entire 
project is anticipated for a period of 20-30 years. The joint 
venture expects to get its first profits in five years after the 
start-up of the plant. For the economy of Sakhalin the emergence 
of the oil processing plant is an unprecedented event. Despite 
the fact that oil and gas have long been extracted on the 
island, oil products have always been brought in from the 
continent. The start-up of the first oil processing plant will 
make it possible to provide one-third of the fuel demands of 
Sakhalin and the Kurils. 
  The president of the joint venture, Donald Joiner, announced 
that Petrosakh in principle is ready to continue making capital 
investments in the Russian economy--to build several more 
plants, to conduct exploration of new deposits, and to actively 
export oil. It is true, Mr. Joiner concluded with regret, that 
the tax system that exists today in the Russian Federation makes 
these plans difficult to realize. 
  [Begin boxed material] 
<H5>  Basic Characteristics of the Oil Industry Complex Created in </H5>
Sakhalin by the Joint Venture Petrosakh 
  The Okruzhnoye deposit is located in remote taiga on the 
eastern shore of the central part of Sakhalin 500 km from 
Yuzhno-Sakhalinsk, 160 km from the port of Poronaysk, and 100 km 
from the Pervomayskoye settlement. The oil reserves are 
estimated at 8-10 million tonnes. There are plans to extract up 
to 80 percent of these reserves. By the end of 1995 plans call 
for reaching a level of 1 million tonnes of oil per year. 
  When the first line of the oil processing plant reaches full 
capacity, the joint venture Petrosakh will be able to meet 40 
percent of the needs of Sakhalin Oblast for aviation kerosene, 
30 percent of its needs for gasoline (AI-93 and A-76) and diesel 
fuel, and its total need for fuel oil. 
  [End boxed material] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47053 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94053" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   MFER Instruction Regulating Export Licenses </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    MFER Instruction Regulating Export Licenses </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0394B Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 21 May 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0394B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vadim Bardin: "Order of Issuing Export Licenses </F>
Approved. But Will Quotas Be Preserved?"] 
  [Text] Regulation of export is currently centered 
around manipulations of quotas. Their future fate may turn out 
to be rather varied: Ranging from their significant 
restructuring for the purpose of reduction to their use as 
insurance funds in attracting foreign investments. While 
coordination work goes on in the higher offices, in practical 
activity exporters will be guided by the MFER [Ministry of 
Foreign Economic Relations] instruction on the order of issuing 
export licenses in 1994, which has passed registry in the 
Ministry of Justice and was officially disseminated 
yesterday. 
  Export quotas and licenses--if not twins, are certainly 
blood 
relatives. First, quotas are born within the Ministry of 
Economics. There are four types of these: State quotas, which 
the MFER strives to distribute through its tendering committee; 
enterprise quotas, which the latter receive through the retained 
sectoral departments; regional quotas, which are managed by the 
local administrations; and auction quotas, which the MFER puts 
up for bidding. The most troublesome, naturally, is to obtain 
one quota or another. Then the exporter, who files the 
application in accordance with the MFER instruction, receives a 
license from the ministry's local authorized agencies. Turning 
the quota into a license is in essence a purely technical act. 
However, the ratified instruction, due to the laws of the genre, 
certainly does not make it any easier. The objective basis is to 
tighten the requirements of currency control. Now the MFER 
authorized agency, before issuing a license, must be assured of 
guarantees of returnability of the currency revenues in 
accordance with the joint version of the system of currency 
control developed by the Central Bank and the GTK [RF State 
Tariff Committee] (instruction on the order of implementing 
currency control dated 12 October 1993). And this automatically 
means that the possibilities for dragging out the issuance of 
licenses are expanded. It is true, this favorite game of the 
bureaucrats may become senseless in connection with the rather 
probable significant reduction in the family of quotas. 
  According to many indicators (among them the direct 
announcements of Deputy Prime Minister Aleksandr Shokhin, 
Minister of Foreign Economic Relations Oleg Davydov, acting 
Minister of Finance Sergey Dubinin, and (less importantly) the 
clear desire of the governmental structures to distribute the 
annual volume of export licenses as soon as possible), the 
current system of quota setting and licensing may not even make 
it to the end of the year. A significant elimination of quotas 
in export is expected (it is true, the quotas on oil, diesel 
fuel, aluminum, copper, nickel, and perhaps other nonferrous 
metals will surely remain). In this case, the government admits 
that raw material will continue to remain the basis of Russia's 
exports in the future, and will try to untie the hands of its 
exporters. 
  Russia's exports in January-April of 1994 increased by 
8.7 percent over last year. Moreover, exports of oil (in 
physical volume) increased by 8.5 percent, of oil products 
(primarily diesel fuel)--by 22.5 percent, and of natural gas--by 
14.4 percent. Even in such a traditionally industrial region of 
Russia as Sverdlovsk Oblast the relative share of exports of raw 
materials increased from 57 percent in 1992 to 83.6 percent in 
1993. The machine-building areas export only 3.4 percent of 
their products. 
  The elimination of state quotas raises questions. On one 
hand, the purpose of quotas is to ensure Russia's state 
obligations. State quotas are retained in this, synonymously 
reduced, form: Obligations must be fulfilled, especially since 
the State Duma firmly intends to significantly cut Russia's 
credit limits to foreign countries. On the other hand, the draft 
budget provides for income from state export in the volume of 
$3.3 billion. Where will this money come from if state quotas 
are eliminated? The consent of the Ministry of Finance to remove 
state quotas on exports, and this means also on budget currency 
losses, may mean only one thing: We should expect elimination of 
all tariff and currency benefits to exporters and importers 
(primarily oil and gas producers, which will surely evoke the 
opposition of the RF Ministry of Fuel and Energy). Other 
exporters, however, may evidently hope for a reduction in export 
tariff rates. If benefits disappear, the volume of revenues from 
customs duties may even in this case cover the budget currency 
losses. 


Licenses issued by the MFER in the first quarter of 1994 on basic quota 
goods 

Goods                Quotas for 1994   Issued licenses   Realization of 
                     (million          (million          quotas under 
                     tonnes)           tonnes)           issued licenses 
                                                         (%) 

Oil                  92                52.7              57.2 

Oil products         50                23.1              46.2 

Hydrocarbon raw      0.47              0.14              30 
materials 

Electrical power     35.8              5.6               15.6 
(billion kw-hr) 

Nonferrous metals    1.3               0.42              32.3 

Cellulose            1.35              0.36              26.7 

Fish products        0.92              0.04              4.3 

Lumber (million      26                5.5               21 
cubic meters) 


  [Begin boxed material] 
<H5>  Licenses Not Associated With Russian Export Quotas </H5>
  --Licenses for the export of nuclear materials, 
technologies, 
equipment, sources of radioactive emission and isotopes. Issued 
on the basis of permission from Eksportkontrol. 
  --Licenses for the export of goods containing precious 
stones 
and materials. Granted on the basis of confirmation documents 
from Roskomdragmet [RF Committee on Precious Metals and Precious 
Stones]. 
  --Licenses for the export of certain types of raw goods, 
materials, equipment, and scientific-technical information which 
are used or may be used in developing arms. Issued on the basis 
of permission from Eksportkontrol. 
  --Licenses for the temporary export of goods from Russia for 
processing, as well as under agreements on international 
cooperation. Granted in accordance with the "Customs Code of 
Russia" and the Law "On the Customs Tariff." 
  --Licenses for export of textiles and textile goods to the 
EC. Issued within the limits of quotas on individual categories 
of goods established for Russia by the EC. 
  [End boxed material] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47054 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94054" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Russian Accounting System To Conform to World Standards </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Russian Accounting System To Conform to World Standards </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0394C Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 17 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0394C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> Article by Yevgeniy Timofeyev: "New All-Russian Classifier: </F>
Russia Changing Over to World Accounting Standards"] 
  [Text] The lack of correspondence between the Russian 
statistical and accounting systems and world standards is giving 
rise to many difficulties in mutual relations with Western 
partners. Noncorrelation in the definitions of principle 
concepts is leading to a situation whereby the partners are 
speaking seemingly different languages. Moreover, the existing 
classifiers for the most part no longer meet even intra-Russian 
requirements. The changeover of the Russian accounting system to 
a language which is understood throughout the world has become 
the primary task of the latest development of the Center for 
Economic Market Conditions under the Russian Government and the 
Center for Economic Classifications, the "All-Russian Classifier 
of Types of Economic Activity, Products, and Services" (OKDP). 
Its electronic version (12 Mb) went to the main federal economic 
departments yesterday. 
  [Begin boxed material] 
<H5>  Basic Problems Resolved on the Basis of the All-Russian </H5>
Classifier of Types of Economic Activity, Products, and Services 
  --Organization of "horizontal ties" in the production sphere 
and the sphere of services between producers and consumers of 
products and services. 
  --Provision of strict and precise functioning of the system 
of taxation, investments, and crediting; 
  --Creation of regional and interregional information systems 
of economic management; 
  --Creation of systems for cataloging products; 
  --Creation of a system of state registers of enterprises 
with 
correlation by types of economic activity implemented, products 
produced, or services provided; 
  --Formulation of a system of "electronic marketing" of 
products and services; 
  --Realization of a set of accounting functions within the 
framework of the system of state statistics. 
  [End boxed material] 
  At the present time there are three basic economic 
classifiers in effect in Russia: the OKONKh--the All-Union 
Classifier of Sectors of the National Economy; the OKP--the 
All-Russian Classifier of Industrial and Agricultural Products, 
and the OKSP--the All-Union Classifier of Building Products. 
  The development of a new classifier is the first serious 
result of work within the framework of the State Program for 
Changeover to the System of Accounting and Statistics Accepted 
in World Practice, which was ratified by the Russian parliament 
in 1992. It is noteworthy that the principle adopted for the 
OKDP is not the experience "of a number of countries with 
consideration of Russian specifics" (up to this time the 
consideration of these specifics has, as a rule, not brought 
anything good), but rather the internationally accepted 
classifiers. The organization of the classification groupings of 
the OKDP is based on the International Standard Industrial 
Classification of All Economic Activities and the Central 
Products Classification, which have been ratified by the UN 
Statistical Commission. 
  The operational introduction of a new universal classifier 
will entail an entire series of significant changes. The state 
system of registers of enterprises will be changed, and 
comprehensive data bases will be created based on it. 
Specialists point out that the information gathered in these 
data bases will have very significant commercial value--it will 
make it possible to locate business partners more cheaply and 
accurately. It will also be of considerable importance for 
taxation. For example, the absolute majority of benefits 
provided by Russian tax legislation is associated with the type 
of activity engaged in by the payer of one tax or another. Only 
with the aid of a classifier is it possible to determine 
precisely whether or not the payer is entitled to this benefit. 
  The OKDP is being introduced by Goskomstat [RF State 
Committee on Statistics] into statistical practice as of 1 July 
1994 (Gosstandard [RF State Committee on Standardization, 
Metrology, and Certification] has already sanctioned its 
introduction as of 1 January of this year). It is presumed that 
at first the OKDP will operate in parallel with the classifier 
of industrial and building products. After the development and 
introduction of a second version of the OKDP (proposed date--1 
January 1996), the entire set of current classifiers (except for 
the TN VED [commodity nomenclature list for foreign economic 
activity], which is associated with the OKDP by a conversion 
table) will be repealed. This moment may be called the final 
unification of world and Russian statistical standards. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47055 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94055" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   2 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Caspian Sea Oil Project Coordination Eyed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Caspian Sea Oil Project Coordination Eyed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0409A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 2 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0409A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aydin Mekhtiyev: "Who Will Get First Oil </F>
Rights?--The Smell of Caspian Fuel Is Exciting the World"] 
  [Text] The Russian Federation leadership has informed 
official London that the project to develop Caspian Sea basin 
oil fields and to transport this oil to the European countries 
will not have legal force without preliminary coordination with 
Moscow. Reporting on this sensational development, the British 
publication FINANCIAL TIMES noted that Brian Fall, Great 
Britain's ambassador to Moscow, was handed a letter drafted in 
Smolensk Square. The document emphasizes that the consent of all 
countries having an outlet to the Caspian Sea is required in 
order to begin implementation of the "oil" project. 
  Thus, on the eve of the signing of an agreement between the 
Azerbaijan Government and a consortium of Western companies 
marking the start of the "project of the century," with a total 
cost of $7 billion, Moscow declared it had rights to the richest 
oil fields--Azeri and Chyrag, which the Western countries and 
the United States had acknowledged as belonging exclusively to 
Azerbaijan. Taking into account the reliability of the 
publication that publicized Moscow's demarche on this issue (it 
is well known that the reputation of FINANCIAL TIMES in the West 
is so great that important government decisions are sometimes 
made based on information reported by the newspaper), one may 
draw the conclusion that the struggle between the Russian oil 
giant Lukoil and Western companies to control rights to 
Azerbaijan oil is entering its decisive phase. It is not by 
chance, it is felt, that London was informed of Moscow's 
position on the "oil" question. After all, the British company 
British Petroleum (BP) obtained priority rights from Baku to 
develop the Caspian oil fields, while the British Government 
assured President Geydar Aliyev that it was prepared to be the 
guarantor of fulfillment of BP's obligations as envisaged by the 
contract. From the very beginning of talks with the Azerbaijan 
Government on the question of oil extraction, the Western 
capitals were not euphoric about the "project of the century." 
Experts predicted that Russia, considering itself the legal 
successor to the collapsed USSR, could hardly be expected to 
renounce its rights to the Caspian oil. Perhaps this is not so 
much an economic issue as a purely political one. Over the 
course of seven decades, it has been in Moscow that decisions 
were made as to what volumes of Caspian oil should be produced 
and for what needs it should be utilized. The lion's share of 
the profits from Baku oil settled in the USSR budget, but not 
only did Azerbaijan not derive any benefit whatsoever from this, 
it also received as an inheritance from the former USSR the 
so-called "Karabakh problem." Now the republic, weakened by six 
years of war and with a quarter of its territory under 
occupation by Armenian troops, had gotten an opportunity to 
independently manage Caspian oil. According to preliminary 
estimates, even in the first years of development of the Azeri 
and Chyrag oil fields by the Western consortium, total 
production volume would amount to approximately 30-40 million 
tonnes of oil per year, which would mainly be exported to 
European countries. According to the calculations of Azeri 
specialists, petrodollars would turn the republic into one of 
the richest countries of the former USSR, even before the end of 
the present century. Consequently, the war with Armenia for the 
right to control Nagornyy Karabakh would be concluded in 
Azerbaijan's favor. The prospect of emergence of a Transcaucasus 
country that is independent from Moscow in a financial respect 
evokes serious anxiety, from all appearances, not just in 
Yerevan. Officials in the Russian capital also realize the 
possible consequences of implementation of the "oil" project. 
One possible way of maintaining influence over Azerbaijan 
consists of reestablishing Russia's military presence in this 
Transcaucasian republic. Moscow is insisting on immediate 
introduction of its peacemaking forces into Azerbaijan. However, 
the West is suspicious of the Kremlin's military preparations. 
It is no accident that Russian Minister of Foreign Affairs 
Andrey Kozyrev admitted during the course of a meeting with U.S. 
Senator Sam Nunn: "We are being accused of neoimperialism, the 
assertion being made that a political agreement must first be 
signed, and only afterwards can peacemaking forces be sent to 
Karabakh." 
  Moscow's demand addressed to the West that Russian 
Federation 
consent be obtained for implementation of the "oil" project is 
based on the theory that the status of the Caspian Sea is 
indeterminate. The Azerbaijan Ministry of Foreign Affairs 
considers the Caspian a border lake and believes negotiations 
must be held among all the Caspian countries with respect to 
dividing the Caspian water area into sectors. In this regard, 
Baku rejects Russian attempts to place in doubt the fact that 
the Azeri and Chyrag oil fields belong to Azerbaijan. 
Incidentally, Baku has not received from the Russian leadership 
a copy of the letter sent to the British side. Nonetheless, the 
leadership of the republic Ministry of Foreign Affairs stated to 
Thomas Yang, Great Britain's ambassador to Azerbaijan, that 
attempts to impede the signing of the "oil" contract were 
without foundation, since in November of last year during the 
course of a visit to Baku, Yuriy Shafranik, Russian Federation 
Minister of Fuel and Energy signed a protocol with the 
Azerbaijan Government confirming that Azeri and Chyrag belonged 
to Azerbaijan. 
  Simultaneously with its demand for determination of the 
status of the Caspian on an international level, Moscow 
intensified efforts in another direction as well. The secretary 
general of the International Maritime Organization (IMO) was 
sent a letter containing the oblique demand for diplomatic 
pressure to be exerted on Ankara with the aim of not permitting 
shipping restrictions in the straits of the Bosporus and 
Dardanelles. Moscow accuses Ankara of violating the Montreux 
Convention of 1936. The struggle for the straits is closely 
linked with the project for extraction and transportation of 
Caspian oil discussed above. In restricting movement in the 
straits, Ankara is letting Moscow know that it does not support 
Russian Federation intentions to use the Bosporus and 
Dardanelles in the near future for transporting oil out of 
Central Asia and Azerbaijan to the Mediterranean Sea. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47056 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94056" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Status of Russo-Chinese Trade Relations Analyzed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Status of Russo-Chinese Trade Relations Analyzed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0405A Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 27 May 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0405A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by KOMMERSANT-DAILY columnist Sergey </F>
Tsekhmistrenko: "Chernomyrdin's Visit to China: First 
Priority--Aircraft, Feather Beds Later"] 
  [Text] The days have long since disappeared when 
Moscow and Beijing first swore eternal friendship, then just as 
intently cursed one another as the bayonets of million-strong 
armies bristled on both sides of the Amur and Tian-Shan. Today 
Russia and China call themselves partners. And this is not 
without foundation. Not only have political and economic 
relations become fully reestablished in recent years--these 
relations continue to develop intensively today. Nonetheless, 
quite a number of problems remain. Both sides are therefore 
placing great hopes in the visit to Beijing of Russian Prime 
Minister Viktor Chernomyrdin, which began yesterday. 
  Paradoxical though it may seem at first glance, the greatest 
problems have accumulated precisely in that sphere where a 
qualitative leap has recently been achieved--in trade, the 
volume of which increased 30 percent last year, amounting to 
$7.68 billion. Among Russia's trading partners, China has pushed 
Italy aside and now occupies second place, after the FRG. A 
number of experts have hastened to predict that by 1995, the 
bilateral trade turnover will pass the record level of $10 
billion. However, indices for the first two months of this year 
have poured water on the hopes of the optimists--trade was 
reduced by almost 50 percent as compared with the level for the 
same period of 1993. 
  The reason? As the poet expressed it, "there is one answer 
and it is terribly simple." Bilateral trade has to date been 
extensive in nature and based on two key elements--"shuttles" 
and barter (up to 65 percent of the trade volume). The first of 
these was eliminated by the visa mode of operation introduced at 
the beginning of the year, curtailing what used to be a 
virtually unrestricted flow of goods out of the PRC (as this 
KOMMERSANT-DAILY columnist was told in Blagoveshchensk, 
steamships used to come from the Chinese bank of the Amur loaded 
just about to the top of their smokestacks). While the blow to 
barter, the Chinese believe, was inflicted by Russia's 
introduction of high import duties. But this is just one side of 
the coin. The other side is the low quality of Chinese goods 
offered for exchange. Thus, in 1992 the Chinese managed to 
purchase 26 Su-27 fighters from Russia, paying for them with 
sneakers and feather beds, most of which, a Ministry for Foreign 
Economic Relations employee told the KOMMERSANT-DAILY columnist, 
are today gathering dust in warehouses, unsold because of their 
poor quality. 
  [begin box] 
<H5>  Status of Russian Indebtedness to China </H5>
  Russia's Credit Indebtedness to China 
  --$570 million--settlement-clearing indebtedness for goods 
delivery shortages to China, 1986-1990; 
  --$350 million--credits extended by China in 1990 for the 
purchase of food, raw materials for food production, and 
consumer goods; 
  --$670--credits extended by China in 1991 for the 
above-mentioned purposes; 
  In 1994 Russia must deliver goods to the PRC amounting to 
about $290 million, to pay off 1990 credits and the interest on 
these credits. Settlement-clearing indebtedness for 1986-1990 
will be paid off almost entirely in 1994 through deliveries of 
military equipment and other special property. 
  [end box] 
  During his visit to China, Chernomyrdin must find a way out 
of this situation which is capable of bringing economic ties 
between the two countries to an impasse. The two sides will 
evidently try to reach compromise on the visa mode of 
operation--visas for inhabitants of the border regions will 
either be canceled or replaced by multiple-use visas (true, it 
is up to the Chinese to do something here--they have not yet 
been able to determine their "multiple-exit" citizens). While 
barter may be replaced by mutual accounting operations using 
currency. Chernomyrdin might also convince the Chinese of the 
advantages of expanding military-technical cooperation. Russia 
is counting on the shipment of another consignment of Su-27's, 
Il-76 transport aircraft, and military helicopters. Moscow also 
hopes to sell submarines to Beijing. But rumors regarding the 
sale of an aircraft carrier have turned out to be exaggerated. 
They were refuted on the eve of the visit by Mikhail Belyy, 
director of the First Asia Department of the Russian Ministry of 
Foreign Affairs, in an interview with ITAR-TASS. 
  [begin box] 
<H5>  Most Important Items in Export-Import Transactions Between </H5>
Russia and China 
  Russia exports to China (percentage of total 
exports): 
  --machinery and equipment (30 percent) 
  --ferrous and nonferrous metals (13 percent) 
  --mineral fertilizers and raw chemicals (45 percent) 
  Russia imports from China (percentage of total 
imports): 
  --machinery and equipment (10 percent) 
  --chemical products (4 percent) 
  --raw minerals (7 percent) 
  --industrial and consumer goods (45 percent) 
  Volume of trade in 1993--$7.68 million. Of this 
amount, exports constitute $4.99 million, 
imports--$2.69 million. Russia's positive trade 
balance is $2.3 million. 
  [end box] 
  But Moscow should not be counting on much in the export of 
arms. After all, even during the years when "Russians and 
Chinese were brothers forever," the USSR transferred to the PRC 
about 25,000 packages of documentation enabling the PRC to set 
up their output of tanks, small arms, and other armament. But it 
is precisely these types of armament that essentially constitute 
Russian export items. And with regard to military equipment not 
produced in China, Beijing is asking that it be sold production 
licenses (for those same Su-27's, for example). 
  One other circumstance should not be permitted to disappear 
from view--the fact that Moscow is not (and most likely never 
will be) the leading partner of the PRC. Trade turnover between 
the PRC and United States, for example, has already reached $40 
billion, and Washington's threats to deny Beijing 
most-favored-nation trade status because of its human rights 
violations in Tiananmen will apparently remain only words. Bill 
Clinton does not intend to confirm this status today or 
tomorrow. And Beijing has a real chance to become a member of 
GATT by mid-1995. Production in the most developed Chinese 
regions--the southern regions--is oriented toward the West. In 
this regard, the conclusion drawn by the British publication 
FINANCIAL TIMES--that the PRC views Russia not as a prospective 
equal-rights trading partner, but exclusively as a source of 
inexpensive raw materials and customer for second-rate Chinese 
consumer goods--does not appear all that groundless. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47057 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94057" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   EBRD, Deutsche Bank To Finance Rostov Business Center </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    EBRD, Deutsche Bank To Finance Rostov Business Center </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0405B Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 27 May 94 p 9 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0405B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleksandr Bezmenov: "Rostov Becomes the Business </F>
Center of the North Caucasus"] 
  [Text] The people of Rostov may remember this spring 
by virtue of the introduction of major construction projects 
coming one right after another--first there was the Whole World 
park, a kind of Rostov "Disneyland" (see KOMMERSANT-DAILY, 24 
May), and now--the International Business Center. The initiators 
of the latter project managed to enlist support from large-scale 
investors at the Ceetex International Investments Exposition 
held in London. The European Bank for Reconstruction and 
Development (EBRD), East-European Bank, and Deutsche Bank agreed 
to finance this project--the first international business center 
in the south of Russia. An impressive amount of money was 
required--at least $40 million. Yesterday the Tandem 
Corporation, established for construction of the business center 
in Rostov, started searching for consulting firms in Europe to 
conduct the project marketing. 
  The Tandem financial-industrial corporation was 
established in 1994 in Rostov-on-Don for constructing the 
business center and carrying out foreign economic transactions, 
investing in the production and installation of sewage systems 
and modular pavement surfacing, and delivering and servicing 
public utility and road construction equipment. Tandem was 
founded by the Moscow concern Stroydormash and a number of 
Rostov enterprises: the joint-stock companies Stroydormashservis 
and Rostovsotsbank, the Elektroapparat conversion plant, the 
city administration, and private firms. 
  Tandem general director Igor Gorin informed KOMMERSANT-DAILY 
that the business center in Rostov-on-Don will include office 
space occupying 35 percent of the center area, a top-quality 
hotel (25 percent of the area), conference halls, sports 
facilities, restaurants, and stores. The total area of the 
center is 25,000 square meters. The matter of foreign 
investments was virtually resolved during the course of talks in 
London. Magne Haga, head of the CIS Division of EBRD, assured 
Mr. Gorin that the bank was prepared to assume 70 percent of the 
expenditures. The guarantor of these investments is the Russian 
Government and Rostov City Administration--which is allocating 
the land for construction. The financial director of Deutsche 
Bank, Mr. Lars Saunus, noted that German bankers were interested 
in establishing a business center in Rostov that would improve 
operating conditions for FRG businessmen in the south of Russia, 
the number of whom is quite great. Agreement with the 
East-European Bank was reached prior to the start of the 
exposition. 
  It is highly likely that the list of investors will expand. 
Tandem has enlisted the support of British intermediary 
companies (the London firms J&amp;B Direct Introductions 
International Consultants, Dixon &amp; Company) prepared to begin 
the search for new investors--under the condition, of course, 
that European banks extend guarantees. In such event, the volume 
of construction will have to be expanded since the 
intermediaries seek investors for projects costing not under 
$100 million. 
  The general contractor for the Rostov project will be the 
major German construction company Strabag International GmbH in 
Dortmund. Ireland's Independent Project Management intends to 
erect the hotel for the business center. Successful project 
implementation (the authors of the concept are counting on 
recouping their outlays in five to seven years and on achieving 
profitability on the order of 28 percent) will enable Rostov to 
consolidate its position as the business center of the region. 
  [begin box] Founded in 1796 on the banks of the River Don, 
Rostov has always been a traditional "merchant" city. The city's 
advantageous geographical location contributes toward the active 
development of local commercial structures, mainly in the sphere 
of trade. Through the Taganrog Bay, the Don is connected to the 
Sea of Azov, Black Sea, Aegean Sea, Mediterranean Sea, and Sea 
of Marmara. Freight passes through the Volga-Don Canal from 
Moscow to Rostov and return. In addition, the city is a major 
railroad and motor vehicle transportation center. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47058 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94058" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   St Petersburg Coca-Cola Plant Granted Tax Break </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    St Petersburg Coca-Cola Plant Granted Tax Break </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0401A Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 26 May 94 p 9 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0401A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Konstantin Zbarovskiy, with a commentary by the </F>
Economic Policy Department, under the rubric "The Coca-Cola 
Project Has Been Exempted From Taxes": "Anatoliy Sobchak Has 
Lightened the Tax Load by Way of an Exception"] 
  [Text] A large project of the Coca-Cola St. 
Petersburg Bottlers company (one of the Russian branches of the 
Coca-Cola Nordic and Northern Eurasia company), which called for 
the construction of a production complex in St. Petersburg for 
manufacturing brand-name beverages, was on the brink of failure 
until recently. It was quite likely that it would share the fate 
of a project of another American giant, the Procter and Gamble 
company, which after one year of preparations altogether gave up 
the construction of a plant in the city on the Neva. However, as 
KOMMERSANT learned yesterday, the management of the company 
division in Oslo resolved to embark on construction in St. 
Petersburg as early as in July upon the signing of a directive 
to exempt the Coca-Cola St. Petersburg Bottlers from the payment 
of taxes in 1994 by Anatoliy Sobchak. The new enterprise should 
manufacture the first batch of beverages next year. 
  Coca-Cola St. Petersburg Bottlers announced its 
intention to build a new production complex in the Pulkovo area 
for the first time in February 1993. The total area of the 
parcel comes to 43 hectares. The necessary volume of investment 
is estimated to be $34 million-$35 million. The project is 
advantageous from the social point of view, too: According to 
preliminary estimates, the new plant will provide jobs for more 
than 2,000 people. 
  Since the partner companies that had previously signed 
contracts with the Coca-Cola St. Petersburg Bottlers joint-stock 
company failed to meet their obligations to build the first 
stage of facilities networks, the burden of financing this 
segment of the project has to be shouldered by Coca-Cola in its 
entirety. The amount necessary for this, which came to $23.8 
million, turned out to be greater than the company itself had 
planned. At that point, Coca-Cola approached the economic 
development committee of the mayoralty of St. Petersburg with a 
request to reduce lease payments for land. It is curious that 
this request was accompanied by a quite categorical official 
statement: "The company does not give bribes in any form and 
will persistently seek a resolution of this problem." The 
tenacity of Coca-Cola representatives astounded the mayoralty. 
In the words of Aleksey Kudrin, the chairman of the Committee 
for the Economy and Finance of the mayoralty, the history of 
Coca-Cola representatives knocking on doors in the official 
echelons deserves to be published in the form of a handbook for 
Western businessmen, under the title "How To Work in St. 
Petersburg." 
  So the company will have its way: Anatoliy Sobchak has 
signed 
the directive "On the Construction of Engineering Communications 
in the Area of Pulkovo Highway." In keeping with the directive, 
Coca-Cola St. Petersburg Bottlers shall be exempted from the 
payment of quite a bunch of taxes in 1994. KOMMERSANT considers 
it necessary to give a full listing of these taxes: They are the 
tax on profit, the tax on enterprise property, the land tax and 
lease payments for the parcel of land, the tax on advertisement, 
and the tax for the maintenance of housing, facilities of the 
sociocultural sphere, and law enforcement organs. An agreement 
has also been reached to the effect that the relief will be 
extended, taking into account the payment of the cost of 
construction of the engineering infrastructure. Such a case sets 
a precedent in the practice of work of the St. Petersburg 
mayoralty with foreign companies. According to an ironic 
assertion by Aleksey Kudrin, the pattern of tax exemptions for 
the debtors of the city, for example, the Vodokanal, was used in 
developing it. On the whole, the company has been exempted from 
50 percent of Russian taxes. 
  The tractability of the mayoralty is perhaps due to the 
recent defeat of another large foreign investor, Procter and 
Gamble, in St. Petersburg. At the end of last year, this company 
abandoned altogether the construction of its plant in the city 
(the project was valued at $300 million). Differences between 
the executive and legislative authorities of St. Petersburg were 
one of the reasons for this abandonment. The mayoralty did not 
want to pick a quarrel with Coca-Cola, to boot. In the committee 
for the economy and finance, they believe that tax exemptions 
suit both sides and will be used for cooperation with other 
foreign investors. Therefore, the "tax holiday" for Coca-Cola in 
St. Petersburg is the first case, but by far not the last. 
  [Boxed item] 
<H5>  Commentary </H5>
  The fact that the relief granted is quite radical is 
noteworthy: Coca-Cola may refrain from paying to the local 
authorities the profit tax, at the rate of 22 percent; the tax 
on property, at the rate of 2 percent; the tax for the 
maintenance of housing, at the rate of 1 percent of the cost of 
products; on advertising, at the rate of 5 percent of its cost; 
the tax for the maintenance of the sociocultural sphere and law 
enforcement organs, at the rate of 3 percent of the labor 
remuneration fund; and the tax on land, at the rate of R700 per 
square meter. 
  It is remarkable that such radical steps of the St. 
Petersburg authorities are quite symptomatic of the modern 
economic policy of Russia. In the environment of an obvious 
shortage of actual financial resources, the authorities strive 
to avoid in every way possible the direct allocation of funds, 
especially those in foreign exchange, to enterprises and prefer 
to provide support in the form of granting tax and customs 
relief. This is much more convenient: It is one matter to spend 
the already available money, and it is quite another to spend 
some kind of future revenues, which are frequently very much in 
doubt (given the ineffectiveness of the Russian tax system, most 
of the future taxes ultimately remain on paper). Apparently, in 
the immediate future this tactic will be used extensively to 
attract Western investors who do not dwell in particular on the 
specifics of Russian taxes, in the customary belief that to get 
an exemption from them is the same as getting real money. For 
example, as Aleksandr Shokhin admits, the government intends to 
compensate the Mars concern for investment in Russia by relief 
in the payment of customs duties. 
  Besides, local authorities have an opportunity to enjoy 
additional advantages of such a policy. In particular, in 
exchange for tax relief they can shift to investors some of the 
duties to finance the urban infrastructure, as well as use the 
amount of tax relief or leasing fees as a peculiar contribution 
to the statutory fund of a joint enterprise (The government of 
Moscow has already started to vigorously use this variant). 
  [Signed] The Economic Policy Department. 
  [End of boxed item] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47059 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94059" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Renewed Trade Ties With Cuba Urged </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Renewed Trade Ties With Cuba Urged </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0912B St. Petersburg NEVSKOYE VREMYA in Russian 7 Jun 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0912B </F>
<F P=104>  St. Petersburg NEVSKOYE VREMYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lev Anikin: "Russian Columbuses Needed: The Lost </F>
Island of Foreign Trade"] 
  [Text] Rumor is, there is this unknown country--Cuba. 
This is not at all the namesake republic we knew in the old 
times in the former USSR. In this country, land belongs to those 
who work on it, and doors are open to foreign investors, 
including emigres. Foreign currency is freely accepted here; 
entrepreneurship encouraged. And it goes without saying that in 
business relations they are guided by regular commercial utility 
rather than ideological opinion. 
  True, in the opinion of some stern observers, there is no 
other Cuba. They only pretend on this island of revolution that 
they have commenced fantastic transformations. Life made them do 
it. The disintegration of the socialist camp, the lack of 
friendly subsidies, and the final collapse of the inefficient 
economic system have presented them with the need to establish 
relations with the world community, which wants a partner to 
have a proper image. Cuban leaders have not drawn proper 
conclusions from the events in East Europe, such observers 
believe. In the design of its initiators, portable capitalism 
here should serve only as salvation straw during hard times, and 
then help to resurrect socialism. With all relevant consequences 
for the same gullible investors. 
  Cuban reformers, however, have their own interpretation of 
change. And they want to be understood correctly. They believe 
that what stood in the way until now is an almost complete 
information blockade regarding today's Cuba. "The Soviet Union 
lost Cuba, and Russia has not yet discovered it," said the 
republic's Consul General Felix Leon Carballo at a meeting with 
St. Petersburg journalists. For the third year now, the little 
country is learning how to live under the conditions of the 
harshest economic crisis in its history, having lost overnight 
almost all of its trading partners, 85 percent of whom had been 
allies from the former socialist camp. They have to economize on 
everything. Nevertheless, problems are gradually being resolved. 
Exports--the main source of income--are growing; increasingly 
more companies invest capital in Cuban industry. By the 
beginning of this year, more than 5,000 representative foreign 
companies and 112 joint ventures were operating in the country. 
Twenty-eight of them are busy developing the tourism industry. 
Trips to the exotic island are relatively cheap and are in 
demand. Among investors in a variety of economic sectors are 
countries of West Europe, North and South America, and the 
Caribbean. China is showing an interest in cooperation. All of 
this is not accidental. The Cuban Government provided the 
necessary guarantees for free movement of capital; associations 
have been given the right to distribute property; they are 
exempt from taxes on gross income and only pay 30 percent of the 
net profit. 
  Russia so far is absent in this popular new market, however. 
It also has neglected the old one: Equipment rusts without spare 
parts; unfinished Soviet enterprises under construction turn to 
dust; billions worth of investment in the former Cuban economy 
are going to waste, while additional potential market for idling 
Russian enterprises is being lost. Only late last year were 
several intergovernment agreements signed on trade and 
scientific-technical cooperation. But the axiom "better late 
than never" does not apply here. In economics, late most often 
means never. Competition does not wait. And even these few 
agreements remain on paper. Trips of Russian commercial 
Columbuses do not materialize. The same goes for a tentative 
partnership with the governments of St. Petersburg and oblast. 
No one disagrees that there are good prospects in cooperation 
and mutually profitable exchange in the area of developing 
tourism, the sugar industry, and production of high- quality 
medications for which Cuban specialists have always been famous, 
and other projects--but this is where it ends. 
  One of the possible reasons is the shadows of ideological 
prejudice, which manifest themselves one way or the other in the 
debates on the substance of changes in Cuba. Whatever they are, 
however, commercial and merely vital interests of the people 
have their own logic, which will put everything in its proper 
place. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47060 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94060" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Ministers, Other Officials Appointed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New Ministers, Other Officials Appointed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1470A Almaty VESTNIK KAZAKHSTANA in Russian 15 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1470A </F>
<F P=104>  Almaty VESTNIK KAZAKHSTANA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [KAZTAG report] </F>
  [Text] 
<H5>  Edict of the president of the Republic of Kazakhstan: On the </H5>
Appointment of V.V. Karmakov as Minister of Energy and the Coal 
Industry of the Republic of Kazakhstan 
  Vladimir Vasilyevich Karmakov shall be appointed minister of 
energy and the coal industry of the Republic of Kazakhstan. 
  [Signed] President of the Republic of Kazakhstan N. 
Nazarbayev 
  Almaty, 14 June 1994 
<H5>  Vladimir Vasilyevich Karmakov </H5>
  Born in 1951 in Vladivostok. Russian. Graduated from Odessa 
Higher Naval Engineering School. Mechanical engineer. 
  Began his labor activity after graduation from school as a 
ship mechanic of the Caspian Sea Shipping Line. Subsequently 
worked for more than 15 years in engineering and management 
positions at enterprises of the republic. Was general director 
of the Kustanay commodity-raw material exchange, first deputy 
chief of the Kustanay Oblast administration, and president of 
the Teploset joint-stock company. Since April 1994--first deputy 
minister of energy and fuel resources of the Republic of 
Kazakhstan. 
<H5>  Edict of the president of the Republic of Kazakhstan: On the </H5>
Appointment of N.K. Isingarin as Minister of Transportation and 
Communications of the Republic of Kazakhstan 
  Nigmatzhan Kabatayevich Isingarin shall be appointed 
minister 
of transportation and communications of the Republic of 
Kazakhstan, having been released from the position of minister 
of transportation of the Republic of Kazakhstan. 
  [Signed] President of the Republic of Kazakhstan N. 
Nazarbayev 
  Almaty, 14 June 1994 
<H5>  Edict of the president of the Republic of Kazakhstan: On the </H5>
Appointment of Zh.S. Karibzhanov as Minister of Agriculture of 
the Republic of Kazakhstan 
  Zanybek Salimovich Karibzhanov shall be appointed minister 
of 
agriculture of the Republic of Kazakhstan, having been released 
from his position as deputy prime minister of the Republic of 
Kazakhstan-chairman of the State Committee of the Republic of 
Kazakhstan for State Property. 
  [Signed] President of the Republic of Kazakhstan N. 
Nazarbayev 
  Almaty, 14 June 1994 
<H5>  Edict of the President of the Republic of Kazakhstan: On the </H5>
Appointment of S.Zh. Abishev as Manager of Affairs of the 
Cabinet of Ministers of the Republic of Kazakhstan 
  Syzdik Zhumatayevich Abishev shall be appointed manager of 
affairs of the Cabinet of Ministers of the Republic of 
Kazakhstan, having been released from his position of deputy 
prime minister of the Republic of Kazakhstan-minister of foreign 
economic relations. S.Zh. Abishev shall remain a member of the 
Cabinet of Ministers. 
  [Signed] President of the Republic of Kazakhstan N. 
Nazarbayev 
  Almaty, 14 June 1994 
<H5>  Edict of the President of the Republic of Kazakhstan: On the </H5>
Appointment of K.I. Yesenberlin as Chairman of the State 
Committee of the Republic of Kazakhstan for State Property 
  Kozykorpesh Ilyasovich Yesenberlin shall be appointed 
chairman of the State Committee of the Republic of Kazakhstan 
for State Property. 
  [Signed] President of the Republic of Kazakhstan N. 
Nazarbayev 
  Almaty, 14 June 1994 
<H5>  Kozykorpesh Ilyasovich Yesenberlin </H5>
  Born in 1954 in the city of Almaty. Kazakh. Graduated from 
the Kazakh Polytechnical Institute imeni V.I. Lenin. Candidate 
of technical sciences. 
  Began his labor activity after graduating from the institute 
as an engineer of the Kazakh Polytechnical Institute. Worked as 
a senior scientific associate in charge of the laboratory of 
that same VUZ [higher educational institution], was director of 
the Geosistema scientific production enterprise, vice president, 
and subsequently president of the Alemsistem Corporation. Since 
March 1994 he has been a supernumerary adviser to the prime 
minister of the republic. 
<H5>  CHRONICLE </H5>
  By an edict of the president of the Republic of Kazakhstan 
Kadyr Karkabatovich Baykenov was released from the position of 
minister of energy and fuel resources because of the abolition 
of this ministry. 
  By an edict of the president of the Republic of Kazakhstan 
Igor Valimovich Ulyanov was released from the position of 
minister of communications in connection with the abolition of 
this ministry. 
  In order to ensure independence of the National Bank in 
implementing the monetary-credit policy, by an edict of the 
president of Kazakhstan the chairman of this bank, Daulet 
Khamitovich Sembayev shall be removed from the Cabinet of 
Ministers. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47061 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94061" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Deputy Evaluates Supreme Council Workings </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Deputy Evaluates Supreme Council Workings </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1472A Almaty VESTNIK KAZAKHSTANA in Russian 14 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1472A </F>
<F P=104>  Almaty VESTNIK KAZAKHSTANA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Kazakh Supreme Council Deputy Aleksandr </F>
Garkavets by VESTNIK KAZAKHSTANA special correspondent Nikolay 
Gora; place and date not given; under the rubric "Frank 
Conversation": "Aleksandr Garkavets: Practical Work Showed That 
Dialogue Between Deputy Groups Will Serve Society's 
Consolidation"] 
  [Text] Aleksandr Nikolayevich Garkavets was born in 
1947 in Donetsk Oblast. He graduated from Kharkov University, 
and has worked at Ukrainian newspapers and publishing houses. 
Completed graduate study at the Institute of Oriental Studies of 
the USSR Academy of Sciences in Moscow. Since 1987 he has been 
head of the Russian Language department of the Kazakh Academy of 
Sciences' Linguistics Institute. 
  Doctor of philology, author of 13 books. 
  Elected Supreme Council deputy by state list from 
Kustanay Oblast. Deputy chairman of the parliament's Committee 
on Culture, Press, Mass Media, and Public Associations. 
  Today the parliament member answers our special 
correspondent's questions. 
  [Gora] Well, Aleksandr Nikolayevich, the parliament, like a 
big boat--if one may put it this way--has reached the open sea 
of life. And it is very important for the deputies-oarsmen to 
take their places and work at full capacity. In my view, 
however, the parliamentary boat is moving in a quite leisurely 
way; a lot of time is spent on arguments, discussions, tongue 
lashing. What is your opinion on this subject? 
  [Garkavets] The Greeks called boats of this class--that is, 
with so many oarsmen--catarga; the Turks called them 
galere, and the oarsmen took to the oars not because 
it was their calling; also, to ensure coordinated rowing, the 
methods used on these quite sturdy vessels were, to put it 
mildly, command-administrative. However, if we extend your 
metaphor to picture other branches of authority--as analogous 
big boats--then the parliament is the only surface vessel 
solidly moored to them: All its work, miscalculations, and 
shortcomings are in the public view, while the other seafaring 
vessels are predominantly of an underwater variety and are 
equipped not with oars but nuclear reactors. They are the ones 
pulling our society from one bright future to another--through 
thorns to the stars. And the neighboring flotillas, too, are 
trying to prevent us taking off on an independent voyage. While 
the blame falls on those who are exposed. 
  That is why I think that in these conditions the parliament, 
in keeping with the will of the voters expressed during the 
elections, first and foremost must decide whether we really are 
going where the people want us to go, and whether we are doing 
so the right way. In order to define our strategy we have to 
first of all sort out interparliamentary relations. Therefore, 
some time has been spent on organizational matters. There were 
inevitable arguments and attacks. But it simply does not happen 
otherwise in collectives where everyone is equal. 
  There are already some results of the discussion on the 
strategic issue: "Are we heading in the right direction and are 
we going about it the right way?" In its statement, produced 
after almost a week of debate on this issue, the parliament 
questioned the correctness of the course of socioeconomic and 
legal policy of the government. Now we will hear the government 
program of reforms, in particular, urgent measures for getting 
out of the crisis, into which it has led us in the first place. 
Although for objectivity's sake one has to admit that it could 
be several times worse. 
  [Gora] All deputies have equal rights, but it is no secret 
that they have different potential. This means we can assume 
that in time some or other parliament member will simply be 
unable to carry the heavy load, to meet the high standards. Who 
can determine the effectiveness of a deputy's activities and 
recall him if he cannot handle his job? 
  [Garkavets] Do I handle well, for instance, the "job of a 
professional parliament member?" And what is a "professional 
parliament member" and what is his job description? For many, 
including myself, these are notions that so far have not been 
precisely and clearly defined. We know for certain two things: 
We were elected by the people, and our only duty is to carry out 
the will of the people who elected us by the means set by the 
law. How to carry this out so that the work will be considered 
professional is still to be decided. The main criteria of 
parliamentary professionalism will be most graphically expressed 
in the laws on the Supreme Council and on the status of the 
Supreme Council deputy, and other related legislative acts. Then 
you can put the Supreme Council and its deputies to a real test. 
  [Gora] Deputies of the former parliament stayed close to the 
population, met with voters quite frequently, conducted open 
dialogue, and reported on the work done and on carrying out the 
mandates. Now it appears that professional parliament members 
will not have much time for meetings, unless one counts short 
vacations. Will this not lead to isolation from the voters; will 
a wall of alienation not rise up between deputies and voters? 
  [Garkavets] It is unlikely that the deputies of the current 
parliament will detach themselves from the population. Special 
time is set aside for work in the oblasts (districts). There 
also will be an assistant to the deputy, hired specifically for 
this purpose, working there. Anyway, our people know their way 
to the capital very well--they will not let us drift away. 
  Being an armchair scholar, and having shifted only a few 
years ago from history and theory to the practice of ethnic and 
language policy, lawmaking in this area, as well as public work 
in the area of ethnic revival, in five to seven years I have 
accumulated such intensive contacts that a professional 
politician can only dream of. They will keep me on my toes. 
Especially considering that I, as the chairman on the public 
associations subcommittee, spend many hours every day in 
discussions with leaders of the republic's most active 
associations of citizens of diverse political leanings, ethnic, 
confessional, and other affiliation. 
  [Gora] Factions have been established and are operating in 
the parliament. Can their activities exert perceptible influence 
in lawmakers' activism, the parliament members' quality of work? 
  [Garkavets] I do not yet know about factions, even the 
radical-moderate faction of the National Congress of Kazakhstan, 
to which I belong as a member of party's political executive 
committee, but some deputy groups, which formed as we went, have 
already clearly made themselves count. For instance, the 
Progress group, which prepared the draft of the parliament's 
statement of no-confidence in the government's course of 
socioeconomic and legal policy. The work showed that the 
dialogue between deputy formations will be businesslike and 
constructive, and will serve society's consolidation instead of 
splitting it. Although in the conditions of economic 
stratification there are more then enough preconditions for a 
schism both in society and in parliament, first and foremost on 
a class basis. What will ensure calm in the parliament and a 
semblance of peace in the country, however, is not potential 
attempts to cajole deputies, practiced in exploiter states. Only 
concern for unprotected population strata, consistent 
implementation of the principle of pay according to labor, and 
priority support for goods producers--and in ethnic policy, the 
principle of equality--will preserve peace in Kazakhstan and the 
working zeal in parliament. 
  [Gora] Lawmaking undoubtedly will require of parliament 
members daily strain, exhausting labor, and great intellectual 
and emotional efforts. In my opinion, an important part is the 
skill to conduct discussion in such a way as to prevent unneeded 
waves of emotions from arising. I do not want to hurt the 
feelings of any of your colleagues, but observations show that 
not everyone possesses the skills to conduct dialogue calmly. 
How do you raise the level of deputies' political culture? 
  [Garkavets] Joint involved work--humanity has not invented a 
better teacher of ethics. Working together in committees, 
commissions, working groups, and plenary sessions, we will 
gradually, as they say, adjust. One cannot do without emotions, 
however. We are defining the principles of a state system, 
organization of production relations, participation in socially 
significant labor, and distribution of the aggregate product. 
This is not at all a semantic dissection of phrases comprising 
the law. 
  [Gora] You were at the beginnings of the Ukrainian national 
center. I assume you still hold its concerns close to heart. 
What has it achieved, and what tasks is the center facing? 
  [Garkavets] The main task today is the publication of 
Kazakhstan's republic-wide newspaper UKRAYINSKIY NOVYNY, which 
was founded by the Cabinet of Ministers of the Republic of 
Kazakhstan; the publisher is the republic publishing house 
Deuir. More than 150 Ukrainian newspapers and magazines are 
published outside Ukraine, where about 11 million Ukrainians 
live; there are also about 70 institutes, departments, and 
chairs. All of them, however, exist mainly on public money. Even 
to organize a chair of Ukrainian studies in Harvard University, 
which now has an independent Institute of Ukrainian Studies, 25 
years ago the Ukrainian diaspora had to collect $2 million. Our 
newspaper, however, was from the very beginning financed by the 
state--the first state Ukrainian newspaper outside Ukraine. For 
Kazakhstan's Ukrainians, for Ukrainians all over the world, it 
is testimony to the true internationalism of the Kazakh people, 
who are building together with us, citizens of other 
nationalities, a sovereign democratic state. With great pleasure 
I serve as the newspaper's volunteer editor in chief. 
  [Gora] And now a little about yourself. How do you spend 
whatever little free time you have, when you manage to find it? 
  [Garkavets] I am continuing my work on a collection of 
folklore of Urum (Kypchak-language) Greeks in the Azov region, 
in four volumes--about 2,500 pages. There are about 400 pages 
left to go. I have been collecting material for more than 20 
years in the Mariupol area, and now I can finally publish these 
texts together with the original 18th-19th century manuscripts. 
Then it will be time to publish a unique dictionary of this 
language. Also, I help my friends in forming art publications. I 
make computer-generated layouts for them. For instance, Sultan 
Orazelinov's photo album "Abai Eli" ("In the Abakh Land") will 
be published soon--it will be printed in the Czech Republic. In 
a month or two an American weekly newspaper about unusual and 
amazing events in the world--WEEKLY WORLD NEWS--will begin 
publication in Russian; it will also be printed in the Czech 
Republic. Initially it will be published twice a month. This is 
also my hobby. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47062 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94062" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Legal Reform Committee Session Evaluated </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Legal Reform Committee Session Evaluated </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1471A Almaty VESTNIK KAZAKHSTANA in Russian 15 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1471A </F>
<F P=104>  Almaty VESTNIK KAZAKHSTANA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["Own Information": "Not Just a Technical Question"] </F>
  [Text] At the regular meeting of the Committee of the 
Supreme Council on Legal Reform, Legality, and Law and Order, 
led by Murat Kalmatayev, one question was raised: approval of 
cadres for the oblast arbitration courts. Out of a habit that as 
become ingrained in past years, it could have been regarded as 
purely technical. In any case, in the High Arbitration Court, 
which prepared the corresponding documentation, they probably 
did not think so: More than 30 judges from practically all 
oblasts of Kazakhstan were invited to the committee meeting. 
  The deputies, to put it mildly, were perplexed by this 
approach. During the preliminary exchange of opinions it was 
noted that attempts on the part of certain officials to turn the 
Supreme Council into a voting machine had to be nipped in the 
bud. If a campaign-like approach were taken to resolving any 
problems, large blunders and serious mistakes were inevitable. 
In this case the committee intended to discuss in detail not 
only the candidates proposed by the High Arbitration Court but 
also the problems of the arbitration courts as a whole. And, as 
everyone knows, they have quite a few. It is no wonder that 
reproaches against these organs have been heard in all corners 
of the republic. 
  But more than 30 people were waiting in the corridors for 
their turn to get into the meeting. Taking into account this 
circumstance and also the personal request of the chairman of 
the High Arbitration Court, Ivan Teterkin, the committee agreed 
to consider each candidacy, although it immediately became clear 
that even the documents for approval had been prepared hastily 
and rather carelessly. One would not want to continue the chain 
of logic to the evaluation of the final results of the work of 
the arbitration courts, but anyway... 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47063 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94063" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Economic Reform Committee Session Outlined </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Economic Reform Committee Session Outlined </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1471B Almaty VESTNIK KAZAKHSTANA in Russian 15 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1471B </F>
<F P=104>  Almaty VESTNIK KAZAKHSTANA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Draft Returned for Further Work"] </F>
  [Text] At the meeting of the Committee of the Supreme 
Council for Economic Reform chaired by Orazala Sabdenov there 
was discussion of the draft Law "On Entrepreneurship in the 
Republic of Kazakhstan," submitted by the Cabinet of Ministers. 
  The deputies noted that the draft that was submitted is a 
codified act. Consequently, it must bring together all existing 
normative acts and have the logical structure of a whole 
concept, stability of legal norms reinforced in it, system, and 
coordination. From these positions it was noted that the need 
for the development of a codified act was not sufficiently 
substantiated and its conceptual basis was not sufficiently 
developed. 
  The draft takes into account the position of only two 
laws--"On Protection and Support of Private Entrepreneurship" 
and "On Freedom of Economic Activity and the Development of 
Entrepreneurship." 
  It does not take into account the provisions of other laws 
regulating entrepreneurial activity, antimonopoly legislation, 
or the Law "On Bankruptcy." Thus the draft generates additional 
contradictions in legislation. 
  The peculiarities of various types of entrepreneurial 
activity (banking, insurance) are not taken into account. The 
opinion was expressed that it is necessary to get away from 
codification and adopt a number of individual laws--on 
licensing, on trade secrets--and to make changes in existing 
laws. 
  Taking into account the results of the discussion and the 
serious remarks regarding the draft Law "On Entrepreneurship in 
the Republic of Kazakhstan," it was decided to return it for 
further work. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47064 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94064" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   13 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Supreme Council Autumn Agenda Anticipated </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Supreme Council Autumn Agenda Anticipated </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1471C Almaty ABV in Russian 13 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1471C </F>
<F P=104>  Almaty ABV </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vadim Nekrasov under the rubric "In the </F>
Corridors of Power": "What Does Autumn Mean for a Deputy? Autumn 
Means New Laws"] 
  [Text] The Supreme Council of Kazakhstan has 
developed a plan for parliament's work on draft laws until the 
end of 1994. The deputies are to approve this document in the 
next few days. 
  Judging from everything, this autumn in parliament will 
bring 
a rich crop of laws on economics. 
  In August the president of the republic will submit to the 
Supreme Council the drafts "On Procedure for Registration of 
Economic Entities" and "On Fundamentals of Economic Activity." 
The latter document could be called long-suffering since it was 
developed and critically discussed by the deputies last year. 
And now, almost a year later, a reworked version will be 
presented to the members of parliament. In the meantime in 
foreign trade the "belle of the ball" has been the executive 
power, and, as a study of the former Control Chamber shows, far 
from always successfully. The law on concessions has been 
abolished, the law on foreign investments (almost four years 
old) looks like an empty declaration, the free economic zones 
have amounted to nothing--on the whole, one of the most 
important spheres of our economy has been forced to rely on the 
norm setting of the Cabinet of Ministers. 
  In September the government will offer to the members of 
parliament a new redaction of the Law "On Destatization and 
Privatization" and a completely new draft of "On Protection of 
Rights of Stockholders." The Committee on Agrarian Questions and 
Food will by that same date prepare a draft Law "On Selection," 
and the Committee on Ecology and the Utilization of Nature--a 
draft Law "On the State Nature Preserve Fond and Especially 
Protected Natural Territories in Kazakhstan." 
  In September businessmen will probably be bitter about the 
abolition of two laws: "On Protection and Support for Private 
Entrepreneurship" and "On Freedom of Economic Activity and the 
Development of Entrepreneurship in the Kazakh SSR." Instead of 
these the deputies might adopt the codified Law "On 
Entrepreneurship," the draft of which ABV commented on in detail 
last week. The main thing is that there not be a long hiatus 
between the "elimination" of certain business laws and the 
generation of others; otherwise there will inevitably be a legal 
vacuum like the one now seen in the sphere of financial and 
economic activity. 
  October will be decisive for our financial legislation. The 
Cabinet of Ministers is preparing for this time new redactions 
of the Laws "On the National Bank of the Republic of Kazakhstan" 
and "On Banks in the Republic of Kazakhstan." It seems that 
quite recently there were heated discussions in the House of 
Parliament concerning these laws, but a year has past, the tenge 
has burst into our life--and relatively "fresh" legislative acts 
have to be rewritten. 
  One must assume that by October a certain amount of 
information will have been accumulated by the new members of the 
Control Chamber, who intend to deal precisely with banking 
structures first of all. 
  In November most of the attention of the deputies will be 
devoted to questions of reinforcing legality--drafts of the 
republic's Civil, Criminal, Criminal Procedure, and 
Administrative Codes. At that same time members of parliament 
will have to discuss the changes and additions to the 
Constitution proposed by the president. Discussion of the draft 
Law "On Political Rehabilitation of Participants in the Events 
of December 1986" is scheduled for 20 November. 
  The Fourth Estate will probably receive in that same month 
the Law "On Television and Radio Broadcasting," the 
highbrows--the Law "On Scientific-Intellectual Property," and 
people who are somewhat stronger physically--the Law "On 
Physical Culture and Sports." 
  The deputies have left December fairly open so far: There is 
the Civil Procedure Code, the draft Laws "On the Procuracy" and 
"On Grain," the draft of the new republic Housing Code, and also 
a number of economic resolutions. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47065 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94065" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   13 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commentary Views Plan To Transfer Capital </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Commentary Views Plan To Transfer Capital </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1473A Almaty ABV in Russian 13 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1473A </F>
<F P=104>  Almaty ABV </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Are We Going, Friends, to the Virgin </F>
Lands? The Question of Moving the Republic Capital to Akmola 
(the Former Virgin Lands Capital) Is Brought to the Level of the 
Supreme Legislative Body"] 
  [Text] It was Nursultan Nazarbayev who last Thursday asked 
people's deputies to make this decision. His main argument: "It 
is much more convenient to run the republic from the center 
rather than from the southern outskirts." The president pointed 
to the overpopulation of Almaty and the adverse ecological 
situation. It is true that the current capital already has one 
and a half times more inhabitants than it is designed to 
accommodate, plus tens of thousands of visitors daily, including 
from the far and near abroad. Considerable areas of agricultural 
land that previously fed the city already have been allocated 
for Almaty's development. 
  As to the environment, over the past year the oxygen content 
in the capital's atmosphere has decreased by 2 percent. 
According to specialists' calculations, Almaty needs an 
additional 1 million trees to maintain optimum air quality, but 
the number, unfortunately, continues to decline. The capital's 
"lungs" are sick, negatively affecting the condition of even 
healthy people. There is also growing concern about potential 
destructive earthquakes, since the formation of the relatively 
young Alatau mountains continues. All this is true, but let us 
return to the key point--the need to relocate the republic 
leadership headquarters from the southern outskirts closer to 
the center. One can discern not only administrative-economic 
aspects in this, but also serious political ones. 
  Moving a capital had been and continues to be part of world 
practice. Recall how Lenin moved his headquarters from 
Petrograd's Smolnyy to the Moscow Kremlin. In the united Germany 
the capital is now returning to Berlin. But in our case the 
analogy is hardly appropriate, since Akmola at this point is no 
more than an oblast center. True, this was the potential 
intention of the great liberalizer Nikita Khrushchev. He was not 
able to see it through, however. 
  Now at the new stage of Kazakh history, in the conditions of 
national sovereignty, the question of moving the capital to 
Akmola is being brought again into the realm of practical 
decisions. At this point it is hard to predict what the position 
of the people's deputies will be, and whether they will support 
the president's proposal or will try to find a compromise 
solution. 
  We, on the other hand, would like to recall that ABV 
("Akmola 
Is More Dear to Us Than Berlin to the Germans," No. 43, 2 
November 1993) has already discussed the issue of moving the 
capital of Kazakhstan. And emphasized at the time that this very 
costly undertaking will cost our taxpayers $10 billion at 
minimum. If we compare these figures with the revenue part of 
the republic's budget last year, our compatriots will have to 
work hard for at least five years just to pay to move the 
capital to Akmola. But in addition to financial problems a whole 
set of other issues arises, which cannot be left out, either. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47066 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94066" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   13 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commentator Ponders Government Actions </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Commentator Ponders Government Actions </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1473B Almaty ABV in Russian 13 Jun 94 pp 1, 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1473B </F>
<F P=104>  Almaty ABV </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Sergey Volkov: "June `Weather': From the Cabinet </F>
of Ministers to Zhayrem--Fog Everywhere"] 
  [Text] Looking at the past week one would be hard 
pressed to decide which was "The Event." Everything seems to 
point in the direction of the country's president speech in the 
Supreme Council being the "No. 1 news item" not only of the past 
seven days but of all of June. However, Nursultan Nazarbayev's 
speech in the parliament is only the tip of the iceberg called 
the economic life of Kazakhstan. 
  A number of events, which also happened lately, point in 
this 
direction. While the head of the state was unfolding before the 
deputies a broad picture of the republic's coming 
market-democratic prosperity, Deputy Prime Minister Akezhan 
Kazhegeldin consulted on the subject of the much-suffering 
anticrisis program with a group of economic managers and 
businessmen especially close to the government and formalized as 
the Union of Industrialists and the Congress of Entrepreneurs of 
Kazakhstan. True, neither side heard anything special at this 
conference. But the intensity of consultations on this issue, so 
characteristic of late, suggests that the Cabinet of Ministers, 
if not in June then at the beginning of July, will finally be 
able to say something concrete on the subject of its program. It 
remains to be seen, though, whether an agreement on it will be 
reached in the parliament and among economic managers. 
  During this time the government also managed to set up a 
commission on operational production and financial matters 
headed by Mssrs. Zhabagin, Urkumbayev, and Makiyevskiy. Its 
tasks, as indicated by the name, practically fully coincide with 
those guiding the similar Russian commission headed by Oleg 
Soskovets, who is well known in our republic. Whether he was the 
one to suggest the idea of such a structure to our authorities, 
or they came to it on their own, is no longer important. The 
interesting part in this case is that having handed to the 
"operational commission" (which has practically unlimited 
powers) the reins of decisions on urgent questions of economic 
life of the country, the government once again tried to keep a 
good face while playing not so nice a game. That is, no matter 
what the president may say about his designs, the current 
Cabinet of Ministers team will persist in looking for a solution 
to the global issues of economic reform in overcoming momentary 
problems and mini-problems, in the sacred belief that this is 
what strategy of state administration really is. 
  Meanwhile, unpleasant incidents are occurring one after 
another in the "hope and pride" of the head of state's market 
transformations--privatization. One day it comes out that State 
Privatization Fund Chairman Mr. Baishev, together with Mr. 
Orynbasarov, director of the Goskomimushchestvo [State Committee 
for the Administration of State Property] Information and 
Records Center, permitted a transfer of coupons of some 
investment funds to the accounts of other funds. And the 
bureaucrats, caught redhanded, had no choice but to correct the 
"mistake," along with a disciplinary thrashing. 
  Or suddenly employees of the Zhayremskiy Mining and 
Enrichment Combine (GOK) learn to their surprise that their 
enterprise, already converted to joint-stock ownership (and 
also, as an entity of strategic importance for the republic, due 
to be privatized through a custom-designed arrangement), had 
been for all practical purposes sold at the second coupon 
auction as a simple and very small plant of local significance. 
To all the puzzled questions of the producers of polymetal and 
iron-manganese ore, Goskomimushchestvo responds with a solid 
wall of silence. As for Kazpotrebsoyuz [Kazakh Consumers Union], 
which became the owner (it was its five funds that very 
fortuitously and "accidentally" purchased 46 percent of GOK's 
shares), it is now trying to prove the unprovable, namely, that 
there was not, and is not, any collusion (bureaucratic and 
commercial) in this respect. When one learns, however, that 
precise lists of enterprises going to be offered at coupon 
auctions are given to investment funds only one hour before the 
auction opens, one unwittingly starts wondering about the 
vicissitudes of behind-the-scenes games in the current 
privatization. Especially considering that the example of the 
active "creativity" of Mssrs. Baishev and Orynbasarov is still 
fresh on one's mind. The most interesting part, however, is that 
an enterprise, which by all laws and state programs is not 
subject to privatization for at least the next couple of years, 
belongs (or, to be more precise, belonged) to the state holding 
company Ak-Sunkar and, correspondingly, to the republic's 
Ministry of Industry. Now, having lost its potentially mighty 
piece, the ministry's brass only shrug their shoulders and 
express extreme unhappiness with the events. Naturally, one 
could go on fantasizing on this subject, keeping in mind that 
the former head of Zhayremskiy GOK, who left it not in the 
nicest way, became the deputy chairman of Goskomimushchestvo. 
But let other organs do this. Let us rather think: How can it 
happen that one organization (Kazpotrebsoyuz) could have five 
(!) investment funds at the same time, which theoretically 
allows it to buy today any enterprise put up at auction as part 
of mass privatization. Why then, one wants to ask, did we 
introduce restrictions on the number of shares of economic 
entities that can be purchased by one investment fund? In short, 
there obviously is something to look at both for the Antitrust 
Committee and other oversight bodies in the republic. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47067 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94067" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   13 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Terms of EBRD Agreement Outlined </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Terms of EBRD Agreement Outlined </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1477A Almaty ABV in Russian 13 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1477A </F>
<F P=104>  Almaty ABV </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lev Grebnev, under the rubric "State Support for </F>
Entrepreneurs": "European Bank Demands Serious Guarantees"] 
  [Text] As is known, more than 50 private companies in 
Kazakhstan will receive this year loans totaling 100 million ECU 
(about $112 million) for production business development. Their 
generous sponsor is the European Bank for Reconstruction and 
Development (EBRD). The names of these companies and description 
of investment projects so far have not been made public, despite 
the promises of high-ranking government officials to observe 
complete openness in this matter. The guarantee agreement on 
loans, on the other hand, which was signed at the end of last 
year, is not a secret: Its text was submitted by the government 
for ratification to the Supreme Council. 
  The guarantee agreement is written in terse and tough 
language; it is a supplement of sorts to the 
main--loan--agreement, intended to dot all of the "i's." 
  According to this document, Kazakhstan "unconditionally 
guarantees as the principal borrower rather than as a guarantor, 
the payment in proper and timely manner of any and all monies 
due by the credit agreement, both on the indicated repayment 
date and before it...." 
  The bank has the right to request, and the republic is 
obligated to supply, various financial and economic information, 
including data on the balance of payments, Kazakhstan's foreign 
debt, draft decisions affecting the banking sphere, the 
mechanism of bankruptcy, and taxation. In other words, the 
creditor wishes to protect the project from possible surprises 
and demands that a prior concurrence be obtained with respect to 
principal reformist steps on the part of the Cabinet of 
Ministers and the parliament. 
  The most delicate point in preparation of such documents is 
the issue of collateral that guarantees the repayment of the 
loan. Russia, for instance, when agreeing last year to print 
"new" rubles for us, set a condition to put up a part of the 
republic's gold and foreign currency reserves as collateral for 
repayment of this "technical credit." Some agreements entered by 
international banks use the principle of "negative collateral": 
If you do not repay the loan on time or do not make timely 
payments, the creditor has a right to freeze your foreign 
currency assets in other countries. 
  In the case of Kazakhstan, a compromise was found, verbatim 
wording of which would take nearly a quarter of a newspaper 
page. Kazakhstan undertakes an obligation to grant the EBRD loan 
a priority in allocation, use, and distribution of foreign 
currency holdings. Should an unforeseen situation arise where 
the republic would find itself owing several creditors at once 
and short on foreign currency reserves, Kazakhstan is "quickly 
and without cost to the bank to back up the loan principal, 
interest, and other loan-related fees by an equivalent right of 
withholding with respect to OTHER PUBLIC ASSETS satisfactory to 
the bank." 
  "Other assets" mean the property of the "guarantor" or of 
subjects owned by it, including gold and other foreign currency 
assets. Thus, one way or the other, the bank will have to be 
paid on time. 
  In addition, Kazakhstan is responsible for paying any 
professional, banking, transfer, or foreign currency commission 
fees and expenditures incurred in preparation of this agreement 
and accompanying documents. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47068 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94068" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   11 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ministry Responds to Pension Fund Concerns </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ministry Responds to Pension Fund Concerns </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1478A Almaty KAZAKHSTANSKAYA PRAVDA in Russian 11 Jun 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1478A </F>
<F P=104>  Almaty KAZAKHSTANSKAYA PRAVDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by unidentified correspondent: "After the </F>
KAZAKHSTANSKAYA PRAVDA Statement--'Pensioners Are in a 
Panic...'"] 
  [Text] The Kazakh Ministry of Finance examined the article 
"Pensioners Are in a Panic. The Government Is Silent," and it 
reported the following to the editorial staff. 
  In accordance with the "Temporary Procedure for the Receipt 
and Expenditure of Resources for State Social Insurance in the 
Pension Fund of the Kazakh Republic Through the Republic's 
Budget," which was approved by the Finance Ministry on 1 April 
1994, resources for paying pensions and benefits to the 
unemployed population are being allocated from the republic's 
budget. According to item No. 3 of the presidential Edict No. 
1529 on the republic budget for 1994, dated 27 January 1994, the 
Finance Ministry will execute financial measures associated with 
the implementation of functions, particularly the Pension Fund, 
as resources are received for them, but not more than the 
maximum scale of expenditures established by this edict. 
  From the time of the inclusion of the Pension Fund in the 
republic's budget system, that is, from 1 April to 1 June of 
this year, receipts amounted to 936.7 million tenge. In 
addition, credits were allocated three times from the republic's 
budget to the Ministry of Social Protection of the Population 
for the payment of pensions in May in the sum of 778 million 
tenge. 
  Considering the acuteness of the question, the Finance 
Ministry on 8 June additionally formed yet another credit from 
the republic's budget for the payment of pensions in the sum of 
200 million tenge, which already exceeds the budgetary receipt 
of insurance premiums by 41.3 million tenge. 
  "The Temporary Procedure for the Receipt and Expenditure of 
Resources...in the Pension Fund..." in effect at the present 
time is really cumbersome, but it is necessary to consider that 
this procedure is temporary and was adopted for the period of 
formation and transfer of files of premium payers from the 
Pension Funds to the tax inspectorates. As a consequence, it is 
proposed to simplify it to a maximum and to use the insurance 
premiums collected at the oblast level, but only the premiums 
remaining after the payment of pensions will be subject to 
redistribution. 
  However, to shift at the present time to such a procedure 
means to leave citizens without pensions who live in the oblast 
and who for objective reasons--a reduction and halt in 
production--cannot ensure the collection of insurance premiums. 
  To explain the "confusion" with the payment of pensions 
simply with the transfer of Pension Fund resources to the 
republic's budget system, which follows from the article that is 
being reviewed, would be very simple, and it can be eliminated 
easily. The reasons lie deeper, they are in the general economic 
crisis that has stricken our economy. Therefore, the situation 
would have developed the same way regardless of who at the 
present time would engage in the collection of insurance 
premiums--the structures of the Pension Fund or the tax 
inspectorates. 
  To hope that the structures of the Pension Fund could make 
it 
incumbent upon enterprises to transfer premiums is at the very 
least naive, since this is not within the power even of the tax 
inspection organs. 
  The Wage Fund, according to data of the Goskomstat [State 
Committee for Statistics], totaled 4.101 billion tenge just for 
April of this year. If it is taken into account that in May the 
Wage Fund would have remained on the same level, although it was 
really increasing, than the calculated size of payments for 
April and May should be not less than 2.200 billion tenge. 
Actually, not more than 43 percent of this sum was received on 1 
June. 
  Pensioners are not to blame for the difficulties that the 
economy is experiencing at the present time. Undoubtedly they 
are first to need material and social assistance. But, it should 
not be thought that heartless bureaucrats are sitting in the 
Finance Ministry and the government. Specific measures are being 
employed in paying pensions, given the first real, most of all 
financial, opportunity. 
  The situation is being monitored, and, as soon as 
circumstances permit, the "Temporary Procedure..." that has 
aroused so much censure, including in the press, will be 
simplified to the maximum so that the path that insurance 
premiums take from enterprises to direct pension payments is 
shortened. 
  In any case, the special purpose of the insurance premiums 
that are transferred to the Pension Fund is not violated in any 
way, even when the latter is in the republic budget system, and 
the burden of the of republic's budget expenditures is not 
shifted to the pensioners. 
<H8>  * * * </H8>
  KAZAKSTANSKAYA PRAVDA was also informed that the newspaper 
gave an incorrect interpretation of the explanation of the text 
of the Cabinet of Ministers Decree on making changes to Decree 
No. 34 of the Kazakh Cabinet of Ministers of 6 January 1994, 
which was given by the manager of the department of finance, 
labor, and social protection of the population. As G.V. Guseva 
explained, according to the decree, the delivery of pensions and 
benefits is conducted through organs of the Ministry of Social 
Protection of the Population by enterprises of the Ministry of 
Communications and establishments of the People's Bank, which 
conforms to Article 81 of the law on pension support of citizens 
in the Kazakh SSR. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47069 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94069" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   13 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Deputies Address Labor, Wage Issues </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Deputies Address Labor, Wage Issues </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1478B Almaty ABV in Russian 13 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1478B </F>
<F P=104>  Almaty ABV </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vadim Nekrasov: "'Trade Unions of Kazakhstan' </F>
Insist on an Increase in the Minimum Wage and Indexation of 
Citizens' Savings"] 
  [Text] Forty-three people's deputies signed an appeal 
of the "Trade Unions of Kazakhstan" faction, demanding a change 
in the schedule of the work session and, as a first order of 
business, an examination of questions that have disturbed the 
population for a long time. 
  The session agenda proposes to raise the question "On the 
Minimum Consumer Budget." The law by the same name that was 
adopted as far back as June 1991, in fact, did not go into 
effect, and it was "frozen" in March of this year by a 
presidential edict until better times--1 April 1997. 
  Meanwhile, the size of minimum wages and pensions (100 
tenge) 
and allotments have not even reached one-twentieth of the actual 
minimum, which, as is stated in the appeal, "causes only the 
amazement and displeasure of the people." 
  The parliamentarians are demanding the approval of "a 
thoroughly reasoned consumer budget," starting from which it 
would be possible to establish an even more objective scale of 
income from which the "poverty line" is calculated. It is also 
proposed to increase the frequency of wage payments and, as in 
the West, to issue them on a weekly basis. If, in addition, 
earnings could also be indexed, at least on a half scale of the 
real level of inflation... And, even if the present scanty wage 
of the majority of the Kazakhstan people is issued twice a day, 
it would not make things easier. 
  But the trade union representatives in the deputy corps are 
exactly implying such an indexation, insisting on a discussion 
of the question on the implementation of the Law on indexation 
of the monetary incomes of the population, taking into account 
the increase in prices for consumer goods and services." It is 
obviously clear that this law also is strictly "paper." 
  Another sore problem that could turn up at the session, 
among 
the most immediate concerns, is the indexation of citizens' 
savings in the savings bank. It will be recalled that the 
dissolved Russian parliament courageously attempted to resolve 
it, but it did not succeed. The juridical reasoning of the 
supporters of indexation will unlikely raise any doubts: Really, 
people turned money into the savings bank, also under the 
guarantee of the state, and this state depreciated their 
deposits by immediately freeing prices. The only problem is how 
to return to the population what was lost and at the same time 
not to provoke a new relentless increase in prices, which there 
and then will "eat up" the entire sum of compensation. 
  The trade unions have their own ideas on this score: As is 
stated in the appeal, they proposed a noninflationary mechanism 
of indexation to the government. 
  In any case, the subject deserves to be discussed, and it 
should not be rejected right off, after accusing the initiators 
of populism. In December of last year, with the approval of the 
draft Law on the internal state debt of the republic, the former 
deputy corps was at the point of taking revenge by insisting on 
a form of wording that credits received by the government at the 
expense of the depreciated citizens' deposits could become 
republic debt obligations. However, a reaction to this by the 
president followed: The law was vetoed. 
  The interest rate on deposits in today's People's Bank 
remains scanty: It does not even reach 200 percent per year, 
while the level of inflation, according to the estimates of 
experts, will be 10 times higher this year. 
  Should it be a surprise that an absolute majority of 
Kazakhstan people [two lines illegible] a little more than 20 
tenge? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47070 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94070" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   4 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Railways Department Director Views Passenger Service </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Railways Department Director Views Passenger Service </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Performance 

<F P=102>   944E0898A Moscow GUDOK in Russian 4 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0898A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow GUDOK </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview of Yu. Panov, deputy minister of transportation </F>
and director of the Department of Railways of the Republic of 
Kazakhstan, by T. Shirshova, time and place not given] 
  [Text] Last summer was a hard one for Kazakhstan 
railroad workers. Crowds of passengers literally assaulted first 
the cashiers offices--standing in line overnight--and then the 
cars, where double booking was not unusual. And this was not 
just at the two terminals in the capital, but also at the 
terminals of the republic's oblast centers. 
  What awaits us today? This is the subject of our 
reporter's conversation with Yu. Panov, deputy minister of 
transportation and director of the Department of Railways of the 
Republic of Kazakhstan. 
  [Shirshova] Yuriy Vladimirovich, won't the latest increase 
in 
the price of train tickets cause passengers to abandon railroad 
transportation? 
  [Panov] Let's compare: to fly from Alma-Ata [Almaty] to 
Moscow a passenger has to put out 2,000 tenge (120,000 rubles 
[R]), while passage in a railroad car with compartments will 
cost one-tenth as much. Motor vehicle workers are completely out 
of the competition: the vehicle fleet has one foot in the grave, 
as they say, and they are not receiving any replacements. 
Furthermore there is the fuel problem, and the cost of motor 
vehicle travel is not much different from air travel. So 
railroad workers will again have to bear the main burden of 
conveying passengers on both short and long trips. 
  Suburban trains have begun to be organized very actively 
recently, especially on the Virgin Lands Railroad. Whereas 
people there used to make their trips by bus, now they are 
trying to get onto the train. So just like last year, railroad 
workers will be forced to put in use cars which sometimes do not 
even meet the requirements of esthetics--so long as safe travel 
is ensured. People are asking us, "We don't care if it's a steam 
engine, just get us there." The suburban, or more accurately 
interoblast, trains are already running overloaded. And 
passengers understand that it is difficult for the railroad 
workers to ensure comfortable travel. 
  [Shirshova] All the same, I hope that things will not come 
to 
steam travel? 
  [Panov] There are 2,200 passenger cars in our fleet. Over 
the 
winter 300 cars were given factory overhauling, and 700 were 
serviced at depots. That is a total of 1,000, but for the 
large-scale summer passenger traffic we should have 1,500. Or 
even more. So our technical capabilities are limited; they 
cannot meet the demand for conveyance. 
  Last year Kazakhstan bought 114 railroad cars in Germany and 
70 in Tver. This year we are buying another 100 cars in Germany, 
but it is a question how many we will buy in Tver. Russia too 
needs to update its fleet. So it is a very complex situation. 
The German cars we bought will not go to organize new routes, 
but rather to supply existing ones. 
  [Shirshova] Many people are concerned about the fate of the 
trains to Moscow and St. Petersburg. Rumors are going around 
that the Petersburg train will be canceled. 
  [Panov] Yes, there were such intentions. But we decided to 
run it three times a week. The reasons were, first, that we are 
short of cars and, second, we are uneasy that the trains travel 
half-empty in Russian territory. 
  [Shirshova] People think that the Russian cashiers are 
unenthusiastic about selling tickets to Kazakhstan trains so 
that they can fill up their own Russian ones. 
  [Panov] Not exactly. Our conductors often would conceal 
vacant seats, in order to take people without tickets along. And 
there are indications that information on vacant seats is not 
being given out from Kazakhstan trains. But I think this will be 
straightened out soon. At the last conference in Voronezh 
representatives of the railroad administrations of the 
Commonwealth countries signed documents to introduce penalties 
for carrying passengers without tickets and concealing vacant 
seats. So if Russian inspectors, for example, inspecting a 
Kazakhstan train in Russian territory, find 10 persons without 
tickets, they will issue a penalty against the car depot that 
made up the train for the cost of 10 tickets. Similar penalties 
are envisioned for concealing vacant seats. 
  [Shirshova] Last year problems arose in Kazakhstan with 
travel document forms. How are things now? 
  [Panov] We placed an order for production of the forms in 
Russia. As you know, Kazakhstan does not have the facilities. We 
have already received the forms. Incidentally, as of 10 May a 
new system for preparing tickets has been introduced. The number 
of kilometers that the train travels in Commonwealth territory 
is now marked on the ticket stub. And income from passenger 
conveyance will always go to the state on whose territory the 
train was traveling. 
  [Shirshova] Those are problems which were solved earlier, 
and 
have reappeared. 
  [Panov] The Volga Railroad has canceled the Volgograd-Beyneu 
route, which served the Chevroil petroleum-gas complex. The 
pretext for the cancellation was supposedly that a danger of 
crime had developed in the territory across which the train was 
traveling. But they could not cite any specific examples of 
excesses or attacks. 
  Only a very few Russian trains remain in Kazakhstan. I can 
name just one, the Novosibirsk--Alma-Ata train. The rest are 
organized by Kazakhstan. This fact greatly complicates the 
situation with passenger conveyance. In order to get out of the 
situation somehow we are restoring 40 cars that belong to the 
Baikonur cosmodrome. They are in neglected condition and, of 
course, need repair. 
  The problems with bed accessories have increased; there is a 
kind of boom in disappearing bed linen these days. I am not 
implicating passengers; they can hardly slip out of the car with 
an armload of clean sheets. This means that we have to look for 
the offenders elsewhere. 
  Another concern is that the bed accessories do not meet 
requirements at all. Especially on the West Kazakhstan Railroad, 
which makes up the Aktyubinsk--Alma-Ata train. One often wants 
to detain it in the capital for their sloppy attitude toward 
cleanliness. It looks like the bed linen is never washed, and 
the supply runs out as soon as the train passes the exit signals 
of Aktyubinsk station. K. Tazhibekov, first deputy director of 
the West Kazakhstan Railroad, has received reprimands for this 
irresponsible approach. He is supposed to keep his finger on the 
pulse of passenger traffic, but what we hear from him is excuses 
about poor work by the laundry. But I myself know that a laundry 
with a capacity of 15 tonnes a days was built in Aktyubinsk the 
year before last. All the linen in the city can be cleaned 
there. Now they have a new argument, the shortage of detergent. 
But this is no excuse either, for the Alma-Ata reserve 
conductors buy detergent in Guryev, that is, in the territory of 
the West Kazakhstan Railroad. 
  In general, the train does not have a caring owner. The door 
to a car is hanging on one hinge--they make excuses about the 
lack of factory repair facilities. But pardon me, you do not 
have to have a factory to fix a door. A carpenter with minimal 
materials can hang it in 2 hours. All the locks to the 
compartment cars are broken. But the Aktyubinsk farm machinery 
plant could fill an order for locks. At one time they did that. 
  [Shirshova] Yuriy Vladimirovich, summer is vacation time. 
What do you think, will people travel to the sea on vacation? 
You know, we once had a line from Alma-Ata to Adler. It was made 
up on the Alma-Ata Railroad. Is there a desire to restore it? 
  [Panov] Because of the unstable situation in the Black Sea 
region people from Kazakhstan, as far as I know, are not wanting 
to go there. They prefer to spend their vacation closer to home. 
We have places for vacationing, for our own people and for 
guests, although we do not have a second Black Sea. In 
principle, however, a train could be organized. But there would 
have to be a full guarantee of the safety of the passengers and 
service personnel. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47071 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94071" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   2 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Slump in Almaty Production Viewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Slump in Almaty Production Viewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1428A VECHERNIY ALMATY in Russian 2 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1428A </F>
<F P=104>  VECHERNIY ALMATY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article under "Gorstat Reports" rubric: </F>
"Results of Three Months: Crisis and Losses"] 
  [Text] In the first quarter of the current year, 
there was no improvement in the situation with respect to 
industry in the city. The decline in production remains 
significant. Overall it amounted to 21.7 percent of the level of 
the first quarter of last year. Eighty enterprises, 60 percent 
of the total number, had a reduced volume of production. 
  Of the 95 kinds of output considered in the regular 
reporting, the production volume increased for 21 items 
(agricultural machinery, knitted and sewn goods, bed linen, 
canned fruits and vegetables, groats, mixed feeds, and others) 
in comparison with the analogous period in 1993, it declined for 
62 items, and there was no output at all for 9 items (machine 
tools, medical equipment, road signs, canned meat and 
meat-vegetable products, and wine). 
  There was a decline in production in all basic branches with 
the exception of the electrical power industry. The total volume 
of production in the fuel and energy complex exceeded the level 
of the first quarter of last year by 1.2 percent and amounted to 
81.5 million tenge in current prices. The output of electrical 
power for the city declined by 4.6 percent and the production of 
thermal power fell by 3.2 percent. 
  In the machine building complex, the volume of production 
declined by 22.4 percent relative to the corresponding period of 
last year. 
  The largest decline in production is seen in the woodworking 
branch--44 percent. 
  In the building materials industry, output declined by 29.8 
percent in comparison with the first quarter of last year, 
including by 35.7 percent for the production of prefabricated 
reinforced concrete structures and products. 
  In the first quarter of the current year, fixed capital 
amounting to 585 million tenge was put into operation, of which 
41.3 percent was for production facilities. In the current year, 
16 start-up facilities and capacities are under construction. In 
the first quarter, 59.5 million tenge were assimilated, or 16.7 
percent of the annual funding allocated from the fund for the 
transformation of the economy. There was a significant decline 
in the volume of conveyances with all kinds of transport. 
Communications enterprises provided services to the population 
amounting to 15.5 million tenge. The number of basic subscribers 
increased by about 2,200 over the year and the increase in the 
number of telephones installed in apartments was almost 1,800. 
  The economic crisis that has affected all branches of the 
national economy could not fail to be reflected in the financial 
results of the enterprises and organizations. In the first two 
months of the current year, the city registered total losses of 
217.7 million tenge. Of 629 enterprises and organizations, 94 
(15 percent) suffered losses amounting to 387.7 million tenge. 
  Wholesale prices of industrial enterprises exceeded the 
level 
of the corresponding period of last year by a factor of 18.5; in 
the first three months, prices increased by a factor of 2.7; in 
March, they increased by a factor of 1.4 in comparison with the 
preceding month. 
  In the first three months of the current year, the prices 
for 
foodstuffs increased by a factor of 2.4. For nonfood items, the 
cost of paid services to the population increased by a factor of 
2.2. 
  In the first quarter in comparison with the corresponding 
period of 1993, the production of consumer goods declined by 
14.7 percent, including by 15.2 percent for foodstuffs (despite 
the fact that in March the total production of consumer 
foodstuffs increased by 66.6 percent over February). 
  There was a decline in the production of almost all food 
products except canned fruit and vegetables, macaroni products, 
packaged natural tea, margarine, bread, and baked goods. 
  The volume of meat production was only 72.5 percent of the 
level of the first quarter of last year, that of sausage 
products was 63.1 percent, mayonnaise 46.2, whole-milk 
production 86.5, confectionery 60.8, animal oil 41.7, and 
semifinished meat products 64.3 percent. 
  The population of the city was provided with adequate 
quantities only of bread, baked goods, and macaroni products. 
  In March, the per-capita cost of a selection of vitally 
necessary food products was 323 tenge compared with 290 tenge in 
Febuary. 
  The production of nonfood commodities declined by 19.2 
percent in the first quarter in comparison with the same period 
last year. 
  In comparison with the corresponding period of last year, 
the 
volume of production of knitted goods increased by 9 percent, 
leather footwear by 3.9 percent, sewn goods by 24.9, bed linen 
by 1.4, and leather goods by 2.1 percent. The production of 
textile goods amounted to only 8.6 percent [of the level of last 
year], televisions 10.9, and washing machines, 34.9 percent. 
  The average monthly wage in January-February increased by a 
factor of 11 in comparison with the corresponding period of last 
year and amounted to 446 tenge, whereas in Febuary it was 475 
tenge (an increase of 26.2 percent over January). 
  Above average for the city was the average monthly wage for 
workers in transport, communications, construction 
organizations, material-technical supply, housing and municipal 
services, and nonproduction kinds of domestic services for the 
population. For workers in commercial activities, it amounted to 
a little over 800 tenge, whereas for workers in the credit 
industry and in state insurance it was more than 1,200 tenge. 
  Below the average for the national economy was the level of 
wages for workers in public health, physical culture. social 
security, and science, where it was lower by a factor of 2.3, 
and scientific services, where it was one-half the level for the 
national economy. 
  Since the beginning of the year, 2,376 persons appealed to 
the employment service and jobs were found for 1,142 of them 
(48.1 percent). As of 1 April of the current year, there were 
144 persons officially registered as unemployed in Almaty, of 
whom 115 (79.9 percent) are receiving unemployment assistance. 
  As we see, overall the situation in the branches of the 
economy remains unsatisfactory. In the coming months, one may 
more likely predict a worsening rather than a stabilization of 
the situation in industry, because with the insolvency of 
enterprises the increase in prices for power sources will lead 
to a shutdown of many production capacities. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47072 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94072" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   16 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Rising Costs of Consumer Goods, Services Examined </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Rising Costs of Consumer Goods, Services Examined </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1428B VECHERNIY ALMATY in Russian 16 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1428B </F>
<F P=104>  VECHERNIY ALMATY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article under "Gorstat Reports" rubric: "On </F>
the Change in the Prices for Consumer Goods and Paid Services in 
the First Four Months of 1994"] 
  [Text] The prices for 
consumer goods and services continue to rise. 
  They are rising faster for foodstuffs and have tripled since 
the beginning of the year. For nonfood products, they increased 
by a factor of 2.7. The cost of a selection of food items made 
up of 33 vitally necessary products rose by a factor of 2.7 in 
April in comparison with December and amounted to 427 tenge. 
  The largest increase in consumer prices was registered for 
dairy products (by a factor of 7.2), which increased in price as 
follows: milk by a factor of 5.5, cream and sour cream by 10, 
curds by 9.6, eggs by 5.6, poultry by 4.9, and mutton by a 
factor of 4.3. 
  There was a noticeable increase in the cost of nonfood 
products: clothing and footwear by a factor of 2.7, office 
supplies by 6.1, and refrigerators, washing machines, and 
televisions by a factor of 2. The prices for medical compounds 
increased by a factor of 4.5. 
  All kinds of paid services became more expensive. There was 
a 
sharp increase in prices in April. For the first four months of 
the year, the prices for passenger transport services increased 
by a factor of 4.5, services of a legal nature and for banking 
institutions by 5.6, housing services by 5.2, and paid public 
health services by a factor of 3.9. 
  For the first four months of 1994, the index of the change 
in 
consumer prices, which in international practice is considered 
to be an indicator of inflation, amounted to 294.1 percent for 
the city of Almaty. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47073 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94073" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Regional Polls on Interethnic Issues </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Regional Polls on Interethnic Issues </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1410A Almaty VESTNIK KAZAKHSTANA in Russian 7 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1410A </F>
<F P=104>  Almaty VESTNIK KAZAKHSTANA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Murat Arenov, director of the Information Center </F>
of the Supreme Council of the Republic: "Kazakhs Understand the 
Apprehension of Russians"] 
  [Text] Almaty--[begin boxed item] Specialists of the 
Information Center of the Supreme Soviet in May and December 
1992 and January 1994 conducted a probing poll of various social 
groups of the population in eastern, western, northern, and 
southern Kazakhstan oblasts. The polling area was broadened in 
1994 owing to the inclusion of Karaganda and Almaty Oblasts. A 
total of more than 2,500 persons took part. [end boxed item] 
  The high degree of trust in each other among all ethnic 
groups that was noted in 1992 is also characteristic of the 
beginning of this year. Sixty-four percent of respondents 
answered in the first poll that they trust the people who live 
with them in the same locality (the sum of affirmative answers: 
"yes"--42.5 percent and "sooner 'yes' than 'no'"--21.5 percent. 
In 1994 this sum amounted to 62 percent (41.5 and 20.5). 
  People's perception and assessment of the condition and 
quality of interethnic relations also did not change. In 1992, 
70.1 percent of those polled characterized them as friendly 
(27.2) and peaceful (48.0). The result is the same today. The 
number of Kazakhstan citizens who assessed the status of 
international [mezhnatsionalnyy] relations negatively is 
likewise almost unchanged. 
  Stability and absence of signs of interethnic 
[mezhetnicheskiy] conflict are also indicated by the answers to 
the question "Have you witnessed malevolent treatment of 
representatives of your nationality or quarrels and disputes on 
national grounds?" The number of witnesses to these kinds of 
cases dropped by 20 percent. 
  Data such as these point to the profound international 
character of interpersonal and group relations: 88.4 percent of 
the residents of the republic older than 16 years of age have 
friends of various nationalities, and a third of families are 
international. Of those Kazakhstan residents who responded, 83.2 
percent live in multinational collectives, 85.4 percent live in 
multinational microrayons, and 93 percent have lived a large 
part of their life in Kazakhstan. More than 80 percent of 
respondents answered that their parents also live in Kazakhstan, 
and if it is at the same time taken into account that one-fifth 
of those questioned are people older than 50 years of age, it 
can be asserted that more than 90 percent of Kazakhstan 
residents are natives who have lived here for more than one 
generation. The results of the poll confirm that they really 
lived and continue to live in a peaceful and friendly situation: 
More than 76 percent did not take part in any kind of actions in 
defense of their people, and 15.7 percent took part in arguments 
in this regard. 
  Analysis of ethnosocial relations in a national context 
showed that in 1993 certain new trends appeared in the mood and 
behavior of representatives of various ethnic groups, their 
treatment of one another, evaluation of their own social 
situation, and their reaction to the processes occurring in 
society. Two of them are of particular interest to the largest 
ethnic groups of the republic--Russians and Kazakhs. 
  For the Kazakhs it is a realization of their responsibility 
for the preservation of international peace and accord and an 
understanding of the need to observe equal rights and 
opportunities for representatives of all nationalities that 
populate the republic. The dynamics of the indicators of 
national feelings, moods, and stereotypes of thinking and 
behavior of the Kazakhs show that there is an increase in trust 
toward people, a reduction in the level of intolerance and 
claims to special rights and privileges, and a realization of 
the necessity of international coexistence. In other words, a 
departure from ethnoegoism and ethnic narrow-mindedness, which 
to a certain degree was characteristic of the Kazakhs in 
1992--the first year of Kazakhstan's independence. 
  Despite the existence and strengthening of negative factors 
(socioeconomic and foreign, in the first place), the Kazakhs 
sensed that it was vitally important for them to maintain 
international accord and peace in the country. 
  The number of Kazakhs who on the list of the most alarming 
contemporary problems named an exacerbation of relations between 
nationalities increased by 7.3 percent. But on the whole this 
problem was singled out by 22.6 percent of Kazakh respondents. 
  There was a 10 percent decrease in the number of Kazakhs who 
prefer to live in a family of one nationality, and a 15 percent 
decrease in those who prefer to work in a multinational 
collective, but only 19 percent prefer to live in isolation from 
other nations--less by a factor of two than in 1992. But this is 
already at the level of other nations: Russians--13.7 percent, 
Germans--15.2 percent, Uzbeks--16 percent, and Koreans 14.3 
percent. To the question: "Do you think that people of your 
nationality should enjoy an advantage?" more than half of the 
Kazakhs last year answered in the affirmative from the 
standpoint of elections to organs of authority. Only 32.5 
percent think this way this year. A decrease of 11-18 percent 
occurred among Kazakhs who think that persons of their 
nationality should have advantages in the provision of 
commodities, privatization, allotment of land, enrollment in a 
higher educational institution, and job promotion. 
  A year ago 28.7 percent of the Kazakhs supported the 
departure of non-Kazakhs, this year--14.82. There is a change in 
positions: While last year the number of those who supported the 
migration of non-Kazakhs was approximately equal to those who 
did not support it, this year there are three times as many of 
the latter. On the other hand, a reverse change occurred in the 
position of representatives of Russian nationality: There was an 
increase by a factor of 2.5 in the number of supporters of 
non-Kazakhs (the highest indicator among nationalities that live 
in Kazakhstan). 
  Changes in the positions of the Russian population deserve 
attention. In the main, they retain friendly and peaceful 
relations with those people who live in the republic. 
  And for those who do not intend to leave Kazakhstan, and 
this 
is an overwhelming majority (more than 85 percent), there is a 
characteristic understanding of the problems of national revival 
of the Kazakhs, the formation of a republic as an independent 
state, and the strengthening of peace and accord in society. At 
the same time, the results of the poll show that a feeling of 
alarm is growing among Russians over uncertainty in the future 
and in migration and separatist attitudes, and the level of 
trust in the people who live with them and in state structures 
is falling. 
  Only 7.67 percent of Russians are confident of their own 
welfare in the future--this is less by a factor of three than 
optimists among Kazakhs (23.29 percent). While in 1992 the 
proportion of potential migrants among Russians was at an 
average republic level (7.7 percent), in 1994 it doubled (14.5). 
  More than two-thirds of Russians were in favor of dual 
citizenship. In comparison with representatives of other 
nations, trust in the organs of state authority among Russian 
respondents was 10-12 percent lower, and the level of trust in 
people who lived alongside them dropped by 7 percent. 
  Answers to the question "What do you think of the idea of 
retaining the territorial integrity of Kazakhstan?" are an 
indirect indication of separatist tendencies in individual 
regions of the republic. 
  In North-Kazakhstan Oblast this idea is supported by 61.9 
percent (79.7 in 1992), among the Russian population--only 51.7 
percent (not supporting--23 percent, and 23.9 percent found it 
difficult to answer). Thus in this region in the course of one 
year a significant strengthening of separatist attitudes 
occurred. In the east of the country the number not supporting 
territorial integrity remained at the same level--10.6 percent. 
  Interesting data were acquired on the question "How is an 
unfriendly attitude toward another people reflected?" While for 
Kazakhs last year this attitude was reflected predominantly in 
three positions: undervaluation of the people's past (18.8 
percent), disrespect for traditions and customs (14.7), and a 
haughty attitude toward language (13.7 percent), this year, 
along with the first and third positions in the trio of leaders, 
there was Kazakh dissatisfaction with respect to people's 
preference for their own nationality in selection of 
personnel--16 percent (in 1992--8.2 percent). Among Russians 
this percentage increased by a third and is higher by a factor 
of two than among Kazakhs. In the opinion of almost a third of 
the respondents, the most unfriendly attitude toward them is 
reflected exactly in the sphere of personnel policy. However, 
this fact calls attention to itself--that the level of 
dissatisfaction among other nationalities on the placement of 
personnel according to national criteria is at the Kazakh level 
(among Germans--9 percent, Uzbeks--16 percent, Tatars--18.8 
percent, and Koreans--14.3 percent). 
  Moreover, if it is taken into account that the managers of a 
majority of enterprises in construction, industry, transport, 
communications, trade, and consumer services are Russian, then 
the sharp dissatisfaction of Russians on the personnel question 
can be explained by their reaction to the changes that are 
occurring in the existing status quo in personnel placement and 
also to the results of the propaganda of Russians and some 
Russian-language mass media in the republic. 
  But on the whole the high percentage (22.1) on this position 
apparently indicates that personnel placement has been turned 
over to the control of managers, and also indicates a trend 
taking place in the establishment of multinational collectives, 
although this trend contradicts the polyethnic nature of our 
society and is losing the support of Kazakhs--only 15.1 percent 
of respondents would like to work in a collective where all the 
people are of the same nationality (23 percent in 1992). 
  These are some of the first results of the research we have 
conducted. Processing and analysis is continuing. Interesting 
data were acquired on the largest nationalities after the 
Kazakhs and Russians: Ukrainians, Germans, Uzbeks, Tatars, 
Koreans, and also Cossacks. A conceptualization is required of 
the attitude of Kazakhs toward various parties and movements and 
religions. Finally, on the basis of the results acquired, light 
will be shed on the reasons for and factors in ethnosocial 
tension, and measures will be determined that could influence 
its curtailment in different regions of the country. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47074 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94074" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   20 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Causes of Interethnic Tension in Northern Oblasts Outlined </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Causes of Interethnic Tension in Northern Oblasts Outlined </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1412A Moscow MOSCOW NEWS in English No 20, 20-26 May 94 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1412A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MOSCOW NEWS </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Yemelyanenko: "The Russian-Speaking </F>
People of Kazakhstan: Mounting Wave of Protests"] 
  [Text] For the quiet small town in North Kazakhstan three 
6,000-strong rallies at a time -- on April 26, May 1 and 9 -- is 
almost a historical event, because the old residents recall 
nothing like this for 70 years. "Perhaps, we would not assemble 
in the street," says Valery Lyubushin, deputy of the regional 
assembly, freed recently, "had it not been for the arrest of 
Boris Suprunyuk, one of the organizers of the meeting." 
  Valery Lyubushin and Boris Suprunyuk were detained on April 
12 when it became clear that despite the ban by the authorities, 
the protests by the Russian-speaking communities -- Ukrainians, 
Russians, Germans and others -- would take place all the same. A 
week before the non-sanctioned meeting Suprunyuk and Lyubushin 
were arrested without an accusation. The picket of Cossacks near 
the Procurator's office demanded that they be set free. But only 
Valery Lyubushin was released, and a meeting with Suprunyuk was 
promised. But instead of that Petropavlovsk learned from Radio 
Liberty and Voice of America broadcasts: "Boris Suprunyuk has 
been accused of fomenting national discord and has been 
transported to Alma-Ata." 
<H5>  `Down With Tyranny!' </H5>
  The participants in the marches in support of the prisoner 
were emboldened by the protest of Russia's Foreign Ministry and 
the status of a civil rights champion, given to Boris Suprunyuk 
by Amnesty International and Helsinki Watch. 
  "Had it not been for international support, people would not 
dare to speak aloud about the oppression of "non-natives," 
deputy of the city Soviet Galina Kalyuzhnaya said with 
conviction. The reputation of Suprunyuk, an extremist and rebel, 
restrained the suppressed irritation of those non-Kazakh, who 
were dissatisfied with the national policy of President 
Nazarbayev. But his arrest caused an explosion in society. The 
cause of the persecutions of Suprunyuk in Petropavlovsk is 
believed to be from his consistency in demanding re-registration 
of the Russian community of Kazakhstan. The thing is that on the 
eve of elections to the new parliament all national associations 
of the republic were shut for re-registration by a decree of 
Nursultan Nazarabayev, issued in December 1993. As it was 
promised -- till the opening of the new parliament. 
  More than two months have passed since its formation, but so 
far only the Kazakh movement "Kazakh-tili" has been officially 
registered. The others are still outlawed. "We, Germans, 
participated intentionally in the meeting of April 26 together 
with other Russian-speaking communities," says Viktor 
Shlotgauer, member of the presidium of the society "Revival." 
"We are not registered under the pretext that we are rejecting 
the wording: 'Kazakh Germans.' It is clear that this is being 
done to split all the Russian-speaking people -- Poles, 
Byelorussians, Armenians, Germans." 
  Every year around 200,000 Germans, allowed by the quota, 
leave Kazakhstan for Germany. There is a queue for many years, 
but the 37,000 who remain prefer to move to Russia where, 
according to them, life is easier. The outflow of Germans 
increased, as soon as Alma-Ata compelled everyone to choose 
their citizenship by March 15, 1994. This date has been extended 
for another year. This is due to the requests and protests by 
the Russian-speaking communities against combining the adoption 
of citizenship with the transfer of all documents to the state 
language -- Kazakh. 
  Before the spring of 1994 the keeping of documents in the 
Kazakh language seemed to be a distant future, but at the 
meeting of April 26 in Petropavlovsk the demands were clear: to 
set up a free economic zone with Russia and introduce the second 
state language -- Russian. 
<H5>  South Against the North </H5>
  "We are called chauvinists, but what can be done if in 
Kokchetav, Pavlodar, Ust-Kamenogorsk and Tselinograd up to 
60% 
of the population are Russian-speaking, and in Petropavlovsk and 
Kustanai almost 100%," says Valery Lyubushin. "Should all 
these 
people move to the Kazakh language? It would mean shutting down 
schools, institutes, factories. It's absurd!" Therefore, those 
participating in the rallies demand that the border with Russia 
be opened, that settlements of accounts be made easier with the 
enterprises of neighbours -- Novosibirsk, Omsk, Kurgan, as well 
as equal taxation with the South. It is already "equal" -- 
100% 
of the profit the regions assign to Alma-Ata. But the greater 
part goes to the Kazakh South, which has created a free economic 
zone with China and Central Asia, and a lesser part -- to the 
Russian-speaking North. 
  "So far the conflict is not of a vividly outlined national 
character," says Valery Ilyin, leader of the local branch of the 
Socialist Party. "People went out into the street because they 
are not paid wages for six months and spend a year on an 
emergency leave -- the plants stand idle because of ruined 
contacts with Russian suppliers. But even the ordinary citizen, 
mostly indifferent to politics, is not blind. He sees that for 
him there is no money, but Kazakh migrants from Mongolia are 
paid substantial travelling expenses, loans, even interest-free." 
  Their actions run into absurdity: the wave of renamings 
swept 
the cities which never had other names. Petropavlovsk 
participated in a meeting, on learning that the city had been 
renamed into Kzylzhar. "It is fantastic only at first glance," 
says Valery Lyubushin, teacher of the local pedagogical 
institute, "but our lecturers teaching in the Kazakh language 
get 15-20% more than Russian-speaking teachers. All the 
leading 
posts are occupied by the representatives of the Kazakh nation." 
  The election results to the new parliament show that this 
policy contributes to the formation of Kazakh statehood, 
infringing the national self-consciousness of other people. Out 
of 170 deputies 105 are Kazakhs. And this happens when over 
60% 
of the republic's population are Russian-speaking. 
  The privileges for the Kazakh nation together with 
unemployment played their role: in 1993 a total of 365,000 
Russian-speaking people left Kazakhstan and moved to Russia. 
From Mongolia and China 105,000 Kazakhs returned to the republic 
and are now settled in the North. The results of the "soft" 
forcing out policy on Russians and the resettlement of Kazakhs 
on their lands were not kept waiting. In 1994 alone there were 
clashes in 5 Cossack villages (stanitsas) between the local 
Cossacks and Kazakh migrants. 
<H5>  Cossacks and Kazakhs </H5>
  "We are not questioning Kazakhstan's sovereignty, but we are 
not going to leave our lands," says Viktor Achkasov, chieftain 
of the banned association of Siberian Cossacks. "Six percent 
Serbs succeeded in upholding the right to existence and we are 
more than 70%. We shall withstand!" 
  Viktor Achkasov openly wears the Cossack uniform and carries 
a whip, banned by a decree of President Nazarbayev, whose stand 
is unequivocal: "In the socio-political forces of Kazakhstan 
there are no Cossacks," he told Boris Yeltsin at the latest 
talks in Moscow. As is known, Russia kept mum. The Cossacks 
believe this is "in reply to the right of taking Baikonur on 
lease." "In this way the life of one million people has been 
crossed out," Achkasov argues with the President of Russia. He 
is convinced that non-recognition of the Cossack community leads 
to the radicalization of that part of society. "You see, if 
earlier a mere juridical recognition suited us, then today many 
chieftains insist on autonomy, right up to the reunification 
with Russia," says Achkasov. These demands made at the meetings 
set the Kazakhs against Cossacks, threatening the republic with 
a split. 
  After the events in Petropavlovsk the North grew quiet in 
expectation, Alma-Ata promises to release Boris Suprunyuk "after 
the completion of the investigation." Suprunyuk, according to 
his wife Luiza, continues his hunger-strike and will insist on 
an open political trial. He was backed up by all the national 
communities of the North and Cossacks who declared that they 
will openly carry arms, just like in Russia. "If the events that 
took place in Topolevka and Pokatilovka continue, we shall put 
force against force," ataman Achkasov says openly. -- 
Petropavlovsk 
  [Box, p 3] 
<H5>  MN File: </H5>
  Boris Suprunyuk, 58, is a journalist and chairman of the 
Russian-speaking community in North Kazakhstan. In August 1993 
he turned down Kazakhstan citizenship and adopted Russian. Twice 
he was arrested. In 1988 the communist nomenklatura suspected 
him of a "mental disorder". He was set free two months later 
with the diagnosis: "healthy". In April 1994 he was arrested for 
refusing to give a written undertaking not to leave his 
residence in Petropavlovsk. 
  [Box, p 3] 
<H5>  MN File: </H5>
  On March 14-16, 1994 there was a clash in Topolevka and 
Pokatilovka stanitsas (Taldy-Kurgan Region) between Cossacks and 
Kazakhs during the celebrations of the Moslem holiday Navruz. Up 
to this day the villages are cordoned off by the forces of 
Kazakhstan's Interior Ministry. Twenty-five representatives of 
the Cossack community and 15 Kazakhs were arrested. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47075 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94075" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   7 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Efforts Against White-Collar Crime Noted </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Efforts Against White-Collar Crime Noted </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1411A Almaty VESTNIK KAZAKHSTANA in Russian 7 Jun 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1411A </F>
<F P=104>  Almaty VESTNIK KAZAKHSTANA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by VESTNIK KAZAKHSTANA correspondent Aleksandr </F>
Kuzennyy under the rubric "The Man and Law": "When Rogues Are in 
Office"] 
  [Text] Kokshetau Oblast--The well-known Decree of the 
President of the Republic "On Increasing the Responsibility of 
Officials of State Government Organs for the Status of 
Discipline, Public Order, and Security" was issued on 4 December 
1992. However, its urgency is tremendously significant at 
present, too. How are those to whom leadership positions have 
been entrusted complying with the decree? Not everything is 
favorable in Kokshetau Oblast in this regard.... 
  Reports on compliance with the president's decree in rayons 
and cities are filed with the oblast prosecutor's office on a 
monthly basis. This instills discipline and enhances the 
responsibility of leaders. Nonetheless, some are tempted to 
cross the line of the permissible and circumvent the law: 
Perhaps they can get away with it.... 
  Logvinenko, UPTK [Directorate for Production and Technical 
Supply] director at the Borovoye agro-industrial combine, 
certainly thought this way. He headed the collective of the 
administration for many years and was highly regarded by his 
subordinates and the leadership of Shchuchinskiy Rayon. On one 
occasion Viktor Grigoryevich devised what in principle was a 
good endeavor: to bring in timber from Tyumen Oblast. He went 
away to do reconnaissance and make arrangements. The oblast 
administration issued him a license to export from Shchuchinsk 
R90 million worth of meat and R48 million worth of 
butter--naturally, at the request of the rayon administration. 
The director set out for Tyumen with this hard-to-find 
merchandise. They waited for him at home for a week, then for a 
month, but he did not return. Coworkers went to find out what 
had happened. This was what they learned. Logvinenko sold the 
meat and the butter, received 22 million Russian rubles for them 
and R6 million worth of merchandise, and subsequently 
disappeared in a direction unknown. He is still being sought. 
  K. Ibrayev, the rayon prosecutor, said: "Some of the losses 
have been recovered by the state. Two cottages of the UPTK chief 
have been sequestered; three cars of the VAZ-2199 make acquired 
by him have been attached. He took the rest with him. Criminal 
proceedings have been instituted against him." 
  Angibaryan, director of the Golden Ear sovkhoz, also decided 
to "push" butter, circumventing the law. As the saying goes, he 
was caught red-handed. He was held liable under an 
administrative statute; the court assessed as much as...R10,000 
against the director, while a R10 million fine was imposed on 
the sovkhoz. With such arrangements, one can safely go on 
trading in butter in contravention of the law. 
  The position of chief of the rayon tax inspectorate is a 
respectable position. In Shchuchinsk it was filled by a certain 
Yergusayev. On one occasion he was summoned to the prosecutor's 
office. He was outraged: "How dare you? Over what?" He was told 
that an audit had found one peasant farm that was not paying 
taxes. Yergusayev argued: "It is on the right side of the law; 
all peasant farms are exempted from payment of taxes during the 
first three years." They objected: "It has already been four 
years...." 
  The chief of the tax inspectorate was surprised: "Really? 
Excuse me, I did not know...." 
  A sum of R17 million was collected from this peasant farm on 
the demand of the prosecutor's office. However, after this case, 
the already mentioned Yergusayev once again got caught with 
"small stuff." A commercial store not registered anywhere at all 
was uncovered in the rayon; its owners were not paying taxes. 
  We always refer to our budget, which is "full of holes." How 
can it be otherwise if the attitude of some leaders toward their 
official duties is so irresponsible? The rayon prosecutor's 
office has filed a lawsuit seeking R48 million from 
undisciplined bosses--this is for 1993 only. The court refunded 
R40 million to the state. How many more millions are retained by 
shadow economy structures without entering the field of vision 
of that same prosecutor's office?... 
  G. Fedorov, head of the Shchuchinsk City Administration 
(albeit currently the former head) did not think that a cash 
bonus he issued to himself would come out. K. Akhmetov, chief of 
staff of the same administration, decided to build a "business" 
on the illegal issuance of licenses. A fine for spoilage of 
construction materials has been assessed against the management 
of a furniture factory. 
  Facts, facts, and more facts.... So, we wanted to meet with 
officials who have allowed particular violations to occur and 
hear their explanations from the horse's mouth. Acting manager 
of Agrobank Vrublevskaya entered the office of the city of 
Shchuchinsk prosecutor. At present, this bank is widely known in 
the oblast on account of its unseemly deeds rather than its 
operations. 
  The bank's former manager, Azhikenov, has been sentenced to 
nine years' imprisonment. 
  I addressed the banker: "Elvira Yakovlevna, what do you 
think 
about the sad lot of your boss?" 
  Without embarrassment she began to recount the history of 
the 
event, referring continuously to the management of the oblast 
National Bank. 
  "We extended R200 million in credit to the 
Agropromkomplektatsiya joint-stock company." 
  Prosecutor R. Ashibayev asked: "How did credit end up in the 
hands of a commercial company?" 
  "This was a directive from the management of the oblast 
National Bank." 
  "Specifically whose?" 
  "There was a verbal directive." 
  "But it was not valid, was it?" 
  Elvira Yakovlevna did not want to fail her highly placed 
bosses and still would not name the one who had "called her 
personally." 
  The prosecutor continued to ask questions: "Fine, you 
extended credit, but why did you not flag the commercial company 
as a defaulter at the time indicated in the contract? The 
joint-stock company failed to pay the money back to the bank for 
two months. This is a direct violation of the law on banks." 
  Vrublevskaya repeated: "There was a verbal instruction from 
the management of the National Bank to that effect." 
  The prosecutor's office of the city recovered 53,500 tenge 
for the state. 
  "How can you explain what you did?" 
  After a certain pause, she said: "Perhaps it was 
irresponsible...." 
  A great many questions arose as soon as the conversation 
turned to the Agropromkomplektatsiya joint-stock company. As one 
begins to search for answers, the trail leads to the oblast 
seat. They issued a directive from there, they checked on it 
from there.... The enterprise was headed by S. Novikov. He has 
now received Russian citizenship and moved to Russia for 
permanent residence. For the most part, Agropromkomplektatsiya 
engaged in purchasing cable products in Uzbekistan and 
subsequently selling them in Kokshetau Oblast. A 
hard-to-figure-out commercial company suddenly acquired 
respectable protectors and a solid reputation together with them. 
  They say money talks. It may have done its part in this 
case, 
too. It is just that the going was made too smooth for this 
joint-stock company by many officials. 
<H5>  Commentary by Senior Justice Counselor Kasymbek Omarov, </H5>
Deputy Oblast Prosecutor: 
  We are trying as hard as we can to make our young state a 
law-abiding one. Nonetheless, so far we have not been 
necessarily successful in inculcating respect for the law. After 
instituting prosecutorial monitoring of the President's Decree 
"On Increasing the Responsibility of Officials of State 
Government Organs for the Status of Discipline, Public Order, 
and Security," we uncovered 1,320 violations of the law in the 
oblast in 1993 alone. Some 231 officials were disciplined; 
statutory penalties were meted out to 130 officials, and 147 
officials were held financially liable. Some 189 lawsuits were 
referred to the courts, of which 170 have been adjudicated and 
satisfied. Ninety-two criminal cases were instituted. Here is a 
fact which makes one think hard: More than R1 billion was 
recovered for the revenue part of the budget through the tax 
inspectorate on prosecutors' referrals! I repeat--solely on 
prosecutors' referrals. 
  An especially large number of violations were detected in 
the 
area of external economic operations. As a rule, these 
violations are associated with the illegal issuance of licenses 
and customs declarations for exporting products out of the 
republic. Almost R410 million were recovered from the guilty 
parties for these violations, and three criminal cases were 
instituted. For example, O. Yevtyukhov, deputy director of the 
Dipol company, who entered false information on a license for 
porcelain products in an attempt to illegally export 70 tonnes 
of steel sheets, got a suspended sentence of three years' 
imprisonment. A criminal case has been instituted against S. 
Kasymov, former chairman of the Oblast Committee for External 
Economic Relations. The reason was the same--egregious 
violations in the issuance of licenses. 
  On a referral from the Kokshetau prosecutor for the 
transportation sector, a fine was collected, as budget revenue, 
from the Gelios limited-liability company for exporting grain 
without a license. The Leninskiy, Bostandykskiy, and Sunrise 
sovkhozes in Leningradskiy Rayon illegally exported agricultural 
products to Omsk. A fine in the amount of R7.3 million was 
assessed against them. Ye. Zhantasov, chief of the Kuybyshevskiy 
Rayon Agricultural Administration, Ye. Kobzeva, chief 
accountant, and V. Kunitskiy, chief agronomist, decided to join 
the market economy in one fell swoop. The Chongar private small 
enterprise put them on its staff as "scientific consultants," 
paying them respectable monetary remunerations. M. Sobar, 
director of the Kazdorproekt design institute, and A. Shvets, 
director of Lobanovskiy sovkhoz (currently the former director), 
also combined positions. They "moonlighted" for commercial 
structures. 
  The law enforcement organs have instituted a criminal case 
against K. Tonkayev, deputy manager of a branch of Igilik-Bank. 
This official extended loans in the amount of R223 million in 
exchange for a bribe. Without any legal authority from the 
Ministry of Defense, the former chief of the Borovoye military 
health resort sold one of the boarding hotels to the 
Kokchetavglavsnab Administration for...R39,798. The purchase and 
sale contract was pronounced invalid by a ruling of the court of 
arbitration. 
  Prosecutorial organs have increasingly often begun to 
uncover 
violations of law in the tax inspectorates. Here is just one 
fact. The Kokshetausskiy Rayon Administration registered some 
small enterprises without a statutory fund, and the local 
revenuers turned a blind eye to it. Worse yet, eight commercial 
enterprises did not remit even the profit tax to the budget. 
  Hundreds and thousands of officials of various kinds, 
including those in executive jobs, hold various state positions. 
They should set an example, enforce respect for the law, and 
live and work by constitutional norms. Yet many of them act as 
violators of order themselves. Well, they will have to answer 
for these violations to the fullest extent of the law. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47076 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94076" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KYRGYZSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   President Akayev Accused of Abuses </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    President Akayev Accused of Abuses </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1404A Moscow PRAVDA in Russian 3 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1404A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow PRAVDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by PRAVDA correspondent Yuriy Razgulyayev: "The </F>
Payroll Was Hidden in the Basement: While the Relatives of 
President Akayev Blow Away $1 Million in Phony Credit in Vienna, 
a Starving Peasant Sells His Infant on the Steps of the 
Parliament"] 
  [Text] Bishkek--The proceedings of a regular session of the 
Zhogorku Kenesh, the Kyrgyz parliament, in Bishkek ended in a 
row. At the beginning of the session President A. Akayev ran up 
to the podium with a red file in his hands. He stated literally 
the following: 
  "I know that some deputies are collecting compromising 
evidence against me. This does not scare me. Moreover, I am 
asking the prosecutor general to check out the first document 
that has ended up in this file--a statement of the control 
chamber...." 
  I will outline the content of this document for our readers. 
In the opinion of the control chamber, it has revealed egregious 
violations of legislation in the process of the receipt and 
disbursement of foreign exchange credit by a certain commercial 
company. The brother of the president's wife is the director of 
the company. Understandably, throughout the days following this 
event the parliament was abuzz and anxious as it discussed this 
unconventional conflict. On the last day, the general prosecutor 
reported on the results of the investigation. 
  As many had expected, the prosecutor found all the arguments 
of the control chamber to be unsubstantiated. However, the 
picture changed abruptly when the deputies began to ask 
questions. First, it came out that the brother of the 
president's wife had right away transferred $1 million which had 
been borrowed at "a ridiculous rate of interest" to Vienna, to 
his son-in-law--the chairman of the National Bank. The latter 
purchased in Malta "merchandise that was most necessary for 
Kirghizia [Kyrgyzstan]"--ladies' coats with fur collars and 
underwear--and shipped them to Bishkek. The slow-witted people 
were in no hurry to purchase the merchandise, and for this 
reason the foreign exchange still has not been recovered, 
although all the deadlines have long since passed. 
  It was precisely these circumstances, rather than the legal 
intricacies, that outraged the deputies the most. For example, a 
female physician from Bishkek asked reasonably: 
  "Do we really have no other way to spend foreign exchange? 
Give it to our hospital or buy medicines.... We do not have what 
we need to treat patients...." 
  D. Tentiyev, general director of the Ilbirs Knitwear 
Association: 
  "Had we purchased raw materials for this $1 million, the 
entire republic could have been buried under cheap underwear and 
clothing for children." 
  Rural residents were outraged in particular. All their 
requests to help with purchasing gasoline for the planting 
campaign or fertilizer have invariably drawn the same response: 
There is no money. It turns out that Minister of Industry and 
Commerce A. Iordan offered this to the director of the 
commercial company even without a request: Take $1 million! 
  Deputy from Dzhalal-Abad O. Tekibayev said: "The 
prosecutor's 
office may not be interested in the moral, ethical aspect of the 
issue. However, we cannot remain silent about the fact that 
since as early as the year before last earthquake victims have 
not had a roof over their heads. Hundreds of families who have 
lost their houses to landslides have now been added to the 
victims. And at such a time the president defends his relatives 
who are churning state dollars for their own benefit...." 
  Incidentally, a blood-curdling episode occurred during the 
same days. Right on the steps of the White House (Bishkek also 
has one), a peasant was selling his child so that his other 
children might survive. It turned out that he had sold his 
tobacco and cotton to the state but was unable to get the money. 
Fervent monetarists were saying that a lot of cash cannot be 
issued, or there will be inflation. 
  Such was the unexpected outcome of the president's attempt 
to 
whitewash his relatives and take in hand the "loudmouths and 
provocateurs," although, to tell you the truth, this entire 
session was given to such scandals and score-settling. Precisely 
while the session was in progress, the press reported that chief 
of the Issyk-Kul Oblast Administration Zh. Saadanbekov had 
repaired a two-story residence at the expense of the state and 
had privatized it free of charge right away. A huge downtown 
restaurant was sold at the price of a passenger car. The plague 
of corruption has reached even into the Ministry of Defense. Its 
employees have given hundreds of thousands of dollars in cash to 
commercial structures "on interest." Meanwhile, soldiers 
frequently faint of hunger and flee their units. 
  The accusation of pouring it on too thick can be leveled 
against me. Unfortunately, only a fraction of the unseemly facts 
that were talked about at the session have been mentioned here. 
It was no accident that the deputies themselves established a 
special commission to "verify the purity and integrity" of their 
ranks, that is, those who, taking advantage of their positions, 
"grab-it-ized" houses, shops, hotels, and cars, and those who 
"churn" loans which the rural residents lack so badly. 
  However, I am afraid that all these commissions, 
score-settling, and even dismissals and resignations will hardly 
change the situation radically. President A. Akayev responds to 
all sharply worded questions in the same manner: "they will give 
us credit," "they will help us, they will pay for us." 
Unfortunately, many problems are now solved in Kirghizia at this 
level. The Kazakhs will come to build the Naryn Hydropower 
Stations; the Russians will come to restore defense enterprises; 
and the Turks will come to build hotels. A. Akayev promised this 
to even the blind and the deaf who assembled in front of the 
parliament after the deputies had canceled all preferences for 
them: We will set up a foundation, and international 
organizations will help you. 
  "We will get it, we will split it up, we will grow rich"--it 
appears that this formula is becoming increasingly dominant in 
the minds of present-day reformers. At any rate, almost nobody 
is talking about production. Prime Minister A. Dzumagulov makes 
some attempts to have society face real, specific endeavors. 
However, this policy does not enjoy any support from the 
president or his team. 
  On the other hand, the reformers themselves are beginning to 
look askance at A. Akayev. An alarm signal sounded at this 
session. Three ambassador designates nominated by the president 
were not confirmed. For the second time they sent packing E. 
Karabayev, Akayev's closest comrade-in-arms, who headed his 
staff for a long time. First, they failed to confirm him as 
minister of foreign affairs, and this time--as ambassador to the 
United States. 
  T. Chyngyshev, former prime minister, who did not resign of 
his own volition, also failed to become ambassador to the FRG. 
Just like E. Karabayev, he is "deeply privy" to the still 
smoldering "gold scandal." 
  In deputy smoking rooms it was said: "They know too much." 
Therefore, on one hand, they needed to be bought off, while on 
the other--"sent far away." All the more so because T. 
Chyngyshev himself said directly in an interview to the 
newspaper POLITIKA that he was suffering "for someone else's 
fault" in the "gold affair." For whose fault can the number two 
person in the state suffer in silence? 
  There is a reason they say in the Orient that all 
reassignments at the top are prepared "behind the scenes." I 
think that the "foreign exchange" and "gold" scandals mentioned 
here and mistakes in personnel selection are nothing other than 
reverberations of the skirmishes in the back rooms. Akayev's 
rating, which is declining more and more, points to the same. 
Recent surveys ranked him as low as seventh. 
  The last meetings of the session indicated that the attitude 
toward the policy of the president and the government is 
undergoing a major change. People are losing hope that their 
lives will finally improve. At present city bazaars are piled 
high with relatively cheap meat. Rural residents are 
slaughtering cattle in order to survive. They have not been paid 
for a long time; the money is being kept in the basement of the 
national bank, thus preventing inflation. For the fourth year 
now almost no fertilizer has been applied on irrigated lands in 
the Chu Valley. 
  This is what concerns people more than anything else. There 
is already a shortage of food for children, while the old, 
solidly designed economy has not ultimately fallen apart. Alas, 
the president prefers to talk about credit and the image of 
Kirghizia in the international arena. He is leaving for Paris 
again.... 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47077 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94077" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KYRGYZSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Possible Presidential Candidates Assessed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Possible Presidential Candidates Assessed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1364A Moscow NOVAYA YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA in Russian 27 
May 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1364A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NOVAYA YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Kabay Karabekov: "Labyrinths of Power; the Best </F>
Vegetables Grow in Osha, and Fruit--in the Chuiskiy Valley; What 
the Biographies of Potential Candidates for President of 
Kyrgyzstan Have in Common"] 
  [Text] The republic's newspapers have started an undeclared 
preelection campaign for future president of Kyrgyzstan. Is it 
not too early? It seems that it is not. Not much time is left 
before the date--autumn 1996--that is cherished by some 
political leaders. But in the struggle for power, as is well 
known, the one who begins to prepare the sleigh well ahead of 
time wins more often. 
  The confrontation in the upper echelons of power is also 
coming out in the open. The campaign is already developing in 
earnest. All of the groups that are involved in this process are 
actively preparing reliable springboards for their candidates. 
The arrangement of forces is being publicly counted, and the 
newspapers indicate with an accuracy of up to one-hundredth of a 
percent the representation in the government of natives of one 
or another region. Every slight shortcoming of a potential 
candidate for the first post in the republic is recorded and 
filed in a dossier. Without a doubt, the assembled compromising 
material will be reported to the voters at the necessary time. 
  So who could end up on the voter's ballot within two years? 
Besides Feliks Kulov, the former vice president (this candidacy 
has already been examined in previous issues of NYG [NOVAYA 
YEZHEDNEVNAYA GAZETA], there are three real aspirants: Askar 
Akayev, the current head of state (despite the statement that he 
does not intend to take part in the new political show); 
Chairman of the Supreme Soviet Medetkan Sherimkulov; and Prime 
Minister Abbas Dzhumagulov. These three are well known to the 
people, and each of them has his strong and weak points, and 
pluses and minuses. 
<H5>  Carte Blanche of the Communists </H5>
  The most real political force in Kyrgyzstan today is the 
party of the Communists. To all appearances, it is counting on 
M. Sherimkulov, speaker of the parliament. Dzh. Amanbayev, the 
former leader of the Communists and the present deputy prime 
minister, in fact, crossed himself off the list of aspirants to 
"father of the nation" with his own hand. The deputy prime 
minister, while on a working trip to the south of the republic, 
allowed himself a whole number of rather imprudent statements. 
Speaking to the aktiv of two agricultural oblasts, in the past 
an ardent supporter of the kolkhoz-sovkhoz system, he suddenly 
declared publicly that the kolkhozes and sovkhozes are a "thing 
of the past." The state, he said, is not in a condition to 
finance unprofitable production. Of course, they can exist in 
the event that they do not request money from the authorities 
for subsistence. And he noted in passing that the government 
allocated a total of 150 million soms for spring field work. 
This, he said, is all that it is possible to do in the given 
situation. 
  The Communists will hardly forgive their former leader for 
betraying the general party line. It is still fresh in people's 
minds how the willful Communist Dzh. Amanbayev did not let an 
occasion pass to goad the president for badgering the kolkhozes 
and sovkhozes, and he was one of A. Akayev's most serious 
opponents. 
  But a lot speaks in favor of M. Sherimkulov. First, which is 
quite important, he is the only representative of the party 
elite in the higher echelons of power. (In the former regime, 
Sherimkulov occupied the post of secretary of the Central 
Committee of the KPK [Communist Party of Kyrgyzstan] for 
ideology. Second, which is no less important, he is an 
intelligent, subtle, and very experienced politician. While 
holding the position of speaker of parliament, Sherimkulov 
collected a lot of points, skillfully analyzing all of the 
stratagems of eastern politics. During this time, the speaker 
worked on foreign policy as well as on domestic policy. He 
proved himself to be a peacemaker in the Armenian-Azerbaijani 
conflict. 
  M. Sherimkulov is a very strong trump card for the Communist 
Party. If the Communists will unanimously and to the last come 
out for the speaker, they will acquire a good opportunity to 
enter the White House on the shoulders of the head of parliament 
and thereby return to grand policy. And with respect to 
everything else, the speaker in his position is in a more 
winning situation than his two nearest rivals: because he is 
associated far less than A. Akayev and A. Dzhumagulov with the 
republic's economic problems, and all of the troubles and 
problems of the population will be attributed to the account of 
the latter two. 
<H5>  Will the Prime Minister Sit in the President's Chair? </H5>
  Abbas Dzhumagulov, the former perennial second in the 
communist system and present prime minister, having tasted 
freedom, is beginning to conduct himself in this eminent company 
in a more and more relaxed manner. He understands perfectly well 
that there will be no break in the economy for the next three to 
four years. Unemployment is increasing. Seventy large 
enterprises have been stopped, and of these, four are grandees 
of the defense industry, where, incidentally, mainly highly 
qualified Russian specialists work. Deprived of earnings, they 
will leave Kyrgyzstan. In order to stop the specialists, it will 
be necessary to put the dying plants into operation. But the 
republic does not have the resources for this. And Russia has 
declared openly that it can keep only 30 percent of Kyrgyz 
defense industry occupied. 
  The situation in the economy of the republic shocked 
specialists of the IMF. Money that is earmarked for production 
disappears in the sand. The government is not in a condition to 
retrieve it, inasmuch as only altruistic businessmen make tax 
payments to the treasury. The rest either hide their incomes or 
procrastinate as long as possible. But many, after receiving 
credits, disappear in unknown directions. 
  The prime minister, naturally, could not agree to the 
demands 
of the IMF to freeze wages fully. He promised that excise taxes 
on a whole series of commodities would be introduced. The state 
once again will become a monopolist in the production of vodka. 
The sale of alcohol will be prohibited. In the near future, the 
output of commodities will be prohibited that do not meet 
quality standards. A. Dzhumagulov intends to make essential 
consumer goods accessible in price and to make it up in volume. 
  The intentions are good, but they are not new. There is no 
doubt that the Kyrgyz homegrown "marketeers" will find a way out 
of this situation and a method for duping the state. And the 
Kyrgyzstan Government will once again slip out behind the flags 
that the IMF sets up. 
  It is quite possible that right after the minister of 
finance, several other members of the cabinet and rayon managers 
will "disappear." Life will make it also necessary, probably, to 
reduce the number of oblasts and rayons and to eliminate them 
entirely in the future. The prime minister will certainly come 
out with a new administrative structure at the next session. He 
has no other way out. Otherwise, the prime minister is deprived 
of all prospects for the future, and he will be compelled always 
to remain in secondary roles, carrying out the instructions of 
more resolute politicians. 
<H5>  Today the First, but Tomorrow.... </H5>
  President Akayev has a no less, if not a more, difficult 
situation. His team is composed of the second echelon of the 
Communist nomenklatura. There is not one representative of the 
party generals next to him. 
  The trump ace of the president is foreign policy. He was 
able 
to place himself in the rank of CIS leaders whose opinion is 
heeded. 
  But today, it is necessary for A. Akayev to score in the 
republic also. Seeing that the kolkhozes and sovkhozes are not 
making a go, A. Akayev is counting on the farmers. In the 
future, the association of farmers could become a powerful 
political force and constitute a serious competitor to the 
Communists. 
  The president will have to "grapple" with the prime minister 
very soon. If the government, in unison with the parliament, 
tries to subordinate the National Bank under it, the president 
will be deprived of a lot. 
  The "golden" question will once again become the urgent 
argument in the hands of the opposition. In the next few days, 
one more project will come into doubt that is being concluded by 
the government with the support of the president--a contract for 
the development of the very large Kumtor gold field. In the 
president's opinion, the break with Kameko [name as 
transliterated]--a Canadian firm--promises the republic a lot of 
unpleasantness. In addition to the fact that it will be 
necessary to pay a huge penalty to the firm, Kyrgyzstan's 
authority will be fundamentally tarnished. Information 
concerning the fact that the firm is already investing resources 
in the uranium production of a neighboring republic sounded like 
an alarm bell for the defenders of the Kameko project. However, 
Kameko is associated with Seabeco. And everyone knows this. 
Among the opponents of the president, political considerations 
will dominate over common sense. 
  Personnel policy will also seriously let A. Akayev down. In 
the opinion of many, the staffs of the president and the 
government are insufficiently professional, not to mention the 
managers in the localities. In the opinion of Professor N. 
Eshmambetov, an assistant to A. Akayev for economics, the 
intellectual level of the staff leaves a lot to be desired. 
  These are the starting positions in which the real aspirants 
to the second successive post of president of Kyrgyzstan find 
themselves. Of course, many are disturbed by the fact that the 
current president, speaker, and prime minister are natives of 
the Chuiskiy Valley. But it is easy to correct this reality. In 
the event of a victory of one of them, the three branches of 
power--presidential, legislative, and executive--simply will be 
divided among the three largest regions of the 
republic--Chuiskiy--Talasskiy, Issyk-Kulsko--Narynskiy, and 
Osha--Dzhalal-Abadskiy. 
  It is impossible today to say unequivocally who will become 
the next head of state. But fortune will smile on the one of 
them who uses the remaining period to maximum advantage for 
himself. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47078 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94078" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   20 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> UZBEKISTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ambassador Views Relations With Russia </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ambassador Views Relations With Russia </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1447A Moscow ROSSIYA in Russian No 22, 8-14 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1447A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Kedrov: "Russians and Uzbeks--Brothers </F>
Forever"] 
  [Text] "...Uzbekistan cannot imagine itself 
without Russia. And this aspiration to come closer together 
manifests itself not only in economics. It may be said without 
exaggeration that there is a mutual attraction in categories 
such as spirituality and morality." These words spoken by Uzbek 
President Islam Karimov can be considered to be the leitmotif of 
the speech given by Bakhtiyar Hamidov, a deputy prime minister 
of the government of Uzbekistan, at the republic's embassy in 
Moscow. 
  The economic reform that was started in the republic in 
March 
of this year promoted further reinforcement of Uzbek-Russian 
ties. Besides relations at the state level, direct mutual 
relations between goods manufacturers are acquiring increasingly 
greater significance in the economic sphere, noted the Uzbek 
deputy prime minister. Moreover Uzbekistan and Russia have moved 
away from the principle of barter, and all commodity turnover is 
now proceeding according to world prices. 
  The important guest advised that famous Uzbek vegetables and 
fruits no longer receive any attention at all from Russian trade 
organizations and firms, which prefer to buy such products, 
often of lower quality, from countries of the far abroad. By the 
way, the blame for this lies to an equal degree with both Uzbek 
producers and marketing specialists, who haven't yet recovered 
from destruction of the traditional interrepublican ties as a 
result of the Union's disintegration. However, the process of 
their recovery is gradually increasing in tempo. 
  Developing in a situation of stability and security, 
Uzbekistan has avoided the numerous problems that arose in most 
states in the post-Soviet period. It is especially gratifying 
that manifestations of interethnic enmity are practically absent 
in the republic; this is one of the few parts of the former USSR 
where Russians continue to live and work in peace. The line 
toward strengthening interethnic peace and harmony is being 
pursued to the fullest extent possible by the Uzbek leadership. 
  In this connection something needs to be said about the 
great 
and active work being done in Moscow by the embassy of the 
Republic of Uzbekistan to strengthen the knots of friendship 
between our peoples. The republic's ambassador Yusif Abdullayev, 
an energetic, broadly educated and sympathetic person, is 
playing far from the last role in this noble effort. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47079 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94079" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> UZBEKISTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Protocol Signed With FRG on Cooperation in Economic, Other </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Protocol Signed With FRG on Cooperation in Economic, Other </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Spheres 

<F P=102>   944K1442A Tashkent PRAVDA VOSTOKA in Russian 14 May 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1442A </F>
<F P=104>  Tashkent PRAVDA VOSTOKA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "Bernard Schweiger: We've Found Dependable </F>
Friends"] 
  [Text] The final phase of negotiations on economic 
cooperation between representatives of the government of the 
Republic of Uzbekistan and a delegation from the FRG Ministry 
for Economic Cooperation and Development was conducted on 13 May 
in the Cabinet of Ministers of the Republic of Uzbekistan. 
  As we know, this delegation, which was headed by Bernard 
Schweiger, spent the week in our country. Members of the 
delegation acquainted themselves with the work of the first 
Uzbek-German joint ventures, and with the activity of different 
ministries and departments. The members of the delegation also 
visited Bukhara, Urgench, Khiva and Nukus. 
  The results of the meetings and negotiations were 
generalized 
in the Cabinet of Ministers. A final intergovernmental protocol 
and an agreement on financial and technical cooperation were 
signed. The documents were signed in behalf of the Uzbek 
government by republic Deputy Prime Minister Utkur Sultanov, and 
in behalf of the German delegation by Bernard Schweiger. 
  The protocol foresees cooperation in areas such as research 
and personal training, joint agricultural projects, improvement 
of the communication system, reconstruction of the airport in 
Tashkent, and assistance in public health. 
  "We found some warm and dependable people here," said the 
leader of the German delegation on the last day of the talks. 
"My hope is that our friendship will grow stronger not only in 
words but also in specific deeds. The documents that were signed 
today on strengthening our cooperation are aimed at this." 
  German Ambassador Extraordinary and Plenipotentiary to 
Uzbekistan Doctor Karl Heinz Kuna [transliteration] participated 
in the signing ceremony. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47080 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94080" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> UZBEKISTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ambassador on Relations With Japan </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ambassador on Relations With Japan </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1442B Tashkent PRAVDA VOSTOKA in Russian 14 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1442B </F>
<F P=104>  Tashkent PRAVDA VOSTOKA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Japanese Ambassador Extraordinary and </F>
Plenipotentiary to the Republic of Uzbekistan Ukeru Magosaki by 
Gulom Mirzo; place and date of interview not given: "Ukeru 
Magosaki: Our Cooperation Began in the Distant Past"] 
  [Text] In the second half of May Uzbek President Islam 
Karimov made an official visit to Japan. 
  Uzbekistan devotes considerable attention to the problems of 
developing diverse ties with Japan, which is considered to be 
one of the most highly developed countries in the world. Japan 
in turn considers our republic to be a state with which mutually 
advantageous cooperation would be worthwhile. The history of 
cultural ties between our peoples extends far into the past, but 
diplomatic relations were not established between Japan and 
independent Uzbekistan until early 1993. An embassy of this 
country is now operating in Tashkent. On the eve of Islam 
Karimov's visit to Tokyo, this UzA correspondent asked a number 
of questions of Ukeru Magosaki, the Japanese ambassador 
extraordinary and plenipotentiary to the Republic of Uzbekistan. 
  [Mirzo] Mr. Ambassador, 7 June will be exactly a year from 
the time that you presented your credentials to the president of 
our republic. What work has been done since then to develop 
cooperation between our countries? 
  [Magosaki] What I find most gratifying is that talks are 
proceeding successfully in a diversity directions. I'm referring 
to visits by more than 20 delegations to Uzbekistan consisting 
of specialists from different sectors of the Japanese economy, 
and at long last, the official visit to be made to our country 
by President Islam Karimov. Japan is preparing to receive him at 
the highest level. Your methods of managing the economy are 
highly valued by the Japanese. In particular, one of your 
principles of establishing a market economy is that economic 
reforms are initiated and implemented by the state. We ourselves 
passed through this phase some time ago as well. We know from 
our own experience that it is impossible to achieve positive 
changes in the economy in the first stage without a plan and 
without unified leadership. 
  [Mirzo] Please tell us briefly about the political changes 
in 
your country. 
  [Magosaki] Until recently there were two major parties of a 
capitalist and a socialist orientation in Japan, which waged a 
struggle for power. The end of the cold war had a positive 
effect upon Japan's foreign and domestic policy. The struggle 
between the two parties faded into the past. Our country is now 
adhering to a new direction in domestic policy, one based on a 
multiparty system. From this day forward the government is to be 
headed by a unified coalition bringing together all parties in 
the country. Of course, change in the composition of this 
coalition is a fully natural phenomenon in the transitional 
period. You are aware that Tsutomu Hata was recently elected 
prime minister in place of Morihiro Hosakawa, who recently 
retired. New ministers have been appointed. My hope is that the 
newly formed government will work productively in behalf of 
progress in our country, and to raise the welfare of our people. 
  [Mirzo] What is the new government's attitude toward states 
of Central Asia, and particular toward development of relations 
with Uzbekistan? 
  [Magosaki] Japan is perpetually concerned with problems of 
mutual relations with Central Asian states. Our prime minister 
understands well the significance of Central Asian states 
because, among other things, he had worked previously in the 
office of foreign affairs minister. The fact that our new 
government made its first official invitation to the president 
of Uzbekistan, Mr. Islam Karimov, is clear evidence of this. 
  [Mirzo] What can you say about the forthcoming visit by the 
head of Uzbekistan to Japan? 
  [Magosaki] The visit to Japan by the leader of your republic 
will doubtlessly open up new possibilities for industrialists, 
bankers, and businessmen of our country. We anticipate signing 
of intergovernment documents in a number of areas of bilateral 
cooperation. During his visit President Islam Karimov will 
conduct talks with Prime Minister Tsutomu Hata, and he will be 
received by Emperor Akihito. In Japan, Mr. Islam Karimov is 
known not only as the president of the Uzbek Republic but also 
as one of the region's major political figures. We are very 
interested in the opinion of your country's president regarding 
the current situation in Central Asia, Uzbekistan's mutual 
relations with Russia, the situation in Tajikistan and 
Afghanistan, and Islamic fundamentalism. Consequently the 
Japanese are impatiently waiting to meet Islam Karimov as an 
authoritative and experience politician capable of objectively 
assessing the situation. 
  [Mirzo] Mr. Ambassador, our compatriots have a rather full 
understanding of your country and its people. But what do 
Japanese know about Uzbekistan, about Uzbeks? 
  [Magosaki] As you yourself said, our diplomatic relations 
were established around a year ago. However, the knots of 
cooperation between Japan and your country were tied back in the 
7th and 8th centuries. Friendly ties between our peoples were 
established in that distant past through the Great Silk Route. 
It is no surprise that during his trip to Japan Islam Karimov 
will visit our emperor's personal museum, which contains unique 
articles associated with the Great Silk Route, and ancient 
relics left to us by your ancestors. Uzbeks are known in Japan 
as an ancient people whose roots extend deep into the past, as a 
people with a great future. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47081 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94081" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> UZBEKISTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Law on Foreign Investment, Guarantee of Foreign Investment </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Law on Foreign Investment, Guarantee of Foreign Investment </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Activities 
<H4>    Text of Law </H4>

<F P=102> 944K1417A Tashkent PRAVDA VOSTOKA in Russian 14 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1417A </F>
<F P=104>  Tashkent PRAVDA VOSTOKA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Text of Law "On Foreign Investments and Guarantees of the </F>
Activity of Foreign Investors"] 
  [Text] This Law defines the legal and 
organizational-economic foundations and procedure for carrying 
out foreign investments on the territory of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan. The Law provides guarantees for the efficient 
activity of foreign investors and is focused on attracting and 
rationally using foreign financial, material, intellectual, and 
other resources and contemporary foreign technology and 
administrative experience in order to help develop the Republic 
of Uzbekistan's economy and help integrate it into the world 
economic system. 
<H5>  Article 1. Foreign Investors </H5>
  The following may be foreign investors in the Republic of 
Uzbekistan: 
  foreign states; 
  foreign legal persons; 
  international organizations; 
  foreign citizens, associations of citizens, and persons 
without citizenship; 
  citizens of the Republic of Uzbekistan who are living 
abroad permanently. 
<H5>  Article 2. Foreign Investments </H5>
  Foreign investments include all types of valuable property 
and rights to it as well as the rights to intellectual property 
invested by foreign investors in objects of entrepreneurial and 
other types of activity for the purpose of obtaining profit 
(income). 
  No change in the form in which the property is invested 
initially or a second time causes a change in its classification 
as an investment. 
<H5>  Article 3. Forms for Making Foreign Investments </H5>
  Foreign investors may carry out investments on the Republic 
of Uzbekistan's territory in the following ways: 
  through share participation in companies and partnerships, 
banks, insurance organizations, and other enterprises created 
together with legal and physical persons of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan; 
  through creation of companies and partnerships, banks, 
insurance organizations, and other enterprises which belong 
entirely to the investors; 
  through the acquisition of property, stock, and other 
securities; 
  through the acquisition independently or with the 
participation of legal and physical persons of property rights, 
including the right to possess and use land (including on a 
leased basis) and natural resources. 
<H5>  Article 4. Enterprises with Foreign Investments </H5>
  Enterprises with foreign investments on the Republic of 
Uzbekistan's territory are enterprises in which foreign 
investments make up at least 10 percent of the stock (shares) or 
capital stock. They operate in any organizational-legal form 
which does not contradict the legislation of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan. 
  An enterprise with foreign investments may be created either 
by its founding, as a result of a foreign investor acquiring a 
participating share (or stock) in an enterprise created earlier 
without foreign investments, or by his acquiring such an 
enterprise in full, and this includes during the process of 
privatization. 
  An enterprise with foreign investments must be registered at 
the Republic of Uzbekistan Ministry of Finance and acquires the 
rights of a legal person the moment it is registered. 
<H5>  Article 5. Branches and Offices of Enterprises with Foreign </H5>
Investments 
  An enterprise with foreign investments may set up subsidiary 
enterprises or branches with the rights of a legal person or 
offices and other separate subdivisions which are not legal 
persons on the Republic of Uzbekistan's territory in compliance 
with the requirements of this Law. 
  Branches, offices, and other separate subdivisions of 
enterprises with foreign investments may be set up outside the 
borders of the Republic of Uzbekistan. 
<H5>  Article 6. Economic Associations of Enterprises </H5>
  Enterprises with foreign investments in accordance with 
legislation of the Republic of Uzbekistan may on voluntary 
principles set up economic associations, concerns, consortiums, 
and other associations on the Republic of Uzbekistan's territory. 
<H5>  Article 7. The Legal Status of Foreign Investments </H5>
  Foreign investments in the Republic of Uzbekistan have state 
legal protection. The legal status of foreign investments cannot 
be less favorable than the corresponding status for comparable 
legal and physical persons of the Republic of Uzbekistan. 
  By legislation of the Republic of Uzbekistan, additional 
privileges may be established for foreign investors directing 
investments to priority sectors of the economy and regions. 
<H5>  Article 8. Types of Activity </H5>
  Foreign investors and enterprises with foreign investments 
may carry out all types of activity which are not prohibited by 
legislative enactments of the Republic of Uzbekistan and conform 
to the goals envisioned in the charters of these enterprises. 
  To carry out types of activity which in accordance with 
legislative enactments of the Republic of Uzbekistan must be 
licensed, a foreign investor must receive a license following 
procedures defined by the Republic of Uzbekistan Cabinet of 
Ministers. 
<H5>  Article 9. The Rights of Foreign Investors </H5>
  A foreign investor independently determines the volumes, 
types, and focus of investments made and at his own discretion 
attracts legal and physical persons to realize the investments. 
  A foreign investor has the right to possess, use, and 
dispose 
of objects and results of investments, including reinvestments 
and trade transactions on the territory of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan and outside its borders, in accordance with the norms 
of international law and legislation of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan. 
  By decision of the foreign investor, the rights to possess, 
use, and dispose of investments and their results may be 
transferred to other legal and physical persons following 
procedures established by legislation of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan. Interrelations of the parties in the transfer of 
rights are regulated by them on a contract basis. 
<H5>  Article 10. Obligations of Foreign Investors </H5>
  Foreign investors must do the following when carrying out 
investment activity: 
  conform to legislation in effect on the territory of the 
Republic of Uzbekistan; 
  pay taxes and make other payments in accordance with 
legislation of the Republic of Uzbekistan; 
  obtain findings of expert studies on investment projects 
as to compliance with sanitary-hygienic, economic, and other 
requirements stemming from legislation of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan. 
<H5>  Article 11. Guarantees of the Rights of Foreign Investors </H5>
  The Republic of Uzbekistan guarantees protection of the 
rights of foreign investors when carrying out investment 
activity on the republic's territory in accordance with 
generally accepted norms of international law. 
  In the event subsequent legislation of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan worsens conditions for investing, the legislation in 
effect at the time the investments were made is applied to the 
foreign investments for no more than 10 years. This requirement 
does not apply to a change in legislation related to ensuring 
defense, national security, or public order or protecting the 
environment. 
  In the event the state organs of the Republic of Uzbekistan 
adopt normative enactments which violate the rights of foreign 
investors, the losses incurred are reimbursed by these organs on 
a judicial basis. 
  State organs and their officials have no right to intervene 
in the economic activity of foreign investors which is carried 
out in accordance with legislation of the Republic of Uzbekistan. 
<H5>  Article 12. Guarantees Against Nationalization and </H5>
Requisition 
  Foreign investments in the Republic of Uzbekistan are not 
subject to nationalization. 
  Foreign investments are not subject to requisition, with the 
exception of cases of natural disasters, accidents, epidemics, 
and epizootic diseases. The decision on requisition is made by 
the Republic of Uzbekistan Cabinet of Ministers. Compensation 
paid to the foreign investor in these cases must be equal to the 
damages incurred. 
<H5>  Article 13. Guarantees on the Transfer of Profit in Foreign </H5>
Currency 
  Foreign investors are guaranteed that their profits and 
other 
capital in foreign currency obtained as a result of legal 
activity can be transferred abroad without any restrictions. 
<H5>  Article 14. Guarantees on the Use of Profits </H5>
  The profits of foreign investors obtained in the Republic of 
Uzbekistan may be reinvested on the republic's territory or used 
in another way at the owner's discretion. Foreign investors may 
have accounts in any currency without restriction in the 
republic's banks. 
  Foreign investors may use capital in the national monetary 
unit in their accounts to acquire foreign currency on the 
domestic currency market. 
<H5>  Article 15. Insurance Protection for Foreign Investments </H5>
  The insuring of foreign investments and risks of foreign 
investors is done on a voluntary basis. 
  Insurance protection of foreign investments in the Republic 
of Uzbekistan is provided by a system of insurance which 
includes the Republic of Uzbekistan National Insurance Company, 
which is the official state insurance agent, and joint insurance 
companies with the participation of foreign insurance 
organizations. 
  Insurance organizations which insure foreign investments are 
not responsible for the obligations of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan. The Republic of Uzbekistan is not responsible for 
the obligations of insurance organizations, except in cases 
stipulated in the parties' agreement. 
  The system of insurance of foreign investments insures 
foreign investors against the following: 
  expropriation of property or any legislative or other 
administrative measure resulting in the confiscation of property 
or loss of control over it or income obtained from it, other 
than generally applied nondiscriminatory measures the country 
introduces to regulate economic activity on its territory; 
  war or civil disturbances; 
  intervention of the country's authorities in contract 
relations of the insurance organization and the investor; 
  introduction by the country's authorities of restrictions 
on converting the national currency into other currencies and 
transferring it outside the country's borders; 
  introduction of new statutes which are discriminatory in 
relation to certain groups of investors; 
  other types of risks. 
  Insurance protection of the activity of foreign investors is 
supported by the assets of the insurance organizations, some of 
which may be located in foreign banks, and guarantees foreign 
investors comprehensive protection of their investments. 
<H5>  Article 16. Currency Self-Sufficiency ["samookupayemost"] </H5>
  All the expenditures enterprises with foreign investments 
make in foreign currency must be done with their own foreign 
currency revenue or through other sources for obtaining foreign 
currency permitted by legislation of the Republic of Uzbekistan. 
Their currency self-sufficiency may also be provided within the 
framework of associations, consortiums, and other organizational 
structures being created. 
<H5>  Article 17. The Export and Import of Output </H5>
  An enterprise with foreign investments has the right to 
export output it has produced itself and to import output for 
its own production needs without a license, in accordance with 
legislation of the Republic of Uzbekistan. The list of output it 
produces to be exported and the output imported by enterprises 
for their own needs is established by the Republic of Uzbekistan 
Cabinet of Ministers. 
  Currency receipts from exporting output the enterprise 
produces itself is fully owned by the enterprise after 
established taxes and other payments have been paid. 
<H5>  Article 18. Customs Charges </H5>
  Property imported into the Republic of Uzbekistan for 
in-house production needs and for the personal needs of foreign 
employees of enterprises with foreign investments is exempt from 
paying customs duties. 
<H5>  Article 19. Taxation </H5>
  Enterprises with foreign investments as well as foreign 
investors pay taxes and other payments in accordance with 
legislation of the Republic of Uzbekistan. 
<H5>  Article 20. Control Over the Activity of Enterprises with </H5>
Foreign Investments 
  Within the limits of their authority, tax and other state 
organs with specialized control functions provide monitoring of 
compliance by enterprises with foreign investments of the 
requirements of existing legislation of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan. 
  Enterprises submit the information on their activity needed 
for monitoring to these organs. The control organ must keep a 
trade secret safe. Divulging a trade secret is prosecuted under 
the law. 
<H5>  Article 21. Accounting and Reporting </H5>
  An enterprise with foreign investments does its accounting 
and reporting following the procedures established by existing 
legislation of the Republic of Uzbekistan. 
<H5>  Article 22. Securing Obligations </H5>
  An enterprise with foreign investments may use its property 
to secure all types of its obligations, including the attraction 
of loan capital. Its property rights to buildings, structures, 
and equipment as well as other property rights, with the 
exception of the right to possess and use land and other natural 
resources, may act as security. 
<H5>  Article 23. Intellectual Property </H5>
  Enterprises with foreign investments conclude contracts with 
their employees regarding objects of intellectual ownership 
created in accordance with the tasks affirmed by the 
enterprise's documentation. 
  Enterprises with foreign investments patent inventions and 
introduce industrial models following procedures established by 
the legislation of the Republic of Uzbekistan. 
<H5>  Article 24. Labor Relations </H5>
  Labor relations of employees of enterprises with foreign 
investments are regulated by legislation of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan. 
<H5>  Article 25. Hiring Foreign Employees </H5>
  Foreign citizens may be among the workers and employees of 
enterprises with foreign investments, its administration, and 
members of the supervisory council. 
  Questions of labor payment, vacations, and pension support 
of 
foreign employees of enterprises with foreign investments should 
be resolved in individual labor agreements (contracts) with each 
of them. The wages of these employees and other income obtained 
legally may be transferred by them to other states without any 
restrictions. 
<H5>  Article 26. Social Insurance and Security </H5>
  Social insurance of employees of an enterprise with foreign 
investments and their social security (with the exception of 
pension support of foreign employees) are regulated by 
legislation of the Republic of Uzbekistan. 
  An enterprise with foreign investments transfers capital in 
hard currency for pension support of foreign employees to the 
appropriate funds of the countries where those employees reside 
permanently. 
  An enterprise with foreign investments makes deductions for 
state social insurance of employees of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan and foreign employees and deductions for pension 
support of employees of the Republic of Uzbekistan in accordance 
with existing legislation. 
<H5>  Article 27. Funds of Enterprises with Foreign Investments </H5>
  Enterprises with foreign investments independently establish 
the list and procedures for forming and using the enterprise's 
funds. 
<H5>  Article 28. Reorganization and Liquidation </H5>
  An enterprise with foreign investments may be reorganized or 
liquidated independently following procedures envisioned by 
legislation of the Republic of Uzbekistan. 
  The assets of an enterprise with foreign investments are 
taxable at their real value when the enterprise is liquidated. 
The rest is distributed among the participants in the enterprise 
with foreign investments proportional to their share in the 
enterprise's property, unless the charter documents envision 
otherwise. 
  When an enterprise with foreign investments is reorganized 
or 
liquidated, the employees discharged are guaranteed that their 
rights and interests will be maintained in accordance with 
legislation. 
<H5>  Article 29. Division of Property Upon Withdrawal from an </H5>
Enterprise with Foreign Investments 
  In the event a foreign investor withdraws from an enterprise 
with foreign investments or this enterprise is liquidated, he 
receives the right to the return of his share in the 
enterprise's property in monetary or commodity form in 
accordance with market value. And other participants are granted 
the right to acquire the share of the foreign participant who is 
part of the enterprise with foreign investments. 
<H5>  Article 30. Acquisition by Foreign Investors of the Right To </H5>
Use Land 
  Foreign investors and enterprises with foreign investments 
may be offered land to lease for a term envisioned by the 
conditions of the contract. 
  When the right of ownership to buildings and structures is 
transferred, along with these objects the right to use the land 
parcel is transferred as well, following the procedures and 
conditions established by legislation of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan. 
<H5>  Article 31. Leasing </H5>
  The leasing of property to foreign investors is carried out 
by the lessor on the basis of contracts and in accordance with 
legislation. 
<H5>  Article 32. Concessionary Contracts </H5>
  Foreign investors are granted concessions to prospect, mine, 
and exploit natural resources and conduct other economic 
activity on the basis of concessionary contracts concluded by 
the foreign investors with authorized organs of state government 
of the Republic of Uzbekistan following procedures defined by 
legislation. 
  Concessions are allowed in all spheres and types of 
activity, 
if they are not prohibited by legislation of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan and satisfy the objectives of the concessionary 
contracts concluded. 
<H5>  Article 33. The Procedure for Reviewing Disputes </H5>
  Disputes between foreign investors and state organs of the 
Republic of Uzbekistan are subject to review in the courts of 
the Republic of Uzbekistan, unless international treaties and 
agreements of the Republic of Uzbekistan envision otherwise. 
  Disputes of foreign investors and enterprises with foreign 
investments with enterprises, public associations, and other 
legal and physical persons of the Republic of Uzbekistan and 
disputes between investors and enterprises with foreign 
investments on issues involving their activity are subject to 
review in the administrative courts of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan or, by agreement of the parties, in arbitration 
tribunals abroad. 
<H5>  Article 34. International Treaties and Agreements </H5>
  If international treaties and agreements of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan have established provisions other than those 
envisioned by legislation of the Republic of Uzbekistan on 
foreign investments, the provisions of the international treaty 
or agreement apply. 
  President of the Republic of Uzbekistan, I. Karimov 
  City of Tashkent 5 May 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47082 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94082" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> UZBEKISTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Law on Foreign Investment, Guarantee of Foreign Investment </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Law on Foreign Investment, Guarantee of Foreign Investment </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Activities 
<H4>    Decree on Implementation </H4>

<F P=102> 944K1417B Tashkent PRAVDA VOSTOKA in Russian 14 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1417B </F>
<F P=104>  Tashkent PRAVDA VOSTOKA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Text of the Republic of Uzbekistan Supreme Soviet Decree </F>
"On Putting the Republic of Uzbekistan Law `On Foreign 
Investments and Guarantees of the Activity of Foreign Investors' 
into Effect"] 
  [Text] The Republic of Uzbekistan Supreme Soviet 
decrees the following: 
  1. Put the Republic of Uzbekistan Law "On Foreign 
Investments 
and Guarantees of the Activity of Foreign Investors" into effect 
the day it is published. 
  The Republic of Uzbekistan Cabinet of Ministers must do the 
following: 
  submit proposals on bringing legislative enactments into 
line with the Law "On Foreign Investments and Guarantees of the 
Activity of Foreign Investors" to the Republic of Uzbekistan 
Supreme Soviet; 
  bring the decisions of the Government into line with the 
Republic of Uzbekistan Law "On Foreign Investments and 
Guarantees of the Activity of Foreign Investors" and ensure that 
the republic's ministries, state committees, and departments 
repeal and revise their normative enactments which contradict 
this Law. 
  3. Declare the laws of the Republic of Uzbekistan of 14 June 
1991 "On Foreign Investments in the Republic of Uzbekistan" and 
of 2 July 1992 "On Making Amendments and Additions to the 
Republic of Uzbekistan Law 'On Foreign Investments in the 
Republic of Uzbekistan'" to have lost their legal force. 
  Acting chairman of the Republic of Uzbekistan Supreme 
Soviet, 
E. Khalilov 
  City of Tashkent 5 May 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47083 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94038" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   13 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> GEORGIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Periodical To Focus on Rural Concerns </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New Periodical To Focus on Rural Concerns </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1436C Tbilisi SAKARTVELOS RESPUBLIKA in Georgian 13 Apr 
94 p 4 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1436C </F>
<F P=104>  Tbilisi SAKARTVELOS RESPUBLIKA </F>
<F P=105>  Georgian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unsigned item under the rubric "A New Newspaper": "As an </F>
Aid to the Georgian Village"] 
  [Text] Helping and aiding the troubled Georgian village is 
the patriotic and noble mission that has been undertaken by the 
newly formed Georgian Village Society (Professor Bidzina 
Sardzhveladze, president). Its purpose is to unite the efforts 
of anyone who cares in order to help the village get on its 
feet. This aim is promoted by the Society's newspaper KARTULI 
SOPELI [Georgian Village] (Vaso Kasradze, editor), the first 
edition of which came out the other day. 
  The lead article on the first page presents the program by 
which the newspaper promises anyone concerned about the village 
to regularly discuss relevant themes. The editors anticipate 
that both farmers and specialists will need advice, help, and 
relevant information in order to deal with specific problems. 
This will be offered to readers under rubrics such as "Theme of 
the Week," "Commentary," "News From the Villages," "Market 
Prices," "The Hard Working Farmer," "Letters to KARTULI SOPELI," 
"A Scientist's Opinion," "What's New in Legislation," "Questions 
and Answers," "Chronicle of the Life of Business Circles," 
"Stock Exchange News," "Prices," and "The Family Purse." 
  The newspaper also intends to pay special attention to offer 
advice on taking care of orchards, vineyards, field crops, 
plantations, and livestock sections, advice which will be useful 
to readers through the years. In this way it emphasizes that it 
wants to be as practical and useful as possible and help its 
readers solve their problems. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47084 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94039" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   13 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> GEORGIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Businessmen Appeal to Shevardnadze on Restrictions </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Businessmen Appeal to Shevardnadze on Restrictions </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1436A Tbilisi SAKARTVELOS RESPUBLIKA in Georgian 13 Apr 
94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1436A </F>
<F P=104>  Tbilisi SAKARTVELOS RESPUBLIKA </F>
<F P=105>  Georgian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Open letter to Shevardnadze from Brokers Guild and National </F>
Union of Free Entrepreneurs of Georgia: "When Entrepreneurs Are 
Unfairly Restricted.... An Open Letter to the Head of State of 
the Republic of Georgia"] 
  [Text] The extremely harsh and hostile policy that has been 
conducted toward commercial structures lately compels us to 
write this open letter to you as the Head of State of the 
Republic of Georgia. 
  At a time when the republic is experiencing an economic 
crisis, declining production, inflation, and a declining 
standard of living, there are certain state bodies which, 
through their unthinking actions, are further aggravating the 
situation. They are making decisions whose aim is to restrict 
the activity of commercial structures. This can hardly fail to 
cause concern among entrepreneurs, most of whom are trying to 
help the country improve the economic situation. 
  Article 10 of the 25 July 1991 Republic of Georgia Law "On 
the Principles of Business Activity" states specifically that 
the entrepreneur shall be independent in his activity. State 
intervention in the entrepreneur's activity is not permitted 
except in cases stipulated by laws of the Republic of Georgia. 
The state is the guarantor of protection of the rights and 
lawful interests of entrepreneurs in Georgia. 
  Unfortunately, things happen differently in practice. The 
entrepreneur is unfairly restricted in his commercial activity, 
but the state does not protect him. 
  In particular, not only has the state failed to create the 
necessary elementary conditions for the normal existence and 
development of business activity, conditions such as 
communications, swift and reliable banking transactions, 
supplies of electricity, functioning transportation, protection 
against criminal elements, and so on, but in fact has, through 
frequent unlawful intervention by its official agencies, 
actually harmed entrepreneurs. 
  On 26 March 1993, the National Bank of the Republic of 
Georgia made a decision which prohibits the sale of cash 
currency via cashless transaction. The Caucasian Stock Exchange, 
as a law-abiding organization, complied with the requirements of 
this document, but it appealed to the Republic of Georgia 
Parliament, Cabinet of Ministers, Procuracy, and other bodies to 
act to overturn the above-mentioned unlawful decision of the 
National Bank, because that decision only served the narrow 
interests of the National Bank and the personal interests of 
some of its official. Given the rate of hyperinflation, if the 
National Bank cannot guarantee swift cashless transactions and 
they take several banking days, sales and purchases of currency 
via cashless transaction make no sense at all. Add to this the 
fact that the National Bank prohibits the removal, for business 
needs, of any currency that winds up in a currency account via 
cashless transactions (it is permitted only for travel), and it 
is clear why entrepreneurs benefit from purchasing currency via 
cashless transactions while the National Bank benefits from 
prohibiting them. Again, add to this the fact that the volume of 
these transactions on the Caucasian Stock Exchange ran as high 
as several tens of millions of rubles and several tens of 
thousands of dollars as a result of legal trading, and it is 
clear that, after it was banned, the state budget and the 
Caucasian Stock Exchange lost the chance to earn considerable 
income. 
  Unfortunately, the state has taken a year now to react to 
the 
considerable damage inflicted on itself and on business 
structures, damage which has been caused by the unlawful 
decision (No. 2/4, 26 March 1993) of the Board of the National 
Bank of the Republic of Georgia. Let us note that according to 
the Republic of Georgia General Procurator's 17 May 1993 
Representation (No. 7-8 g-1993) on eliminating violations of 
laws regulating and licensing currency transactions, the 
aforementioned decision by the Board of the National Bank was 
ruled unlawful and was to be brought into compliance with the 
law within one month, but in vain. 
  Batono Eduard! We appeal to you in the hope that measures 
will be taken and competent bodies will be ordered to study the 
issue in greater depth and resolve it on legal principles 
reflecting the republic's interests. 
  We are confident that your intervention will produce 
positive 
results. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47085 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94040" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   13 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> GEORGIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ajarian Official Outlines Batumi Potential </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Ajarian Official Outlines Batumi Potential </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1436B Tbilisi SAKARTVELOS RESPUBLIKA in Georgian 13 Apr 
94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1436B </F>
<F P=104>  Tbilisi SAKARTVELOS RESPUBLIKA </F>
<F P=105>  Georgian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Ajarian First Deputy Industry Minister Tamaz </F>
Bolkvadze by Givi Tevzadze under the rubric "The Economy: 
Problems and Prospects": "If We Put Our Heart in It"; place and 
date not given] 
  [Text] For decades, not only guests from foreign 
lands but even Georgians who have come here to vacation by the 
sea have considered Batumi and Ajaria as a whole strictly a 
resort oasis, with only a tourist's eye for the dawn-to-dusk 
blazing sunshine and the soothing waves, viewing this blessed 
nook of Georgia as just a place of sea, citrus, and 
relaxation. 
  Thus, except for a narrow circle of persons concerned 
with their official duties, few people have thought about the 
fact that Ajaria is a major artery of Georgia's industry, whose 
vigorous pulse has a great deal to do with the republic's 
economic potential. 
  Now that Georgia's economic sectors, including 
industry, are having a hard time of it, it may be of interest to 
take a look at the problems of the autonomous republic's 
enterprises; for this purpose we interviewed Ajarian First 
Deputy Industry Minister Tamaz Bolkvadze. 
  [Tevzadze] Batono Tamaz, in these times of warped political 
and economic conditions, when the country faces difficult 
problems, Ajaria is most often cited as an example of stability, 
calm, and relatively better economic conditions. In this 
context, how are things now in the autonomous republic's 
industrial sphere, despite the fact that many of Georgia's major 
enterprises are now at a standstill? 
  [Bolkvadze] Despite the difficult political and economic 
situation, a number of Ajaria's industrial sectors have done a 
certain amount of work and taken very useful--even bold--steps 
in order to meet the forecast targets on time. 
  But in order to show that these are not just empty words, I 
will cite some figures. In 1993 we produced 100.5 billion 
coupons worth of commercial output (in comparable prices) and 
manufactured 7.2 billion coupons worth of various kinds of 
goods. The construction and repair administration completed 81.3 
million coupons worth of project work. Also last year, 13.7 
billion coupons worth of goods were shipped to consumers. That 
figure includes 5.5 billion coupons worth of goods shipped 
outside the republic. A total of 462.3 million coupons worth of 
various kinds of items were shipped on the basis of 
inter-governmental agreements. 
  [Tevzadze] You probably have a number of problems as well. 
What obstacles do you encounter? 
  [Bolkvadze] The basic reasons for declining production 
volumes are difficulties in supplies of materials, raw 
materials, and energy. I guess it would be useful to cite some 
facts. Last year our enterprises only obtained 630 tonnes of 
rolled metal stock from various sources, versus our requirements 
of 10,000 tonnes. Again, we obtained 51 tonnes of nonferrous 
metal instead of 950 tonnes. We also got much less than we 
needed of particle and fiber board, fabrics, and so on. As a 
result, our enterprises were not even able to work at half 
capacity throughout the year. Not only that, but some of them 
stood altogether idle for a long time. 
  In addition, problems in transportation brought it about 
that 
large amounts of finished goods piled up in enterprise 
warehouses. By January 1994, 166.9 billion coupons worth of 
finished goods had been charged to production establishments, 
including major enterprises such as the electromechanical, 
shipbuilding, machine building, and transformer plants. 
  Despite our difficulties, most of our enterprises managed to 
earn the profits called for in the forecast, but some of them 
are in an unsatisfactory financial position. 
  [Tevzadze] What is the Ministry doing to rectify the 
situation, and what help are you getting from the autonomous 
republic's leaders? 
  [Bolkvadze] Almost all the credit for the fact that Ajaria 
is 
in a comparatively better position than Georgia's other regions 
today goes to the republic's leadership, in particular Ajarian 
Supreme Council Chairman Batoni Aslan Abashidze. 
  As for our Ministry, it is working intensively to attract 
investments. Here again, Abashidze's prestige and efforts have 
helped us greatly. It was at his initiative and personal 
invitation that Ajaria was visited by British experts who helped 
us prepare investment projects. The projects were translated 
into Russian and English and distributed to client enterprises 
in accordance with sectors and enterprise potentials. Plans call 
for rebuilding and re-outfitting those enterprises, completing 
projects that have been started, forming joint enterprises, and 
so on. 
  Right now, negotiations are underway between the Batumi 
Electromechanical Plant and Bulgaria's Balkankar regarding the 
joint development of electric hoisting machines. A joint 
Russian-Georgian-Turkish enterprise, Kimikos [Chemist], has been 
formed. There is also a deal between the Batumi Sewn Goods 
Association and a British firm, by which the firm brings 
supplies and raw materials to Batumi and the factory makes the 
goods; as a result, we have already earned hard currency. 
  This year we plan to produce about 200 billion coupons worth 
of goods for which we will have to import about a billion 
Russian rubles worth of raw materials from Russia. For this 
reason, the Ajarian Autonomous Republic's Industry Ministry has 
prepared a list, which has been sent to the Republic of 
Georgia's Ministries of Industry and Material Resources for 
Trade. 
  [Tevzadze] You have mentioned Russia and the Russian ruble. 
Is your Ministry concerned with restoring business relations 
with the CIS countries? 
  [Bolkvadze] Of course. And the republic's leaders are 
helping 
us in this as well. I have mentioned the restoration of 
relations with Russia. In January, in addition, along with the 
Georgian Industry Ministry an agreement was concluded with 
Ukraine's Machine Building and Military Industrial Complex and 
Conversion ministries, Belarus's State Committee for Industry 
and Intersectorial Enterprises, and Tajikistan's Industry 
Ministry. 
  The new contacts should help us obtain sufficient supplies 
and raw materials--in particular, 8,542 tonnes of rolled ferrous 
metal, 847 tonnes of nonferrous metal, 1,200 tonnes of metal 
products, 1,000 tonnes of plastics and so on. Enterprises have 
started working to inaugurate new products in 1994. In 
particular, the Transformer Plant is working to inaugurate the 
production of new types of electroconvectors and electric 
heaters. The Electromechanical Plant is developing test models 
of a new type of enclosed 5- and 15-passenger electric vehicles. 
The Batumi Consumer Goods Machine Building Plant is doing 
preparatory work to inaugurate the production of low-power 
washing machines, series production of which is planned for the 
end of this year. The Batumi Shipbuilding Plant has begun to 
prepare the technical documentation for a new model of launch. 
  A certain amount of work is being done to use available 
material resources to renovate products. The Shipbuilding Plant 
has basically completed the development of an oceanarium. The 
Machine Building Plant is manufacturing uniform buttons, 
insignia, and chest decorations for the national army and 
Georgian police officers. The Consumer Goods Machine Building 
Plant has inaugurated the manufacture of plastic boxes. In the 
Furniture Production Association we have inaugurated the 
production of new kinds of dining room and kitchen furnishings. 
The Woodworking Plant has inaugurated the use of a local raw 
material--bamboo--to make tables, chairs, booths, and 
modern-style children's beds. The Leather Goods Plant has 
reactivated a shop which uses remnant materials to make leather 
lining goods, also a section which uses remnants to make belts, 
handbags, and watchbands. 
  In short, we are not sitting idle, and we have high hopes 
for 
the future. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47086 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94041" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> GEORGIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zugdidskiy Rayon Reconstruction, Development Plans Outlined </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Zugdidskiy Rayon Reconstruction, Development Plans Outlined </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1437A Tbilisi SAKARTVELOS RESPUBLIKA in Georgian 15 Apr 
94 pp 1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1437A </F>
<F P=104>  Tbilisi SAKARTVELOS RESPUBLIKA </F>
<F P=105>  Georgian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleko Aslanishvili and Odik Kukhilava under </F>
rubric "Report from the Emergency Zone": "The Sun Is Peeking 
Through"] 
  [Text] 2. ANYONE WHO STILL HAS FAITH IN 
TOMORROW... 
  As the saying goes, there are as many opinions as there are 
people. We were told in Zugdidi that Rayon Head Edisher 
Chargazia is a tough man. Some went so far as to say he's 
unfriendly or even crude. As it happens, we didn't get a chance 
to talk to Batoni Edisher. We did meet him, but our brief 
meeting, distinguished by impeccable courtesy, was not enough to 
say much even approximate, let alone specific, about the man, or 
rather his character. 
  The most astute observation, in our opinion, came from a 
cheerful native of the village of Tkaia: "You won't get anywhere 
being nicey-nice; it takes sternness and toughness to tidy up 
this messy rayon of ours, and just because he doesn't pat 
everybody on the head, they think he's a heavy character." 
  Indeed, the rayon head did not waste time being nice but 
swiftly kicked out the ideologues and financiers of the 
"resistance." He got rid of the managers of educational, 
cultural, and administrative bodies, retail and trade 
organizations, banks and many enterprises and establishments, 
and almost all village heads and assembly leaders who, through 
action or inaction, fostered regional destabilization and 
funneled large amounts of state and civic bodies' funds to 
followers of the ex-President. He installed new people in their 
place. 
  In Chargazia's words, "We're not fighting those who 'think 
differently,' we're fighting those who would 'differently' 
destroy the country." 
  We have already reported some of Zugdidi's destruction and 
ruination, which have impacted not only agriculture but also 
industry. Still, stabilization--despite difficulties (the 
shortage of electricity and petroleum products, the lack of raw 
materials, transportation problems, financial straits, and so 
on--has enabled Zugdidi's enterprises to resume operations. 
Programs have been worked out, local resources are being 
mobilized, old contacts are being restored, and the groundwork 
is being laid to resume full-capacity operation soon (this may 
sound a lot like officialese, but in this case we prefer it: 
officialese may be dry and bland, but it is incomparable in 
terms of conciseness). 
  In short, the people of Zugdidi (like all of Georgia's 
people) are eager somehow to get the wheel-rusted, stripped and 
looted train of industry moving again after its tracks have been 
torn up fore and aft and the rails are scattered far and wide.... 
  Zugdidi Chinaware Factory is one of the few enterprises 
which 
escaped looting and wrecking. Attempts were made on it, but not 
a single motor or machine was lost, even though the enterprise 
stood idle almost eight months. The reason is that Director Givi 
Soselia and his shop chiefs guarded it day and night with 
weapons in their hands. 
  There was a time when the shops of this only-begotten child 
of the Georgian chinaware industry employed 800 workers; now, 
only 350 are left. But in this case, that "only" actually 
represents a victory: most of the republic's industrial 
enterprises are idle, while the Zugdidi Chinaware Factory is 
working, even if only at half capacity. 
  "We resumed production in January," Batoni Givi told us. 
"People realized that this endless 'oppositionizing' and 
'national disobedience' was going to destroy the country. The 
old way of life is gone. Furthermore, the working man craves to 
work and has eventually come back. The rayon's new leadership is 
helping us in every way. No 'witch hunt' is going on, nobody is 
going to persecute you for your belief if you are not guilty of 
a crime. People have realized that the reconciliation process is 
real and deep-seated, not just empty words...." 
  Givi Soselia is a well known executive not only in the rayon 
but all over Georgia; he has almost three decades of experience 
as a manager and has been in charge of this factory for seven 
years now. He shrewdly foresaw the processes to be expected 
following the breakup of the USSR and the possibility that ties 
would be broken, and he took advance measures to stock up on raw 
materials, which are now so expensive and hard to import (96 
percent of the raw materials the Zugdidi Chinaware Factory needs 
comes in from outside; it was planned that way from the start, 
and continues to this day!); now these supplies are enough for 
the factory to operate at full capacity for two years! 
  But what then? What will it take to prevent the country from 
being exploited over imported raw materials? Then there are the 
endless crises, the destruction, hyperinflation and chaos. 
Soselia and his collective have to think about tomorrow. They 
are working with the Caucasian Mineralogical Institute and the 
Technical University's Chemistry and Geology departments to find 
ways to convert to Georgian raw materials. There are already 
some encouraging findings: in Bolnisskiy Rayon's Begtakari 
village they found a deposit of excellent kaolin, enough to last 
200 to 300 years! Hence, soon Georgian chinaware will really be 
Georgian. It is also possible that 60 to 70 percent of the 
factory's output will meet European standards. 
  The Zugdidi factory also has close ties with Germany's 
famous 
Dorset Firm, which is the leading supplier of chinaware and 
ceramics production lines to the world. The Dorset Firm has 
worked out a blueprint to rebuild the Zugdidi factory to 
accommodate the production of new items such as facing tiles and 
plumbing fixtures. German specialists will visit Georgia soon, 
and the question of further cooperation will be decided on the 
governmental level. 
  Except for plates, the Zugdidi Chinaware Factory 
manufactures 
all kinds of dishware (because of erratic electricity and the 
high price of fuel oil, it can't manufacture plates--there are 
only two big kilns operating). We saw something that is unusual 
and rare in Georgia at the present time: construction going on. 
They are building a new, temporary cafeteria on the first floor 
(the factory's excellent permanent cafeteria was blown up in 
1992--by the "resistance movement"). Every month the factory 
spends 50 million coupons so workers can buy meals at a 
discount. It may be a drop in the bucket, but it's real, it's 
progress. It shows the working man that the factory does care a 
little and is ready to help.... 
  Scant months have passed since the terrifying, chaotic 
events 
of September-October, when many no longer believed that this 
impossibly disordered country could get back on its feet, when 
the administration and no more than a handful of Zugdidian 
policemen doggedly, tirelessly stood watch over the beleaguered 
factory, so that later, after the sun broke through again, the 
state wouldn't give it up for lost. 
  So now it is working, turning out goods; Georgia's firstborn 
of chinaware is operating. Thanks are due to Batoni Givi Soselia 
and his comrades-in-arms. 
  P.S. The factory people asked us to convey their thanks 
to the Zestafoni officers of the Internal Affairs Ministry's 
Property Protection Administration who patriotically came to 
their aid in November-December, and in addition to serving as 
alert sentinels, they shared their own food with the people who 
had taken refuge in the factory. 
  A number of formerly idle enterprises have resumed 
operations 
in Zugdidi. All the tea industry facilities are operating, work 
is underway on restoration of the machine building plant, and 
two of the Inguri Pulp and Paper Combines' shops are operating. 
We personally tasted samples of Tarkhuna, a soft drink made by 
the Beer and Nonalcoholic Beverages Bottling Plant. It was 
pretty good, not bad at all! 
  This plant is worth some discussion. 
  The Enguri Firm (whose chairman of the board is Zurab 
Gogokhia), to which his plant belongs, happened to be founded in 
the time of troubles, and, as the saying goes, it bore the brunt 
of them. 
  This relatively stable factory always did a fair job of 
meeting the region's needs, producing 25 to 30 tonnes of beer 
and 25,000 to 30,000 bottles of soft drinks a day. But for eight 
months now they haven't been brewing any beer, and in the past 
two months they have only supplied 40,000 bottles of soft drinks 
to consumers. 
  This does not mean, however, that the enterprise is 
neglected 
and hopelessly dead. Not at all! We talked to deputy board 
chairmen Gigla Alshibaia and Tamaz Antia and 
engineer-technologist Tornike Gelendava. They are optimistic 
about the future. The enterprise came out of the civil war's 
destructive blows unhurt. The collective fought tooth and nail 
to save the factory. 
  Gigla Alshibaia had this to say: "Every night, seven of us 
took turns guarding the place against looting. And we saved the 
plant's facilities. On the other hand, we failed to save the new 
enterprise we are building not far away. Two of the new 
facility's three stories were already completed, but somebody 
dismantled it and took the blocks away. It's a good thing that 
the production lines that had been bought for it were here and 
were saved. We can actually start making beer today, we have the 
necessary materials in stock, and all we need is a steady supply 
of electricity. As you know, the brewing of beer is a lengthy 
and complex process; if the electricity goes off it can do a lot 
of damage, the cycle is interrupted and beer that is almost 
ready has to be dumped." 
  "But hey, you are making soft drinks. Do you have enough 
sugar?" 
  "Instead of sugar we use syrup which we manage to find. As 
they say, 'Where there's a will there's a way.' In order to get 
uninterrupted power directly from the substation (they promise 
us this will soon happen), we spent our own money to switch the 
district's population over to a separate power line. Give us 
peace and quiet, and we'll run this like clockwork. We have many 
plans, and converting to leasing has made everything easier." 
  We have cited the Chinaware Factory and the Enguri Firm to 
show that love of one's job, patriotism, and faithfulness to 
one's enterprise can do a lot. At a time when brother was 
fighting brother, and looting and robbing ruled, when it was 
every man for himself, and when destructiveness was no disgrace, 
these enterprises preserved people's hope for the future and did 
what was needed to make that hope a reality. 
  The Odishi Tea Combine saved itself the same way (Demur 
Todua, director). We learned one remarkable fact--considering 
today's conditions, anyway: after making their inspection, the 
Finance Ministry's auditors awarded a prize to Rezo Kantaria, 
the head accountant of the Zugdidi Experimental Tea Combine 
(Nugzar Gulua, director) because of the excellence of his work. 
  Zugdidi is licking its wounds, working hard and striving for 
normalcy, with great effort and toil, sometimes confidently and 
sometimes hesitantly. The process will probably go more quickly 
when the army of refugees goes back home. Today (according to 
the February count) 65,800 refugees have taken shelter there 
(26,000 in the city). There is hardly a family that hasn't taken 
someone in. Koki Sherozia's three-member family in Tkaia at one 
time, almost a whole month, had 37 relatives as guests. Today 
there are 12. There are many such families. 
  The refugees are having a hard time of it. Sad to say, not 
all of them have a host. Dormitories, children's homes, 
administration buildings--and even cattle sheds--are packed. 
  This huge mass of people are painfully concerned about every 
nuance of the negotiations about returning to Abkhazia. Anyone 
who has looked into the matter can detect processes which 
indicate that among them there are active political opponents 
working to foster destabilization. There are indications that 
agents of the enemy are working among them. One indicator of 
that, perhaps, was a provocative challenge which we ourselves 
witnessed: "Let us enter Abkhazia carrying white flags and, if 
there is no other way, register ourselves as Abkhazians." Along 
with this, a thousand rumors are being circulated, and some 
people, in despair, are seizing upon them eagerly. For example: 
"They say that the Abkhazians in the village of Chuburkhindzhi, 
Galskiy Rayon, have hung a big banner which reads, in 
Mingrelian, 'We must create an Abkhazian-Mingrelian Republic. Do 
not hinder us'"; or, "They say Ardzinba has said he won't bother 
the Mingrelians, he will repatriate them all, if they will 
change their passports and register as Mingrelians." A laughing 
matter? Not at all! Foreign and domestic enemies are cleverly 
exploiting the plight of the refugees, trying to fragment and 
corrupt people and pit them against one another, to launch a new 
wave of destabilization, to place the settlement of the 
Abkhazian question in jeopardy. Maybe someone will swallow the 
hook?! 
  The main thing, however, is faith in the future. God forbid 
we should lose it. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47087 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94042" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> GEORGIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Tbilisi Police Chief Reviews Priorities </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New Tbilisi Police Chief Reviews Priorities </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1437B Tbilisi SAKARTVELOS RESPUBLIKA in Georgian 15 Apr 
94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1437B </F>
<F P=104>  Tbilisi SAKARTVELOS RESPUBLIKA </F>
<F P=105>  Georgian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Tbilisi Police Administration Chief Major </F>
General Demur Mikadze by Guliko Markozashvili: "Professionalism 
and Discipline Are the Foundation of Law and Order": place and 
date not given] 
  [Text] AS WE KNOW, RECENTLY DEPUTY INTERNAL AFFAIRS 
MINISTER MAJOR GENERAL DEMUR MIKADZE TOOK CHARGE OF THE CAPITAL 
CITY'S POLICE ADMINISTRATION. OUR CORRESPONDENT ASKED HIM A FEW 
QUESTIONS. 
  [Markozashvili] Batono Demur, what was your first order of 
business? 
  [Mikadze] Organizational business. First you have to find 
out 
who does what. We created a collegial leadership body in order 
to deal promptly with various issues in a collegial manner. Most 
important, we are paying special attention to discipline, which 
is the foundation of any good effort. Without strict discipline, 
especially in an organization like ours, we cannot be 
successful. That is why we have given such priority to 
discipline. The principal function of the police is to prevent 
anticipated crimes and solve crimes that have been committed. 
For this reason, we demand that every unit chief see to it that 
every crime is registered and solved as far as possible. 
  [Markozashvili] Law and order in the city has definitely 
improved. Both motorists and pedestrians are obeying the law 
more. Although we do see infractions. 
  [Mikadze] That's right. In the past while, passport 
regulations have been almost out of control. The city has many 
refugees, and unfortunately there are unscrupulous individuals 
who use the refugees' names to commit crimes. Units created 
specially to deal with this are stepping up their efforts, and 
very soon things ought to fall into place. And there are other, 
no less urgent problems, for example the fact that people are 
selling gasoline anywhere they please, and that is also against 
the law. For this reason, we urged the Mayor's Office to see to 
it that such sales be carried out in specially designated 
places. This way we can facilitate unimpeded traffic in the 
city. We think that the way things are being done on Railway 
Station Square is worth emulating: sales booths have almost all 
been cleared from the area. This is the kind of law and order 
that should be instituted everywhere. 
  [Markozashvili] What are relations like between the Defense 
Ministry, the Security Ministry, and the Police? 
  [Mikadze] The first thing I did on becoming chief was to 
hold 
an expanded meeting with the Collegium of the Defense Ministry. 
The garrison, legion, and personnel of the capital city's Main 
Administration of Police will have to find a common language 
with all the legal armed formations. We started this with the 
Defense Ministry, and we passed a joint "Appeal of a Joint 
Conference of Representatives of the Defense Ministry of the 
Republic of Georgia and the Main Administration of Internal 
Affairs of the City of Tbilisi to All Members of Armed 
Formations and Other Armed Persons in Georgia." 
  As for the Security Ministry and its head man, Igor 
Giorgadze, it is ready to engage in worthwhile cooperation. We 
are placing big hopes on this joint effort. 
  [Markozashvili] What changes are to be expected in your 
service? 
  [Mikadze] We will start with cadre policy, of course, 
because 
it is the nucleus of the Internal Affairs Ministry. Persons who 
can meet today's requirements will stay on, but persons who are 
professionally unfit will have to leave. 
  Another thing. It is our desire that Tbilisi be served by 
Tbilisians. Residents of the city will serve on the city's 
police force. We want the police and the inhabitants of the city 
to be one indivisible entity and to stand by one another. We 
want them to fight crime together and maintain law and order in 
their city. We will try to see to it that the police are 
provided with all the essentials--transportation and equipment. 
We want every police officer to be morally clean, so that the 
city knows that it has a faithful protector that cares about it. 
  I give my fellow residents my solemn promise that I will 
always protect their peace and safety. The only reason I have 
taken on the job of Tbilisi's police chief is that I want every 
Tbilisian to live in a city that is exemplary. I believe we can 
do it. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47088 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94043" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> GEORGIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Journalist Explains Feud With Kitovani </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Journalist Explains Feud With Kitovani </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1418A Moscow MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI in Russian No 21, 22-29 
May 94 p A5 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1418A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Akakiy Mikadze, MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI </F>
correspondent in the Transcaucasus: "After the Fight"] 
  [Text] Last month proved less than tranquil for me. Friends 
and colleagues express sympathy; strangers and people who do not 
wish to introduce themselves call me and promise to kill; more 
cautious acquaintances prefer to avoid contact. 
  The cause of such attention to my persona is that a month 
ago, in the Georgian parliament building, former minister of 
defense Tengiz Kitovani attempted to settle a score with me in a 
fistfight. I have no illusions regarding the mores of today's 
Georgia, where threats, violence, and murder have become a norm 
both in everyday life and in politics. I know Mr. Kitovani well 
enough to believe that they were not idle threats I heard from 
him and his bodyguards. But I very much want to understand why 
it is precisely now that the antipathy of this man toward me has 
become so strong that he could not--or would not--restrain it. 
  As a journalist I could not possibly bypass this figure 
during the past two years--national guard commander, minister of 
defense, member of the Military Council, parliament member, the 
closest confederate of Zviad Gamsakhurdia. The role this man 
plays in the life of Georgia, of which we are both citizens, is 
just too important. 
  In my account of Kitovani's biography I did not find it 
necessary to hide his criminal past, but I never reproached him 
for the prison term he served. I did not blame him for becoming 
one of the organizers of overthrowing his patron 
Gamsakhurdia--after all, a man has a right to see the light. I 
did not pick on Kitovani's personal traits, but I did have a 
problem with the results of his political activities. 
  I will not take back what I have written and said over the 
past two years. The civil war in South Ossetia and Abkhazia 
became for Kitovani a means for taking care of his political and 
financial affairs. The criminal divvying up of the nearly 
extinct Georgian economy turned out to be much more important 
for him than its revival. He is unprincipled with respect to 
Russia: One day he talks about the threat of Russian imperialism 
and under this banner robs military warehouses, the next day he 
declares that Georgia is ready to become Russia's outpost in the 
Caucasus and warmly greets Zhirinovskiy. He is doing everything 
he can to remove Eduard Shevardnadze from the country or at 
least nullify his efforts... 
  ...Kitovani, however, has heard and read it all before. So 
why did he lose his temper now, of all times? 
  Well- and ill-wishers alike offer this explanation: The 
cause 
of Kitovani's exacerbated emotional response is my article 
"Georgians of Russia" published in MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI half a 
year ago. It deals with the Georgian diaspora in Russia, its 
most prominent figures--for instance, Nina Ananiashvili, or 
Archil Gomiashvili, or Zurab Tsereteli. As I am told, it is the 
details of the business and political activities of some Moscow 
residents of Georgian descent--Kitovani's friends and 
partners--that caused such an explosion of emotions. It would 
have been better not to have done this, I am told. Kitovani 
tolerated attacks against himself, but when the interests of 
"such" people are brought into it... you have to understand... 
  I do understand. And I do not intend to admonish Kitovani by 
saying that these things are better handled in court rather than 
with fists. And I will no longer appeal to the head of the 
Georgian state: It appears that his relations with Kitovani are 
no easier than mine. I can only fulfill my professional duties: 
Say loudly what I know for a fact. 
  Quite possibly, Tengiz Kitovani will interpret the latter as 
a threat. He should not. I am not "digging" or collecting 
compromising materials either on him or on other figures. First, 
this method of self-defense is no better that a six-against-one 
fight. Second, everything I knew I have already said and 
written. And what? Kitovani still remains one of Georgia's 
masters. He is still received by high-ranking politicians in 
Moscow, just like before. In Georgia people still keep silent, 
as they did before, recognizing the right of the strong. In some 
strange way, Kitovani's fate and the attitude toward him remind 
me of another "hero" in Georgian history--General Igor Rodionov, 
who was in command of the massacre of demonstrators in Tbilisi 
on 9 April 1989. How many angry words were said about him; how 
many substantiated accusations advanced; how many conclusions 
issued by official commissions--but General Rodionov remains 
head of the General Staff Academy of the Russian military. 
  Still, I believe that the proverb "the dog barks, but the 
caravan moves on" is a consolation for cowards. As everywhere, 
in our country the word comes first; it is just it takes us 
longer for the word to translate into the deed. 
  I have to admit that Kitovani and I have identical feelings 
toward one another, and the cause of the antipathy is similar. 
Kitovani believes that with my publications I am interfering in 
his plans. He interferes with mine, too. I do not intend to live 
in a country engulfed in a civil war, where there are more 
beggars than workers, where, finally, a parliament member uses 
his bodyguards to beat up a journalist. By his actions, Mr. 
Kitovani is interfering with my plans. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47089 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94044" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Rail Link to Iran Planned </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Rail Link to Iran Planned </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1468D Baku GUNAY in Russian 15 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1468D </F>
<F P=104>  Baku GUNAY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [KHABAR-SERVIS report: "Railroad Will Link Azerbaijan to </F>
Iran"] 
  [Text] Rafik Zeynalov, deputy chief of the Azerbaijan 
Railroad administration and its chief engineer, characterized as 
a matter of great strategic importance the construction of the 
Astara (Azerbaijan)-Qazvin (Iran) railroad, the possibility of 
which was discussed during negotiations between Azerbaijan 
President Geydar Aliyev and the head of the Iranian state. 
Construction of this line will make it possible to first and 
foremost establish a supply line to the Nakhichevan Autonomous 
Republic [NAR], weakened by the Armenian seizure of part of 
Azerbaijani territories and the blockade of the NAR. Second, it 
will link Azerbaijan with two neighboring states--Iran and 
Turkey, which will allow the republic a gateway to the 
Mediterranean and Asian countries. The Government of Iran also 
places great importance on this line, since it will bring to 
Iran metal and timber from Russia, which Iran acutely needs. At 
the same time, freight transit will bring huge foreign currency 
earnings into the Azerbaijani budget. As R. Zeynalov pointed 
out, the proposed route for the railroad is the optimal one. In 
particular, it is envisaged building a 100-meter-wide rail 
bridge over the border river Astarachay. 
  The chief engineer of the Azerbaijan Railroad emphasized 
that 
the Russian Ministry of Railroads is already interested in this 
project. Foreign companies--the Canadian company Maple Wind, the 
largest European company M&amp;M, and the Austrian A-Trade 
company--are willing to invest in the construction. The only 
condition set by foreign companies' representatives is President 
G. Aliyev's personal guarantee. The Azerbaijan Railroad's 
leadership recently petitioned the Cabinet of Ministers and 
Geydar Aliyev to consider this matter. 
  The Government of the Islamic Republic of Iran is willing to 
fully finance construction of the line on its territory. 
  On 2 June 1994 the head of the Azerbaijan Railroad received 
written assurance that the final decision on the matter of 
building a railroad between Azerbaijan and Iran will be made 
during the expected visit of G. Aliyev to Tehran. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47090 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94045" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   18 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Russia's Punitive Tariffs Impact on Employment </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Russia's Punitive Tariffs Impact on Employment </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1395C Tallinn EESTI S&Omacr;NUMID in Estonian 18 Apr 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1395C </F>
<F P=104>  Tallinn EESTI S&Omacr;NUMID </F>
<F P=105>  Estonian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [BNS release: "Russian Customs Barrier Puts a Squeeze on </F>
Estonia's Economy"] 
  [Text] 
  The high import tariffs imposed by Russia last month 
have forced many Estonian companies to reduce their labor force 
and curb their production considerably. 
  It is understandable that Russia, like any other state, uses 
customs restrictions to protect the interests of its domestic 
producers. "Only Estonia goes marching into Europe, with its 
chest exposed, without supporting its producers," deplored Ain 
Talts, foreign trade consultant at the Ministry of Agriculture. 
"Estonia's government thinks that the quality of Estonian butter 
can be improved without imposing any tariffs and by bringing in 
`mixes' and `moxes.' The fact is, Estonia's butter has been 
known for its high quality for a hundred years," Talts said. 
  Talts thinks that export to Russia will soon open up through 
Belarus or Ukraine. "The flow of trade cannot be enforced at 
state level and, even now, there are many Russian businessmen 
who use other states for their exports," he remarked. Russia's 
step did, however, deal a blow to some of the biggest suppliers 
(like the Tallinn Meat Processing Plant and the Refrigeration 
Plant of Tartu)," Talts commented. 
  "Out of all the companies in Estonia, the state-owned 
Tallinn 
Meat Processing Plant suffered most from the tariff hike," said 
Anatoli Deelinson, director of the plant's marketing department. 
  Deelinson remarked that all other producers can export their 
production to Russia through a third country. Tallinn Meat 
Processing Plant's main export article to Russia was the cooking 
sausage whose short shelf life (72 hours) does not allow any 
time for that. This is why, as of March 15, the company stopped 
its exports of cooking sausage to Russia entirely. 
  Deelinson said that 14 percent of the plant's January 
production, and 25 percent of its February production of cooking 
sausages was sold to Russia (primarily St. Petersburg). Losing 
the market due to the 40-percent tariff, however, caused the 
company to make major cutbacks and give its employees vacations 
without pay. Right now, the plant is running on reduced hours 
and, should that continue, the situation will become even more 
serious. 
  Urmas Sannik, deputy director of the processing plant, saw a 
solution in either finding a new market for the cooking sausage, 
or in concentrating on the export of some other meat products. 
  Russia's increase of custom tariffs has also had an adverse 
effect on the state-owned Kalev corporation. "We have lost most 
of the Russian market whereas, last year, 40 percent of Kalev's 
production was sold to Russia," said the firm's executive 
director Mati Peekma. Kalev was forced to close down some of its 
production lines and is currently operating at half of its 
capacity. 
  "Russia has started to use international tariff codes, 
according to which some of the goods could be exported at lower 
rates, but Russian customs do not always go along with that," 
Peekma said. He added that looking for `holes' in the Russian 
customs barrier continues. 
  Estonia's neighboring states, however, have established 
tariffs so high that Kalev, which produces more than the 
domestic market can absorb, has a tough time staying alive. On 
our exports to Latvia, sugar products are subjected to a tariff 
of 30 percent, and chocolate products to a 50 percent tariff. On 
our exports to Finland, there is a 35 percent tariff on 
confectionery products, Peekma explained. 
  The search is on for new markets, but countries closest to 
us 
have established high tariffs, while safe transport becomes an 
issue for reaching those further away, Peekma said. Foreign 
markets, however, cannot be reached that soon. 
  Increasing our exports to Belarus and Ukraine is being 
considered but, in the case of Belarus, for example, there is a 
danger that the state will revert to the ruble zone and 
establish tariffs just as high as those of Russia. 
  Andres Varik, acting director of the Central Alliance of 
Agricultural Producers, said he is not aware of the tariff 
increase having a catastrophic effect on agricultural producers. 
The level of agriculture has dropped so much already that it 
could not drop any further because of that, Varik added. In his 
opinion not enough time had lapsed since the tariffs were 
increased to gather any meaningful data. 
  Ain Talts, consultant at the Ministry of Agriculture, thinks 
that increased customs restrictions for Estonia will remain in 
effect until the president, or the foreign minister, makes peace 
with Russia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47091 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94046" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Finance Minister On Fighting Inflation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Finance Minister On Fighting Inflation </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1395A Tallinn PaEVALEHT in Estonian 21 Apr 94 p 8 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1395A </F>
<F P=104>  Tallinn PaEVALEHT </F>
<F P=105>  Estonian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [ETA release titled: "HEIKI KRANICH: Reducing Estonia's </F>
Money Supply Is Inevitable"] 
  [Text] 
  ST. PETERSBURG (ETA). Estonia's money supply must be 
reduced, or it will cost Estonia dearly, said Finance Minister 
Heiki Kranich. 
  Kranich told ETA on the last day of the annual meeting 
of the European Bank of Reconstruction and Development [EBRD] 
that he is planning to discuss the matter of reducing Estonia's 
money supply with Bank of Estonia's president Siim Kallas. 
  "Inflation should be pushed back," Kranich said. "Should the 
Bank of Estonia maintain that inflation is a normal phenomenon, 
Estonia may wind up paying dearly for it," Kranich emphasized. 
  If the 1993 inflation indicators could be considered normal, 
then the rate of inflation during the first few months of 1994 
has been too high, said government advisor Madis 
&Ubreve;&AElig;urike. 
The principal cause for inflation, according to 
&Ubreve;&AElig;urike, 
is increased money supply, which is partly the result of 
Estonia's successful export activity. 
  EBRD president Jacques de Larosi&egrave;re had remarked, at 
his 
meeting with representatives of the Estonian delegation, that 
such a situation can be one of the drawbacks of great success, 
&Ubreve;&AElig;urike told to a group of businessmen assembled 
for a 
presentation held in connection with EBRD's annual meeting. 
  To reduce the money supply, securities should be issued so 
that people will have a chance to invest, Kranich said. 
  To the question how reduction of the money supply would 
affect Estonia's population, both Kranich and 
&Ubreve;&AElig;urike 
said that a rapid rate of inflation would have a devastating 
effect on the poorer segment of the population. Securities, 
however, would provide an investment opportunity for those who 
have money left over. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47092 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94047" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   25 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Privatization Problems Hamper Banking System </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Privatization Problems Hamper Banking System </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1395D Tallinn EESTI S&Omacr;NUMID in Estonian 25 Apr 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1395D </F>
<F P=104>  Tallinn EESTI S&Omacr;NUMID </F>
<F P=105>  Estonian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Business Desk editor: "Estonian Banking </F>
Evaluated By European Standards"] 
  [Text] 
  At the invitation of Bank of Estonia, and within the 
framework of the PHARE program, the international auditing firm 
of Price Waterhouse did a selective audit of Estonian banks 
between March and July of 1993. The strict European standards 
applied resulted in harsh criticism in many of the aspects. 
However, in many of the cases, the evaluation applies more to 
the society as a whole, rather than the banking system. 
  1. Estonia's banking functions in an extremely volatile 
economic environment, characterized by a cash-poor society and a 
limited banking culture. Within a span of a few years, most 
of the industry has lost its former supply base and has been 
deprived of its traditional market in the former Soviet Union. 
Reorientation has begun in both industry and trade, but it will 
take some time. 
  The volume of cash transactions, especially among 
individuals, is very low. One indicator of a society's banking 
culture is running its financial dealings through the bank. This 
naturally presumes confidence between the bank and its 
clients--and favorable earnings to the bank for its 
services. 
  Based on the latest surveys done by Bank of Estonia, 
however, 
one can maintain that confidence is on the rise and interest in 
using the modern cash-free forms of settling accounts is growing 
among individuals. 
  Estonia's legislation is deficient, from the business 
and banking point of view. Among new laws enforced since 
this audit are the Bank of Estonia law, right to ownership law, 
securities law, new taxation law, etc. These laws will 
also have to take effect. Banking culture cannot be raised 
independently from the general accounting and tax culture. 
  Privatization of banking is plagued by confusion. 
(This assessment should not be linked to the current attempts at 
determining the state's participation in banking). The biggest 
problem seen by PW experts is the participation of state-owned 
enterprises in the ownership of commercial banks. What happens 
to the shares of such a bank, when the state enterprise is 
privatized? 
  2. Ownership and the management of banks. 
  Conflicts of interest are possible if the actual management 
of the bank is in the hands of an owner (shareholder). The 
banks were too generous in paying out their 1992 dividends. 
Instead, earnings should have been used to create additional 
venture capital funds. 
  The lending departments of some of the banks would benefit 
from additional schooling, some would be well served by separate 
units for problematic loans. (This schooling is now being 
arranged at the initiative of the Banking Association). 
  3. Of reports and regulations. 
  What are needed (and already being prepared) are 
specific measures to establish confidence in Estonian 
banking. PW recommended paying special attention to 
reflecting unaudited profit in the bank's reporting, and to 
defining different levels of capital according to the 
requirements set at Basel. 
  Above all, one must determine the suitability of 
different international conventions to one's own local banking 
environment. Government obligations among the bank's assets 
(which, according to the European custom, have a high liquidity 
rating) should be given a lower liquidity rating under our 
circumstances. (One of the delegates: "In my opinion, government 
obligations cannot be converted into cash in Estonia right now.") 
  The auditors were also concerned with the quality of 
reports being submitted to the central bank by Estonia's 
commercial banks. Banking inspectors have also started to 
do more checking on the banks' operations locally. 
  When the law on credit institutions is passed, changes would 
also have to be made in Estonia's banking law. A steady and 
continued development is expected. 
  Plans for the Bank of Estonia suggest that such selective 
auditing will not be the last of its kind. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47093 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94048" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   18 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Credits Vital To Sustain `Economic Miracle' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Foreign Credits Vital To Sustain `Economic Miracle' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1326A Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER RUNDSCHAU in German 18 
May 94 p 13 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1326A </F>
<F P=104>  Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER RUNDSCHAU </F>
<F P=105>  German </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Hannes Gamillscheg: "Estonian Economy on Unsure </F>
Footing: Abundant Supply of Goods at Extremely High Prices; 
Government Shies Away From Massive Investments"] 
  [Text] Tallinn--At first glance Estonia's economic miracle 
seems impressive. Since its introduction two years ago, the 
currency, the Estonian kroon, has rigidly maintained its level 
of parity with the mark--one mark is equal to eight kroon--that 
was established at that time. The national budget is balanced, 
as is the current account, and the unemployment rate, at least 
unofficially, is only 2.4 percent. The supply of goods in shops 
and department stores is as plentiful as in the West, and in the 
capital city of Tallinn, bars, pubs, and cafes are springing up 
everywhere. 
  The representatives of the people gladly attribute this 
success to their bold policy of rapid reform. In Washington, the 
American political and financial establishment recently 
acknowledged to Prime Minister Mart Laar that Estonia has 
shifted from a Soviet planned economy to a Western free-market 
economy most rapidly and most radically, and that the small 
Baltic republic could serve as a model for all of East Europe. 
  The foundation upon which the economic miracle is built, 
however, is weak. Production has dwindled to less than half 
since the country's uncoupling from the Soviet economy. In 1994, 
the GNP is expected to increase for the first time, by around 
3.5 percent. Consumption has fallen drastically. "In comparison 
with the golden seventies, when we lived in style at the expense 
of Russia and its oil dollars, things are much worse now for 
most people," concedes Tiit Saat, state secretary in the Finance 
Ministry. "People have 25 to 30 percent less money to spend on 
food and clothing now than they had before." 
  Although the national budget is balanced, it is tiny. It 
amounts to only 5.8 billion kroon (725 million marks [DM]), plus 
2.5 billion kroon for a social welfare fund to be used for 
pensions, children's allowances, and other subsidies. Spending 
covers the most urgent consumption needs. Barely a single kroon 
is left over for capital expenditure by public authorities. 
"Things cannot go on like this for long," Saat admits. "The 
price of maintaining order in state finances is very high. In 
the area of social welfare, in the education system, in road 
construction, practically everywhere we have very strict 
limitations." 
  Thus the majority of the population does not experience much 
of the miraculous economy. The average monthly income is 1,200 
kroon. After the 26-percent income tax has been taken out--the 
first 300 kroon are tax-free--966 (DM120) remain. That is barely 
enough for rent and the most inexpensive groceries. Western 
goods, which to some extent have supplanted domestic products in 
department stores and supermarkets, are for most Estonians again 
as unattainable as they were in the days when they could be 
purchased only in the special stores for the elite. 
  Pensioners, who are being fed with 350 kroon, or the 
unemployed, whose compensation amounts to 180 kroon, have too 
little to live on and barely enough to die on. Elderly Estonians 
who can still remember the former republic and who have waited 
their entire lives for the reestablishment of independence are 
turning in great disappointment away from the state that they 
feel has deserted them. This is because the attention of the 
government, in which the average age is only slightly above 30, 
is drawn to the young and the strong. 
  That is why the tax progression was abolished "to offer work 
incentives to people with higher incomes." Saat is doubtful that 
increasing tax rates would increase public revenues: "The 
outstandingly high incomes are unknown to the revenue authority 
anyhow." No one dares speak of tax increases in the primary 
election year. But rent prices, the price of basic foodstuffs, 
or public transportation rates will be multiplied without 
compensation being provided even to small-wage earners. In 
January the consumer price index rose by 5 percent, in March by 
9 percent. In 1994 a price increase of 40 percent is looming, 
however since it is largely the result of reductions in 
subsidies it does not alarm the government. 
  Nevertheless, in the future monies borrowed from foreign 
countries, which up to now the state has passed directly on to 
banks and firms, are to be used for the first time for "public 
welfare"--translation: the development of the infrastructure. A 
deficit of more than 1 percent of the GNP will not, however, be 
permitted. "We do not want to become trapped in the vicious 
circle of debt," says State Secretary Saat in defense of the 
restrictive financial policy. 
  Foreign credits are essential to the survival of Estonia's 
economy. The layer of equity resources is thin, and the new 
firms are still not yielding the profits necessary for 
investments. That is why Estonia is seeking, despite its 
problems with integrating the Russian-speaking population and 
despite the unsettled issue of Russian troop withdrawal, to 
present itself as a stable country in which capital can be 
invested risk-free. A trust agency modeled after the German 
Trust Agency is supposed to have completed the privatization of 
state-owned firms by the end of 1995. At this point it has sold 
off 76 firms for $33 million, however these have been primarily 
small businesses, while parties interested in the monolithic 
giants have failed to appear. 
  The shifting of the economy is also evident in the export 
and 
import statistics. In 1991, 95 percent of exports and imports 
were still with the former Soviet Union. Now that country's 
successor states take delivery on only 30 percent of goods 
produced by Estonia, and provide only 20 percent of its imports. 
This is partly due to the tariffs that are arbitrarily imposed 
and lifted, primarily by Russia, and to price differentials with 
neighboring countries to the East, but is also the result of 
Estonia's search for new trading partners, such as Finland, 
Sweden, and Germany. 
  For the Estonians--Saat estimates that "90 percent earn low 
wages, 10 percent are paid well"--this means an abundance of 
Western goods that for the most part are prohibitively 
expensive. Still, very few would trade this for their former 
circumstances, when they had money but there was nothing to buy. 
"I have experienced the humiliation of having to ask former 
pupils whether they could sell me a small piece of meat under 
the counter," says Gaia, the teacher. "That is why I like the 
new system better, even if my money will buy only one small 
sausage per week." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47094 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94049" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Meri, Laar Seen in Duel Over Constitutional Powers </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Meri, Laar Seen in Duel Over Constitutional Powers </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1431A Helsinki HUFVUDSTADSBLADET in Swedish 5 Jun 94 p 9 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1431A </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki HUFVUDSTADSBLADET </F>
<F P=105>  Swedish </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Bjarne Nitovuori: "Meri Created a Strong </F>
Position for Himself"] 
  [Text] Tallinn -- When independent Estonia approved a new 
Constitution in a referendum in June 1992, the head of state, 
the president, was given a rather weak position, compared with 
Finland, for example. 
  The president appoints the one who forms the government, but 
if the first two candidates are not approved by the Riigikogu 
[parliament], it is parliament itself that appoints a candidate 
for prime minister. The president can only dissolve parliament 
and announce new elections under certain conditions. 
  It says expressly in the Constitution that the government 
takes care of foreign policy, while in Finland it is the 
president. 
  The first president elected according to the new 
Constitution, Lennart Meri, has shown that he wants to exercise 
power. It has been said that in his exercise of power he is 
approaching the limits of legality. 
  The most spectacular conflict with the government occurred 
last winter, when Mart Laar proposed a replacement of four 
ministers. Meri opposed mainly the firing of the minister of 
economics, Toomas Sildmae. Initially, he refused to agree to the 
change in ministers and delayed the decision. Finally, he gave 
in. 
  There was talk about a constitutional crisis. According to 
the government's interpretation, it is the prime minister who 
decides about the ministers. The president's task is only to 
confirm the government's decision. 
  President Meri's legal advisor Vahus Glaase is of a 
different 
opinion and denies that it could have been a matter of a 
constitutional crisis. 
  He refers to the fact that the Constitution expressly says 
that changes in the government's composition "must be made by 
the president of the Republic at the request of the prime 
minister." It is thus the president who has the last word. If it 
were the prime minister, why would the matter still be referred 
to the president, he wonders. 
  When HUFVUDSTADSBLADET visits Vahus Glaase at the appointed 
time in his official room in Kadriorg, he is not yet there. He 
is with the president, we are told. 
  After 25 minutes he arrives in the company of a man. 
  "Pardon the delay, but 20 minutes ago the president 
appointed 
this man to be the new minister of justice, and I was forced to 
be present," says Glaase. 
  The man is named Urmas Arumae, the successor to Kaido Kama, 
who stepped down a few weeks ago. This time, President Meri thus 
decided immediately to agree to the prime minister's proposal 
for a new minister. 
<H5>  Minute Scrutiny </H5>
  The president also has greater influence over legislation 
than is evident from a superficial reading of the Constitution. 
Glaase quotes Article 107, which says that the president is to 
sanction the laws and that he may refuse to sanction a law and 
within two weeks send it back to parliament. If parliament still 
refuses to change the law, the president must sanction it or ask 
the constitutional court to declare that it violates the 
Constitution. 
  President Meri appears to have taken this article seriously. 
He and his legal advisor very carefully scrutinize every law. 
Vahur Glaase points out that it does not primarily involve 
exercising power but an obligation to see to it that the laws 
agree with the Constitution. 
  Of the 300 laws that have been instituted during Meri's time 
the president objected to 11. In six of the cases parliament 
changed the laws in accordance with the president's wishes. In 
one case the president was satisfied, although parliament did 
not accede to his proposal for change. Three cases have gone to 
the constitutional court and a fourth is on the way. Of the 
three cases that have been decided, the president won two and 
parliament one. 
  President Meri has been especially active in foreign policy, 
which was evident most recently in connection with President 
Martti Ahtisaari's state visit to Estonia. Nevertheless, the 
Constitution does not give the president any role in foreign 
policy. 
  Glaase motivates the president's foreign policy activity 
with 
the Vienna convention on diplomatic relations, which grants the 
head of state a special position in handling international 
relations. 
  He admits that the government should head the practical 
application of the foreign policy. However, there has not been 
any conflict with the government in these matters. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47095 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94050" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   8 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Russians, Estonians Polled on Political, Social Issues </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Russians, Estonians Polled on Political, Social Issues </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P50158A Helsinki HUFVUSDSTADSBLADET in Swedish 8 Jun 94 p 
12 </F>

<F P=103> 94P50158A </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki HUFVUSDSTADSBLADET </F>
<F P=105>  Swedish </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Mert Kabu: "Russian Officers in Estonia Uneasy </F>
about the Future" 
  [Excerpt] Few of the former-Soviet officers in Estonia are 
interested in leaving the country. An entire 87 percent say they 
are deeply worried about how they should go about getting a 
residence permit. A third of them are relying on Russian 
President Boris Yeltsin to help them. Significantly fewer are 
depending on Alexander Rutskoy (15 percent) and Vladimir 
Zhironovskiy (16 percent.) 
  This is some of the information which Estonian academics 
found out from a sociological study financed by the Olof Palme 
International Center of Stockholm. The report was made public on 
Tuesday [7 June] at a press conference held by the Estonia 
Academy of Sciences in Tallinn. 
  According to a law adopted in 1993 by the Estonian 
parliament, permanent permission to remain in Estonia will be 
given only to those retired officers from the old occupation 
force who have reached age 60, or whose wife or children are 
Estonian citizens. Those who worked for the KGB or the military 
intelligence organization (the GRU) will not be allowed to stay. 
  In Estonia there are currently 10,500 retired officers, 
according to Russian military authorities. But according to 
Estonian officials these number "at least 11,500," in addition 
to an unknown number of family members. Russian officials have 
so far refused to hand over name lists, so no one knows for 
sure. This has also meant that the opinion sampling is 
uncertain, and that the results of the study may be open to 
question. 
  Of the 10,500 officers, around half are believed to fulfill 
the criteria for having their individual applications approved. 
Half are under 60 years old, many under 50. Of those interviewed 
for the study, only 31 percent believe they can get a residence 
permit. Thirty-five percent do not think they will get one. 
Thirty-four percent say they don't know or refuse to answer. 
<H5>  78 Percent of Estonians Say Russians No Danger </H5>
  Estonians assert that many of the retired Russian officers 
may become a dangerous "fifth column." Seventy-eight percent of 
those queried deny that the Russians could become "dangerous" 
for Estonia. Only eight percent say they are interested in 
possessing personal firearms. Estonians have confidence in the 
UN, US, Germany and Sweden regarding helping solve problems of 
the retired officers. 
  How many of the former-Soviet officers should be able to 
stay 
in Estonia? All, demands Moscow. Only those who the law permits, 
say Estonians. (Thusly, more than half.) The Estonians are not 
willing to compromise on this point. This would require amending 
the law. Neither President Lennart Meri or Prime Minister Maar 
Laar can promise this, nor is there currently any majority at 
all for this in the Estonian parliament.[passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47096 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94051" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   13 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> LATVIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Latgale Leaders Discuss Separatism, Regional Development </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Latgale Leaders Discuss Separatism, Regional Development </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1323A Riga LAUKU AVIZE in Latvian 13 May 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1323A </F>
<F P=104>  Riga LAUKU AVIZE </F>
<F P=105>  Latvian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by A. Kundzins: "Latgale Does Not Want To Secede, </F>
It Craves Development."] 
  [Text]We say very little about folks on the Latgale side, 
and even then, as if we are observing them from the sidelines. 
We would like to hear from the Daugavpils natives, themselves 
--Valdis Lauskis, City Mayor, Anatolijs 
Susko, President of the Latgale Joint-Stock Commercial 
Bank, Janis Spagis, Chief of the Immigration 
Department, Arturs Prieditis, State Language 
Commission Chairman, and Inara Ostrovska, Director of 
the Saules School. The discussion, which was moderated by the 
editor of the "Lauku Avize", Voldemars Krustins, 
started emotionally and about decentralization. 
  Valdis Lauskis: If there is talk about solving the 
economic problem and the necessary loans, then, in all these 
years, it has not gone beyond the Riga rayon. Control is held by 
the administration, the Saeima, and this also applies to the 
educational and cultural programs. But these are also essential 
factors for the development of Latgale. Do we have any permanent 
banks? Yes, a grand total of two. Where else do we see this? 
  An envoy arrives in Daugavpils and says: "I came because I 
realized - Latvia is not only Riga." This was the realization 
made by a particular state envoy, but our administration does 
not realize this. The matter revolves around the fact that we 
are asking for decentralization, not the creation of an 
autonomous region. In addition -- there is financial 
decentralization. 
  Disguised as reform, all of our financial strength is being 
removed, or more precisely -- it is being turned over through 
taxes on our profits, and we are told-- work! But we have 
nothing to work with. The administration cannot provide us with 
solutions to our problems of education, project development and 
realization. Therefore, leave us the money, and we will find 
solutions here on location -- that is the type of 
decentralization we are asking for. We have been allowed to play 
around a little with privatization, licensing, and the sale of 
alcohol. But even that is being taken away from us, and we are 
told that licenses will be issued in Riga, in collaboration with 
the municipal governments. But they have forgotten about 
collaboration and no money has been left for the municipal 
governments. 
  We are not asking for a Ministry to be relocated here, 
although that would not be such a bad idea with respect to 
national development. Why couldn't we have, for example, the 
Ministry of Economics, since there is a great industrial 
potential concentrated here? We also have a good railway network. 
  A. Susko: Why haven't the deputies from our city 
done anything in the Saeima? 
  V. Lauskis: I represent the Latgale Democratic 
Party. We grew tired of waiting. Tell me, how much longer do we 
wait before we are noticed and heard in Riga? That is why we 
decided to think for ourselves. There are entire institutes 
sitting around in Riga, and they cannot work out a program. They 
need funding and also to operate in Latgale. But the experts are 
not receiving money. Where are the plans being developed for 
education, and other specific questions? If there are no plans, 
there won't be any action. If Latvia doesn't have any plans, 
then there won't be any for Latgale. In a comparison of our 
region with other national regions, we have 20 percent less 
investment -- this is according to the data from the Latvian 
Development Agency. There is an entire list of specific 
questions -- how many choral groups, how many Latvians, how many 
national schools, what will receive financial support, what 
priority does the Latgale language have in schools, etc. Is 
someone considering this at present? This is why we are 
exhibiting political activity, but there is no desire to secede 
or become autonomous. 
  When Latvia was in the process of becoming an independent 
nation in Kurzeme and Vidzeme, we, in Latgale, were living under 
the rule of the Vitebsk province. And Latgale was the one to 
come out for a unified nation of Latvia. Whose idea was it to 
create the Saules school? Was it needed by the state? No, they 
thought of it independently, and it was a good thing that there 
were understanding people in the Ministry in Riga. 
  I. Ostrovska: We don't have funds, so it's a good 
thing that the municipal government is helping. Yes, there is a 
Latgale program -- we are starting to develop. This school was 
founded in 1922, but it was closed in 1954 because it was too 
nationalistic, and then reopened in 1992. It is one of the 
oldest art schools in Latvia. We presented the proposal to the 
Latgale program, but where is it? The school needs a great deal 
of funding, so that we can serve our area. We are also receiving 
students from Jekabpils, Preili, and Ludza, and the competition 
is four applicants per one opening -- even more intense than for 
the university. But they can't even show us the Latgale program. 
  V. Krustins: Daugavpils has a future in both 
business development and in economic activities. 
  V. Lauskis: I think we have to change our status. 
Is Daugavpils one of the provinces, or is it the second largest 
city in the nation? That is the basic question. It must be 
answered by everyone who lives here. We formed the Latgale 
Democratic Party because it was one of the parties founded by 
Francis Trasune. Seventy years have elapsed, and the attitudes 
towards education, the church, the Latgale language have changed 
profoundly. 
  V. Krustins: Our Russian language press emphasizes 
that Daugavpils is a unique city, and that this unique character 
must preserved. What do we interpret this uniqueness to be? 
  A. Susko: We still have the publication of "Soviet 
Youth" -- "SY". Why? Daugavpils also has a newspaper called 
"Dinaburga". Why -- because the Russians don't want to call the 
city by its Latvian name. They specifically found a historic 
name. These people, supposedly unintentionally, want to delay 
the development process. Our city has the company "Vladlen" 
--from the name Vladimir Lenin. People were also given such 
names in the nineteen twenties -- Vladlen, Vilen, Viulen. But 
this company was formed recently. When its owner came to the 
bank, I asked him -- are you preparing to work, or to scare 
people? He answered -- who knows, but that name is sacred to me. 
And, as long as it remains sacred to him, we will be unable to 
move forward. 
  V. Krustins: These activities can be stopped by 
the entrepreneurs, since they need your money to thrive. You 
shouldn't despair, just provide support. 
  V. Lauskis: Up to 1990, Daugavpils was faring very 
well. This was a good training ground for the cadre. People came 
to the city, went through the "Lokomotive" plant, on to the 
Communist Party committee, and into the Ministry. They were 
living high off the hog. When the government was chased out in 
1991, a vacuum was created. Loyal forces were forming in spots, 
but there were no longer any connections. We are fighting for a 
change in any way we can. If we could receive concrete support 
from the top down, then it would be much simpler -- we could get 
out of the crisis, deal with the Russian "Dvinskies". 
  If the state wants the press to be active, then the 
administration should personally provide financial support for 
publishing a newspaper. If this is not done, then this region 
will be lost. We created our own television and radio, and the 
government took away all of the resources. We cannot get any 
financial support for anything through the budget. The loyal 
forces, which we represent here, are being further taxed by the 
circulation tax for last year. And we have no one to sue in 
court. We, the loyal forces that stand and fall for Latvia, must 
sue the Saeima or the Cabinet of Ministers! 
  V. Krustins: Mr. Lauskis, you elected the Saeima. 
Isn't anyone there from Latgale? 
  V. Lauskis: Show me the legal state organ that can 
help solve this financial problem! On what basis did the Cabinet 
of Ministers take away 643,000 lats from the city budget? Who 
should we complain to? We don't have a constitutional court. 
Providenko can voice complaints, but I have to keep silent. And 
yet, I can't keep quiet -- if just by writing something. 
  V. Krustins: We are hearing from all sides that 
the administration is destroying culture, education, industry, 
the ballet -- everything. Now you are saying that the 
administration also wants to silence Daugavpils, since you 
didn't use the word "destroy". Aren't we piling too much on the 
administration? I don't believe that Birkavs wants to harass 
anyone. 
  V. Lauskis: The administration doesn't have any 
money. Thus, I can't get any money from them, nor can I hold on 
to what I have. 
  A. Susko: The manager or entrepreneur must see 
results. You can't just keep taking their profits away. If he 
knew that such and such would remain for him, then it would be 
worth the effort. Taxes are around 80 percent in Israel, and 
still the country is thriving. 
  V. Lauskis: There is a great deal we could do. The 
land is fertile for various applications, which should be noted, 
and the same is true for industry. There is Ventspils, which is 
sitting on a petroleum pipeline. 
  V. Krustins: Daugavpils is just like Ventspils, 
but on dry land. Where could you find a more convenient location? 
  V. Lauskis: Forgive me, but there is a major 
difference right now. We must restore the proper order of 
yesterday, but it is desirable that this be a joint effort. 
Where is the investment in industry? In shipbuilding, there is 
no need to wonder, since their salaries are five times higher 
than ours. Petroleum goes to Ventspils, but for us, everything 
was orientated towards the East. Reorientation requires a 
longer period of time. If Mr. Birkavs would familiarize himself 
with the documents he has in front of him, he would see that 
already over one year ago the German side presented a proposal 
for the reconstruction of the airport. Four times we asked that 
the proposal be evaluated. The state does not recognized 
Daugavpils. 
  J. Spagis: Does the state have a grudge against 
Daugavpils for some reason? Maybe they have some complaints. I 
have some. Maybe we have earned such an attitude. Most of the 
managers in the manufacturing plants have not been replaced. 
Riga doesn't like that. 
  What do you in Daugavpils think -- that we will make 
investments and give you subsidies, if there are others more 
deserving than you? Lembergs is talented and has earned it. If 
we are crying about how we are forgotten, then there are many 
points on which we deserve to be. Who should receive these 
investments, Providenko? I know where he stands on the ballot, 
and the press supports him. But he has an achilles heel, and we 
will get to it -- the Latvian National Independence Movement. 
  People are being tested for their knowledge of the language. 
I turned to Mr. Lauskis, thinking -- he, as a teacher, would 
best understand. We have a student production line -- a major 
railway technical school with 900 students. And do you know what 
happens there? With the help of certain Daugavpils natives, they 
are continuing along in the old spirit -- Latvian language 
studies are ignored, Leninism in being taught. The military 
wives are the teachers. Going into a savings bank, you will only 
hear "what" in Russian. I don't know, Mr. Prieditis, where you 
pay for your public services, but as being responsible for 
promoting the state language, you should be upset, because no 
inroads have been made into the attitude towards language in the 
city. Our people are calling me and asking if I have read 
Prieditis' response in the newspaper to the complaints by the 
National Front members. If this is the attitude, then subsidies 
in Riga, as well, should only be paid after the job is 
completed. And that is only one instance. 
  V. Krustins: The discussion has drifted away from 
economic matters. The banker has not yet had a chance to speak. 
  A. Susko: If people are saying that they are 
oppressed and cannot get into the Saeima because they don't know 
the language, then I am indignant. What good is a person in 
parliament, if, because of language, he cannot become actively 
involved in the work. I wish to help those who want to work. 
When someone comes to me, I can already see from the hands who 
needs the thousand for a tractor so that he doesn't lose what he 
has started, and who wants to "do business". I would never give 
200,000 dollars to some risky venturer. I wouldn't even give it 
to Providenko, because I know his destructive politics. On the 
other hand, there are entrepreneurs, like Locs, Pocs, Ambainis, 
and others, who are truly working for the good of Latvia. Right 
now, a problem has come up that there is no one to receive the 
loans. I could get 100, even 500 million dollars, but I need the 
administration's guarantee. And I also need guarantees that I 
will get back the money loaned. Unfortunately, there are many of 
those who will not return the money. Worldwide, banks plan on 
writing off loses of 3 to 5 percent. 
  V. Krustins: How many borrowers do you have? Seven? 
  A. Susko: Not much more than that. 
  V. Krustins: So, the Latgale Bank has a few 
million kicking around? 
  A. Susko: We are not exactly on the verge of 
failure. If this was a free market zone, then there wouldn't be 
a problem with where to put the money. There is now a lack of 
people active in business who would be able to borrow a good sum 
of money. 
  V. Lauskis: There is a whole category of people 
who are not unwilling, but are unable to pay back the money. 
State policies also have to get involved. When the borders are 
properly regulated, then, within six months, the policies will 
change both here and in Russia. More precise legislative actions 
are needed. We should know what we will be dealing with at least 
three or four years for now. 
  As recorded by A. Kundzins Valdis Lauskis, Anatolijs Susko, 
Janis Spagis, Arturs Prieditis, Inara Ostrovska photos by A. 
Jermaks. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47097 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94052" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   31 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> LATVIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Election Results From Latvia's Largest Cities </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Election Results From Latvia's Largest Cities </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1476A Riga LABRIT in Latvian 31 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1476A </F>
<F P=104>  Riga LABRIT </F>
<F P=105>  Latvian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Articles by various reporters: "Results Of City Council </F>
Elections"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  "Predictions Confirmed" by Guntis Kokars, JURMALA, special </H5>
to LABRIT 
  In almost all electoral districts in Jurmala on election day 
people most often mentioned two lists: "Our Jurmala," in which 
the LNIM [Latvian National Independence Movement] and the 
citizens group "Our Land" were united, and "Prosperity," which 
included representatives of LW [Latvia's Way], the Harmony of 
People party and the SDLP [Social Democratic Labor Party of 
Latvia]. Election predictions were confirmed: "Our Jurmala" 
gained six seats in the council. "Prosperity" gained three 
seats. The rest were alloted thus: DP [Democratic Party, 
formerly Democratic Center Party]--two; and one each to united 
FFF [For Fatherland and Freedom] and the CDU [Christian 
Democratic Union] list, the united PFL [Popular Front of Latvia] 
and AP [Agrarian Party] list, and to the political organization 
"Proprietor". 
  Most popular among the voters was the doctor Leopolds 
Ozolins. It is possible that his placement in the "number one" 
position gave "Our Land" so many seats. Of nationally known and 
familiar persons, Andrejs Inkulis, former deputy chairman of the 
Riga city council, who represented "Prosperity," was also 
elected. From FFF the most popular turned out to be the singer 
and composer Adrians Kukuvass. 
  No list won a majority of the vote, which is why a coalition 
is expected to be established. If "Our Jurmala" forms a 
coalition with FFF and the CDU, then it is possible that Ligita 
Zacesta, who already is the acting chair of the Jurmala Council 
of Peoples' Deputies, would become the mayor of Jurmala. The 
popular Leopolds Ozolins has said that he will not be a 
candidate for the office of mayor. Already during the election 
campaign "Prosperity" named as its mayoral candidate Janis 
Armicans, but with only three votes this idea will be difficult 
to realize. It is possible that the deputies will agree and 
elect someone from a neutral list. That might be the Jurmala 
municipal autosport enterprise director Juris Visockis, who is a 
member of the DP. 
<H5>  "Harmony of People Party Victory" by Santa Belinska </H5>
  The hot election campaign period is over and a long awaited 
silence has descended upon Daugavpils. The Harmony of People 
party can celebrate victory, for it won ten seats in the new 
city council out of 15. As expected, Aleksei Vidavskis, list 
leader and deputy chairman of the state stock company "Dautex" 
received the most voter support. Judging by articles in 
newspapers he could also be the person who the townsfolk and 
party members want to see in the post of mayor. About twenty 
percent of voters cast their ballots for Aleksei Vidavskis. The 
other council members elected from the Harmony of People party 
are SIA "Austra" director Rita Strode, physician Reinits Joksts, 
Social Assistance Center worker Andrejs Grave, insurance 
association "Ezerzeme" president Peteris Savostjanovs, "Latvia's 
Gas" Daugavpils affiliate director Viktors Gajevskis, state 
revenue service inspector Natalija Semjonova, High School Nine 
director Silvija Birjulina, enterprise "Lokomotivs" trade union 
committee chairman Ivans Pucka and stock company "Dilars" 
president Dmitrijs Sinders. The SDLP and the Democratic Party of 
Latgale unified list got three seats in the city council. Those 
go to the current city council chairman Valdis Lauskis, state 
stock company "Dautex" director Janis Ambainis and city chief 
architect Gertrude Kudina. Agrarian Union of Latvia candidate 
Andrejs Dauksts and Social Democratic Party list member Aleksejs 
Providenko, who has a highly controversial reputation in the 
city, each emerged victorious. Before the election candidates on 
the Harmony of People list said that they are willing to work 
with all other lists on economic issues. The Daugavpils 
elections commission will submit its list of the new city 
council to the Central Elections Commission, which will have to 
rule on the level of state language comprehension for three 
council members before they can take office. 
<H5>  "It's All Clear to One--Others Somewhat Confused" by Marina </H5>
Marinina 
  Seven members of the Popular Front, three Democratic Party 
list "We for Liepaja" members, two Association of Nationalist 
Organizations members and one each from "For Fatherland and 
Freedom," the Democratic Labor Party and the Liepaja 
Entrepreneurs Association were elected to the Liepaja city 
council. Although the Popular Fronters did not win the one 
additional seat needed to govern absolutely, Janis Birzkops, 
chair of the Liepaja section of the PFL [Popular Front of 
Latvia], the first person on the victorious list, and now also 
the likely head of the city, does not anticipate any obstacles 
to the work of the resulting Liepaja council. Despite the 
agreement of intent already concluded with FFF at the level of a 
protocol, Mr. Birzkops still hopes to work with the LNIM, 
similar to what is being discussed in Riga. 
  FFF section chair Arkadijs Zebergs confirmed yesterday that 
Janis Gailis, former Home Guard batallion commander, now 
landlord, construction company owner, and the Fatherlander 
elected to the council, supports the PFL orientation, and for 
his part Valdis Prancans, Association of Nationalist 
Organizations member, said that both deputies from his list--the 
doctor Egils Deksnis for the Christian Democrats and Vilnis 
Maulins from the LNIM--will, for the time being, remain in the 
opposition. Similarly, he predicted that "We for Liepaja" would 
be in opposition to the Popular Fronters. 
  Ivars Lagzdins, who submitted this list, looking at the 
seven 
council seats he considered should have been his and that 
certainly Andris Jaunsleinis should have been elected, 
acknowledged that the Popular Front phenomenon in Liepaja 
surprised him somewhat and that predicting the future is truly 
difficult at this moment. We were unable to contact "We For 
Liepaja" deputy Teodors Enins, but the other two, Inese 
Liepniece, Liepaja Commerce Bank board chair, and Janis 
Dreiblats, Liepaja Theatre director, acknowledged that they 
neither expected nor particularly wanted to get onto the 
council, but Mr. Dreiblats was pleasantly surprised by his 
popularity among the city's inhabitants. They declined to 
discuss the future for the time being. Liepaja Entrepreneurs 
Association director Janis Spriedejs was hopeful that he sees no 
reason that his deputy, Music College director Rihards Rubins, 
could not cooperate with the Popular Fronters. 
  Mr. Birzkops did express a bit of regret that a 
representative of producers was not elected from the LEA 
[Liepaja Entrepreneurs Association], because the council does 
not have anyone like that, but that does not mean that he has 
any claim against his former schoolmate, Mr. Rubins. When asked 
about a possible opposition, for example, from the "We For 
Liepaja" side, Mr. Birzkops answered that he views opposition 
with skepticism, for people normally argue only because they are 
missing a clear conception of various things. As for "We For 
Liepaja," they are former Popular Fronters and all are honorable 
and sensible people with whom it is possible to work in a team 
in the the name of Liepaja's interests, [he said]. 
  The possibility of cooperating with the PFL and "We For 
Liepaja" has not been completely ruled out by the Fatherlanders 
either, despite their undisguised worries, but arguments against 
it have already begun to appear. Time will tell whether or not 
they are won over. 
<H5>  "A Convincing Victory" by Valda Madalane </H5>
  Even though only four lists battled in the municipal 
election 
for seats on the Rezekne city council, the final results came 
slowly, although they could have been predicted well in 
advanced. Monday morning it became known that a convincing 
number of seats--six--had been won by "Rezekne's Proprietor" 
(Ernests Jurkans, Vladimirs Cvetkovs, Helmuts Cibulis, Vilmars 
Stanislavs Jukna, Irena Silinevica, Janis Zudans). Two seats 
each went to the National Power Association of Latvia (Janis 
Novaksanovs and Janis Visockis) and to the Harmony of People 
party (Viktors Reblis and Valentina Sidlovska) and one to the 
Democratic Party of Latgale (Jazeps Korsaks). The simplest 
mathematical computations show unmistakably that leader 
affilitations alone do not create the prerequisites for real 
coalition creation. Such a viewpoint is also expressed by newly 
elected Rezekne city council deputy V. Reblis and he adds that 
in this kind of situation it is pointless to seek the office of 
city mayor. In turn "Rezekne's Proprietor" member H. Cibulis 
clarified that the list leader usually nominates the candidate 
for mayor. So: Ernests Jurkans? The future of the city will be 
determined by six entrepreneurial and energy branch 
representatives, three doctors and two educators. 
<H5>  "Expectations--Moderate" by Zane Matulena </H5>
  In the elections for the Jelgava council the 15 seats were 
divided as follows: LNIM (six seats), SDLP (2), DP (2), AU (2), 
FFF (2), LW [Latvia's Way] (1). Yesterday afternoon we contacted 
various list members elected to seats on the Jelgava city 
council. They could only express their own personal views about 
possible coalitions and candidates for mayor, because 
consultations within the local sections of the parties and 
movements, as well as the mutual consultations of those on the 
lists still had not occurred. LNIM Jelgava section member A. 
Burba said that the key to building a coalition will be the 
people who end up in the council from the other lists. 
Cooperation is possible with two new councilmen from the AU 
list. One of them, it is possible, will be the Jelgava city 
chief physician, U. Cacus, who in a telephone conversation 
acknowledged that he has received an unofficial offer to work 
with LNIM representatives on the council. Of course it will be 
concretely decided by the leadership of the Agrarian Union's 
regional section. The LNIM representative emphasized that he was 
expressing his personal thoughts, calling as a potential city 
council chair the current Jelgava city municipal leader, LNIM 
member Uldis Ivans. Equally reserved in his predictions was the 
current city commerce director R. Vitolins. 
  Last night the Jelgava section of "Latvia's Way" held a 
meeting. A resolution was adopted that for the time being the 
movement will be neutral and wait to see who will be nominated 
to the post of mayor by others. If a compromise is not reached 
"Latvia's Way" will be prepared to offer one of their members. 
J. Abele, Jelgava section coordinator for "Latvia's Way," said 
that to resolve actual issues in his city it would be better to 
be part of the ruling coalition, though it is possible that they 
find themselves in the opposition. Unfortunately we were unable 
to find out the thoughts of "For Fatherland and Freedom," the 
Democratic Party or the SDLP yesterday. These lists will also be 
represented in the city council. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47098 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94053" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   18 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> LITHUANIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Demographic Trends Cause Concern </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New Demographic Trends Cause Concern </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1313A Vilnius LIETUVOS RYTAS in Lithuanian 18 May 94 p 
33 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1313A </F>
<F P=104>  Vilnius LIETUVOS RYTAS </F>
<F P=105>  Lithuanian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vlada Stankuniene, head of the Demography </F>
Department of the Institute of Philosophy, Sociology, and Law: 
"The Demographic Crisis: What is its Significance Today, and 
What does it Portend for the Future of Our People?" 
  [Text] The demographic changes that have taken place in 
Lithuania during the last four or five years have broken with 
long-term trends and have created a new demographic situation. 
Its very newness is as frightening as are its unclear 
implications. More and more often we hear the warning cry: Will 
we survive? 
  For the first time ever in peacetime, in 1992 the population 
of Lithuania began to decline: It dropped by ten thousand in 
1992, and by 12.6 thousand in 1993. This decline is not 
infrequently used to illustrate conclusions about fateful 
demographic changes and even about the disappearance of the 
nationality. However, as the overall population declines, the 
numbers of rural and urban dwellers are shifting not only in 
different, but in what are to us unaccustomed directions. The 
number of rural residents, which heretofore had declined, has 
been growing for three years, while the number of urban 
residents has declined. Therefore, before we draw similar 
conclusions, it would make sense to analyze the causes and 
meaning of these changes. Furthermore, there is the danger of 
overestimating secondary phenomena, of attaching special 
importance to them while overlooking the primary ones. It is 
important to lay bare the nature of the recent demographic 
changes. Which of them will determine our demographic prospects, 
and how well do they conform with our demographic vision? Is it 
very important that the population keep growing? Perhaps it is 
more important to know why it grows, and what sort of 
demographic future will be brought about by the changes that are 
taking place? 
  Prior to the end of the last decade, Lithuania was 
characterized by a constant and, by the standards of other 
European countries, fairly large growth in population. However, 
almost half of this growth consisted of migration from the 
republics of the late Soviet Union, primarily from Russia. The 
annual net immigration used to amount to 7-8000 people. That was 
hardly cause for rejoicing. We would have been happier with a 
lower level of population growth. With the change in the 
political situation, population growth began to slow in 1989, 
and to decline by 1992. With the restoration of independence, 
the patterns of migration underwent fundamental changes. Greatly 
increased emigration considerably exceeded the declining rate of 
immigration, and the net balance became negative. 
  Some, without bothering to analyze who is going where, draw 
the conclusion that many of us are leaving our homeland. 
However, statistical data shows that the emigration consists 
primarily of Russians, Belarusians, and Ukranians. In 1992, the 
net balance of migration to the ex-republics of the Soviet Union 
was minus 21,100 people, and in 1993, minus 12,000. We can take 
pleasure in the fact that repatriation is taking place 
peacefully and uncoerced; even a significant decline in 
population due to this reason is hardly cause for concern. Back 
to the subject. 
  Thus far, emigration to the countries of the West has not 
been great. In 1989-1993, the Lithuanian population declined by 
5,600 due to migration to the West. This constitutes only 12 
percent of the total decline in the number of inhabitants due to 
migration. Jews constitute the primary migrants to Western 
countries. During the last five years, the Lithuanian population 
was reduced by 900 due to migration to the West. However, it 
must be emphasized that the official statistics are incapable at 
this time of completely pinning down the total emigration to the 
West. It seems that we will have to determine later how many did 
not return from short trips abroad. Anyway, due to emigration to 
both East and West during the last five years, the population of 
Lithuania was reduced by 51,800 people. As a result, from 1989 
to 1993 the number of Russians in Lithuania declined by 33,600, 
that of Ukranians by 7,400, that of the Belarusians by 7,000, 
and that of the Jews by 5,300. At the same time, 5,400 more 
Lithuanians immigrated than emigrated. With the return home of 
the Lithuanians who had for various reasons been scattered 
across the late Soviet Union, their numbers are growing. The 
percentage of Lithuanians in the general population is also 
growing: They constituted 79.6 percent in 1989, and 81.1 percent 
in 1994. 
  Since the number of inhabitants and its growth are not ends 
in themselves, the currently observable decline in population 
due to emigration cannot be viewed as a serious demographic 
problem. It especially should not be permitted to overshadow 
those demographic problems that demand special attention and 
resolute action. 
  While natural increase has thus far remained positive, 
during 
the last few years, and especially in 1993, as the death rate 
rapidly increased and the birth rate decreased, it approached 
that fateful boundary at which fewer are born than die. During 
the last couple of decades, natural increase accounted for an 
annual increase of 20,000 in the population; in 1993, it was 
only 600. In 1993, almost 7,000 fewer children were born, and 
4,600 more people died, than in 1992. The number of births 
declined from 53,600 in 1992 to 46,700 in 1993 (i.e., by seven 
thousand, or 13 percent), while the corresponding number of 
deaths rose from 41,500 to 46,100 (by 4,600, or 11 percent). 
  Without a doubt, 1993 will enter Lithuanian demographic 
history as a year of demographic decline. Lithuania has never 
experienced such a sudden and spectacular decrease in the birth 
rate and increase in the death rate in a time of peace; at 
least, not in this century. It would be nice to believe that 
this will be the last such "record" set. However, it may be that 
the near future will bring even more "impressive achievements." 
  Such demographic fluctuations are usually the results of 
economic crises. Such crises affect the birth rate fairly 
quickly and noticeably. The public reaction to a deteriorated 
standard of living and uncertain prospects first manifests 
itself in the decision of families to wait for better times. 
Marriages are delayed. Fewer children are born. Many countries 
have experienced this in times of economic crises. However, the 
effect of crises on deaths is usually considerably smaller. Such 
a great increase in an already high, by the standards of 
developed countries, death rate betrays a public inability to do 
anything to save lives. 
  The public health and death rate are currently affected by a 
number of new and, to us, unfamiliar factors. We were taken 
unawares by the sudden change in the conditions and modes of 
life, as well as by the changes in interpersonal relationships, 
by unstable employment, and by a changed standard of living. 
  It is very difficult, especially for the older generation, 
to 
adapt to new conditions. That increases stress, and thereby 
affects the related illness and death rates. The death rate from 
circulatory and psychiatric illnesses is rapidly increasing. 
Last year, the death rate from circulatory diseases increased by 
13 percent. More and more often, we are losing middle aged and 
even young people to these diseases. The death rate has also 
increased due to reasons directly linked to a lack of normal 
living conditions, medical care, and medicines. In the period 
from 1990 to 1993, the death rate from infectious and parasitic 
diseases increased by 45 percent, deaths from tuberculosis 
almost doubled (increased by 1.87 times), and deaths from 
diabetes, diseases of the endocrine system, and digestive and 
metabolic disorders increased by 50 percent. The death rate due 
to malignancies continues to grow. 
  The worsening crime situation carries off its victims. Never 
have we had so many unnatural deaths. In 1993 alone, murder 
increased by 18 percent, and suicide by 12 percent. The number 
of deaths caused by auto accidents is also increasing. 
  Within this complex human environment, the fruits of a 
long-term deterioration of the public health are being 
harvested. During the last five years, the average life 
expectancy has declined by 3.4 years, from 72.4 years in 1988 to 
68.95 years in 1993. In 1993 alone, the average life span was 
reduced by 1.5 years. Statistics on the average life span have 
only been collected in postwar Lithuania since 1959. At that 
time, the average was 69.4 years. Thus, we can only say that we 
have slipped back by more than thirty years. This change was 
primarily the result of a greatly increased death rate among 
men, especially in the countryside. The average life expectancy 
of men declined in the period 1988-1993 by 4.6 years (from 67.7 
years in 1988 to 63.1 in 1993), and that of women by 1.7 years 
(from 76.6 years to 74.9 years). In 1993, the life expectancy of 
rural men was 4.3 years shorter than it had been in 1959, having 
declined from 64.7 years to 60.4 years. 
  The difference between the life expectancy of men and women 
grew to nearly twelve years, and in rural areas up to 13.4 
years. A few years ago, the average male life span, then shorter 
by nine years, was held up by foreign demographers as a 
characteristic phenomenon of Soviet mortality. To what can we 
attribute the situation in 1993? 
  Some cold comfort can be taken from the fact that the 
decline 
of the average life span coincided with a change in the 
statistical methodology. Up until 1991, stillbirths were dealt 
with in accordance with Soviet methodology, which meant that 
many infants that died soon after birth were not included in the 
mortality statistics. However, that should have had more or less 
the same effect on the average life expectancy of men and women. 
It would be nice to believe that this jump in the death rate is 
a temporary phenomenon, the outcome of an accumulation of 
causes. The birth rate, which had sharply declined during the 
first postwar decades, then stabilized itself and for twenty 
years remained at replacement level, i.e., the generations made 
way for one another, without an increase in the overall 
population. However, during the last few years, and especially 
in 1993, the birth rate fell to a level lower than had ever been 
recorded in Lithuania. In 1993 there were only 12.5 births per 
thousand inhabitants, versus 15-17 in the 1970-1990 period. 
  The average number of children that a woman has in her 
lifetime declined in 1993 to 1.66 (it had long been at about 2). 
What does that mean? Are we shifting from fairly widespread 
two-child families to one-child or even childless ones, is it a 
result of poverty and instability? 
  There can be no doubt that a greatly deteriorated standard 
of 
living forces families to make hard choices as to whether to at 
least temporarily forego the desired number of children. For 
many, having as many children as they would like to have has for 
the present become a luxury. 
  Usually, once a crisis is past and conditions begin to 
improve, the birth rate rebounds to its previous level, often 
even manifesting a compensatory effect, i.e., it temporarily 
becomes higher than before. 
  However, it is unlikely that we can count on such changes in 
the future. The effect of the crisis on the birth rate is only 
one of the causes. In recent times, the conditions, ways, rules, 
and value orientations have been fundamentally changing. A 
strong spread of Western culture can be sensed, especially among 
the young. What effect will that have--or is already having--on 
the behavior of families? Will small families, created late, 
also become widespread in our country? Will the numbers of 
unmarried couples, widespread in Western and especially Northern 
Europe, along with their often illegitimate children, begin to 
increase? 
  The first indicators of the development of these processes 
have appeared. As the overall birthrate declines, the number of 
illegitimate children grows. They constituted nine percent of 
births in 1993, while previously the illegitimacy rate had 
remained at the prewar level of 6-7 percent. The increase in 
illegitimate children may be the result of temporary factors. 
  However, it is not rare in Lithuania for the long-standing, 
formal, Catholic-inspired family relationships to be replaced by 
informal ones. Ordinarily, an increase in illegitimacy is a sign 
of an increase in illicit relationships. 
  Since 1991, a fairly rapid decline in marriages has been 
evident. Marriages prior to age 25 are becoming rarer. As it is, 
divorce has been fairly common for some decades; it has become 
more common in recent years. Even scanty data about the family 
and birth rates testifies to the fact that the family is 
undergoing a crisis. Clearly, families are becoming 
destabilized. Common sense and the experiences of other 
countries indicate that difficult conditions are not the only 
causes of the aforementioned changes. Thorough research is 
essential if we are to answer the questions of what ultimately 
determines changes in the family, what those changes are, what 
kind of help families expect from the state and how they could 
be helped. It has not been grasped thus far that these changes 
in the family and in birth rates will determine the time of the 
onset as well as the magnitude of depopulation (an absolute 
decline in population, with the death rate exceeding the birth 
rate). Furthermore, it must be understood that an unstable 
family is not only a consequence, but also a precondition of an 
unstable society. It is therefore not a secondary problem. 
Depending upon our solution to this problem is our demographic 
future and the manifestations and consequences of depopulation, 
which we shall no doubt begin to experience as early as next 
year. 
  The situation is very serious and calls for resolute 
decisions. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-066-93A>      The Lithuanian Population, by Millions </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-066-93B>      Migration to and from the Republics of the Former USSR, by Thousands </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-066-93C>      Natural Increase, Per Thousand </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-066-94A>      Average Number of Children Per Woman (Fertility Rate) </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-066-94B>      Marriage and Divorce, Per Thousand </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-066-94C>      Average Life Expectancy, by Years </FIG>



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47099 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94054" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> LITHUANIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kaisiadorys Fails To Elect Seimas Member </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Kaisiadorys Fails To Elect Seimas Member </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1376A Vilnius TIESA in Lithuanian 17 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1376A </F>
<F P=104>  Vilnius TIESA </F>
<F P=105>  Lithuanian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed report: "Elections Failed a Third Time in </F>
Kaisiadorys"] 
  [Text] Of the 38,900 voters in the Kaisiadorys electoral 
district only 1,878 or 4.8 percent came to vote a third time for 
the sole candidate running for Seimas, A. Visockas, chairman of 
the Socialist Party. The candidate received 1,312 votes, or 70 
percent of those participating. The inhabitants of Pravieniskiai 
were the most active: of 300 voters, 227 gave their votes to A. 
Visockas. Voting took place in all precincts, although some 
electoral commission members refused to take part in the 
elections, and no substantial violations of the electoral law 
were found. 
  A. Zilinskas, secretary of the Main Electoral Commission, 
reported these facts as well as the preliminary voting results 
to reporters yesterday. The commission plans to receive all the 
official election documents today. They will then be verified. 
Correspondence ballots from abroad have also not yet been 
received (about 18 are expected). But the conclusion is already 
clear: a Seimas member has not been elected for the Kaisiadorys 
electoral district -- the election simply did not take place. 
This "pleasure" cost about 50 thousand litas. 
  The fourth round of elections in Kaisiadorys should be held 
in half a year, in November. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47100 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94055" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   18 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> LITHUANIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Reorganization of Ministries Planned </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Reorganization of Ministries Planned </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1376B Vilnius TIESA in Lithuanian 18 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1376B </F>
<F P=104>  Vilnius TIESA </F>
<F P=105>  Lithuanian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aldona Svirbutaviciute: "Those Who Are Able, </F>
Don't Want To, While Those Who Want To, Aren't Able"] 
  [Text] While the new ministerial portfolios are being 
assigned in the lobbies, Seimas managed to ratify the future 
number of ministers. There will be not 18, as we reported a week 
ago, but 19. A Ministry of Environmental Protection will be 
established on June 15, and in the middle of July the Ministry 
of Culture and Education will be divided into two -- a Ministry 
of Culture and a Ministry of Education and Science. Around 
autumn a Ministry of Government Reform and Local Administration 
will be established. (Just last week it was said only two new 
ministers would be appointed.) 
  Discussions are taking place in the Seimas corridors, and 
not 
only there, about potential candidates for the ministerial 
posts. The Lithuanian Democratic Labor Party [LDDP] members of 
Seimas became acquainted with several of them on Monday at a 
meeting of their faction. 
  I interviewed faction members and asked them to answer a few 
questions. Seimas member V. Petkevicius described Albertas 
Vasiliauskas, the future minister of forestry, very positively. 
He said that the candidate is both a scientist and a man of 
practical affairs, who understands very well the problems of 
both commercial forestry and nature conservation. "In the end, 
the decision on ministerial candidates is not made by 
Petkevicius alone or Rupeika alone. That is a prerogative of the 
president and the government," said the author. 
  The faction may voice its opinion about the future 
candidates, but it will not be they who make the decision. 
  In V. Petkevicius's opinion, it is necessary to split the 
ministries of education and culture. He said with a laugh that 
the present minister sits on two chairs; one day he sits with 
education administrators, then on the next with a group of 
cultural workers. 
  A. Lozuraitis, a member of the LDDP faction's hierarchy, 
also 
gave his opinion. He said that the discussion in the faction 
does not constitute a final decision. It is quite possible that 
other candidates exist or will appear. "It is very complicated 
to talk about aspirants in advance, because there is often a 
conflict of strong, passionate opinions. You can't hide the fact 
that some persons are patrons of certain candidates, proposing 
and pushing them, while others criticize them. So this process 
does not have a clear procedure so far. Neither the faction, nor 
Seimas appoints the ministers, but there is a striving to make 
the search for ministers more public, respecting everyone's 
opinion," said A. Lozuraitis. 
  A. Kuncinas, the assistant head of the faction, said that a 
businesslike conversation had taken place on Monday with the 
ministerial candidates, who had answered questions. According to 
him, the faction does not make any decisions, it can only 
express its opinion to the prime minister, who is the chairman 
of the party. A. Kuncinas said that the ministers will be 
discussed again in the faction and in the party presidium. 
  By the way, we found out that the list of ministerial 
candidates is far longer than was known until now. A ministerial 
post (in the Ministry of Education and Science) is being offered 
to A. Lozuraitis. Asked to comment about this news, he said: 
  - That always flatters one's ego, but one must know one's 
limitations. I took this proposal to be a humorous one... I 
don't consider it serious... 
  - Is that possible? After all, it's doubtful that the 
persons 
who made the proposal did it as a joke. 
  - I think that they know me less well than I know myself. 
  A. Kuncinas, the assistant head of the faction, summarized 
this mini-interview: "That's the way it is. Those who could be a 
minister don't want to, while sometimes those who are pushing to 
get the post are not capable of heading a ministry... " 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47101 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94056" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   19 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> LITHUANIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   State Press Enterprise Privatized </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    State Press Enterprise Privatized </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1376C Vilnius TIESA in Lithuanian 19 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1376C </F>
<F P=104>  Vilnius TIESA </F>
<F P=105>  Lithuanian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["A Declaration by the Lithuanian Periodical Press </F>
Publishers Association (LSA)"] 
  [Text] The state enterprise for press distribution 
"Lithuania's Press" (not included in the list of specific state 
enterprises), which as a monopoly set prices unjustified by 
economic considerations for its services in connection with the 
selling of the press, increased its joint stock through excess 
profits, and on 24 March 1994 registered with the Vilnius city 
government as a joint stock company. 
  A privately owned company has become an organization 
controlling a critically important service, the retail trade in 
newspapers and magazines. 
  "Lithuania's Press," which has been dictating unfavorable 
terms to the periodical press (a faulty system of settling 
accounts, in which the sellers are compensated for only 12000070040f 
the loss from unsold periodicals, limits placed an the 
distribution of new periodicals, etc.), is now escaping 
government control. 
  Since there is no alternative system of distributing the 
press -- to create it requires large capital investments -- the 
privatization of this enterprise changes in an essential way the 
situation of the press in our country. 
  Not only hundreds of press kiosks in the best locations in 
Lithuanian cities and small towns became the shareholders' 
property, paid for from residual profits, but also one of the 
largest buildings in Lithuania -- the multistory house on 
Laisves Prospectas in Vilnius -- another large piece of state 
property. A group of people now has the right to decide which 
periodicals to disseminate and which ones not to. Newspapers and 
magazines are left unprotected against arbitrary actions by the 
distributors, dividing periodicals into "good" and "bad," 
creating a precondition for censorship of the press; the press 
may lose the common equality under which it operates in the 
marketplace. There is no guarantee that one fine day we won't be 
left without newspapers -- it is the intent of the stockholders 
to change the profile of the enterprise's activities (the heads 
of "Lithuania's Press" have explained more than once that it is 
more profitable to sell beer and cigarettes than periodicals). 
  The newspaper and magazine publishers are uneasy about the 
fact that a monopoly service is given over to private hands. The 
distribution of the press in our country is becoming 
unpredictable. A threat has appeared to the economic and 
political freedoms of the press, to the entire free press, the 
guarantee of democracy and stability of the country. 
  [Signed] Rimantas Sukys, president of the Lithuanian 
Periodical Press Publishers Association. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47102 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94057" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   22 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Baltic Region In Need of Venture Capital </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Baltic Region In Need of Venture Capital </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1395B Tallinn PaEVALEHT in Estonian 22 Apr 94 p 9 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1395B </F>
<F P=104>  Tallinn PaEVALEHT </F>
<F P=105>  Estonian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by PL staff correspondent: "The Baltics Could Use a </F>
Fund for Venture Capital"] 
  [Text] 
  TALLINN (PL). The annual meeting of the European Bank 
of Reconstruction and Development (EBRD) held in St. Petersburg 
turned out to be very successful for Estonia. According to 
finance minister Heiki Kranich, who represented Estonia at the 
meeting, EBRD president Jacques de Larosi&egrave;re showed a 
lively 
interest in things Estonian, and was ready to consider some of 
Estonia's proposals. He also expressed hope that "results of the 
meeting held between Estonia and the EBRD could soon be 
felt." 
  Estonia expected more in the way of flexibility and 
risk-taking from the bank than there has been before. Of the 
latter special attention was given to establishing a venture 
capital fund with resources coming from the EBRD. Out of the 
resources of such a fund, investments would be channeled 
directly into the equity base of a venture, and the bank would 
become a shareholder in Estonian enterprises through the fund. 
Kranich said that the creation of a joint fund for the Baltics 
was also being discussed at the St. Petersburg meeting. Since 
the levels of the Baltic states are different at the moment, 
Kranich proposed that the fund be first activated in Estonia, 
and later expanded to the other Baltic states. EBRD's board of 
directors did pass a resolution, in principle, to increase its 
investments of startup capital for new ventures. So far, EBRD's 
involvement in Estonia has been limited mainly to the state 
sector. In the future, however, more attention will be paid to 
the private sector. 
  Delegates from Estonia had longer talks with representatives 
of the Nordic Countries Bank of Investments and Japanese 
financial institutions. 
  United States' Stanley Morgan was willing to measure 
Estonia's credit rating to its lenders by international 
standards. Enn Pant, chancellor of the Finance Ministry was of 
the opinion that, at the moment, Estonia's rating is quite 
favorable. Stanley Morgan also offered his help with the issue 
of state obligations and corporate shares. Japan's Namura 
International, however, showed great interest in Estonia's ports. 
  Those attending the EBRD annual meeting attributed great 
significance to the loan agreement signed between the 
Export-Import Bank of Japan, EBRD and Estonia, which opened up a 
$3 million credit line. Martin Poder, vice chancellor of 
the 
Finance Ministry, said that this credit can be used for "joint 
financing with EBRD in cooperation on projects being carried 
out." The agreement is also expected to enhance further direct 
cooperation with the Export-Import Bank of Japan. 
  Heiki Kranich remarked that Estonia was the first 
East-European country to start negotiating for such an agreement 
and that, in the course of negotiations, it was also joined by 
Latvia and Lithuania. 
  At the EBRD annual meeting, favorable recognition was also 
given to relations between Estonia and the International 
Monetary Fund (IMF). What deserves notice in this connection, 
Kranich said, is not that the IMF directives are being followed 
blindly, but rather that the positions taken by the Estonian 
government and the IMF coincide. "Estonia is the favorite of 
IMF," was one of the remarks heard at the EBRD annual meeting. 
  The finance ministers of the three Baltic states are 
planning 
to meet in June of this year, for a further discussion of 
possible cooperative projects. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47103 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   20 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Gaydar Views Political, Economic Concerns </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Gaydar Views Political, Economic Concerns </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1490A Moscow ARGUMENTY I FAKTY in Russian No 24, Jun 94 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944K1490A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ARGUMENTY I FAKTY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Yegor Gaydar, State Duma deputy and chairman </F>
of Russia's Choice, by unidentified ARGUMENTY I FAKTY 
correspondents; place and date not given: "Ye. Gaydar: `Our 
Trouble Is That Wit Works Woe'"] 
  [Text] We continue our regular meetings with 
political leaders. Today "on stage" is Yegor Gaydar--economist, 
former journalist, former prime minister, and currently a State 
Duma deputy and chairman of the new Russia's Choice party. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] There is a stratum of people who have an 
income of R20,000, with the average price of bread being R500. 
According to our data, this group comprises approximately 25 
million people. You have to agree that these people have been 
thrown "under the wheels of history" not without your 
participation. 
  [Gaydar] Let us look at how the bottom 20 percent of the 
population in Ukraine live. Let us compare them with our bottom 
20 percent. And ask ourselves: Why are they running to us from 
their "communist paradise"? This is not statistics--this is the 
truth. Over there, the policy was the motto: "Do not hurt the 
poor!" That is, take care of everyone the communist way. But the 
poor there think about the standard of living of our poor more 
or less the same way we thought during the times of stagnation 
about American unemployed with their benefits. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] That is, you are offering a choice 
between bad and very bad? 
  [Gaydar] Of course, a poor man in America does not give a 
damn about life here. The realistic choice is between the poor 
in Ukraine and the poor in Russia, not between the poor in 
Russia and the flourishing middle class in Switzerland. 
Otherwise, what can we compare it with? 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] Something of our own. 
  [Gaydar] With our "shining" past? All right! Who has 
accumulated $80 billion in debts? The entire country lived on 
imported grain, do you not know this? Where are we going to get 
this kind of money now? 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] Russia has a huge number of Mercedes-600 
and it looks as if these people do not pay a kopek in taxes. At 
the same time, if we compare the old average salary of R135 and 
the 25 kopek price of bread with current prices and wages, it 
comes out that the elderly today get an old-money equivalent of 
R10. 
  [Gaydar] This is not so. In reality even by your calculation 
the floor comes out at R20. We have to make a comparison, 
however, not with the unreal conditions of 1990, when the stores 
were completely empty, but with 1980, when one could more or 
less buy something. If you compare the average wages of today's 
Russia with 1980 wages, you will see that they have stayed at 
the same level, except that there are three more zeros on the 
end now. It is true, though, that income differentiation 
increased sharply, and the poverty stratum expanded. 
  In order to deal with the problem of the poor seriously, we 
need one minor trifle--money. We will find it only when we come 
to understand that we should help weak people instead of 
inefficient enterprises. Because helping such an enterprise is 
helping its stupid director. If you continue helping him, the 
klutz, you will never have enough money to help the poor old 
lady. She is weaker than the director--she will not go and bang 
her fist in the Duma, break through to the president, or 
intimidate the prime minister. 
  It is also cheaper to help the poor individually than to 
help 
inefficient enterprises. Wages comprise 10-15 percent of the 
product cost. It is cheaper to pay wages even when no work is 
done, because this way you save valuable resources instead of 
squandering them on producing output nobody needs. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] What would you do now if you were prime 
minister or president? 
  [Gaydar] There are several most urgent things. What are we 
doing in the area of defense? We are trying to 
maintain the military we inherited from the Soviet Union. I 
personally cut expenditures on arms procurement by 70 percent. I 
am constantly berated for this. Our country cannot carry the 
burden of maintaining a military of this size. Instead of one 
combat-capable division we have six that are not combat-capable. 
And when we use them, it turns out that not a single platoon can 
move because all of them are busy doing one thing--guarding 
warehouses. If we continue to bring the number of soldiers to 
match the number of generals instead of the reverse, we will 
always have a destitute, underfed, underfinanced, poorly armed 
military. 
  The next point of our program is agriculture. Our 
agrarian lobby constantly accuses us of not subsidizing 
agriculture, although it is allegedly subsidized in the entire 
world. In reality, this is the privilege of rich countries. 
Agriculture in rich technological countries is a small "trivial 
item" they can afford to subsidize. This happens as a rule in a 
situation where there is surplus of foodstuffs, and it is 
subsidized there on a scale incommensurate with ours. 
  Russia is a poor country, but it actively continues to help 
inefficient kolkhozes and sovkhozes, so that they will not, God 
forbid, die out. The real agrarian reform ground to a halt in 
the beginning of 1993. Financial infusions began 
again. This is the third item that needs to be immediately done 
away with. 
  We can and need to help the countryside build a system of 
peasant banks, mortgage loans, strengthen land property that can 
be used in commercial operations. Where do loans come from in 
the entire world? Mostly, through mortgages. But how can one 
mortgage the land in our country if he is unable to exercise his 
right of private ownership of the land? 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] Right now you have not found anything 
better for yourself than to jump into politics. Why? 
  [Gaydar] I intended to do academic research. Then the 
government made several such "moves" that set off a panic; a 
price freeze loomed. Although it has been a year and a half 
since I left the job of the prime minister, one still hears: 
"those infamous Gaydar reforms." It is clear to me that I bear 
historical responsibility for all the stupid things that are 
being done now and will be done in the future, for everything 
that will go wrong. So now I will have to spend some part of my 
life reducing the scope of these stupid things. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] This is a noble goal, if we are speaking 
of the stupidity of ministers, but are you not worried about 
communists coming to power? There are examples: Lithuania, 
Poland, Hungary. 
  [Gaydar] A communist wave is inevitable. Reforms start at a 
time when everything is completely ruined. And there are many 
who welcomed the first anticommunist wave because they pinned 
great hopes on it. 
  Remember, I was saying that soon we will have no lines or 
shortages, and the ruble will become convertible? Many were 
sarcastic: "Oh, yes, we, too, read fairy tales in childhood." 
But now they unfortunately do not remember what I said next: 
"Yes, all this is realistic. But this will only be the first 
step, not a solution to all our problems." 
  As one may expect, stores filled with goods no longer 
surprise anyone. Neither does the convertible ruble. New 
problems, on the other hand--increased social inequality, 
serious losses for a number of social groups--manifested 
themselves in full force. And this creates a pretext for the 
mobilization of communist forces. Plus nostalgic recollections 
of the past. This is an objective base for a new communist wave. 
In Poland, Hungary, and Lithuania this wave is quite safe. 
Because in reality members of those parties were not communists 
even at the beginning of the reforms. 
  Russia is another matter. Our communist party is quite 
terrorist, nationalist, and totalitarian. And if, God forbid, it 
gets another chance, it may happen that it will not fade into 
the shadows again for at least another 70 years. This is an 
immense, and serious, danger for Russia. 
  Strange as it may sound, however, we are lucky that the 
communists got large representation in the parliament. The main 
problem for them and for the nationalists is this: They do not 
know what to do with power. The first part is clear: take away 
from the current ones the dachas, cars, and salaries. What next? 
They will not risk making public and beginning to implement 
their real program: nationalization, price controls, 
shortage-driven distribution, and so on. Nobody wants this 
anymore. And the people do not want it, either. They want a lot 
of money and a lot of goods. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] There are many who do not share this 
opinion. It is probably not accidental that you lost the 
elections to the Duma. 
  [Gaydar] We made a great mistake in the course of the 
election campaign. Because we listened too much to Western 
experts and tried to fashion the campaign by Western standards. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] Whose idea was this? 
  [Gaydar] Nobody's. It was not a conscious decision. Our 
trouble is that we have a lot of smart people who know too many 
foreign languages. In this case what we got was wit working woe. 
We knew how election campaigns were conducted in the West. And 
decided to use somebody's else rich experience. This was a 
strategic mistake. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] It happened that our opposition came up 
with figures who one way or another claimed leadership. One gets 
the impression that there are no leaders among the democrats. 
How do you explain this? 
  [Gaydar] Our luck is that the opposition also ran into a 
clear crisis with respect to leadership. The first one was 
Zhirinovskiy. But he has a problem with crowds of 
women running after him on the street and asking: "Where is that 
husband you promised us on 13 December?" Second. 
Rutskoy. He seriously undermined his reputation by 
his "heroics" on 3-4 October 1993. I knew even before then that 
he is a very cautious, to put it mildly, man. Now it has become 
public knowledge, and the opposition is aware of it, too. 
Zyuganov. It is hard to get people to rally behind 
him, he is too much of a communist. So, fortunately for us, they 
are dealing today with the same problems as we are. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] And what about Solzhenitsyn, who has now 
moved here? 
  [Gaydar] I would not at this point discuss his figure as an 
opposition leader. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] And what about you? 
  [Gaydar] I am a man who has a very mixed reputation in 
society. I have a large audience that enthusiastically supports 
me. There is also a large audience that will not support me. 
Therefore, I am a normal leader of one of the political parties. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] And Luzhkov? 
  [Gaydar] Also a very mixed bag when it comes to reputation. 
In Moscow the attitude toward him is varied; "Muscovites" are 
not liked on the periphery. Hence, it is hard for him to be a 
leader. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] Chernomyrdin? 
  [Gaydar] A big "democrat" for whom, much as I would wish to, 
I would find it very difficult to vote. And frankly, I would not 
wish to. I think well of him, but not to the point of wanting to 
see him as my president. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] Yavlinskiy? 
  [Gaydar] Undoubtedly attractive, mostly not mixed up in 
anything, potentially not bad. But on any serious issue he 
carries a very limited real weight in society and so far has not 
shown himself in any special way. One of the potential 
candidates. It is hard to rally democrats around him, though. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] Shakhray? 
  [Gaydar] No chance whatsoever. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] Why? 
  [Gaydar] Too short, just like me. No charisma. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] Shumeyko? 
  [Gaydar] He has a very low rating right now. He is not 
popular in society. Physically attractive. Of course, it is 
possible to try to "inflate" him, but the chance for success is 
very limited. 
  So this is a game of puzzles. Because of this, difficult as 
it is, at this point I see only one democratic candidate for 
president--the president himself. 
  [ARGUMENTY I FAKTY] Do you not think that a man has a right 
to a rest? 
  [Gaydar] Do you want something else?... 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47104 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zyuganov on Restoration of Soviets </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Zyuganov on Restoration of Soviets </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0802A Moscow PRAVDA in Russian 3 Jun 94 pp 1,2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0802A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow PRAVDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Gennadiy Zyuganov, deputy to the State Duma and </F>
Chairman of the Central Executive Committee of the RF Communist 
Party, based on his report at a meeting of the National Council 
of the Accord in the Name of Russia movement: "We Are Not Giving 
Up the Soviets"; date and place of meeting not given] 
  [Text] In Russia the rule of a handful of people who are 
bound by mutual favoritism and have profited from the robbery of 
public property is growing stronger and stronger. And since 
robbery and mass theft have become possible with the permission 
and encouragement of that governmental authority, it itself is 
becoming criminal, turning corruption into an ordinary, everyday 
phenomenon. At the same time, the support of international 
capital is making the Russian government a thoroughly 
comprador-based, antinational force. The September-October coup 
d'etat was, in fact, aimed at bringing the form of government 
into conformity with its new essence. 
  The breakup of the system of soviets has turned 
representative bodies in the center and at the local level into 
powerless appendages of executive structures. The drastic 
limitation of the powers of parliament has been accompanied by 
the practically complete disappearance from it of the 
representatives of the bulk of the population--workers, the 
intelligentsia and peasants. Parliament and local representative 
bodies are being filled with bureaucrats. 
  The control of elective representatives over the 
administrative system is being totally curtailed. Connections 
among the supreme and local representative bodies are being 
destroyed. In this way an autocratic regime is being formed that 
relies on an immense--twice as large as three years ago--army of 
bureaucrats. Even G. Popov admits that the Soviet union has been 
replaced by none other than a "bureaucratic system in which 
property, by and large, will be distributed among various groups 
of bureaucrats (central and local, federal and industrial, 
official and mafia-based), and the state form of government will 
become a 'bureaucratic democracy' as a mechanism for reconciling 
the interests of individual groups of the bureaucratic class." 
  The inordinate strengthening of a presidential 
administration 
that is controlled by no one and nothing has, for all practical 
purposes, destroyed the governing of the country. The president 
and his apparatus rule over all branches of government without 
reckoning with parliament, duplicating the efforts of the 
government per se, and appointing administrators, judges and 
procurators at their own discretion. What we have is an 
intensely authoritarian mechanism based on a vertical 
bureaucratic hierarchy. 
  The Second All-Russian Conference of the Russian Federation 
Communist Party that was held this April developed a number of 
measures aimed at democratizing the political sphere and 
peacefully overcoming the existing confrontation. And I believe 
that these proposals of ours could be taken as the basis for the 
Accord in the Name of Russia movement. Their essence lies in the 
need to overcome the crying imbalance among the branches of 
government, an imbalance which has already brought the country 
to the brink of national disaster more than once in the history 
of the Russian state. 
  Today the executive authority is irresponsible as the result 
of the almost total lack of any control over it, and the 
legislative authority is irresponsible as the result of its 
total lack of rights. It is impossible to enhance and 
redistribute responsibility without redistributing powers 
between the branches of government and strengthening their 
mutual democratic control. To accomplish this, in our view, the 
following is necessary: 
  --overcoming the existing lack of coordination between the 
chambers of the Federal Assembly and defining the sphere of 
their joint, equal jurisdiction, as well as defining relations 
between the Federal Assembly and the executive branch; 
  --overcoming the dual subordination of the ministries and 
departments to the head of state and the head of government. 
Their full operational subordination to the prime minister. The 
clarification and substantial limitation of the jurisdiction and 
functions of the president and his administration; 
  --a shift to the principle of the accountability of the 
government to representative bodies; the legislative 
determination by the Federal Assembly of the government's 
structure and staffing; and the submission to it for approval of 
a government program defining its basic goals and the means and 
projected dates for attaining them, as well as approval of the 
government's composition in terms of personnel; the possibility 
of the government's resignation at the initiative of the Federal 
Assembly in the event of its deviation from its program; 
  --the exclusion of the agencies that manage state television 
and radio from the system of the executive branch. The formation 
of them, based on the principles of parity, by the parliament, 
the government and the judicial branch, taking into account the 
opinions of political parties and occupational and public 
organizations. The ensuring of equal access to the air by 
representatives of all branches of government, political 
parties, and occupational and other public organizations; 
  --the restoration of the full vertical hierarchy of 
representative bodies of authority and extension of the 
principle of the accountability of executive bodies to 
representative bodies to all levels of government, and the 
return of local government bodies to the system of state 
authority; 
  --the strict delimitation of spheres of jurisdiction between 
higher and lower levels of state authority, and enhancement of 
the independence of the latter in exercising their powers; 
  --agreement that the priority in the policy of strengthening 
Russian statehood is the restoration of the union state on a 
new, voluntary basis. Denunciation of the Belovezhskaya 
Agreement insofar as it pertains to the dissolution of the Union 
Treaty. 
  Of course, in order to attain the goals outlined it is 
necessary to revive the constitutional process both within the 
framework of the Federal Assembly and in the operation of the 
Constitutional Court. In our opinion, the court should consider 
the question of the correctness of whether the results of the 12 
December 1993 referendum on adoption of the new Constitution 
were correctly and lawfully interpreted. 
  The essence of the proposed changes lies in the fact that 
they are aimed at attaining a real, as opposed to a merely 
declared, state of civil peace, by which we mean not universal 
harmony and not the elimination of every conceivable public 
conflict, but an aggregate of social conditions and political 
procedures that have been agreed to among various social forces 
and in the context of which the conflicts that exist among them 
are resolved by exclusively peaceful, nonviolent means. The 
struggle among various tendencies is normal and inevitable, and 
there will always be winners and losers in it, but it should not 
result in the destruction oft he state and its economy, the 
social sphere and spiritual life. 
  It is on this basis that Accord in the Name of Russia should 
structure its activities. The basic steps in the development of 
our movement's work to organize the popular masses for the 
restoration of legality in the country could be as follows: 
  --the establishment at the local level of movement 
committees, including on them the representatives of all parties 
and organizations that support Accord in the Name of Russia; 
  --the establishment, on the basis of the movement, of an 
election bloc capable of winning victory in any elections. The 
coordination and support of candidates in elections in 
districts, the formation of authoritative party slates, and work 
on making the necessary adjustments in election legislation; 
  --the preparation of proposals for creating a government of 
popular trust. On the basis of election results, such a 
government could turn from a shadow government into an actual 
government of popular trust. At the same time, the opposition 
could begin right away resolutely arguing for the creation of a 
government of the parliamentary majority that from the very 
outset would reject the policy of "shock reforms" and 
subordination of the country to the interests of foreign capital; 
  --in preparing for presidential elections, Accord in the 
Name 
of Russia could orient itself toward the creation of a kind of 
"state council" consisting of the most prestigious leaders. One 
or two agreed-upon candidates for the office of president could 
be nominated from among its members. 
  In our view, one of the new president's first acts should be 
to put through an amendment to the Constitution abolishing the 
institution of the presidency and restoring genuine democracy in 
the form of a unified system of soviets of people's deputies. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47105 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   `First Tasks' of Opposition Noted </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    `First Tasks' of Opposition Noted </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0802B Moscow PRAVDA in Russian 3 Jun 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0802B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow PRAVDA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed report: "Accord in the Name of Russia: First </F>
Tasks"] 
  [Text] As previously reported in PRAVDA, the first expanded 
session of the National Council of the Accord in the Name of 
Russia was recently held in the capital. At it a resolution was 
adopted defining the movement's priority tasks. 
  1. To adopt, as a basis, draft theses for the Accord in the 
Name of Russia movement's program. The editorial commission, 
with the participation of members of the National Council, is to 
finish drawing up draft theses within two weeks, taking into 
account the discussion of criticisms and proposals that have 
been received. 
  2. For the members of the National Council to make the 
necessary efforts to form the movement's organizational 
structure on the regional and local levels, to establish support 
groups, and to bring about the broad discussion at the local 
level of the program theses that have been drawn up. 
  3. To assign the functions of coordinating council for the 
movement to the initiative group. 
  4. To hold, in the autumn of 1994, an Assembly of National 
Unity at which the movement program would be adopted and its 
working bodies would be formed. To assign the job of preparing 
and organizing the assembly to the movement's coordinating 
council. 
  5. For the movement's coordinating council to discuss with 
interested political forces the question of forming a government 
of popular trust. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47106 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Union of Communists Holds Meeting </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Union of Communists Holds Meeting </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0801A Moscow GLASNOST in Russian No 8, 27 May 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0801A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow GLASNOST </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleksey Veretennikov: "One Step Forward and No </F>
Steps Back!"] 
  [Text] There is a silver-colored metal pillar near the 
highway approximately halfway between Moscow and the Lenin 
Hills. It depicts Vladimir Ilyich in bas-relief and is 
inscribed: "Lenin's Cause Is Alive and Will Triumph!" 
  The words aroused an irate question: What kind of "triumph" 
is this? The country is falling apart and lies bleeding. The 
common man is drinking himself to death. The louse-infested 
homeless, completely oblivious to their surroundings, are a sign 
of the times, and so is the T-80 tank. Its designers probably 
never dreamed that the test site of the wonder-vehicle would be 
the center of our capital. This is where the regime won a 
luminous victory by turning parliament into a candle with a 
gigantic flame. This probably was not the kind of triumph the 
creators of the propaganda visual aid had in mind. Furthermore, 
where is the raykom that ordered its creation and 
installation?... 
  In the hills, in the auditorium of the V.I. Lenin Museum, 
communists from all of the republics sat down at one big table. 
This was the site of the coordinating conference convened by the 
UCP-CPSU and organized with the active participation of all 
those present. The conference began with a brief keynote speech 
by UCP-CPSU Council Chairman O. Shenin. 
  The conference was one of the results of the UCP-CPSU's 
colossal efforts to reestablish our party. 
  The road to the conference was not smooth. After August 1991 
the enemies of the CPSU, both external and internal, did 
everything within their power to make it disappear forever. The 
former did this with prohibitions, and the latter did it with 
betrayal, thwarting the efforts of ethical members of the 
Central Committee and rank-and-file communists to continue their 
work. In summer 1992, however, a Central Committee plenum was 
held and became a point of departure for the restoration of a 
unified organization of Soviet communists. It was followed by 
the 20th All-Union Conference and 29th Congress of the CPSU, 
where the party was temporarily converted into the UCP-CPSU with 
a view to the current situation in the republics. It was joined 
by the majority of republic parties. Delegates from fraternal 
parties at the April conference of the CPRF passed a resolution 
on an extensive coordinating convention. 
  On the eve of the conference our Belorussian [Belarusian] 
comrades presented the CPRF with a gift: a stuffed Belovizh 
bison with one sawed-off horn--an allusion to Shushkevich and an 
inducement to "continue the proceedings." There was no question 
that there was a wish for this, and it was a unanimous wish. Was 
anything else even possible? 
  Each speaker presented an account of trouble and suffering. 
The Russians in Kirghizia who cannot speak the Kirghiz language 
and see no future for themselves there are living the republic: 
There is no recognition of Russian as the language of 
inter-ethnic communication in the republic constitution. 
  Operations have stopped at 40 percent of the enterprises in 
Latvia, and most of the remaining enterprises are in the 
confectionery and furniture industries. The kolkhozes were 
broken up, and the separate farmsteads are back, but the people 
have already lost the skills of solitary labor and have no 
financing. The rate of unemployment according to official 
statistics is 10 percent, and the actual rate is 44 percent. A 
loaf of bread once cost 16 kopecks in Riga and now it costs 16 
centimes, but the average wage was once 160 rubles and is now 30 
lats. The Latvian leadership is making every effort to join 
NATO, to preclude Latvia's return to the union. 
  The Russian economy is suffering a veritable collapse, like 
an avalanche. In Ukraine President Kravchuk kept his campaign 
promises: Everyone did become a "gentleman" and a millionaire, 
but a million karbovantsy will not buy much! Ukrainian 
communists believe that the situation in that republic could 
lead to a repetition of the events of last October in Moscow. 
  What lies ahead? I will cite just a few of the speakers' 
predictions. The Communist Party of the Russian Federation is 
determined, as G. Zyuganov announced, to promote the 
reestablishment of the union state, defend government by the 
people, protect the laboring public, and restore social justice. 
The next speaker, V. Tyulkin (RCWP), clarified these goals, 
however, by stipulating that what had to be reestablished was 
not some kind of "union state," but the Union of Soviet 
Socialist Republics. This will necessitate reliance on labor 
collectives after the party's influence there has been 
strengthened, the development of the labor movement, and the 
organization of a general political strike. 
  The representative of the Communist Party of Estonia (we 
cannot call all of the representatives by name) made the logical 
comment that the anti-people regimes will eventually be ejected 
by public indignation, but communists must be ready for this 
outburst. Some of the speakers suggested that the present rulers 
are dangerous because they are in the throes of defeat and there 
is no crime they would not commit in order to stay on top. 
  A report on the draft plan "For a Renewed Union of the 
Soviet 
Peoples" was presented by Ye. Ligachev. Property is the main 
issue. The draft envisages a multistructured economy with a 
prevalence of public property for our reunited fatherland. "The 
union will have a socialist foundation," Yegor Kuzmich said. The 
Soviet system of government by the people must be restored. The 
soviets (and the dumas, councils, assemblies, and so forth) are 
the best form of democracy because they were refined by the 
course of historical events. The progression toward the union, 
however, will not be quick, according to A. Lukyanov. It will 
begin with economic integration, followed by a common defense 
structure, and only then by a political union. At this time, 
Anatoliy Ivanovich stressed, it is imperative that the Belovizh 
accords be denounced. 
  The formation of a single CPSU is also likely to take some 
time. Obviously, this process will occur at the same time as the 
interstate integration. Until it has been completed, said Sh. 
Shabdolov, the leader of the communists of Tajikistan, each 
party will have its own charter and program, because "it would 
be ridiculous to talk about a single set of documents today. We 
have to be united, however, in the areas in which our unity is 
imperative." Representing the Ukraine, A. Martynyuk continued 
the discussion of unity and reported that the Communist Party of 
Ukraine had joined the UCP-CPSU as a full-fledged member, and 
then asked the leaders of the different communist factions to 
fight our common enemy instead of each other. 
  Many speakers mentioned the responsibility of the communists 
of Russia and their genuinely historic mission. "Everyone is 
watching you," the communists were told. "The union will begin 
with Russia. The situation in Russia has an immediate effect on 
its neighbors," said R. Akhmedov, representing the Communist 
Party of Azerbaijan. "I listened to the comrades from the 
Russian communist parties. I have the greatest respect for them, 
but I did not hear how they are coordinating their own actions." 
Most of the conference participants agree that the UCP-CPSU is 
the only possible form of association at this time, but some 
leaders are not in any hurry to join it. 
  Here is a brief summary of the encouraging information that 
was reported at the conference. 
  The Communist Party of the Russian Federation now has 
550,000 
communist members, united in 20,000 primary party organizations, 
which are active in almost all rayons, cities, oblasts, and 
republics. The "red belt" of the Russian regions is growing 
wider: The leaders in 70 out of 88 are either confirmed 
communists or their supporters--these are the statistics of the 
"democrats." 
  In Tajikistan the organizational structure of the Communist 
Party was maintained, it occupies a strong position in the 
ideological sphere, the party press has been restored 
completely, and the party owns property. 
  In Azerbaijan, "the people have turned to us and are no 
longer waiting for a knight on a white charger." There are 
33,000 active communists in the republic, but the party does not 
feel any pressure to grow at this time and it is preparing for 
its 35th Congress. 
  In the Ukrainian parliament, Chornovil, the leader of the 
nationalists, "bobs up and down in his chair when he listens to 
speeches by communists because these people know what to say and 
how to say it." 
  In Southern Ossetia 60 percent of the communists stayed in 
the party after reregistration. 
  Construction workers in Turkmenistan have initiated the 
study 
and dissemination of V.I. Lenin's works. They buy his books and 
present them to individuals capable of rediscovering the 
Leninist well of wisdom.... 
  Summing up the results of the two-day conference, O. Shenin 
said: "We have taken a step forward and have not taken any steps 
backward." 
  ...On my way back to Moscow I saw the majestic Lenin pillar 
again. This time the words inscribed on it did not sound odd. It 
was all true. Lenin's cause is alive, and it is certain to 
triumph! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47107 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Communist Groups Adopt Resolution </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Communist Groups Adopt Resolution </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0801B Moscow GLASNOST in Russian No 8, 27 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0801B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow GLASNOST </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Resolution of Coordinating Conference of Communist Parties </F>
"On the Political and Socioeconomic Situation in the States 
Within the Territory of the USSR and Objectives Connected with 
the Stronger Unity of Communists"] 
  [Text] Delegations representing communist parties in the 
states formed within the territory of the USSR and a delegation 
from the UCP-CPSU Council met in Moscow on 21-22 May 1994. 
  There was an exchange of views on the political and 
socioeconomic situation in the states within the territory of 
the USSR and on further steps to strengthen the unity of the 
communist movement. 
  Conference speakers remarked that the years since the 
criminal breakup of the USSR against the will of the people had 
confirmed the accuracy of the principled assessments of 
congresses of the communist parties of the states and the 
conclusions of the 29th CPSU Congress. The race for sovereignty 
stopped the economic development of all states, and the economic 
reforms became nothing more than a screen to conceal the efforts 
of a small segment of the population to appropriate the national 
property created by generations of Soviet people. 
  The breakup of the union, the plundering of national 
property, and the disgraceful displays of nationalism separated 
the Soviet people into ethnic communities and divided them into 
a handful of rich individuals and millions of poor people. All 
of this led to an economic disaster and the dramatic 
exacerbation of inter-ethnic and social conflicts. The Soviet 
people and our common motherland suffered economic losses five 
times greater than in all of the years of the war with fascist 
Germany. Hundreds of thousands of Soviet people died in 
inter-ethnic wars and millions became refugees or lost their 
jobs and were doomed to suffering and poverty. 
  The remarkable achievements of our domestic culture are 
being 
replaced by the Western mass culture, with its cult of money and 
violence. Free medicine and education are being replaced with 
paid services and are becoming inaccessible to a growing number 
of citizens. Millions of housing applicants and homeless people 
have lost hope of obtaining housing. The only indicators that 
are rising are the mortality, vice, and crime rates. The death 
rate is higher than the birth rate in the majority of former 
union republics. The number of people killed by criminals each 
year is three or four times as high as the number killed during 
the 10 years of the Afghan war. 
  Under these conditions, the people of these states are 
beginning to realize that their ruling regimes are essentially 
against the people, and they are now pinning their hopes on the 
removal of these regimes and the establishment of government by 
the people as a result of vigorous activity by the communist 
movement and progressive leftist forces. 
  The party organizations of the states learned the necessary 
lessons from their serious defeat. They purged their ranks of 
traitors, opportunists, and timeservers. Most of the communist 
parties of the states are finalizing the establishment of their 
organizational structures and are waging an aggressive struggle 
for the interests of workers, the laboring peasantry, and the 
national intelligentsia. 
  The main goals of the communist parties of the states are 
the 
following: 
  --service to the laboring public; 
  --socialism and communism as the historical future of 
mankind, freedom and social equality, collectivism, social 
justice, and genuine humanism; 
  --the achievement, defense, and consolidation of political 
power by the laboring public, represented by the soviets, the 
development of socialist democracy, and extensive national 
self-rule; 
  --the opposition of the restoration of capitalism, and the 
reinstatement of the socialist pattern of development in the 
republics of the USSR as the best method of satisfying the 
social needs of the laboring public; 
  --the cessation of inter-ethnic conflicts and the prevention 
of civil wars within the territory of the USSR; 
  --the reestablishment of the USSR as a voluntary association 
of sovereign states based on the principles of Soviet 
patriotism, internationalism, the fraternity of peoples, and 
respect for national traditions, in accordance with the national 
referendum of 17 March 1991, when three-fourths of the adult 
population of the country voted to preserve the USSR; 
  --the gradual reestablishment of the single republic 
communist parties and their unification in a single Communist 
Party of the Soviet Union during the process of the 
reestablishment of the USSR. 
  The parties have defined their political strategy and 
tactics, using Marxist-Leninist doctrine and dialectical 
materialism as a guide, in a process of creative development, 
based on an analysis of the actual historical situation and the 
achievements of national and world science and culture. 
  The parties will use parliamentary and non-parliamentary 
forms of political struggle to attain these goals within the 
confines of existing laws. 
  Conference participants reaffirmed the accurate and timely 
nature of the decisions of the 19th CPSU Congress on the 
temporary--until the USSR has been reestablished--reorganization 
of the CPSU as the Union of Communist Parties-CPSU, and they 
believe that the communist parties of the states are all part of 
a single communist movement within the territory of the USSR but 
have their own autonomous organizations and their own programs 
and charters. 
  Conference participants noted that some of the provisions of 
the UCP-CPSU Charter and Program and obsolete and do not 
correspond fully to the present features of the work of the 
communist parties of the states. They requested the UCP-CPSU 
Council to work with authorized representatives of the parties 
on the elaboration of a common set of program and charter 
principles and to submit them to the 30th UCP-CPSU Congress and 
other general party forums for consideration. 
  Conference participants view the current coordinating 
convention of leaders of the communist parties of all states 
formed within the territory of the USSR as a permanent body. 
  Conference participants advise all communist parties to 
concentrate on elaborating and substantiating our common goals, 
coordinating joint actions by the parties for the attainment of 
these goals, publicizing experience in political work with labor 
collectives and with youth, and developing, supporting, and 
distributing communist and opposition socialist news media. 
  Conference participants condemn all attempts to split the 
communist parties and their regional organizations and to create 
a communist movement with numerous centers and advise communists 
to unite in single organizations for stronger influence among 
the workers, peasants, and intelligentsia. Questions connected 
with differing interpretations of theoretical aspects of the 
tactics and strategy of party actions can and must be discussed 
in intra-party debates in accordance with the standards of party 
ethics. 
  Conference participants appeal to all communists for an 
active struggle for the unity of the communist movement within 
the territory of the Soviet Union, for their resolute defense of 
the interests of the laboring public, and for stronger 
organizational and party discipline. Our goals are a Soviet 
Union, government by soviets of workers' deputies, a single 
Communist Party, and socialism. 
  The resolution was approved by all conference 
participants. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47108 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Communist Leaders on Unity of Parties </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Communist Leaders on Unity of Parties </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0801C Moscow GLASNOST in Russian No 8, 27 May 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0801C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow GLASNOST </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with heads of communist party delegations to </F>
coordinating conference in Moscow on 21-22 May, by Yu. Igonin: 
"We Are United by a Great Goal"] 
  [Text] Our correspondent asked the heads of the 
communist party delegations two questions. FIRST: What are the 
primary objectives of the communists of your party? SECOND: What 
will it take to reestablish the Union of Soviet Socialist 
Republics? 
  [R.G. Akhmedov (Azerbaijan)] 
  1. We are trying to build a strong organization under the 
conditions of a brutal dictatorship and to strengthen our 
influence in labor collectives, particularly among workers. 
  In spite of G. Aliyev's declaration that he will not allow 
the resurgence of communist influence in Azerbaijan, we are 
gaining more prestige each day, and our organizations have been 
restored in almost all rayons, cities, neighborhoods, and 
enterprises. We are now publishing the GOLOS KOMMUNISTA news 
bulletin and have already submitted a registration application 
for the KOMMUNIST newspaper. 
  2. During the establishment of a new type of union, we must 
take the actual situation in each of the former republics of the 
USSR into account. After all, conditions in our republics differ 
widely, but there is also the main thing that unites us all: our 
desire for unity and for the restoration of Soviet rule and the 
socialist foundation. 
  [S.G. Badalyan (Armenia)] 
  1. We want to remove the ruling elite from power (legally, I 
stress) and gradually emerge from the crisis. 
  The Communist Party of Armenia is in favor of united action 
by the fraternal parties on an equitable basis, because we had 
already announced our autonomy as early as 1990, at the 29th 
Congress, and we have our own charter. This will not interfere, 
however, with our membership in the Union of Communist Parties. 
  2. We are in favor of the creation of a new single union of 
Soviet states, with a common economy, defense, transportation 
network, and energy supply and a coordinated foreign policy, but 
with the retention of sovereignty, although we know that we will 
have to give up part of it. In principle, we are in favor of the 
Leninist plan of confederation. 
  There is another important consideration: The formation of 
the new union should be preceded by the retirement of Russia's 
present rulers. After all, Russia is the basis of the new union. 
  [V.I. Novikov (Belorussia)] 
  1. Our main goal is to strengthen the party and enhance its 
prestige among the workers. To this end, we are gradually moving 
our organizational and propagandistic work directly into the 
labor collectives. 
  The presidential election will be an important stage of our 
work. I am my party's candidate for this office. What are our 
chances? The polls indicate that they are not bad. In any case, 
we collected more than twice the necessary 1,000 votes for 
registration. We have a simple campaign slogan: We will return 
what the "reformers" took away from the people and reestablish 
the great nation of the Soviet Union. 
  Local government elections and the reestablishment of the 
soviets will be the second stage of our work. This will be a 
serious test for the party. 
  2. All of the communist parties of the former union 
republics 
must surmount the discord in our ranks and unite their efforts 
in concrete action. This could include, for example, concerted 
effort by parliamentary factions. We can work with our 
supporters toward the denunciation of the Belovizh "accords" and 
arrange for referendums in our republics on the reestablishment 
of the USSR. According to various surveys, 86 percent of the 
population of Belorussia is in favor of a renewed Soviet Union. 
  [I.G. Tsikhlauri (Georgia)] 
  1. We communists must inform the people of what is really 
going on in Georgia. Like the parties in other republics, our 
Communist Party was banned and we still have not reregistered. 
Our main goal today is the restoration of party structures: 
raykoms, gorkoms, and primary organizations, and we are 
succeeding in doing this. Another goal is successful 
participation in the upcoming elections, which will be fostered, 
we hope, by the recently revived KOMMUNIST newspaper. 
  2. We know, of course, that the reestablishment of the 
Soviet 
Union will be impossible without the communists of the former 
republics, but the ambitions of some leaders within the 
communist movement must be set aside and we must agree on united 
action. 
  The reestablishment of the Soviet Union should be initiated, 
in my opinion, not by the center--not by Moscow or Russia--but 
by another former union republic. I think this will serve our 
cause better. 
  [K.A. Azhibekova (Kirghizia)] 
  1. Our main short-term goals are the restoration of party 
structures and aggressive action to keep the "predatory 
privatizers" from robbing the people. 
  Propagandists from the party are infiltrating enterprises 
(although this is not a simple matter) and explaining to the 
people there that only their active efforts can change things 
for the better. To tell the truth, however, the communists have 
won the strongest support in rural communities. Our raykoms 
there are operating more effectively. 
  2. The former union republics are still too divided. This 
means that we communists have to conduct painstaking work to 
sway public opinion in support of united effort to revitalize 
the USSR. 
  [I.V. Lopatin (Latvia)] 
  1. We want to continue establishing the structures of the 
Union of Latvian Communists and hold the second republic 
conference of the ULC this summer. We want to expand the social 
base of our union, primarily by encouraging more workers to 
join. We want all residents of Latvia to join the 
struggle for the restoration of civil and political rights. We 
will continue our efforts to register the ULC with the Latvian 
Ministry of Justice. 
  2. In view of the present situation, Latvia's return to the 
future union could be accomplished gradually through economic 
alliances with other republics, participation in the union with 
the status of a confederate member, and membership in the 
federation. 
  Obviously, the decision in all of these cases must be made 
by 
the residents (or citizens) of Latvia by means of a referendum. 
  [Representative of Communist Party of Lithuania] 
  1. The ban on our Communist Party is recorded in the 
constitution. That is why we have to stay so far underground. 
What are we doing now? At this time we are restoring certain 
organizations, and their members are opening people's eyes to 
what is happening in Lithuania. This is producing results, 
although they are still not that impressive. In conversations 
(highly intimate ones between fewer than three individuals) 
people are increasingly likely to say: "They should give us back 
what we had in the USSR." 
  2. The unification of all of the communist parties of the 
former union republics in a single fist would give us strong 
leverage for the reestablishment of the USSR. After surmounting 
our differences, we must make every effort to unite in a single 
union of communist parties. 
  [A.K. Negutsa (Moldavia)] 
  1. We hope to register before 1 August and then hold a 
congress of the Party of Communists of the Republic of Moldova 
in fall. Now we are reestablishing structures on the local level. 
  2. The rebirth of the union will necessarily require us to 
surmount the separation between the parties with communist aims. 
  [G.A. Zyuganov (CPRF)] 
  1. We feel that our main present goal is concerted effort by 
leftist and patriotic forces and the coordination of our actions 
in the struggle against the anti-people regime. During this 
process, we must use legal parliamentary and extra-parliamentary 
methods. 
  2. The restoration of the USSR and the Soviet Government is 
the main purpose of CPRF activity and our highest priority. In 
the recently published policy-planning documents of the 
Communist Party of the Russian Federation, we stated that "we 
are in favor of cooperation by communist parties active in the 
Russian Federation, on the condition of the 
acknowledgement of the need to reestablish the union state 
on a voluntary basis; the restoration of the soviet system of 
government...." 
  [M.A. Rotko (Turkmenistan)] 
  1. We want to enhance the party's prestige among the 
workers, 
who have, we can report with pride, retained their respect for 
communists for the most part; preserve the Leninist creative 
legacy; lower the average age of party members and encourage VUZ 
instructors and students to join our ranks (which is already 
occurring); and acquire stronger influence at enterprises. 
  2. The reestablishment of the USSR should begin with the 
establishment of close economic ties between former union 
republics and the consolidation of friendship between our 
peoples. This will be followed by the political aspects of the 
process. 
  [Sh.D. Shabdolov (Tajikistan)] 
  1. Our immediate objective is to attain power legally 
through 
parliamentary elections. Our chances are superb. Suffice it to 
say that we already have the largest faction in the present 
parliament--more than 40 percent of all the deputies. Our 
raykoms, gorkoms, and obkoms are active on the local level. The 
average age of our party members is around 40. 
  We also have another goal: We want to win local elections. I 
think we will. 
  2. As for the reestablishment of the USSR, we have formed 
special councils on the rayon, municipal, oblast, and republic 
levels to unite the efforts of the workers for this purpose. 
  People are attracted to us and are pinning their hopes on 
the 
communists. 
  [A.I. Martynyuk (Ukraine)] 
  1. The presidential elections and the election campaigns for 
the Supreme Council in 112 districts will be held soon. We are 
getting ready for them. 
  Another of the party's goals is to make the necessary 
preparations for elections to local councils, which will get rid 
of the president's "appointees" on the local level. This is 
where many decisions are being made now that the government in 
Kiev is almost paralyzed (and this is a fact!). 
  2. Unity is the only thing that will save us all, 
but this process must not be forced (although the communists 
should not "doze off" either), because the different conditions 
in the former union republics of the USSR must be taken into 
account. 
  [Representative of the Communist Party of Estonia] 
  1. Our main immediate objective is the legalization of the 
activities of our Communist Party, which was banned when the 
bourgeois government took power. Another objective is the 
restoration of party structures on the local level. This is a 
difficult job, but it can be done. 
  Another important part of the work of Estonia's communists 
entails efforts to secure dual citizenship for individuals of 
non-native nationalities and the approval of the Russian 
language as a language of interpersonal communication. 
  2. It is time for all of the communist parties of the former 
union republics to agree on a single stance on this 
matter. Obviously, the distinctive features of the current 
situation in different regions of the former USSR must be taken 
into account. Furthermore, the existence of so many communist 
parties in Russia can only hurt our common cause. It is time for 
the comrades who are wasting their strength and energy on 
self-assertion to realize this. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47109 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Communist Groups Discuss New Union </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Communist Groups Discuss New Union </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0801D Moscow GLASNOST in Russian No 8, 27 May 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0801D </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow GLASNOST </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report on conference of communist party representatives in </F>
Lenin Hills near Moscow on 21-22 May 1994: "Soviet Communists 
Together Again"] 
  [Text] A coordinating conference of representatives of the 
communist parties of the states formed within the territory of 
the USSR was held in the Lenin Hills near Moscow on 21-22 May 
1994. The conference was attended by plenipotentiary delegations 
headed by the leaders of 19 communist parties and the leadership 
of the UCP-CPSU Council. The following resolutions were approved 
at the conference: 
  --On the Political and Socioeconomic Situation in the States 
Within the Territory of the USSR and Objectives Connected with 
the Stronger Unity of Communists. 
  --On the Draft Plan "For a Renewed Union of Soviet Peoples." 
  --On the 50th Anniversary of the Soviet People's Victory 
over 
Fascist Germany in the Great Patriotic War. 
  --On the 125th Anniversary of V.I. Lenin's Birth. 
  --On the Repressive Treatment of Communists in the States 
Formed Within the Territory of the USSR. 
  The meeting took place in a friendly and constructive 
atmosphere and was marked by party camaraderie and a principled 
approach to the discussion topics. Opinions were exchanged, and 
the resolutions were approved unanimously. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47110 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   CPRF Resolution on Accord </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    CPRF Resolution on Accord </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0795A Moscow GLASNOST in Russian No 8, 27 May 94 pp 4-5 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0795A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow GLASNOST </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Resolution adopted at Second All-Russian CPRF Conference on </F>
24 April 1994: "The Communist Party of the Russian Federation on 
the Road to Accord for Russia's Sake"] 
  [Text] The Communist Party of the Russian Federation [CPRF] 
is setting its tactical objectives for the near future in the 
knowledge that the general program goals, which can only be 
attained in their entirety after the laboring public takes 
power, must be accompanied by a specific plan of action, with 
consideration for the party's opposition status, and by efforts 
to influence the development of sociopolitical events, with a 
view to its actual capabilities. 
<H5>  New Phase of Crisis </H5>
  Russian society has entered a phase of systemic 
crisis: 
  This means, first of all, that the crisis has had a 
seriously 
injurious effect on all the main spheres of societal life, not 
just a few, and that it cannot be surmounted in any of these 
spheres without recovery in the others. Second, regressive 
changes have almost reached the critical point at which they 
could become irreversible and could deprive Russia of its 
chances for social and economic progress for a protracted period 
of indefinite length. 
  The continued recession in the economy has led to the 
dramatic deterioration of the structure of productive 
forces. The first production units to be ruined will not be 
the underdeveloped ones, but the most progressive, 
high-technology fields of production--precisely those that would 
secure the breakthrough to qualitatively new frontiers of 
economic development. Our domestic scientific and technical 
potential is being destroyed. There has been a disastrous 
decrease in the output of the very products on which the 
restoration of production with reliance on our own resources 
would depend (machines, equipment, and building materials). In 
this way, the prospects for intensive and 
extensive economic growth have been undermined to a 
dangerous extent. 
  In the sphere of production relations the abrupt 
stratification of society along property lines has not created 
any new productive classes. This has not been the "classic" 
(according to Marx) form of capitalization of societal 
relations, but a process of rapid social degradation and the 
growth of parasitical declassed strata on all levels, which 
subsist on redistribution and conspicuous consumption instead of 
the productive accumulation of societal resources. All of this 
has had a particularly injurious effect on our youth. We have 
witnessed the rapid reduction of labor reserves and loss 
of labor skills. Soon there will be no resources for 
economic restoration and no one capable of accomplishing it. 
  The policies of the government are based on a balancing act 
between the rising rates of inflation and unemployment. The 
balance is maintained primarily by using up all the resources 
accumulated in earlier decades with no thought of replacing 
them. As the last of these resources are being depleted, the 
monetarist methods of economic development are losing even the 
semblance of effectiveness. 
  The cultural and moral potential of society has suffered a 
dangerous decline. Russia is the target of unprecedented 
ideological aggression for the purpose of suppressing its 
cultural and historical features and the continuity of its 
development. Their obliteration and replacement with the 
mediocre Western brand of "common human" values could lead to 
the loss of the instinct of national-state self-preservation and 
the will to resist the economic, political, and spiritual 
colonization threatening our country. 
  The coup d'etat the president and his administration carried 
out in September and October created a 
constitutional-legal vacuum in political affairs. The 
real power in the country has been usurped by bureaucratic 
executive structures that are free of any effective societal 
control and are increasingly likely to rely on violence or 
threats of violence. This has been accompanied by the 
increasingly confident efforts of organized crime to serve as 
the "regulator" of economic and political affairs. These two 
structures are undergoing an intense merger, installing the 
machinery of a criminal-bureaucratic dictatorship. 
  This has put every aspect of public safety in 
danger: the personal safety of citizens and their property, the 
social protection of the laboring public, the technological 
safety of production, and the economic and military security of 
the country. All of this is constantly diminishing the 
state-political unity and integrity of the Russian 
Federation. 
<H5>  Alternatives </H5>
  The experience of recent years has proved unequivocally that 
emergence from systemic crisis by means of the 
capitalization of the country is impossible. Even if the 
processes of establishing "authentic" capitalist production 
relations and a civilian society of the bourgeois type are going 
on, they are incomparably slower than the related processes that 
are destroying the material and spiritual foundations of society 
and state. Their clearest reflection is in the subversion 
of the bases of civic peace in society. 
  Today the country is already in a state of torpid civil war, 
interspersed with outbursts of increasingly savage brutality 
against the people. These destructive processes are resulting in 
the gradual disappearance of the actual bases for the 
maintenance of civic peace in society. 
  In connection with this, the possible course of future 
events 
is becoming increasingly ominous. The most alarming possibility 
is the danger that the escalated tension created by the social 
degradation and impoverishment of society will turn into an 
uncontrollable anarchic rebellion by declassed elements, in a 
"war against all" for the remainder of our society's resources. 
  Communists must be prepared for any turn of events, and if a 
particular turn of events cannot be prevented, it will be our 
party's duty to give the spontaneous mass movement the most 
organized structure possible and direct it into the channels of 
conscious class struggle by the laboring public for its vested 
interests. We do believe, however, that a civil war, regardless 
of how just it may be, will be a tragedy for the country and the 
people. There can be no victors in this kind of war under 
present conditions. That is why the Communist Party is 
certain that the preservation of civic peace and its 
consolidation by means of a transition to the socialist pattern 
of development are essential conditions for the avoidance of a 
national-state disaster. That is our alternative, and it is 
completely in the interests of the vast majority of people. 
  With a view to this and to its own actual capabilities as an 
opposition force, the Communist Party of the Russian Federation 
has set three strategic objectives: 
  1. The achievement of civic peace as the main condition 
for emergence from the systemic crisis and for the transition to 
socialist development. 
  2. The creation of a broad coalition of leftist, 
centrist, patriotic, and national-democratic forces capable of 
neutralizing the "civil war party" and then accomplishing its 
political, economic, and moral isolation. 
  3. The assumption of power by the coalition as a result 
of an election victory or by other peaceful and nonviolent 
means. The organizational and ideological-theoretical 
preparation of the party for work following the victory of the 
coalition of national-democratic forces. 
  The successful attainment of these general 
democratic objectives and the existence of strong 
government by the people and social stability will create the 
necessary prerequisites for a peaceful and civilized struggle by 
the communists for their less immediate policy goals. 
<H5>  The Road to Civic Peace </H5>
  The Communist Party of the Russian Federation defines the 
state of civic peace as a set of social conditions and political 
procedures agreed upon by various social forces for the 
resolution of their differences exclusively by peaceful and 
nonviolent means. Civic peace does not mean universal harmony 
and the absence of conflict in society. The struggle between 
different tendencies is natural and inevitable, and there will 
always be winners and losers in this struggle, but it must not 
lead to the destruction of the state and its economy, social 
sphere, and spiritual foundation. 
  Civic peace is not achieved by the mere signing of a formal 
declaration of some kind. It must be based not on declarations, 
but on a group of real and perceptible moves directed 
primarily at the elimination of concrete sources of civic 
confrontation. Today these sources, the main "risk factors," are 
the abrupt stratification of society along property lines, 
accompanied by uncontrollable recession and inflationary 
processes; violation of the socioeconomic rights of the working 
public; lack of balance between branches of government; the 
growth of corruption and crime and the diminution of public 
security and personal safety; spiritual impoverishment and 
destruction of the traditional cultural environment; regional 
and ethnic separatism; dismemberment of historical Russia as a 
result of the collapse of the USSR and the transformation of the 
Russian nationality into a divided people. 
  The most complex group of problems exists in the sphere of 
political relations. The political regime that was 
installed during the coup d'etat is distinguished by a severe 
crisis of legality, monopolization of power by presidential and 
executive structures, and deprivation of all other participants 
in the political process of any opportunity to influence the 
affairs of state. 
  Elimination of this constant source of political 
confrontation will require acknowledgement of the need for close 
cooperation by various social forces to surmount the crisis and 
establish the kind of interaction by the legislative, executive, 
and judicial branches of government and by political parties, 
trade unions, associations of producers of goods, and public 
organizations that will secure not only a genuine balance and 
stronger guarantees of the performance of their functions and 
fulfillment of their mutual obligations but also a 
considerable augmentation of responsibility for the state 
of affairs in the country. 
  Today the executive branch of government is free of 
responsibility because of the virtual lack of oversight, and the 
legislative branch is free of responsibility because of its 
total lack of power. Augmentation and redistribution of 
responsibility will be impossible without redistribution 
of powers among the branches of government and reinforcement of 
their mutual democratic oversight. This will require the 
following: 
  --elimination of the present separation of the chambers of 
the Federal Assembly and the definition of the sphere of their 
joint and equal jurisdiction, which will necessarily include 
interrelations of the Federal Assembly with the executive branch; 
  --elimination of the dualism of the executive branch--the 
dual subordination of ministries and departments to the chief of 
state and the head of government. Establishment of the prime 
minister's exclusive jurisdiction over their routine operations. 
Clarification of the powers and functions of the president and 
his administration in connection with this; 
  --a move to the principle of government accountability to 
representative bodies, and legislative definition of the 
government structure and staff by the Federal Assembly. The 
assembly's approval of the government program defining its main 
goals and the deadlines for their attainment, as well as the 
composition of the government staff. The impermissibility of 
intervention in the routine work of government on the approved 
program, and the possibility of removal of the government by the 
Federal Assembly in the event of departures from the program; 
  --exclusion of agencies in charge of state television and 
radio broadcasting systems from the executive branch. Their 
creation on an equal basis by parliament, the government, and 
the judiciary with consideration for the opinions of political 
parties, trade unions, and public organizations. Guarantee of 
equal access to the media for representatives of all branches of 
government, political parties, trade unions, and other public 
organizations; 
  --restoration of the whole vertical structure of 
representative bodies of government, extension of the 
accountability of executive bodies to representative bodies to 
all levels of public administration, and return of agencies of 
local self-government to the system of governmental authority; 
  --strict delineation of spheres of jurisdiction of different 
levels of governmental authority, consolidation of autonomy in 
the exercise of their powers, and encouragement of their closer 
interaction and cooperation; 
  --agreement that the highest priority of Russian policy is 
reestablishment of the Union state on a new and voluntary basis, 
and denunciation of the sections of the Belovezha accords 
abrogating the Union Treaty; 
  --agreement on the need to bring constitutional laws into 
conformity with the principles set forth above. 
  Another important prerequisite for the restoration of civic 
peace is a change of socioeconomic policies. A 
complete program of national economic recovery and emergence 
from crisis can only be coordinated through the joint efforts of 
all concerned parties within the confines of the political 
procedures described above. 
  Several measures, however, will brook no delay. They include 
the following: 
  --cessation of predatory privatization and verification of 
the legality and economic expediency of all earlier 
transactions, and verification of the legal origins of capital 
invested in privatization projects; 
  --legislative guarantees of the priority rights of labor 
collectives to own and use public property and to choose 
specific forms of denationalization wherever it is economically 
justified, and a ban on interference in the economic affairs of 
enterprises owned by collectives or groups, particularly in the 
agro-industrial complex; 
  --reimbursement of losses incurred by citizens and economic 
organizations as a result of the "shock therapy" and the 
planning of ways to resolve the nonpayments crisis, to pay all 
back wages, and to make cost-of-living adjustments in savings 
accounts--not by issuing more currency but by confiscating 
illegally acquired capital; 
  --legislative guarantees of the socioeconomic rights of the 
laboring public to labor, recreation, housing, education, health 
care, and social security. 
  The main governmental-legal and cultural-moral prerequisites 
for the preservation and consolidation of civic peace include 
the following: 
  --a more intense struggle against corruption and crime and 
against the merger of the bureaucracy with mafia capital, and 
the closure of all channels for the theft of societal resources; 
  --protection of the spiritual and moral environment from the 
forcibly instituted cult of vice, violence, and easy money; 
  --acknowledgement of the purpose and value of all periods of 
Russian and Soviet history, and the impermissibility of any 
mockery of the people's patriotic symbols, monuments, and 
victories; 
  --renunciation of ideological revenge and all kinds of 
prohibitions and discrimination against citizens adhering to 
opposition views; 
  --the institution of all possible measures for the 
prevention 
of interethnic conflicts, return of refugees, and consolidation 
of the friendship and fraternity of all nationalities in the 
country; 
  --maximum effort to enhance the combat capabilities of the 
army and its soldiers and veterans, and protection of the high 
prestige of citizens discharging their patriotic military duty; 
  --restoration of our state's prestige in international 
affairs and the exclusion of any incidents of betrayal and 
neglect of our national interests by diplomatic and other 
representatives. 
  Acceptance of this minimum agenda by all the main classes 
and 
social groups as the basis for civic peace will prevent 
spontaneous social upheavals and keep the political, economic, 
and ideological struggle within civilized boundaries. 
<H5>  Prospects of Coalition for Civic Peace </H5>
  During the struggle for civic peace and under the conditions 
of this peace, the opposition will still be the opposition, and 
the Communist Party will still be the Communist Party and will 
have its own program for the rebirth of the fatherland. 
  In any discerning analysis of past experience, we have to 
note that the opposition acquired its present form at some point 
in the middle of 1992. The composition of the opposition forces 
stabilized, and their political and mass nucleus acquired 
distinct outlines. Sometimes, however, the opposition 
tends to be too self-contained. Its meetings and rallies 
and its press sometimes seem to perform a venting function, 
serving as a means of psychological release instead of 
mobilization. 
  Because of the decline of active public involvement, the 
organizational nucleus of the opposition is obviously not strong 
enough. The October defeat in 1993 served as evidence of this. 
In this context, the pseudo-opposition has been able to 
influence public thinking to a considerable extent with the 
pseudo-patriotic demagoguery of individuals who were always too 
cowardly to join the real struggle and can only discredit the 
opposition movement with their behavior. 
  The opposition's next objectives are the attraction of 
potential reserves, reinforcement of its social, material, and 
organizational base, and augmentation of the opposition to 
the scale of a national and democratic coalition for civic peace 
and accord for Russia's sake. 
  The prospects of this coalition will depend on the success 
in 
accomplishing the following: 
  --encouragement of political movements from the centrist and 
liberal spectrum to join, as well as trade unions and 
associations of industrialists and entrepreneurs; 
  --delineation of the sphere of mutual consensus on issues 
connected with the preservation of civic peace and defense of 
the country's fundamental national-state interests without 
slurring over differences of opinion in all other areas; 
  --coordination of the actions of various detachments of the 
opposition after determining the special goals and functions of 
each; 
  --consolidation of the political experience of parties, the 
organizational potential of trade unions, and the financial 
capabilities of industrialists and entrepreneurs for the 
attainment of common goals by forming a shadow government and 
choosing prestigious candidates for nomination in the 
presidential election campaign. 
  We realize that the coalition's methods of achieving power 
will depend on future events in the country. 
  Although the opposition advocates peaceful forms of 
political 
struggle, it cannot exclude the possibility of all types of 
provocations by the ruling elite and reserves the right to 
respond in appropriate ways to the kind of situation this would 
create. 
  These are the steps the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation plans to take on the road to civic peace and accord. 
It is ready to make its part of the journey and is hoping for 
the understanding and support of all sensible and truly 
patriotic and democratic forces concerned about the future of 
our motherland. 
  This document was adopted at the Second All-Russian 
CPRF Conference on 24 April 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47111 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   20 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Union of Communists on Goals </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Union of Communists on Goals </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0795B Moscow GLASNOST in Russian No 4, 1-7 Apr 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0795B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow GLASNOST </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report on meeting of UCP-CPSU Political Executive Committee </F>
in Moscow] 
  [Text] The progress of the report and election campaign in 
the Moscow municipal organization of the CPRF [Communist Party 
of the Russian Federation] was discussed at the latest meeting 
of the Political Executive Committee. 
  Members of the Political Executive Committee attended 12 
rayon party conferences. In most cases the communists favored 
the unity of party ranks and expressed the wish that the 
all-Russian party conference pass a resolution on permanent 
membership in the UCP-CPSU. In Dzerzhinskiy Rayon, however, 
delegates supporting the UCP-CPSU were kept out of the party 
conference. In Proletarskiy Rayon the conference rejected the 
previously approved plan for UCP-CPSU membership, as a result of 
which the three largest primary party organizations announced 
their withdrawal from this rayon organization of the CPRF. 
  An initiating group made up of members of the CPRF gorkom, 
including two members of the UCP-CPSU Council, is organizing a 
parallel municipal party conference. They have invited delegates 
from CPSU organizations which did not join any of the active 
communist parties in Russia and from the CPSU party 
organizations which do belong to the CPRF but do not agree with 
its leaders' views and are not certain that the all-Russian 
party conference will settle the issue of CPRF membership in the 
UCP-CPSU in a positive manner. 
  The UCP-CPSU Political Executive Committee feels that the 
withdrawal of CPSU organizations from the CPRF and the 
organization of a parallel municipal conference are inadvisable. 
This will fragment communist forces again and can benefit only 
the anti-people regime. The communists agree on the main 
goal--restoration of a single Union state, a soviet government, 
and the socialist pattern of development. Existing ideological 
and organizational disagreements can be settled at an all-party 
conference in accordance with the CPRF Charter. Today, however, 
communists must concentrate on work in labor collectives, 
discussion and finalization of CPRF policy-planning documents, 
and the choice of delegates to the all-Russian party conference 
from among comrades agreeing with the resolutions of the 29th 
CPSU Congress and the UCP-CPSU Program and Charter and favoring 
the CPRF's full membership in the UCP-CPSU. 
  The preparations for the 124th anniversary of V.I. Lenin's 
birth were discussed at the meeting. The Political Executive 
Committee advised all parties and movements regarding Leninism 
as their ideological foundation to commemorate this important 
date with joint ceremonial gatherings and rallies and a weekend 
tour of places of significance in Lenin's life and the monuments 
to the leader of the world proletariat. 
  A statement was adopted on the results of E. Shevardnadze's 
meetings with the leaders of the United States, United Nations, 
and NATO and the resulting escalation of tension in the Caucasus. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47112 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   20 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shenin on Communist Unity </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shenin on Communist Unity </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0795C Moscow GLASNOST in Russian No 4, 1-7 Apr 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0795C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow GLASNOST </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Speech by O. Shenin at Kalininskiy Rayon Conference in </F>
Moscow: "United for Victory!"] 
  [Text] I think that our goals are clear and understandable. 
They are reestablishment of the unified state--the Soviet Union, 
restoration of government by the people--the soviets of people's 
deputies, and, without any question, a return to the socialist 
pattern of development. 
  What should we do at this exceptionally complex time? Should 
we adapt to present circumstances or strive to take charge of 
them and direct them? I feel that the second option is more 
important for communists and the communist movement. For this 
reason, I do not always accept hasty decisions that have not 
been preceded by thorough consideration. We should recall the 
events in October, when some comrades believed that power was 
within our grasp. This was an absolutely groundless opinion, and 
it led to groundless actions. 
  Even today many people are saying that we should simply take 
charge of the government and then decide what kind of society we 
want to build. This is also a colossal mistake. Some people even 
plan to avoid all "isms" for the time being. We must begin, they 
say, by restoring order in the country and stabilizing the 
situation, and then we can decide whether we want to build 
capitalism or socialism. I think a communist has no right to 
take this stance. 
  We must take the same approach to the issue of national 
accord and civic peace. There are many questions in this area. 
When we talk about national accord and civic peace, we have to 
invest this term with a specific meaning. We have to stipulate 
the exact terms on which we would agree to this, because some of 
the people who are now appealing to us for accord and peace are 
those who recently destroyed them with their own hands. They 
include the president and the head of the Cabinet of Ministers. 
Are they hoping to perpetuate the pervasive chaos and 
degradation? 
  There is no question that our tactics might change. There 
could be a variety of opinions and actions, but the main thing 
is that our tactics must not get in the way of our strategy or 
obstruct its essential purpose. 
  In spite of all of the present turmoil, the communist 
movement in our country is gaining in strength and numbers. We 
can see this in Russia and Kirghizia [Kyrgyzstan], in Belorussia 
[Belarus] and Tajikistan, in Southern Ossetia and Tataria. 
Furthermore, we can already attest to the united action of many 
of our communist detachments. The chief aim of the absolute 
majority of communists is the formation of a single party within 
the territory of the Soviet Union. Our meetings with 
representatives of various communist organizations in Russia 
have provided us with further evidence of this. 
  Today virtually everyone realizes that disaster can only be 
avoided and this tragedy can only be endured on one 
condition--the creation of a unified state. Without this, no 
economic, political, social, or interethnic problems will be 
solved. That is why all people who cherish these goals must 
strive for organizational unification. 
  Can the communist movement and the communist parties 
accomplish this? I believe that they can. This is the primary 
goal of the work of the UCP-CPSU. Our union was formed in 
accordance with a decision of the 29th CPSU Congress. The 
declaration adopted at that congress said that the CPSU would be 
turned into an international voluntary union of communist 
parties in response to the current situation in the Soviet Union. 
  The program and charter of the UCP-CPSU are in force. 
Specific goals corresponding to the level of our work have been 
defined. Various Union structures are still functioning. It is 
our job to interact with them and organize them, beginning with 
the Union structures of the communist movement. 
  The communist parties of 10 republics are now full-fledged 
members of the UCP-CPSU. We are pleased to report that we 
recently acquired several new associate members and, what is 
particularly important, that they include the Communist Party of 
the Russian Federation and the Russian Communist Workers Party. 
All the parties, including the associate members of the 
UCP-CPSU, have their own programs (with the exception of the 
CPRF). It gives me pleasure to report that a serious step toward 
the resolution of this problem was taken at the March (1994) 
Plenum of the CPRF Central Executive Committee: There was a 
discussion of a draft CPRF program, which will be published 
after the text has been finalized. It is still being discussed 
in party organizations. I think the All-Russian (April) CPRF 
Conference could adopt a document defining the political image 
of the largest organization in Russia and the entire territory 
of the Soviet Union. 
  As you know, a joint statement by the leadership of the 
UCP-CPSU Council and the CPRF Central Executive Committee, 
containing several important provisions with regard to the 
consolidation of Russia's communists, was signed on 3 February 
1994. It specifically stresses that the question of the CPRF's 
full-fledged membership in the UCP-CPSU will be discussed at the 
All-Russian (April) CPRF Conference. 
  I feel that too much time is being spent on discussion of 
membership in the UCP-CPSU. There are frequent unproductive 
debates, and the issue itself is spurious. Could anyone deny 
that all the newly emerging communist organizations were 
established on the basis of the CPSU? 
  I hope that the issue of membership in the UCP-CPSU will 
finally be settled at the upcoming CPRF conference. This will 
pave the way for the unification of other parties in the 
fraternal republics. 
  There is another equally difficult problem: the unity of the 
communist movement in Russia. Should we consider convening an 
all-Russian congress of communists after the April CPRF 
conference? This objective is just as important as the 
establishment of the Union organization. Both could be attained 
at the same time. One would not interfere with the other. In 
fact, it would only have a stimulating effect. 
  There are so many people who want to split the communist 
movement. Some are working specifically toward this goal in 
accordance with the appropriate programs. Others are doing it 
unconsciously, not even realizing that they are actually adding 
grist to the mill of our political opponents. That is why the 
overwhelming majority of members of the Political Executive 
Committee of the UCP-CPSU Council, and I personally, oppose all 
types of parallel party structures, conferences, and organizing 
committees. The problems of unification have to be addressed 
within our own party. However much we may respect our 
administrative bodies, it is time for everyone to realize that 
the party is an organization in which the communist individual 
and the primary party unit are the foundation, and that they 
will make the final decisions on the party's role in society, 
its political image, and its future. 
  I feel that we have every opportunity for organizational 
unification. It must be organizational, because we could have 
ideological differences of opinion in the present situation. 
This is completely understandable. Organizational unification, 
however, would allow us to hold the 30th UCP-CPSU Congress and 
approve all the basic policy-planning documents. They would then 
lay an ideological foundation for the unification of all of the 
communists of the Soviet Union. I am certain that this approach, 
with consideration for the organizational and political autonomy 
of each republic party, will bring us much closer to our present 
goal. Our main concern, however unattainable the objective might 
seem, is the issue of power. Yes, we must acknowledge that we 
are in a stage of transition. I support the views of the 
comrades here who said that we are living through a "second NEP 
[New Economic Policy (1921-1936)]," but who will gain advantages 
from this? Will the anti-people regime benefit from it or will 
we? Under present conditions, it will be the regime. If the 
question of power is settled in the interest of the majority, 
then we can reap the benefits of this NEP, as V.I. Lenin once 
did. 
  That is why I feel that it is time to do some serious work 
on 
the party program and formulate a state ideology that would pave 
the way for an effective struggle against the anti-people 
regime. It must be removed from the political stage. Then the 
communist movement could begin working on its own rise to power 
and on the full-scale move from the transition period to 
socialism. That would be followed by the work of building a 
socialist society and restoring the USSR. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47113 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   20 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Communist Groups Discuss Unity </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Communist Groups Discuss Unity </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0795D Moscow GLASNOST in Russian No 4, 1-7 Apr 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0795D </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow GLASNOST </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report on conference of Kalinskiy Rayon Organization of </F>
CPRF in Moscow: "Communists Are Engaged in Uncompromising 
Discussion on the Eve of the All-Russian CPRF Conference"] 
  [Text] The latest round of rayon report and election 
conferences of the CPRF took place in Moscow last Saturday. The 
conference of the communists of Kalininskiy Rayon was held in 
the 40-Let Oktyabrya Cultural Center. The stage was decked with 
flowers, the banner of the rayon party organization, and a bust 
of Lenin. Comrades who had recently been accepted as party 
members were issued their party cards by O. Shenin and G. 
Zyuganov and were congratulated on this momentous day in their 
life. 
  There was an uncompromising discussion of current party 
events. The work of communists since the special 30th conference 
was analyzed in depth in the party raykom report by Secretary S. 
Penkov and in the subsequent debates. Speakers focused attention 
on the restoration of the structures of the rayon party 
organization and the reinstatement of primary party 
organizations. Intraparty ties were strengthened, and contacts 
were established with other parties and movements with 
communist, socialist, and patriotic aims. 
  The communists of the rayon have taken an active part in all 
the rallies and demonstrations organized by the opposition in 
Moscow. They have conducted indoctrination and explanatory work 
among workers and the population. They gave the editors of 
PRAVDA, SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA, and GLASNOST financial assistance 
and distributed these and other opposition publications. 
  There was also some self-criticism in the speeches, however, 
in reference to certain shortcomings and omissions. According to 
communists, the biggest obstacles impeding the growth of party 
ranks are the continued absence of a CPRF program and the 
endless arguments over its relationship to the UCP-CPSU. 
  O. Shenin and G. Zyuganov addressed the conference 
participants and answered their questions. 
  During the discussion the communists approved resolutions 
"On 
the Results of the Rayon Party Organization's Work in the Report 
Period and Its Primary Objectives" and "On United Action by the 
Communist Parties of the Russian Federation and on Their 
Relationship to the UCP-CPSU" and other documents. 
  The administrative bodies of the party organization and 
delegates to the Moscow municipal party conference were elected 
at the conference and candidates were nominated to serve as 
delegates to the All-Russian CPRF Conference. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47114 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Nationalist Writers View Future </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Nationalist Writers View Future </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Zinovyev: `The Country Has Been Murdered' </H4>

<F P=102> 944F0817A Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA in Russian 9 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0817A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleksandr Zinovyev: "I Believe the Country Has </F>
Been Murdered." From the roundtable discussion held at the Union 
of Writers of Russia on the topic of "Current and Future 
Position of Russia in the Context of the Current and Future 
World Situation."] 
  [Text] [Begin boxed material] 
  "The Current and Future Position of Russia in the Context of 
the Current and Future World Situation." That is how Aleksandr 
Prokhanov defined the topic of the roundtable discussion. The 
discussion was held at the Union of Writers of Russia with the 
participation of the newspapers ZAVTRA and SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA. 
  The following writers, poets and politicians shared their 
thoughts: Aleksandr Zinovyev, Vladimir Maksimov, Valentin 
Rasputin, Petr Rozhanov, Eduard Limonov, Sazhi Umalatova, Viktor 
Anpilov, Mikhail Astafyev, Ilya Konstantinov, Valeriy Ganichev, 
Sergey Vikulov, Gennadiy Gusev, Viktor Smirnov, lawyer Mikhail 
Kuznetsov and a guest from Yugoslavia, Mother Angelina. 
  The newspaper ZAVTRA will publish the materials of the 
roundtable in one of its next issues. We are selecting only two 
presentations, which define the essence and character of the 
discussion--those of the widely known philosopher and Russian 
writer abroad Aleksandr Zinovyev, and the remarkable current 
prose-writer, the firm patriot Valentin Rasputin. 
  [End boxed material] 
  [Zinovyev's speech] ...I am only an observer, but sometimes 
it is useful for someone looking from the outside to express his 
thoughts. From the inside, one cannot always see all that is 
going on. 
  How do I evaluate the present-day condition of Russia?! I 
evaluate it--and I say this with pain in my soul, for me this is 
perhaps the most terrible tragedy of my life--I believe that the 
country has been murdered. Simply murdered. I categorically 
protest against the evaluation of this situation as being some 
natural process. Generally, that is what they say in Western 
propaganda: The system has exhausted itself, and so on and so 
forth... Nothing of the sort! There has been a murder, planned 
immediately after the end of World War II. It was carried out in 
a planned and systematic manner, pedantically. A strategy for 
the murder was developed, and worked out down to the most minute 
details. This was a murder from outside, but the murderers found 
fellow conspirators inside the country, and these murderers 
became the highest leaders of the country, the well-defined 
strata of the intellectual elite and the upper strata of Soviet 
society. They simply betrayed the interests of the entire 
people, the interests of our country. I use the word "betrayal" 
not in some moral sense, but as a precise scientific term. 
  An unprecedented phenomenon in the history of mankind has 
occurred. There has never been anything like it. Just imagine 
that two armies have faced off against each other, and the 
commanders of these armies, the entire general staff, have all 
run over to the enemy camp and begun teaching the enemy how to 
defeat their own army. This is what has happened with our 
country. When I was writing the second part of the book, "The 
Crisis of Communism," which has now been published, I formulated 
this definition in my consciousness. Yet, although I understood 
this in my mind, in my feelings I nevertheless could not grasp 
the impending misfortune. I spoke of the crisis, but already 
then I should have spoken of catastrophe, of the most terrible 
catastrophe in the history of mankind. Sometimes it seems to me 
that I am living in some terrible nightmare. 
  What situation has the murdered, plundered, raped, spat upon 
and insulted Russia found itself in relation to the rest of 
mankind? I always warn that I am not a politician, not a 
composer of plans for the future. I am merely a researcher, and 
nothing more. This is where my task end. I have always been 
guided in my research by a simple, banal principle: The truth at 
any price, whatever this may cost me. I can make a mistake. I 
can be accused of not knowing something, of not studying some 
question. Yet to ascribe certain intentions to me--that is 
dishonest. I have only one intention: In this sea of lies in 
which mankind is now entangled, ideological lies, to seek out by 
any means even a grain of truth. 
  You must understand, this is unusually hard to do. In 
practice, the world does not want to know the truth about Russia 
and does everything possible to silence this truth. And if it 
does not succeed in silencing it, then it tries at least to 
localize it. And if it cannot localize it, then it tries to 
falsify it. I know of no other period in history when there was 
such a physiological hatred toward the truth, and not toward 
truth in general, but toward a fully definite property--the 
truth about the position and fate of Russia. 
  It is as if everyone has conspired against it. Just imagine, 
somewhere in Australia they murdered a German tourist. The 
entire world is abuzz: Month after month, the TV and the press 
carry on about it for half a year... In Russia they murdered 
people before the very eyes of all mankind in the so-called 
White House--and that is alright! And if they do speak of it, it 
is with justification: This, they say, was necessary for the 
sake of democracy... 
  I do not understand such hypocrisy. This is something which 
has no equal... I believe that the struggle for the truth here 
is task number one. To make known the truth about events in 
Russia, beginning with the first day, when the murder began, and 
up to the last. I believe that the events of 3-4 October 1993 
were the final stab of the knife to the heart of Russia. 
  Now an evaluation of the objective position of the country. 
I 
read an endless number of publications on this topic. All manner 
of plans are proposed, and their characteristic trait consists 
of the fact that Russia is viewed in isolation. They take it and 
look to see: What is possible, what will happen? When I express 
my thoughts, they say to me: "Oh, enough of this. Don't fall 
into such pessimism. There was, after all, the Tatar-Mongol 
yoke, but we survived nevertheless. There was the discord at the 
beginning of the 17th Century--but we withstood it. How 
difficult it was during the time of the Great Patriotic War, but 
we were victorious after all!" To this I answer: "It was a 
different enemy, and those were different times!" 
  We do not have time to wait! The world has become such that 
to ignore Russia, to view it as something autonomous--means to 
evade the main question. 
  The fact is that a global society has already begun to be 
formulated, or has already been formulated. The global world 
exists not as a series of autonomous regions, but as a unified 
society. Unified--not necessarily harmonious. In a family there 
are fights and quarrels. Sometimes they fight more than with the 
neighbors, but this is a unified society. Hundreds of thousands 
of international organizations permeate the planet in the most 
varied directions. There are world economic empires, which have 
extended their feelers into all corners of the planet. There is 
an ideological network which penetrates into the soul of each 
individual person, an informational one, etc. This global 
society exists, but it is not a brotherhood of equal partners, 
as the Western ideology and propaganda is trying to represent it. 
  There is no such brotherhood! 
  This global society already has a clear-cut hierarchical 
structure, a reticular structure. It is a very complex system 
which encompasses all of mankind. The West is the world 
hegemonic power. It is integrated, but already forms a single 
whole. But the West, once again, is not a brotherhood of equal 
peoples. It has its structure: The USA is the leader, a rank 
lower is the European Community, in which Germany has already 
ascended to the role of hegemonic power. On the next lower level 
are the dependant countries, say, of Eastern Europe. Or, say, 
France, Italy and England are one thing, and Spain and Portugal 
are another. They are also unequal partners, and below them come 
the dependant countries, and they also are dependant to varying 
degrees... After that come the semi-colonial countries, and then 
the colonial. And so, where is the planned place of our Russia 
in this global society? And where are they shoving us and have 
already shoved us quite successfully? 
  Let our leaders beat their chests: "A great power, a great 
power." Yet all the while they are crawling on their knees. No! 
We are no longer a great power! We have been trampled and ground 
into the dirt, at the very lowest level of this world global 
society. This was planned from the very beginning. This was done 
consistently from one decade to the next. And, frankly speaking, 
I do not see how this violence can be opposed. 
  Do not think that it is easy for me to pronounce these 
words. 
I am recounting the actual state of affairs, and then the 
question arises: What are Russia's possibilities for getting out 
of this situation? In my opinion, these possibilities are 
negligible, if indeed they exist at all. The state system has 
been destroyed. That which is being created is a mongrelized 
system of a colonial regime. The ideology has been destroyed. 
The moral and ideological state of the population have been 
destroyed. The culture has been destroyed. The youth has been 
demoralized, the next generation is being corrupted... We have 
never yet known such a total disintegration of a country, even 
when we devastated Germany during the Great Patriotic War. There 
has never been anything like this. From that war we emerged 
morally strengthened. And now? Is there a Russian army? In one 
of my interviews with PRAVDA on the eve of the shooting at the 
"White House," I said that it would shoot at its own. 
  I have expressed my highly pessimistic view of the problem 
posed at the beginning of the discussion. Perhaps I am 
overstating things a bit. Sometimes this is useful--to focus 
attention on the gravity of the situation, so as not to deceive 
the people with optimistic promises. I believe that today it is 
more important to speak with the Russian people in just this way. 
  I personally hold the following position: We are doomed, and 
therefore I as a Russian will fight to the end. Even if I am 
left one against six billion. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47115 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   9 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Nationalist Writers View Future </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Nationalist Writers View Future </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Rasputin Still Hopeful </H4>

<F P=102> 944F0817B Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA in Russian 9 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0817B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Valentin Rasputin: "I Do Not Believe That All Is </F>
Lost." From the roundtable discussion held at the Union of 
Writers of Russia on the topic of "Current and Future Position 
of Russia in the Context of the Current and Future World 
Situation"] 
  [Text] And nevertheless, this global society about which 
Aleksandr Zinovyev speaks, I believe, has not yet come to 
Russia. When it does come is a matter of time, that is clear. 
Russia is still a continent, still a civilization, such a 
country which, evidently, does not immediately lend itself to 
the onset of a global society. For some time to come, it will 
remain with its own psychology and with its own character. 
  You say, Aleksandr Aleksandrovich, that you are an observer, 
and we are participants, eyewitnesses. I will allow myself to 
disagree with the fact that you are an observer, if only because 
of the position which you take, even because of that pain with 
which you speak about what is going on in Russia. After all, 
your role here was a very important one. Important in that which 
happened with Russia, as well as in that which is now happening 
with Russia. 
  In one of the interviews, I believe with a Polish journal 
given about a year ago, Vladimir Maksimov said goodby to Russia. 
This was painful to hear, because you have a better view of the 
state of affairs. You know the West better. You, knowing Russia, 
look at it as if through sober eyes, from the side. Sometimes it 
seems that we here cannot help but get accustomed to what is 
happening. We get bogged down in that situation in which it 
exists, and this hinders us from speaking and thinking in a 
rational manner. 
  The situation really does press upon us, and to climb out 
from under it is very difficult. You, it would seem, have the 
opportunity to think independently. Yet I do not want to agree 
with you. 
  Yes, the situation is desperate and difficult. But having 
the 
heart of a person living in Russia and being a Russian, I do not 
want to agree. Specifically because people are listening to our 
words. They want to know what we think. They are listening also 
to your word, and in this sense you are not supporting us. 
Perhaps it makes sense even to be cunning. Yes, to be cunning is 
the last thing we should do. Yet, almost contrary to our own 
opinion, we want to keep up hope in the people who are staying 
in Russia and fighting for it. 
  Russia was quite recently a peasant country, by 80-90 
percent. And the fact that it was a peasant country, that it had 
its own ideology, the peasant ideology, could not disappear 
right away. And it has not disappeared, but has become hidden 
under some other ideology. But it still lives inside the people. 
And perhaps, therein lies the hope... 
  Today Russia, it seems to me, listens more not even to the 
patriotic press, but to common sense, which must ultimately 
prevail. Russia understands it better. Especially after the 
October events, when it is no longer necessary to convince 
anyone, when the instrument which was used to makes fools of us 
has fully exposed itself, fully shown itself. When one speaks 
with people somewhere in the remote areas, one sees that the 
people have gone on the defensive. They are digging in so as to 
survive for the time being. To survive, to withstand this 
terrible situation, and then to rise up with their attitude, in 
order to raise up their country. And it is this sense of 
self-preservation, it seems to me, that is being manifested in 
the fact that our man does not see himself outside of statehood. 
No matter how he might want to survive independently, 
nevertheless survival takes place within a certain group. These 
groups are expanding. They are becoming bigger and bigger. 
  Our man is sufficiently literate to understand that if 
Russia 
perishes, he too will perish... Recent years were very 
important. They were frightening, but also important, because 
they were very educational. Our economic managers, directors of 
enterprises and kolkhozes [collective farms] and sovkhozes 
[soviet farms] have been through great universities--political, 
economic, and simply those of life. They now think quite 
differently. This was several years ago when we were still 
confused. Today this confusion has passed. Especially, I repeat, 
since October. Today the economic managers know what to do. And 
they are ready. And the people are also psychologically ready 
for what they will have to overcome. 
  Then you say that everything is different now--civilization 
is different, obviously, the West is different. And this West 
will no longer tolerate Russia. The West "does not need the 
truth about Russia," as Ilyin said. It needs a falsehood about 
Russia which is convenient for it. But the very fact that the 
West is speaking out against Russia with such persistence, is 
trying to destroy it to the end, speaks of the fact that Russia 
nevertheless exists, in spite of the physical force and the 
economic force. It understands the power which it can be. It is 
the power about which Dostoyevskiy spoke in his "Notes From the 
Underground." This is not even power. It is something else, some 
twist, some "aberration", when a man, in spite of everything, 
does not agree with that which is beneficial for him, which is 
important for him, and acts in an unbeneficial way, in such a 
way as no one has ever acted. And this, perhaps, is specifically 
what will happen in Russia. 
  Yes, we are being tempted by benefits. We are being tempted 
by Western life, and specifically because they are tempting us, 
the Russian man will act just the opposite. After all, just 
look, advertising is not very effective. Somewhere in Moscow, in 
the big cities, people take the bait. But in Russia, in its 
depths, that which is imposed evokes hatred and rejection. In a 
Siberian village they will not accept a product simply because 
it is being imposed upon them. In just this same way, those 
rules which are being imposed upon Russia cannot be accepted 
because they are being too strongly imposed. A Russian person 
always has a cautious and suspicious attitude toward something 
that is being imposed upon him. He has always been independent, 
and the "slave position" of our man is overly exaggerated. 
"Slavery under communism" was also overexaggerated. The Russian 
man has a mind of his own. He really was suppressed and 
confused, but now he is coming to his senses. And how he will 
show himself in another year or two, we still do not know. Yes, 
the time is coming when people are starting to not believe in 
anything. But when we turn our face in that direction (not to 
the West, but to the East), our attitude changes. 
  During the time of discord, I believe, there were no 
theoretical conferences about patriotism, about statehood. 
People simply gathered in Nizhniy Novgorod, in Yaroslavl, and in 
other cities, and began giving money, began bringing themselves, 
their friends and their families to the ranks of the people's 
volunteer corps. And ultimately they sacrificed everything. I do 
not believe that all is lost. I do not believe it because I live 
among these Russian people. If we do not retain hope, then what 
is there to live for? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47116 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr065___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-065 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tatarstan, Russia Average Wages Compared </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Tatarstan, Russia Average Wages Compared </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0807A Kazan KAZANSKIYE VEDOMOSTI in Russian 10 Jun 94 p 
11 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0807A </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan KAZANSKIYE VEDOMOSTI </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by L. Ageyeva: "R50,000--Is This a Lot or Not? What </F>
the Ordinary Taxpayer Needs To Know About the Nebulous Concepts 
of the Budget"] 
  [Text] As reported, several items on the agenda of the 
Supreme Soviet session involve the social sphere, that is, your 
pocketbook and mine: on changes to the program of targeted 
social support for the population, and the draft laws on the 
minimum wage. 
  Debates on this topic began even before the session. We have 
reported that the Supreme Soviet's Planning, Budget, and Finance 
Commission did not support the draft on the minimum wage on the 
grounds that it "requires additional consideration and the 
introduction of companion acts not only from the standpoint of 
the budget, but also from the angle of affecting the situation 
and interests of industrial enterprises, first and foremost in 
the defense industry." 
  A few figures from the commission's conclusions: In the 
event 
of shifting to a R50,000 minimum wage, expenditures on sectors 
financed from the Tatarstan budget will amount to R100 billion 
over seven months; additional payments to institutions of higher 
learning and vocational secondary schools--R35 billion; and the 
republic social protection fund's expenditures will increase by 
more than 10 billion. 
  There is an opinion that the government, which proposes to 
raise the minimum wage, is an interested party, because in this 
case there will be an increase in budget revenue from various 
duties which today are pegged to the minimum wage. However, the 
deputy commission came to the opposite conclusion: The tax base 
will shrink, resulting in a loss of approximately R200 billion. 
  Thus, additional expenditures and losses will amount to R350 
billion, or R50 billion a month. The actual state of the budget 
shows that real revenue will amount to R80 billion a month on 
average. 
  Undoubtedly, some people will gain. This includes those who 
will be receiving this minimum wage. One of draft laws submitted 
for the deputies' consideration assumes employers' liability in 
the event they do not pay even R50,000: The administrative fine 
will equal 10 times the value of the minimum wage on the first 
occurrence, and on repeated occurrence within one year--double 
that amount. 
  However, if all other grades are left unchanged in the 
Unified Pay Scale, which is the basis for setting salaries in 
most budget-financed organizations, the imbalance in the ratio 
of labor remuneration for low-skilled and highly skilled labor 
will reach threatening proportions. 
  Several versions of increasing pay for all others were 
submitted to the deputies: add R20,000 to all grades above the 
minimum; make the base pay for the first grade R30,000 or even 
R50,000 and then set salaries in accordance with established 
coefficients; and so on. That is, on the surface, everybody wins. 
  The deputy commission says, however, that increasing the 
minimum wage to R30,000 in February-May did not result in a 
substantial increase in average earnings. Their decline over the 
past months has become catastrophic: Average earnings for March 
and April differ by only R1,000. And this is considering that 
prices went up for everything! 
  And the last consideration on this account. At a recent 
press 
conference M. Sabirov mentioned that the republic budget may 
simply not be able to cover this innovation. That is, R50,000 
will be set by law, and then, as has already happened before, 
people will not see their pay for months. The harsh reality is 
this: The budget treasury in the republic and in Kazan is quite 
depleted. 
  Meanwhile an increasingly greater number of urban and rural 
residents are falling into the low-income category every day. 
The materials distributed to the deputies provide numerous 
interesting details in this respect. 
  As long as store prices and residential rents in Tatarstan 
were lower by an order of magnitude than in other regions of 
Russia, we had good grounds to say that we lived better. Today 
the picture has changed. 
  The average monthly income of one worker in our republic 
amounted to R151,800 in April and fell by 1.3 percent as 
compared to March. Social and labor benefits here account for 
only 6 percent. The average wage earned in April amounted to 
R142,800 and increased as compared to last April by 5.2-fold, 
and as compared to March--by 1.3 percent, while prices for 
consumer goods and services increased 5.8-fold and by 12.8 
percent respectively. 
  Let us arm ourselves with patience and give some thought to 
several more figures: Of the cities in our republic, with 
respect to average wages Kazan was in fifth place 
(R153,069--raise your hands: Who gets how much?). First is 
Bugulma (R174,267), followed by Naberezhnyye Chelny, Zainsk, and 
Nizhnekamsk. 
  If we compare the indicators of changes in the standard of 
living in 1993-1994 in Tatarstan and the Russian Federation, 
everything is less here than in Russia. I do not even want to 
quote the figures so as not to traumatize people unnecessarily. 
  I do not want to add my voice to those who are yelling that 
this is all the result of the treaty with Russia: We are being 
robbed as before, they say. Neither does it make any sense to 
contend that Tatarstan reformers are worse than Russian ones. 
Apparently we have not prepared well for the stage of transition 
from "soft" forms of the market to hard ones, although all this 
time we have been talking of the need for such preparation. That 
is, individuals have prepared, and some have learned to live for 
months without pay, but the republic budget, burdened by 
production decline and insolvency, has been literally brought to 
its knees. As the banker T. Abdullin pointed out at the session, 
we are not rich enough to continue to provide for a "soft merge" 
into the market. We did so as long as we could. But President M. 
Shaymiyev warned prophetically: We will end up where Russia is. 
So why all of a sudden so much talk about a crisis? 
  And the last observation on the subject of the session 
documents. 
  As one can see from the table we publish below, in both 
republics people of the same category have more or less the same 
standard of living in both republics. Financiers, those handling 
the pension and insurance pie, and bureaucrats are paid well 
everywhere (the latter are paid more in Russia, by the way), 
while doctors, teachers, and people of science and culture are 
paupers everywhere. How else can one put it, considering that 
the minimum consumer budget today stands at R164,000, and their 
salaries do not exceed the R130,000 mark? 
  Prime Minister M. Sabirov said a few days ago that this was 
the first time he had heard that journalists are also not paid 
much. Yes, we live like the majority of the population. A 
typical salary in an editorial office is R97,600. So we have to 
study the session materials most attentively--otherwise, how 
will we learn whether the deputies care for our interests or 
their own? 


AVERAGE MONTHLY WAGES in April 1994 

                        (in R thousands) 

                        Russia                     Tatarstan 

Total                   171.1                      142.7 

including: 

industry                185.7         6            147.4         7 

agriculture             75.2          11           94.2          11 

construction            228.6         4            168.8         4 

transportation          270.9         3            189.6         2 

municipal service       194.5         5            156.7         5 

health care, physical   134.0         7            152.7         6 
culture and sports, 
social security 

education               125.8         9            130.0         7 

culture and arts        109.9         10           103.1         10 

science and             130.1         8            107.4         9 
science-related 
service 

credit, finances,       366.1         1            298.9         1 
insurance, and 
pensions 

administrative bodies   231.4         2            185.6         3 
apparat 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47117 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   8 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   * Nordic Firms in Svetogorsk Packaging Venture </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    * Nordic Firms in Svetogorsk Packaging Venture </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P20893A Helsinki HUFVUDSTADSBLADET in Swedish 8 Jun 94 p 9 </F>
<F P=103> 94P20893A </F>
<F P=104>  Helsinki HUFVUDSTADSBLADET </F>
<F P=105>  Swedish </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by "PG": "Tetra Pak Into Svetogorsk"] </F>
  [Text] The Swedish firm Tetra Pak has acquired a minority 
share in the Russian pulp and paper kombinat [group 
of enterprises] in Svetogorsk, which is currently in the process 
of being privatized. The firm has also signed an agreement with 
Kymmene Oy [of Finland] to help improve production there. This 
cooperation pact also involves marketing of products other than 
packaging cardboard. 
  The privatization process is already half completed, but the 
company has aimed at a 20-percent ownership share, a spokesman 
from Tetra Pak stated on Tuesday [7 June]. With this, the firm 
would assure cardboard supplies for its plants making packaging 
materials in Kuban in Russia and Kiev in Ukraine. 
  The pulp and paper kombinat in Svetogorsk is one of Russia' 
largest and most modern forestry industry units. The kombinat in 
its origin was a Finnish construction project carried out by 
Finn-Stroi during the middle of the 1980's. 
  Production capacity is around 420,000 tons of pulp and 
220,000 tons of paper annually. The packaging plant's yearly 
capacity is currently 60,000 tons, and could -- with slight 
additional investment -- be raised to 100,000 tons. Operations 
in Svetogorsk recently have been at a low level because of raw 
material shortages. 
  One of the cable papermaking machines in Svetogorsk has been 
converted so that it can now produce cardboard for liquids 
packaging. Investments of almost 60 million [Finnish] markkas 
have been financed by Tetra Pak. These new investments are a 
direct consequence of Tetra Pak's concentration on the Russian 
market. Over the past few years the firm has invested close to 
700 million markkas in Russia. The firm has four separate 
production facilities for processing machines, filling machines, 
and packaging materials for foods in liquid form. The company 
employs almost 1,500 persons. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47118 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> COMMONWEALTH AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     Documents on Commonwealth Trade Issues Published </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Documents on Commonwealth Trade Issues Published </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Agreement on Creating Free Trade Zones </H4>

<F P=102> 944E0913A Moscow EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN in Russian No 19, May 94 
p 16 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0913A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["Agreement on the Creation of Free Trade Zones"] </F>
  [Text] 
  [box, p 16] 
<H5>  At Your Request </H5>
  In the middle of April the heads of the states and 
governments of the CIS signed a number of documents, including 
the Agreement on the Creation of a Free Trade Zone. If possible, 
publish the actual text of this and other agreements--there is 
still a desire for more detailed and concrete information on the 
agreement of the governments. 
  [Signed] A. Rybkin 
  Commercial Director, Rys Joint-Stock Company 
  Irkutsk 
  During the Moscow meeting more than 35 issues were 
considered. The heads of states signed 26 documents, and 22 
documents were signed by the heads of governments. At your 
request we are publishing the texts of several agreements. [end 
box] 
  The states participating the present Agreement, 
hereinafter referred to as Contracting Parties, 
  affirming their support of free development of mutual 
economic coordination, 
  introducing into practice the principles of a market 
economy, 
  acting in the direction of consistent implementation of 
the provisions of the Treaty on the Creation of an Economic 
Union of 24 September 1993 in the City of Moscow, 
  creating conditions for free movement of commodities 
and services, 
  providing for balance of mutual trade and stabilization 
of the domestic economic situations of the participating states, 
  contributing to the growth of the economic potential of 
the participating states on the basis of development of mutually 
advantageous cooperative ties and collaboration, 
  guided by a desire to constantly raise the standard of 
living of the population of their states, 
  based on stage-by-stage creation of the Economic Union, 
  entering into the Agreement on the Creation of a Free 
Trade Zone, hereinafter referred to as the Agreement, have 
agreed to the following: 
<H5>  Article 1. General Provisions </H5>
  1. The Contracting Parties in order to achieve the 
objectives 
of the present Agreement shall provide for interaction in 
resolving specific problems of the first stage of the creation 
of the Economic Alliance directed toward: 
  a gradual abolition of customs duties, taxes, and fees that 
have equivalent action and quantitative restrictions in mutual 
trade; 
  the elimination of other obstacles to free movement of 
commodities and services; 
  the creation and development of an effective system of 
mutual 
settlements and payments for trade and other operations; 
  coordination of the trade policy with respect to countries 
not participating in the present Agreement; 
  coordination of the economic policy to the extent necessary 
to achieve the objectives of the Agreement (in the areas of 
industry, agriculture, transportation, finance, investments, the 
social sphere, the development of conscientious competition, 
etc.); 
  promotion of interbranch and intrabranch cooperation and 
scientific and technical collaboration; 
  harmonization and/or standardization of legislation of the 
Contracting Parties to the extent necessary for proper and 
effective functioning of the free trade zone. 
  2. The territory of the Agreement encompasses the customs 
territories of the Contracting Parties. 
  3. If the significance of the terms are not especially 
defined in the Agreement or some other agreement of the 
Contracting Parties, upon interpreting them the Contracting 
Parties shall be guided by the principles of the Vienna 
Convention on Law of International Agreements of 1969. 
  Differences of opinion in connection with the interpretation 
of the Agreement or individual terms in it will be resolved 
according to the procedure adopted for regulating disputes in 
connection with the present Agreement. 
  4. The Contracting Parties shall refrain from actions that 
contradict the principles and impede the achievement of the 
objectives of the present Agreement. This provision pertains in 
particular to the conditions for participation of the 
Contracting Parties in other regional economic groupings and 
also other issues related to regulation of relations within the 
framework of the Agreement. 
<H5>  Article 2. Conditions with Respect to Nonparticipating States </H5>
  The Contracting Parties shall retain the right to 
independent 
and autonomous determination of the conditions for foreign 
economic relations with states not participating in the present 
Agreement. 
<H5>  Article 3. Customs Duties, Taxes, and Fees with Equivalent </H5>
Effect and Quantitative Restrictions 
  1. The Contracting Parties shall not apply customs duties, 
taxes, or fees that have an equivalent effect or quantitative 
restrictions on bringing in and/or taking out commodities 
originating on the customs territory of one of the Contracting 
Parties and intended for the customs territories of other 
Contracting Parties. Exceptions from this trade provision shall 
be documented with documents that are an inseparable part of the 
present Agreement. 
  2. In compliance with point 1 of the present article the 
Contracting Parties shall within six months of the date the 
present Agreement goes into force develop and coordinate a 
general List of exceptions from the regime of free trade and 
also methods of application and stage-by-stage abolition of 
these exceptions for the transition period until the creation of 
a free trade zone. 
  3. Until the coordination of the general List of exceptions 
in relations between the Contracting Parties, existing bilateral 
agreements on free trade and protocols on exceptions from these 
conditions shall be applied unless otherwise stipulated by 
bilateral agreements. 
  4. The country of origin of the commodity shall be 
determined 
in compliance with the Rules for Determining the Country of 
Origin of Commodities, which shall be an inalienable part of the 
present Agreement (Appendix No. 1). 
<H5>  Article 4. Technical and Other Special Requirements </H5>
(Restrictions) 
  1. The Contracting Parties, in order to eliminate technical 
barriers and other restrictions of a similar nature in mutual 
trade, shall strive to harmonize technical and other special 
requirements and coordinate their policies in this area. 
  2. The Contracting Parties shall instruct their authorized 
organs to prepare the corresponding proposals for implementation 
of the provisions of the first point of the present article on a 
multilateral or bilateral basis. 
<H5>  Article 5. Fees and Formalities Related to Shipment of </H5>
Commodities In and Out 
  1. All fees and payments (with the exception of customs 
duties, taxes, and fees on a par with them) established by the 
Contracting Parties in connection with shipping commodities in 
and out in mutual trade must not exceed actual expenditures 
within reasonable limits. 
  2. The Contracting Parties shall provide information about 
the kinds of fees and payments and strive for a coordinated 
reduction of their number and amounts. 
  3. The Contracting Parties shall strive to simplify and 
standardize administrative formalities. 
  4. The provisions of the present Agreement shall apply, in 
particular, to fees and formalities pertaining to: 
  quantitative restrictions; 
  licensing; 
  foreign currency control; 
  statistical reporting; 
  documents, documentation, and certification of documents; 
  analysis and inspection; 
  quarantine, the sanitary service, fumigation, etc. 
<H5>  Article 6. Standardization and/or Harmonization of Customs </H5>
Procedures 
  1. The Contracting Parties shall take measures for maximum 
simplification and standardization of customs formalities, 
particularly through the introduction of standard forms of 
customs documentation and documentation accompanying 
commodities, being oriented toward existing international 
agreements and treaties. 
  2. The Contracting Parties shall instruct their authorized 
organs to prepare proposals pertaining to harmonization of 
customs procedures and mutual recognition of customs documents 
and customs support. 
<H5>  Article 7. Commodity Classification </H5>
  1. When taking measures for tariff and nontariff regulation, 
introducing statistical reporting, and exchanging statistical 
information, and also for customs control and documentation the 
Contracting Parties shall take advantage of the Commodity 
Classification of Foreign Economic Activity based on the 
Harmonized System of Description and Codification of 
Commodities. Here for their own needs the Contracting Parties 
shall, if necessary, carry out further development of national 
commodity classifications. 
  2. The introduction of a standard copy of the Harmonized 
System of Description and Codification of Commodities shall be 
effected by the Russian Federation through existing 
representative offices in the corresponding international 
organizations until other contracting parties announce 
independent introduction of a standard copy. 
<H5>  Article 8. Domestic Taxes and Other Fees of a Fiscal Nature </H5>
  1. The Contracting Parties shall not directly or indirectly 
impose on commodities originating on the customs territories of 
other contracting parties taxes and fees of a fiscal nature in 
an amount exceeding their level for national commodities. 
  2. The Contracting Parties shall submit full information 
about their existing taxes and other fees of a fiscal nature. 
<H5>  Article 9. Subsidies </H5>
  The Contracting Parties have agreed not to grant export or 
other subsidies to enterprises located on their territories if 
as a result of granting such subsidies conditions of 
conscientious competition are violated. 
<H5>  Article 10. Transit </H5>
  1. The Contracting Parties agree that observance of the 
principle of free transit is a most important condition for 
achievement of the objectives of the present Agreement and an 
essential element in the process of including them in the system 
of international division of labor and cooperation. 
  2. Transit shipments must not be subjected to unjustifiable 
delays or restrictions. 
  3. The conditions for transit, including tariffs for 
shipment 
by any kind of transportation and the rendering of services, 
must not be worse than the conditions provided by the 
Contracting Parties for their own dispatchers and recipients of 
cargoes and commodities belonging to them and also for shippers 
and means of transportation of said Contracting Party or they 
are offered to dispatchers and recipients of cargo, commodities 
belonging to the shippers, and means of transportation of any 
other foreign state unless otherwise stipulated by the bilateral 
agreement. 
<H5>  Article 11. Re-Exporting </H5>
  1. No Contracting Party shall allow unsanctioned 
re-exporting 
of commodities with respect to whose exports other Contracting 
Parties from whose territory said commodities originate apply 
measures of tariff and/or nontariff regulation. 
  2. The Contracting Parties shall not prevent economic agents 
from including in contracts provisions that affect re-exporting 
of commodities. 
  3. Questions relating to re-exporting commodities shall be 
regulated in compliance with the Agreement on Re-Exporting 
Commodities and the Procedure for Issuing Permits for 
Re-Exporting (Appendix No. 2), which makes up an inalienable 
part of the present Agreement. 
<H5>  Article 12. Production Cooperation and Scientific-Technical </H5>
Cooperation 
  The Contracting Parties shall contribute to the development 
of production cooperation and scientific-technical cooperation 
on an interstate (interbranch, regional) level and on the level 
of economic agents, including through the granting of various 
forms of state support. 
<H5>  Article 13. Exceptions </H5>
  1. General exceptions. 
  The present Agreement shall not infringe on the right of any 
of the Contracting Parties to adopt measures generally accepted 
in international practice for state regulation in the area of 
foreign economic relations which it considers necessary for 
protection of its vital interests or which are undoubtedly 
necessary for the fulfillment of international agreements of 
which it is a participant or intends to become one if these 
measures pertain to: 
  preservation of social morality and social order; 
  protection of the life and health of people; 
  protection of animals and plants; 
  protection of the environment; 
  protection of artistic, archaeological, and historical 
assets 
that are national property; 
  protection of industrial and intellectual property; 
  trade in gold, silver, or other precious metals and stones; 
  preservation of irreplaceable natural resources; 
  restriction of exports of products when the domestic price 
for these products is below the world price as a result of the 
implementation of state programs for support; 
  violation of the payment balance. 
  2. Exceptions for safety considerations. 
  Nothing in the present Agreement shall infringe on the right 
of any of the Contracting Parties to apply any measures of state 
regulation which it considers necessary if these measures 
pertain to: 
  ensuring national security, including prevention of the 
leakage of confidential information pertaining to state secrets; 
  trade in weapons, material equipment, and ammunition, 
rendering of services of a military nature, transfer of 
technologies and rendering of services for production of arms 
and military equipment and other military purposes; 
  delivery of fissionable materials and sources of radioactive 
substances and salvaging of radioactive wastes; 
  measures applied during wartime or in other extreme 
circumstances in international relations; 
  actions to meet its commitments on the basis of the UN 
charter for maintaining international peace and security. 
<H5>  Article 14. Procedure for Introducing Measures of State </H5>
Regulation 
  1. The Contracting Parties shall promptly notify other 
Contracting Parties of the reasons, nature, and proposed time 
periods for the introduction and the effect of measures of state 
regulation. 
  2. The Contracting Parties shall conduct preliminary 
consultation and develop recommendations. In the event that it 
is impossible to adopt a coordinated decision within six months, 
the Contracting Parties mentioned in point 1 of the present 
article shall have the right to introduce measures for state 
regulation at their own discretion. 
  3. In special cases where delay cannot be tolerated the 
Contracting Parties shall have the right to introduce measures 
of state regulation in the area of foreign economic activity 
with simultaneous notification and immediate subsequent 
consultations with other Contracting Parties. 
<H5>  Article 15. Cooperation in the Area of Export Control </H5>
  The Contracting Parties shall cooperate and take coordinated 
actions regarding issues of export control. 
<H5>  Article 16. The Sphere of Enforcement of the Agreement </H5>
Regarding Commodities 
  The conditions of the free trade zone shall apply to 
commodities originating on the customs territories of the 
Contracting Parties and intended for the customs territories of 
Contracting Parties. 
<H5>  Article 17. Services </H5>
  1. The Contracting Parties on the basis of mutuality shall 
strive for gradual removal of restrictions in order to create 
conditions for free rendering of services within the territory 
of the Agreement. 
  2. The Contracting Parties shall determine the kinds of 
services to which the present Agreement shall apply and single 
out priority kinds of services in the area of direct service for 
commodity turnover with respect to which questions of 
liberalization of imports and exports shall be subject to an 
immediate resolution. 
  3. The Contracting Parties shall retain the right to 
coordinate questions related to rendering services on both a 
multilateral and a bilateral basis. 
<H5>  Article 18. Exchange of Information on Legal Regulation of </H5>
Foreign Economic Relations 
  The Contracting Parties shall in a coordinated way grant one 
another information on domestic legal regulation of foreign 
economic relations. 
<H5>  Article 19. Procedure for Resolving Disputes </H5>
  1. Any disputes and disagreements among the Contracting 
Parties regarding interpretation and/or application of the 
provisions of the present Agreement and also other disputes 
affecting the rights and responsibilities of the Contracting 
Parties concerning the present Agreement or in connection with 
it shall be resolved according to the following procedure: 
  through conducting direct consultations by the involved 
Contracting Parties among themselves or, by mutual consent, with 
the participation of representatives of other contracting 
parties; 
  within the framework of the Agreement procedure (through the 
creation of work groups for studying materials from the dispute 
and developing recommendations); 
  in the Economics Court of the CIS; 
  within the framework of other procedures envisioned by 
international law. 
  2. The transition to the subsequent procedure is possible by 
mutual consent of the Contracting Parties between which the 
disputed issues or disagreements have arisen or at the demand of 
one of them upon failure to achieve agreement within six months 
of the day of the beginning of the procedure. 
<H5>  Article 20. Relationship of the Present Agreement to Other </H5>
Obligations and Rights of the Contracting Parties 
  1. Nothing in the present Agreement shall be construed as 
preventing any of the Contracting Parties from fulfilling 
commitments they have made in compliance with any other 
international agreement of which the Contracting Party is a 
participant or may be under the condition that these commitments 
do not contradict the provisions and objectives of the present 
Agreement. 
  2. The conditions of the present Agreement do not affect the 
rights and advantages granted within the framework of regional 
cooperation, border and coastal trade, preferences, free 
economic and customs zones regulated by domestic legislation or 
on the basis of international agreements. 
  3. The Contracting Party which intends to include 
preferential, trade, or integration agreements with states that 
are not participants of the present Agreement shall promptly 
notify other Contracting Parties of this and inform them of the 
proposed conditions for its participation in the aforementioned 
agreements. 
  For purposes of the present point the Contracting Parties 
shall be Contracting Parties which have signed the present 
Agreement and states that have joined it. 
<H5>  Article 21. Transition to a Customs Union </H5>
  The free trade zone shall be regarded as a transition stage 
to the formation of a customs union. 
  The customs union may be created by states that express a 
desire to continue cooperation within its framework and meet the 
conditions of the present Agreement. 
<H5>  Article 22. Changes and Additions </H5>
  1. Changes and additions may be made to the present 
Agreement 
by the mutual consent of the Contracting Parties. 
  2. Reservations shall not be allowed with respect to the 
present Agreement. 
<H5>  Article 23. Enactment </H5>
  1. The present Agreement shall be temporarily applied from 
the day it is signed and shall go into force effective the date 
of submission for storage in the depository of the third 
notification of the implementation by the Contracting Parties 
who signed it of all the necessary intrastate procedures. 
  2. The depository for the present Agreement shall be the 
Republic of Belarus. 
  3. After one year from the date of the signing of the 
present 
Agreement the Contracting Parties for which the Agreement has 
gone into force shall adopt a resolution regarding participation 
in the Agreement of Contracting Parties for which the Agreement 
has been applied temporarily. 
<H5>  Article 24. Joining </H5>
  1. The present Agreement shall be open for joining by any 
state of the Commonwealth of Independent States which recognizes 
the provisions of the Agreement in effect as of the time of 
joining and which expresses its readiness to fulfill them in any 
volume. 
  2. They may join under the conditions and according to the 
procedures determined in a separate agreement with the joining 
state, which shall be preliminarily coordinated and subject to 
approval by all Contracting Parties in compliance with their 
intrastate procedures. 
<H5>  Article 25. Terminating Participation in the Agreement </H5>
  1. Any Contracting Party shall terminate its participation 
in 
the Agreement through sending an official written notification 
to other Contracting Parties of its intention to withdraw from 
the Agreement six months before withdrawal. 
  2. In the event of the violation by any of the Contracting 
Parties of the provisions of the present Agreement, causing 
serious harm to the achievement of its objectives, the other 
Contracting Parties shall have the right to adopt a decision to 
terminate the effect of the Agreement or individual provisions 
of it with respect to this Contracting Party or adopt a decision 
to expel it from the participants in the Agreement. 
  3. In order to resolve possible disputes and claims, 
including of a material nature, the provisions of the present 
Agreement shall remain in effect with respect to the Contracting 
Party that has terminated participation until all of these 
demands have been fully regulated. 
  Done in the City of Moscow on 15 April 1994 in one 
authentic in the Russian language. The authentic copy shall be 
stored in the Archives of the Government of the Republic of 
Belarus, which will send the Contracting Parties that have 
signed the present Agreement their certified copy. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47119 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> COMMONWEALTH AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     Documents on Commonwealth Trade Issues Published </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Documents on Commonwealth Trade Issues Published </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Rules for Determining Country of Origin </H4>

<F P=102> 944E0913B Moscow EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN in Russian No 19, May 94 
p 17 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0913B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["Rules for Determining Country of Origin of Goods"] </F>
  [Text] 
<H5>  Appendix </H5>
  Approved by a resolution of the Council of Chiefs of 
States of the Commonwealth of Independent States on Rules for 
Determining the Country of Origin of Commodities of 24 December 
1993 
  Rules for Determining the Country of Origin of Commodities 
  The present rules shall be in effect with respect to 
commodities originating from the CIS states and being circulated 
in trade among these states. 
  For purposes of the present rules: 
  a) the term "CIS state" shall be understood to mean CIS 
states that have signed the Agreement on Cooperation in the Area 
of Foreign Economic Activity (15 May 1992, Tashkent); 
  b) the term "country of origin of commodities" shall mean 
the 
CIS state in which the commodity was completely produced or 
subjected to sufficient processing. For application of the 
criterion of sufficient processing it shall be possible to apply 
the cumulative principle of origin, that is, when there is 
sequential processing of commodities in the CIS states these 
states shall be regarded as a single whole for purposes of 
determining origin; 
  c) the term "criterion of sufficient processing" shall mean 
the term according to which the commodity in whose production 
two or more countries participate shall be considered to 
originate from the country in which it was subjected to the last 
essential processing sufficient for imparting to the commodity 
its typical feature; 
  d) the term "customs control" shall mean the totality of 
measures taken by national customs organs for purposes of 
ensuring observance of national legislation in customs matters 
and also national legislation and international agreements, 
control over whose implementation is the responsibility of 
customs organs; 
  e) the term "commodities" shall mean any mobile property 
including thermal, electric, and other kinds of energy 
transported across the customs border; 
  f) the term "commodity classification" shall mean the 
Commodity Classification of Foreign Economic Activity (TN VED) 
used in the CIS states based on the Harmonized System of 
Description and Codification of Commodities and the combined 
tariff-statistical classification of the EC. 
  The procedure for determining the country of origin of 
commodities shipped onto the customs territory of the CIS states 
from third countries and shipped to third countries from the 
states shall be regulated by national legislation of the CIS 
states. 
  1. The country of origin of a commodity shall be considered 
to be the state where the commodity was completely produced or 
subjected to sufficient processing. 
  2. The following commodities shall be considered to have 
been 
fully produced in the given country: 
  a) minerals extracted on its territory or in its territorial 
waters, on its continental shelf and in the seas if the country 
has exclusive rights to the development of these minerals; 
  b) vegetable products raised and harvested on its territory; 
  c) living animals born and raised in it; 
  d) products obtained in this country from raising animals 
there; 
  e) products of hunting, fishing, and sea fishing; 
  f) products of sea fishing caught and/or produced in the 
world ocean by ships of the given country or ships leased 
(chartered) by it; 
  g) secondary raw material and wastes which are the result of 
production and other operations conducted in the given country; 
  h) high technology products obtained in open space on space 
ships belonging to the given country or leased by it; 
  i) commodities produced in the given country exclusively 
from 
products mentioned in subpoints "a"-"h" of point 2. 
  3. When two or more countries participate in the production 
of a commodity, the origin of the commodity shall be determined 
according to the criterion of "sufficient processing." 
  4. The criterion of "sufficient processing" may be 
reflected: 
  a) by a rule that requires a change in the tariff position 
of 
the corresponding commodity classification with a list of 
exceptions: (Footnote 1) (The list of exceptions may include: a) 
a list of production or technological operations which, although 
they lead to a change in the commodity position, are not 
considered a sign of sufficient processing or are considered 
such only with observance of certain conditions; 
  b) a list of production or technological operations which, 
although they do not lead to a change in the tariff position, 
are considered a sign of sufficient processing with the 
observance of certain conditions. 
  The conditions mentioned in subpoints "a" and "b" may 
pertain 
both to operations conducted with the commodity and to the rule 
of "ad valorem share.") 
  b) a list of production or technological processes either 
adequate or inadequate for the commodity to be considered as 
originating from the country where these processes took place; 
  c) the rule of "ad valorem share" when the percentage share 
of the value of the utilized materials or added value reaches a 
fixed level in the price of the franco-plant delivered commodity. 
  5. In the event that the criterion of origin of the 
commodity 
is not especially stipulated with respect to specific 
commodities or a specific country (countries), the general rule 
shall be applied whereby a commodity is considered to have been 
subjected to sufficient processing if there has been a change in 
the commodity position (classification code of the commodity) on 
the Commodity Classification at the level of any of the first 
four indicators. 
  The following shall be regarded as not meeting the criterion 
of sufficient processing: 
  a) operations for providing for preservation of the 
commodities during storage or transportation; 
  b) operations for preparing the commodities for sale and 
transportation (breaking down batches, forming shipments, 
sorting, repackaging); 
  c) simple assembly operations; 
  d) switching of commodities (components) without imparting 
to 
the product obtained characteristics that are significantly 
different from its initial ones; 
  e) a combination of two or more of the aforementioned 
operations; 
  f) slaughter of livestock. 
  6. In the event that the criterion of "sufficient 
processing" 
is reflected through the ad valorem share, the value indicators 
shall be calculated: 
  a) for imported materials--according to the customs value, 
that is, the value subject to customs duties when shipped in (on 
the basis of the SIF [expansion not indicated]) or in the event 
that their origin is unknown--at the price established for the 
first sale on the territory of the country where the production 
is being carried out; 
  b) for finished commodities--at the price franco-plant or 
export price of the seller. 
  7. Objects in disassembled or unassembled form shipped in 
several batches when because of production or transportation 
conditions it is impossible to ship them as one batch (Footnote 
2) (This rule shall also be applied in cases where the batch has 
been broken down into several by mistake or because of incorrect 
addressing.) must be regarded, at the request of the importer, 
as a single object from the standpoint of determining origin. 
(Footnote 3) (The conditions for the application of this rule 
shall be: preliminary notification of the customs office where 
it is shipped in of the breakdown of a disassembled or 
unassembled commodity into several branches with an indication 
of the reasons for this breakdown, a detailed specification of 
the contents of each batch referring to the TN VED, the value, 
and the country of origin of the commodities included in each 
batch; the delivery of all batches from one country and by one 
exporter; the shipment of all batches through one customs 
office; the delivery of all batches of commodities by a date not 
exceeding six months from the date of the first dispatch.) 
  8. For purposes of determining the origin of commodities, 
the 
origin of thermal and electric energy, machines, equipment, and 
instruments used for their production shall not be taken into 
account. 
  9. A commodity is considered to have originated from the 
country of export only if this commodity not only meets the 
criterion of origin and other conditions established by the 
present Rules but also is purchased directly from an enterprise 
or firm registered in keeping with the established procedure in 
the exporting country and is imported through direct dispatch 
from this country to the importing country. 
  The requirement of direct shipment shall also be met by 
commodities transported through the territory of one or several 
of the countries as a result of geographical, transportation, 
technical, or economic factors and also when they are 
temporarily shipped into or warehoused on the territory of these 
countries under the condition that the commodities remain the 
whole time under the customs control of the country of transit. 
  Additionally, the rules of direct dispatch are complied with 
by commodities purchased by an importer at exhibits or trade 
fairs under the condition that these commodities were not used 
for purposes other than exhibits after dispatch to the 
exhibition or trade fair and remained under customs control 
during the course of the exhibition or trade fair. 
  10. When certifying the origin of the commodity in the given 
CIS state it is necessary to submit to the customs organs of the 
country into which it is shipped a declaration-certificate 
(hereinafter referred to as certificate) concerning the origin 
of the commodity. 
  11. When commodities are exported from the CIS states the 
certificate of origin shall be issued by an organ of the country 
of origin of the commodity authorized in compliance with 
national legislation. 
  The CIS states shall exchange samples of stamps of organs 
and 
signatures of individuals authorized to endorse the 
certificates. The certificates shall be considered invalid 
without the aforementioned samples and the preferences 
envisioned by agreements on trading conditions shall not apply. 
  12. The certificate must contain the following necessary 
information about the commodity for which it is issued: 
  a) name and address of exporter; 
  b) name and address of importer; 
  c) means of transportation and route of travel (to the 
extent 
that this is known); 
  d) the number of places and kinds of packaging and a 
description of the commodity containing all the information 
necessary to identify the commodity; 
  e) weight brutto and netto. (Footnote 4) (These indicators 
may be replaced by others such, for example, as the number of 
units or volume when the weight of the commodity changes 
significantly during transportation or when these units are 
regularly applied to the given type of commodity.) 
  13. The certificate of origin must clearly state that the 
given commodity originates in the corresponding country, that 
is, it must contain: 
  a) a written declaration from the exporter to the effect 
that 
the commodity meets the corresponding criterion of origin; 
  b) a written certification from the authorized organ that 
issued the certificate to the effect that the information 
presented by the exporter on the certificate is accurate. 
  14. The certificate of origin shall be submitted to customs 
organs in typed form without corrections in the Russian language. 
  15. The certificate of origin shall be submitted along with 
the freight customs declaration and other documents necessary 
when filling out customs documentation. 
  16. In the event of the loss of the certificate of origin an 
officially notarized duplicate (copy) shall be accepted. 
  17. On a certificate of origin for small batches of 
commodities (valued at up to $5,000) the exporter may declare 
the country of origin of the commodity on the shipping invoice 
or other accompanying documents attached to the commodity. 
  18. If there are doubts about the accuracy of the 
certificate 
of origin or the information contained in it the customs organs 
shall apply to the authorized organizations that endorse the 
certificate or other authorized organs of the country indicated 
as the country of origin of the commodities with a justified 
request to provide additional or clarifying information. 
  19. The commodity shall not be regarded as having originated 
in a given country until the proper confirmation of origin or 
the requested information is provided. 
  20. As a general rule, failure to provide the properly 
filled 
out certificate of origin or information about the origin shall 
not be considered grounds for refusing to let the freight pass. 
  The customs office may refuse to let freight pass only if 
there are sufficient grounds to assume that it originated in a 
country whose commodities must not be allowed into the country 
in compliance with international agreements in effect for this 
state and/or its national legislation. 
  Taking into account the provisions of the second paragraph 
of 
the present point, commodities whose origin has not been 
reliably established are allowed to be shipped into the country 
with the payment of customs duties at the maximum rates of the 
customs tariff of the country into which they are being shipped. 
  21. Most favored nation or preferential conditions may be 
applied to commodities indicated in the third paragraph of point 
20 upon receipt of the proper certification of their origin no 
later than a year after the delivery (output) of the commodity. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-066-08A>      Figure </FIG>


  [box, p 17] 
<H5>  Resolution on Changing Points 9 and 10 of the Rules for </H5>
Determining the Country of Origin of Commodities 
  In connection with the conclusion of the Agreement on the 
Creation of a Free Trade Zone and the need to change Points 9 
and 10 of the Rules for Determining the Country of Origin of 
Commodities of 24 September 1993, the heads of the governments 
of the states participating in the Commonwealth of Independent 
States 
  have resolved: 
  1. Points 9 and 10 shall be worded as follows: 
  "9. A commodity shall be considered have originated on the 
customs territory of a state participating in the Agreement on 
the Creation of a Free Trade Zone if it meets the criteria for 
origin established by the present Rules and is acquired by a 
resident of one of the states participating in the Agreement on 
the Creation of a Free Trade Zone. 
  "10. As certification of the origin of a commodity on the 
customs territory of a state participating in the Agreement on 
the Creation of a Free Trade Zone it is necessary to submit to 
the customs organs of the state to which it is shipped a 
declaration-certificate of the origin of the commodity (form 
ST-1 is attached) issued by an authorized organ of the country 
of origin participating in the Agreement on the Creation of a 
Free Trade Zone." 
  2. The rules for determining the country of origin of a 
commodity, taking into account the changes that have been made, 
shall be applied only for participants in the Agreement on the 
Creation of a Free Trade Zone. 
  Done in the city of Moscow on 15 April 1994 in one authentic 
copy in the Russian language. The authentic copy shall be stored 
in the Archives of the Government of the Republic of Belarus, 
which will send a certified copy to the states that signed the 
present Resolution. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47120 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> COMMONWEALTH AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     Documents on Commonwealth Trade Issues Published </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Documents on Commonwealth Trade Issues Published </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Agreement on Procedure for Reexport of Goods </H4>

<F P=102> 944E0913C Moscow EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN in Russian No 19, May 94 
p 17 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0913C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["Agreement on Reexport of Commodities and the Procedure for </F>
Granting Permission for Reexport"] 
  The governments of the states participating in the 
present Agreement, hereinafter referred to as the Parties, 
  based on the provisions of the Agreement on Cooperation 
in the Area of Foreign Economic Activity of 15 May 1992 and the 
Agreement on the Creation of an Economic Union of 24 September 
1993, with a view to assisting one another in support and 
protection of their mutual interests in the area of foreign 
economic activity, 
  have agreed to the following: 
<H5>  Article 1 </H5>
  The subject of the present Agreement shall be reexport of 
commodities with respect to whose shipment the Parties from 
whose customs territory these commodities originate apply 
measures of tariff and/or nontariff regulation or grant foreign 
economic benefits when they are shipped from their customs 
territory. 
  Reexport of the commodities indicated in the first part of 
the present article shall be conducted only with the properly 
documented written permission issued by an authorized department 
of the country of origin of the commodities. 
  The Parties shall exchange lists of commodities which can be 
re-exported only with this kind of properly documented written 
permission. 
  Said Agreement shall not apply to re-exporting specific 
commodities (weapons, narcotics, medicinal preparations, 
precious metals and stones, etc.) which are exported according 
to a special procedure. 
  Other commodities shall be re-exported in compliance with 
rules generally accepted in international trade. 
<H5>  Article 2 </H5>
  For purposes of the present Agreement re-export shall be 
understood to mean the shipment of commodities originating on 
the customs territory of one of the Parties by another Party 
outside the customs territory of the latter in order to ship 
them to a country that is not a party to the present Agreement. 
  Sanctioned re-export shall be understood to mean the 
re-export of commodities with properly documented written 
permission issued by an authorized department of the country of 
origin of the commodities. 
  Unsanctioned re-export shall be understood to mean 
re-exportation of commodities indicated on the lists by the 
Parties without the properly documented written permission 
issued by an authorized department of the country of origin of 
the commodities. 
  The country of origin of the commodities shall be defined 
according to the Rules for Determining the Country of Origin of 
Commodities approved by the Resolution of the Council of Heads 
of States of the Commonwealth of Independent States of 24 
September 1993. 
<H5>  Article 3 </H5>
  The Parties shall not allow unsanctioned re-export. 
<H5>  Article 4 </H5>
  The Parties have agreed: 
  when granting permission for re-export of commodities the 
authorized department of the country of origin of the 
commodities shall be guided by the existing national legislation 
and agreements on trade-economic cooperation and trading 
conditions with re-exporting states as well as norms of 
international law; 
  in order to obtain permission for re-export of commodities 
the interested economic agents shall apply to the authorized 
department of the country of origin of the commodities with a 
substantiated application for re-export, to which they shall 
append a copy of the contract for the acquisition of commodities 
and existing conditions for the re-export transaction (the 
country of destination, quantity, price, and quality of 
re-exported commodities, the basis of delivery, the delivery 
dates, and the code of the Harmonized System of Description and 
Codification of Commodities); 
  the authorized department of the country of origin of the 
commodities shall within 10 days of the date of receipt of the 
application consider the request and notify the interested 
economic agents and authorized department of the re-exporting 
state of the decision that is adopted and, if the decision is 
positive, the conditions for re-export. 
  As one of the conditions the country of origin of the 
commodities may demand from the economic agent that is 
re-exporting a commitment to return to it a part but no more 
than half of the difference between the price of the transaction 
for re-exporting commodities and the price of the transaction 
for shipping the commodities out of the country of origin 
through transferring this difference in the currency of the 
transaction for re-export of the commodities into an account 
indicated by the authorized department of the country of origin 
of the commodities. 
  If the interested economic agent agrees to the conditions 
for 
re-export the authorized department of the country of origin of 
the commodities shall within two weeks issue him the properly 
documented written permission for re-export of commodities. 
  The authorized department of the country of origin of the 
commodities shall have the right, if a positive decision is 
made, to apply to the authorized department of the re-exporting 
state with a request to oversee the fulfillment of the re-export 
contract with an official notification that the existing 
conditions actually correspond to the conditions of the 
re-export transaction declared in the substantiated application 
of the economic agent. 
<H5>  Article 5 </H5>
  The Parties have agreed that the issuance of permission for 
re-exportation may be refused if: 
  information on the transaction that is known to be 
inaccurate 
is reported; 
  there is use of dumping prices and other elements of an 
unconscientious trading practice which causes harm to the 
economic interests of the country of origin of the commodities; 
  there are restrictions on the part of third countries 
against 
bringing the corresponding commodities onto their customs 
territory. 
<H5>  Article 6 </H5>
  In the case of unsanctioned re-export the country of origin 
of the commodities shall have the right to demand compensation 
for damages caused and to apply sanctions. 
  The Parties shall contribute to the adoption of national 
normative acts specifying the responsibility of economic agents 
for unsanctioned re-export. 
<H5>  Article 7 </H5>
  The Parties have agreed that in the event that the volume of 
unsanctioned re-export of commodities causes economic harm to 
the country of origin of the commodities, the losing side can 
halt the delivery of these commodities to the state whose 
economic entities have allowed unsanctioned re-export or apply 
other sanctions envisioned by norms of international law. 
  The burden of proof of the fact of unsanctioned re-export 
shall lie with the authorized department of the country of 
origin of the commodities. It must be submitted to the 
authorized department of the re-exporting state necessary and 
sufficient evidence of violation by concrete economic subjects 
of the present Agreement. 
<H5>  Article 8 </H5>
  The Parties have agreed that the authorized department of 
the 
re-exporting state shall render assistance to the authorized 
department of the country of origin of the commodities in 
revealing cases of unsanctioned re-export and penalizing of 
economic entities that have committed this in compliance with 
its national legislation. 
<H5>  Article 9 </H5>
  The Parties have agreed that any disputes or differences of 
opinion arising during the fulfillment by the Parties of mutual 
commitments under the present Agreement shall be resolved 
through consultations among representatives of the Parties 
authorized to do this. 
<H5>  Article 10 </H5>
  The present Agreement is open to be joined by any state of 
the Commonwealth of Independent States. 
<H5>  Article 11 </H5>
  The present Agreement shall go into force effective the date 
the copy of the third notification of the fulfillment by the 
Parties of the necessary intrastate procedures is submitted for 
storage. 
  The Agreement has been concluded for a period of five years 
and shall be automatically extended for subsequent five-year 
periods. Any Party may terminate its participation in the 
Agreement by sending an official written notification to the 
depository of its intention to withdraw from the Agreement six 
months before it withdraws. 
  Done in the city of Moscow on 15 April 1994 in one authentic 
copy in the Russian language. An authentic copy of the Agreement 
shall be stored in the Archives of the Government of the 
Republic of Belarus, which is the depository for the present 
Agreement, which shall send certified copies to the states that 
signed the Agreement. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47121 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   2 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> COMMONWEALTH AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     Summary Document from April Conference on CIS Banking Issues </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Summary Document from April Conference on CIS Banking Issues </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0921C Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 2 Jun 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0921C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Text, under the rubric "Banks," of Summary Document of the </F>
International Banking Conference: "The Search for an Effective 
System of Mutual Settlement of Accounts"] 
  [Text] On 23-24 April, a banking conference devoted 
to the problem of interstate settlement of accounts within the 
CIS and the entire zone of economic influence of the former USSR 
was held near Moscow at the Bor vacation hotel. Among the 
participants of the conference "The Establishment and 
Development of an Efficient System of Mutual Settlement of 
Accounts on the Level of Central (National) and Commercial Banks 
of the States of the Former USSR" were: the Association of 
Russian Banks, representatives of central and commercial banks 
of the former USSR, and scientific figures. In view of the 
importance of the problem, NG [NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA] is 
publishing the conference's summary document, which appeared in 
May, in unabridged form. 
  After analyzing the situation which has now developed in the 
sphere of mutual settlement of accounts on the level of the 
central (national) and commercial banks of the states of the 
former USSR, the participants in the conference observe the 
following: 
  1. The failure, for objective and subjective reasons, to 
preserve the common monetary system of the states of the former 
USSR resulted in those states introducing their own national 
currencies, which commercial banks are supposed to use in 
international settlement of accounts for the trade-economic 
transactions of their clients. 
  The absence of convertibility and the "softness" of their 
currencies and the limited potential to use the national 
currencies to acquire goods resulted in the fact that settlement 
of accounts in national currencies entails substantial 
difficulties and conceals a possibility of material losses. 
  In these conditions, settlement of accounts of Russian 
commercial structures with partners from the states of the 
former USSR has been done primarily in rubles, spontaneously 
forming a zone of use of the Russian ruble, which, compared with 
other monetary units, is a harder national currency and for many 
participants in the Eurasian market has the same significance as 
the dollar does for Russia. 
  In payment relations with non-Russian commercial structures, 
the participants in trade-economic exchange with other CIS 
states use typically a freely convertible currency or the 
Russian ruble as the currency for settling accounts among 
themselves. 
  The shortage of freely convertible currency and Russian 
rubles means that trade-economic partners try to prevent 
stoppages and the breakdown of production in their countries and 
so resort to bilateral deals based on physical and cost 
indicators and the simplest forms of barter and clearing on the 
level of enterprises and banks. Those commercial banks which 
offer their clients methods of monetary settlement of accounts 
with partners in Eurasian space in "soft" nonconvertible 
currencies, methods which are acceptable to those clients and to 
themselves, play a positive role. Carried out without the 
support of the central (national) banks under the full 
responsibility of the commercial banks, these settlements of 
accounts have not yet been markedly developed. And certain 
central (national) banks are not systematizing data on 
commercial banks working with "soft" currencies and so do not 
always possess the quantitative and qualitative details which 
permit the impact of these settlements to be assessed correctly. 
Thus it does not seem possible to determine to what degree the 
system of interstate settlement of accounts affects the process 
of restoring disrupted economic ties on the territory of the 
former USSR. 
  The condition of accounts on nontrade operations, especially 
those related to monetary transfers of citizens' capital from 
one state of the former USSR to another, is unsatisfactory. A 
considerable number of difficulties arise in connection with the 
migration of the population. The procedure for determining the 
currency exchange rate needed for nontrade settlement of 
accounts and the mechanism for linking nontrade turnover with 
trade turnover and for coordinating norms for citizens to carry 
cash in and out of the country are unclear. 
  Many commercial banks do not deal in exchanging cash in 
"soft" currencies. 
  2. A search is underway in the states of the former USSR for 
ways to establish an efficient system of mutual settlement of 
accounts in the economic space of the former USSR. 
  Many participants in the conference drew the conclusion that 
it is important that all participants in accounts--the central 
(national) and commercial banks and their numerous 
clients--conduct this search along the lines of the Blueprint 
for By-stage Establishment and Development of an Efficient 
System of Mutual Settlement of Accounts developed by 
Mezhekonomsberbank [Intereconomic Savings Bank]; this document 
provides a strategic vision of a new payments system. 
  Most of the participants in the conference believe that in 
accordance with the political and economic realities which have 
become established in the states of the former USSR, the new 
payments system may in principle be formed in two ways: 1) by 
combining the monetary systems of the interested countries 
modeled on a new type of ruble zone, and 2) by consistently 
developing settlement of accounts in the national currencies 
from simple bilateral to more complex multilateral settlement of 
accounts through the organization of a payments union. In the 
opinion of the participants in the conference, neither way 
contradicts the other. The development of settlement of accounts 
in national currencies is supposed to promote their mutual 
convertibility, which provides the basis for an effective 
payments system. We must develop a procedure for mutual 
settlement of accounts in "soft" currencies which most fully 
promotes using them under the set of rules for convertibility, 
providing equal opportunities for all national currencies to 
participate in this system of rules. 
  Because of the different conditions which have become 
established in the CIS states, it is impossible to combine their 
monetary systems all at one time and include all the states in 
the unifying process right away. But in places where the 
necessary prerequisites have matured to a significant degree, in 
the interests of speeding up the creation of a common economic 
space it seems necessary to support the states' desire for 
unification of their monetary systems in a new type of ruble 
zone. 
  In connection with this, many participants in the conference 
believe that the signing by the heads of governments of Russia 
and Belorussia [Belarus] of the Treaty on Unifying the Monetary 
Systems of these states is making an important contribution to 
the general process of development of the economic integration 
of the CIS countries and serves as a manifestation of the 
centripetal tendencies which have objectively emerged on the 
territory of the former USSR. 
  3. After exchanging opinions, the participants in the 
conference expect that stronger cooperation between the central 
(national) banks of the interested states of the former USSR 
could help speed up the process of creation of an effective 
system of mutual settlement of accounts on the Eurasian market. 
The process of creating currency markets in these states, which 
is essential for establishing a contemporary system of mutual 
settlement of accounts, is occurring at different speeds. As a 
rule the currency markets are distinguished by a low volume of 
transactions and significant disproportions in supply and 
demand. The impact of the "black" market is substantial. All 
this impedes the development of settlement of accounts in "soft" 
currencies and reduces the economic potential of commercial 
banks to have a positive effect on the restoration of economic 
ties. The lack of coordination and reconciliation of the actions 
of the CIS states and their central (national) banks in the 
sphere of currency regulation is a serious obstacle. One of the 
reasons for this is the lack of a general coordinating and 
methodological organ. 
  Taking this into account, the participants in the conference 
believe it is important to specially study the question of the 
wisdom of creating such an organ, for example one like the 
Standing Commission on Currency-Financial Questions, which 
operated quite successfully in the former CEMA structure for 
many years and played a positive role in the establishment and 
development of payment-accounts relations among its member 
states. 
  Within the framework of the CIS, the Currency Committee 
under 
the Interstate Bank could perform similar functions, and its 
recommendations could be realized through the council of this 
bank. Developing a mechanism for a new payments system could be 
among the first tasks of the Currency Committee. The start of 
the activity of the Interstate Bank should be stepped up. 
Delaying its work may discredit its potential in the work of 
improving interstate settlement of accounts. 
  4. In the interests of the work, increase interaction of 
central (national) banks with commercial banks in the sphere of 
organizing their currency-financial cooperation. As analysis 
shows, the problems of accounts settlement and payment relations 
are derived from the main problem: the mutual imbalance of 
commodity turnover of the former USSR republics, above all with 
Russia, which causes the participants in the market to have a 
great need for rubles. Inasmuch as the national currencies of 
the near abroad are not convertible, they frequently wind up in 
the accounts of enterprises in commercial banks. Russian 
entrepreneurs have little interest in settling accounts in the 
"soft" currencies of their partners, which ultimately deters 
settling accounts in them and does not promote the development 
of a mechanism for mutual convertibility of those currencies. 
  A certain solution could be found if commercial banks were 
included in the activity of the Interstate Bank. As the process 
of liberalization of foreign-economic ties progresses, 
settlement of accounts on the level of commercial banks will 
become predominant. In these conditions it is important that 
commercial banks cooperate with central (national) banks and the 
Interstate Bank. Prominent commercial banks are prepared for 
such partnership in any form. 
  5. The future of the currency-financial cooperation of the 
commercial banks of the former USSR states is seen not only in 
their participation in establishing an effective payments 
system. Commercial banks must mobilize their influence on the 
processes of normal movement of goods, services, labor, and 
capital in the space of the former USSR. The participants see 
overcoming the isolation and separateness of commercial banks 
from one another as the way to do this. 
  6. The participants in the conference also link the 
prospects 
of currency cooperation with the possibility and need to 
establish close contacts with commercial banks of the states 
which were members of CEMA, in particular concerning the topic 
of joint development of a mechanism for mutual settlement of 
accounts in national currencies, as well as the creation of 
joint banks when there is mutual interest. 
  The readiness of commercial banks of the states of the 
former 
USSR to actively interact with banks of the countries of Central 
and Eastern Europe is the result of their desire to help restore 
the economic ties in this region which were largely destroyed. 
Scientific-technical cooperation in the area of industrial 
cooperation has virtually ceased. In trade the main type of 
transaction is barter, which does not suit entrepreneurs of any 
form of ownership now. Commercial banks consider currency 
cooperation with their partners from China and Vietnam promising 
for them; the many years of experience with those partners has 
confirmed the profitability of economic cooperation with them. 
  7. The conference considers speeding up solving the problem 
of nontrade payments, especially monetary transfers of citizens 
of different countries, one of the urgent tasks. The 
participants in the conference are making a request of the 
Association of Savings Banks, the Savings Bank of Russia, the 
Savings Bank of the Republic of Belarus, Mezhekonomsberbank, and 
the specialized credit institution Western Union DP-East, 
created with the participation of Mezhekonomsberbank, to take 
the initiative to prepare the government's proposals on a 
possible mechanism for transferring personal capital and the 
conditions of its operation. 
  8. The conference believes that development of all forms of 
banking cooperation on all levels from the central (national) to 
commercial banks requires that the information vacuum be 
eliminated and measures be taken to improve the system of mutual 
information on the activities of commercial and central 
(national) banks of the states of the former USSR. 
  9. Based on the fact that the economies of the states of the 
former USSR are the transitional economies from a planned 
economy to a market economy, and that many cadres, including 
bank cadres, lack the proper experience in managing market 
relations, the participants in the conference believe it is 
important to increase scientific support of cooperation and 
enrich it, above all with basic theoretical research. For this 
purpose, it is considered wise to prepare a fundamental 
scholarly work "Money and Banks in the Transitional Economy of 
the States of the Former USSR (Theory and Economic Pragmatism)." 
To publish it, interested banks could create a fund to finance 
research work and assign the Association of Russian Banks to 
handle it. 
  Along with this, it is considered important to expand 
applied 
research in the area of international accounts-payments and 
currency-credit relations. The conference is asking the RAN 
[Russian Academy of Sciences] institute of foreign-economic 
research, which specializes in problems of international 
relations within the CIS, to study its potential to regularly 
service the scientific needs of central (national) and 
commercial banks, together with other similar scientific 
institutions of the Commonwealth countries. The above-indicated 
fund is to be used to finance scientific research. 
  10. Attaching exceptional importance to the systematic 
exchange of opinions on pressing problems of the international 
activity of central (national) and commercial banks, the 
participants in the conference believe it is wise to conduct 
meetings regularly (as a rule, once a year), and for this 
purpose rename the conference the standing congress "Cooperation 
of Banks of the CIS States" and decide the appropriate 
organizational questions on a working basis. Questions of the 
interaction of commercial banks with central (national) banks, 
complete development of a system of mutual settlement of 
accounts, conduct of joint analysis of the economic situation 
and monetary-credit and currency policy, and changes in banking 
legislation can be topics of discussion in order to develop 
possible proposals for joint initiatives and projects. 
  [Ordinal number 11 missing in text]. The conference is 
asking 
the Association of Russian Banks and Mezhekonomsberbank to 
remain the headquarters where interested central (national) and 
commercial banks can send their ideas temporarily, until the 
organs of the congress are formed. 
  12. The conference is asking the organizing committee to 
summarize the proposals and ideas suggested during the 
conference and to prepare an analytical report and send it to 
the governments and central (national) banks of the CIS states. 
  Chairman of the conference, S. Yegorov, president of 
the Association of Russian banks; Cochairman of the 
conference, V. Kolbayev, president of Mezhekonomsberbank; 
chairman of the conference organizing committee, V. 
Khorkin, member of the Mezhekonomsberbank council. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47122 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   31 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> INTERSTATE AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     Crimea Seen Provoking Kiev in Conflict </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Crimea Seen Provoking Kiev in Conflict </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944K1384A Moscow SEGODNYA in Russian 31 May 94 p 10 </F>
<F P=103> 944K1384A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SEGODNYA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleksandr Yuryevich Grushevskiy, deputy director </F>
of the Center for Economic and Regional Studies: "'And Once 
Again the Trumpet Sounds....'"; subtitled "Crimean Triangle"] 
  [Text] Ukrainian airborne forces and Spetsnaz have once 
again landed on the pages of Russian newspapers, and Ukrainian 
armored transport vehicles have been glimpsed on the television 
screens. New crisis in southern Ukraine, new crisis in 
Russian-Ukrainian relations. And no matter that the sources of 
the information--the Crimean administration and the press center 
of the Black Sea Fleet--are all too often regaling us with 
defective news, they are achieving their purposes: The exposures 
have an indistinct ring, and a new image of the enemy--a 
perfidious and aggressive Ukraine encroaching on Russian land, 
Russian property, and Russian honor and glory--is being shaped 
and is strengthening. 
  The psychological preparation of the general consciousness 
for the perception of such a position was manifested distinctly 
at the time of the recent Crimean crisis, when the notion that 
the conflict between Kiev and Simferopol was needed by the 
forces in Ukraine that, playing the "Crimea card," are 
endeavoring to postpone the presidential elections and remain in 
power for as long as possible was prevalent in Russian public 
opinion. 
  An effective version, but improbable, nonetheless. And it is 
not only that practically nowhere in the post-Soviet world that 
has rejected totalitarianism does policy resemble a 
well-calculated chess match but is reminiscent almost everywhere 
of the patching of holes in one part of a caftan by creating 
them in another. The abundance of diverse (but always most 
acute) problems and life's ineradicable trivia physically 
prevent the administration from switching from the level of 
tactical tasks to a higher strategic level. The disruption of 
the traditional patterns of decisionmaking and the malfunction 
in the mechanisms of their realization are more often than not 
permitting the authorities merely to respond in haste to the 
rapidly changing situation. What time does the new elite have 
here for calculated multi-move maneuvers! And Ukraine is no 
exception in this respect. But even were this not the case and 
were Kravchuk's team really attempting to play the "Crimea 
card," it is hard, all the same, to agree that such a pragmatist 
as Kravchuk (and he is undoubtedly in this category of 
politicians) has deliberately moved toward an open conflict with 
Crimea for the sake of preservation of his power and the 
cohesion of his nation. Regardless of his personal affections, 
the president of Ukraine cannot fail to take account of the fact 
that Meshkov is today backed by a majority of the Crimean 
electorate and that the Crimean administration is supported by a 
significant part of the command of the Black Sea Fleet and that, 
given certain circumstances, the entire might and authority of 
the Russian Federation could be behind him. With this alignment 
of forces, Kiev would find itself in an obviously losing 
situation in a confrontation with Simferopol and could not 
realistically hope to win a conflict and retain control of the 
peninsula. 
  In addition, an unpleasant outcome of the Crimean crisis for 
Kiev would threaten a sharp exacerbation of the internal 
political situation. It would inevitably entail an increase in 
the influence of extremist and the radicalization of moderate 
political forces and a growth of the separatist mood in a number 
of southern and eastern oblasts, which is fraught with the 
danger of a split of all of Ukrainian society and could put to 
rest the very idea of an independent unified Ukrainian state 
within its present borders. The example of Georgia, which was 
pulled into a conflict, is all too fresh and graphic for the 
leadership of Ukraine not to draw conclusions from the sorry 
Georgian experience. And it hardly needs to be recalled how 
lamentable is the lot of the presidents of ruined 
countries--power is no joy to them. The risk of such a 
development of events is too great for Kravchuk to attempt to 
hold on to power by provoking a large-scale conflict in Crimea. 
All Kiev's actions are, meanwhile, reminiscent more of attempts 
to curb what could be for itself an unpropitious development of 
events and to return processes on the peninsula to the framework 
of the Ukrainian Constitution. It is essential here to make an 
allowance for the fact that Ukraine has encountered a crisis of 
such a scale for the first time and that the machinery of state, 
which is largely in the grip of old ideas, was hardly prepared 
to respond in skilled and appropriate fashion to this challenge 
ahead of time. 
  On the other hand, it has to be noted that the crisis is to 
the benefit of the forces that have come to power in Crimea, 
inasmuch as only via confrontation can they realize their 
program goals and, if not separate, then, availing themselves of 
the tension, "push" the peninsula as far away from Ukraine as 
possible. In a stable and calm atmosphere, however, they would 
hardly succeed in persuading the authorities of Ukraine to 
renounce its internationally recognized borders and to recognize 
the self-proclaimed republic as a full-fledged subject of 
international relations. 
  A particular danger for peace and security in the region in 
this connection emanates from the attempts of the Crimean 
administration to portray Ukraine in the form of an aggressor 
and to pull Russia into the conflict in order, at a minimum, to 
conduct a further conversation with Kiev with Russia behind its 
back. The appeal of six weeks ago of the Office of the President 
of the Republic of Crimea to Moscow requesting that it stop a 
Ukrainian assault landing in Simferopol that was allegedly under 
way, the present appeals to the news media with reports of the 
arrival on the peninsula of appreciable contingents of Ukrainian 
national guardsmen (not confirmed, for that matter), the 
assurances of Kuznetsov, the Crimean minister of internal 
affairs, of Kiev's intention of transporting to the peninsula 
overnight 60,000 Ukrainian servicemen (the technical feasibility 
of which under the present conditions military experts seriously 
doubt), the disinformation concerning the Ukrainian Spetsnaz's 
storming of the Crimean Ministry of Internal Affairs, and much 
else may be recalled here. Any rash reaction on the part of 
Russia to the calls for help coming from Simferopol would have 
irreversibly transferred the conflict to a new, practically 
uncontrollable level, which, thank God, did not happen. 
  The recent crisis in Crimea has shown that a further 
escalation of tension could result in a serious regional 
conflict, in which there would be no winners. This, by all 
accounts, is clearly understood in Kiev, of which the readiness 
with which the Ukrainian leadership agreed to negotiations with 
Moscow and to consultations with Simferopol may serve as 
evidence. What, then, can be done today for a peaceful 
settlement of the situation that has taken shape in connection 
with Crimea? Efforts should be made first and foremost to 
localize the conflict and prevent its further escalation, and 
Kiev's attempts to resort to simple solutions and put power 
pressure on its opponents would seem to be ineffective in this 
connection. The result could be the direct opposite of that 
expected, especially since the Crimean administration is trying 
to appear the victim of its "northern neighbor" as it is. As the 
experience of other conflicts on the territory of the former 
Soviet Union shows, a balanced, wait-and-see position and a 
shift of the emphases from ideological opposition to the 
economic sphere and the sphere of actual policy could prove more 
productive at this phase of development of the crisis situation. 
  And recent information testifies that Kiev is opting for 
this 
path in relations with Simferopol. Inasmuch as the military are 
frequently an independent force in zones of ethno-political 
tension and conflicts, a lowering of the level of confrontation 
and the further resolution of the conflict will depend to a 
large extent on the surmounting of the uncertainty of the status 
of the units and subunits of the Black Sea Fleet stationed on 
the peninsula and in the south of the Ukrainian mainland. Having 
agreed with Kazakhstan on the leasing of Baykonur and having 
found mutual understanding with Latvia on the use on the 
radar-tracking station in Skrunda, Russia simply cannot share 
the naval legacy of the USSR with Ukraine by laying claim to the 
infrastructure even in Izmail, which is remote from the Russian 
Federation. The result would be the spread of tension not only 
at the locations where the Black Sea Fleet is based on the 
peninsula, but also in practically all the Black Sea ports of 
Ukraine. I would like to hope that the continuation of 
negotiations on a division of the Black Sea Fleet and its 
infrastructure begun by the prime ministers of the two countries 
will reduce the danger of the involvement of regulation military 
units in the confrontation. Special attention should be paid 
simultaneously to the prevention of the interference in the 
conflict of extremist formations--illegal groups of militants of 
political movements, Cossacks, and volunteers. 
  Considering Russia's special role in this region, it would 
be 
no great exaggeration to say that Moscow bears the 
responsibility at this time for the further development of 
events. And its mission in the localization and minimization of 
the conflict could be, despite the pressure of the imperial 
opposition and despite the emotional pressure of Crimea, to 
prevent itself from becoming involved in a direct confrontation 
with Ukraine, to remain within the framework of international 
and bilateral agreements, and, in the event of an appeal by the 
interested parties, to make every effort for the development of 
dialogue between Simferopol and Kiev. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47123 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   8 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> INTERSTATE AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     Commentary on Concurrent Baltic Ties to Both West, Russia </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Commentary on Concurrent Baltic Ties to Both West, Russia </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944Q0421A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 8 Jun 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0421A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Marina Kalashnikova: "The Baltic Paradox: While </F>
Trying To Put an End to the Common Past, the Baltic Countries 
Are Doing All They Can for a Common Future with Russia"] 
  [Text] At first glance, the Baltic States can serve as a 
model of Russia's "civilized divorce" from the USSR's former 
republics. Their relations are developing based on the 
"European" (negotiation) type. The Baltic version seems to be 
the most predictable and the least disastrous. Therefore, it is 
making it possible to delve calmly into the intertwining of 
those problems which must be solved by Russia and the West in 
the search for new principles of foreign policy and European 
security. 
  However, as the English proverb goes, "it takes two to make 
love or war." A divorce becomes civilized if both parties 
observe agreed-upon and generally accepted rules of behavior. In 
this sense, Russia has moved ahead much farther on the path to 
compatibility with the world community. It has already withdrawn 
or is withdrawing from the Baltic countries troops which may not 
be on the territory of another state against its will. 
  In the area of economics, Russia is also offering the Baltic 
States good relations. Latvia has been granted most favored 
nation status. The transit of Russian freight and the proximity 
of the Russian financial market are ensuring, to a great extent, 
the prosperity of the former republics: Latvia is laying claim 
to the role of the "Baltic Switzerland," while Estonia is 
claiming that of the "Baltic Hong Kong." 
  Russia has even met the Baltic States halfway in moral 
questions. In particular, agreement has been expressed with the 
Latvian side in the condemnation of the 1940 occupation and the 
postwar repressions. 
  Russia has covered its half of the path to a "civilized 
divorce," having given up much and having lost much. The Baltic 
Republics have succeeded greatly in their economic and political 
"jump" toward the West: a program has been outlined, along with 
time frames, for their gradual integration into the European 
economic system and their insertion into the security structures 
is also proceeding at a gradual pace. 
  But the ticket to Europe has been issued to these countries, 
it seems, prematurely. The Baltic States have quite a few 
unhealthy "small problems" capable of becoming the source of a 
threat to security in the post-confrontation era. Building up in 
the region is the potential for internal instability engendered 
by ethnic confrontation, political extremism, economic jerks and 
innovations, to which society is unable to adapt. Not precluded 
is the threat of a local military conflict. The "Baltic 
Perimeter" of Russia's borders, so safe at first glace, is not 
without danger for Europe. 
  From the standpoint of culture and civilization, the Baltic 
States have always been drawn toward the West and and it is in 
this sense that their current "departure" has taken place. 
Undoubtedly, the "pieces of the historical past" left in them 
(the Russian-speaking population and the economic and military 
infrastructures) and the geopolitical situation are still 
keeping them within Russia's gravitational field. The Baltic 
dualism, which, in individual matters, is changing into acute 
incompatibility, is expanding the "dispute" area for possible 
collisions between Russia and the West. 
  The chief danger lies in the fact that the Baltic countries 
are rushing into Europe without being sufficiently "European." 
First of all, they will hardly be able to fit the image of a 
European state by subjecting the Russian-speaking population to 
discrimination. In Latvia and Estonia, these people are viewed 
as "colonists" and have been deprived of citizenship or have had 
their civil rights infringed upon. The local parties' approaches 
to the solution of this problem are often of a destructive 
nature -- from proposals which bring to mind associations with 
genocide and ethnic cleansing to "civilized segregation" in the 
spirit of the declarations of Estonian President Lennert Meri 
that "the rights of citizens and non-citizens will be 
protected." However, this assumes the preservation of the 
division of Estonia's population into first-class and 
second-class citizens. That The Baltic States are not mature 
enough for a "civilized divorce" from Russia and a final 
"attachment" to the West is also becoming apparent in the 
territorial claims against Russia, which Estonia is raising 
especially importunately and which manifestly look like a 
political anachronism. 
  This is the kind of baggage the Baltic countries are 
bringing 
with them into a united Europe and inserting into its security 
structures, having already become associate members of the 
Western European Union and participants in the "Partnership for 
Peace" and hoping to find themselves in NATO in the near future. 
The independent Baltic States, it seems, do not fully realize 
the responsibility which indepence imposes on then. The 
excessive aggressiveness with which the Baltic countries are 
trying to become members of NATO or to obtain guarantees of 
Western military assistance is threatening to make this region a 
middleman in the aggravation of relations between Russia and the 
West. 
  For the time being, Russia is bearing with restraint the 
multilateral damage which the departure of the Baltic republics 
is inflicting on it. It has been deprived of many bases and has 
lost important parts of the PRO and PVO [ABM and Air Defense] 
systems. Serious and costly restructuring of the entire 
strategic military infrastructure of Russia's western oblasts, 
which were formerly rear-area oblasts and have now turned out to 
be forward-area oblasts, is needed. The communications system 
with Kaliningrad Oblast has been undermined. 
  Russia's geostrategic losses are measured not simply by the 
loss of its position in the Baltic region. Within the framework 
of NATO, a special "Baltap" command has been established, the 
area of responsibility of which has been declared to be the 
entire Baltic Sea, right up to the Gulf of Finland and the Gulf 
of Bothnia. Its everyday tasks include the development of all 
types of cooperation in the region -- between NATO and Western 
Europe, on the one hand, and the former socialist countries, 
including Russia and and the Baltic States, on the other. 
However, it can take upon itself the function of protection of 
the Baltic States from an aggressor -- Russia, although, within 
Baltap, it is considered a highly unlikely one. 
  By exaggerating fears about Russia's "imperial ambitions" 
and 
hurrying too rapidly into NATO, the Baltic States are provoking 
feelings of heightened vulnerability in Russian military and 
political circles. The prospect of turning out to be on one of 
NATO's flanks, irrespective of the conditions of Russia's own 
participation in the "Partnership for Peace," may stimulate in 
them a desire to take preventive measures. 
  We have before us the "Baltic Paradox": while trying in 
every 
way possible to sever the bonds of the past, Latvia and Estonia 
are doing all they can to strengthen a common future with 
Russia. Not having solved the problem of citizenship and thereby 
leaving within themselves a "Russian Enclave," they are 
postponing their own prospects for becoming the "far abroad" and 
are preserving for Russia the right to keep them within the 
focus of its own "near" interests. The territorial claims and 
the ardor for NATO are creating the impression that it is 
advantageous for the Baltic countries to maintain a smoldering 
and controllable tension in relations with Russia. But it is 
hardly effective as a "trump card for bargaining" with Russia 
and the West. If this is a method of national identification, 
then it is too dangerous. In striving for a "civilized divorce," 
the Baltic States are proving to be insufficiently "civilized" 
for it. While parting with Russia, the Baltic States are still 
not ready to join Europe. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47124 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC &amp; SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Rail Transport Information Processing Plans Viewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Rail Transport Information Processing Plans Viewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0903A Moscow ZHELEZNODOROZHNYY TRANSPORT in Russian No 
3, Mar 94 pp 2-5 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0903A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ZHELEZNODOROZHNYY TRANSPORT </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by S.F. Potapchenko, director of the SET </F>
limited-liability partnership: "Computerized Information Data 
Processing at the Service of Transport"] 
  [Text] In order to unite the railroads' efforts to 
accelerate informatization and develop the infrastructure for 
computerized information data processing and the area of data 
processing services, the Association for Practical Cooperation 
in the Area of Establishing, Developing and Operating 
Computerized Systems in Rail Transport (the SET Association) was 
established at the beginning of 1991. Its tasks included the 
practical development of long-range standard planning decisions 
for computerized systems, the improvement of servicing systems 
for computers and peripheral equipment, the exchange of 
experience in incorporating standard developments, and the study 
of the world's computer market. With the assistance of the SET 
Association, the railroads received an opportunity to conduct an 
antimonopoly policy with respect to the producers of computer 
equipment and the developers of computerized systems. This is 
being achieved by analyzing the competing proposals of computer 
suppliers and organizations of experts and alternative research 
and development of computerized system hardware. 
  In 1992, the SET Association was converted into a 
limited-liability partnership called "Contemporary Electronic 
Technology in Transport" (TOO SET). A total of 24 railroads 
(eight of them railroads in the countries of the near abroad), 
three scientific and engineering centers, and three enterprises 
servicing computer equipment were among the founders. 
  A general meeting of representatives from the founding 
railroads elected a Council of Empowered Delegates to manage TOO 
SET activities. Within the TOO SET framework, this body 
implements technical policy in the area of establishing, 
incorporating, and expanding computerized systems in rail 
transport, which the Russian Federation Ministry of Railways has 
developed. 
  TOO SET functions as an independent juridical person with 
complete self-financing. The profit received from providing 
services (basically from shipments of computer equipment) is 
directed toward the fund for expanding production and the 
special funds formed for designing computer equipment for rail 
transport. There have been definite successes in this, which 
must be mentioned. 
  The development of a technology for transmitting operational 
information to the computer network of a line enterprise having 
remote installations, yards, stations, loading and unloading 
frontages, sections, and approach lines with the help of 
portable information recorders occupies the central place. The 
solution of this technical problem will permit one to obtain not 
only the complete work technology of the stations and sections, 
but also the planned effectiveness from incorporating electronic 
document turnover. TOO SET is developing a portable information 
recorder based on using the experience of the VNIIZhT [All-Union 
Scientific Research Institute of Railroad Transport] and the 
Scientific Research Institute for Railroad Automation. The need 
to supplement train and freight information in non-regular 
situations arises even with the availability of automatic 
information output. In addition, global automation for reading 
information is not always economically advisable and requires 
that it be combined with less expensive technical solutions at 
installations with negligible work volumes. The use of a 
portable information recorder will permit one to monitor the 
authenticity of information directly when performing freight and 
commercial operations and to correct a mistake on the spot when 
necessary. 
  The technical specifications for the portable information 
recorder provide for connecting the device to the Transport 
series radio station and also to intra-station wire 
communications when possible. Standardization of design, which 
allows for the possibility of an electric power source, both 
from the radio station, using a convenience outlet, and from an 
independent power source, using a plug-in unit, is provided for. 
The portable recorder can be used by the freight car data 
collector and inspector during the commercial inspection of the 
rail cars at the checking point, container site, and permanent 
way division sections. For this, the personal computer for the 
radio channel or wire communications channel automatically 
installs the program for processing the information units that 
is appropriate for this operation in the information recorder 
when the user of the recorder plugs into the "type of 
information." A sufficiently voluminous indication area permits 
the portable information recorder operator to carry on a 
dialogue with the PEVM [stationary computer], receiving 
management and reference information from it in order to 
eliminate detected errors. 
  The design of the portable information recorder permits one 
to use it under difficult climatic conditions having a large 
range of unfavorable temperatures and humidity; the luminescent 
display insures operations when there is insufficient 
illumination. At the present time, work on the design plans and 
specifications for the portable information recorder is being 
done. Trial operation and introduction are planned during the 
first quarter of 1994 at installations of the Gorkiy Railroad. 
Series production will begin in 1994. 
  The subject second in importance within TOO SET plans is the 
development of a standard multi-task and multi-terminal computer 
complex based on the PEVM for the line enterprises of the 
railroads. This development will permit one to reduce the 
resulting cost of one automated worker position (ARM) by a 
factor of 2.5 to three, in comparison with the version that 
embodies a computer for individual use at each work position. 
This complex should be responsive to the peculiarities of the 
technical processes in processing train and freight information 
at stations, depots, and other line enterprises, and those 
involved in bookkeeping and accounting at the machine 
calculating stations of the railroad divisions. These 
peculiarities are characterized by standardized document forms, 
a regulated sequence of events and operations, and the presence 
of a common data base concentrated in one computer. Technical 
solutions that permit one to combine imported personal computers 
with domestic display stations and telecommunications controlled 
by base software that is a domestic product are being found and 
tested. 
  In order to add the multi-task and multi-terminal computer 
complexes to the unified network for transmitting ASUZhT 
[automated control system for rail transport] data, the base 
software includes a network component that permits the user to 
describe the protocols of the local and global networks, within 
which it is planned to use these complexes. 
  The widespread use of these computer complexes in rail 
transport will not only permit capital investments in the 
development of automated systems to be used more fully. They are 
completely necessary to re-equip systems preparing data for the 
information and computer centers of the railroads, the machine 
calculating stations of the railroad divisions, and the 
accounting groups in the locomotive depots, locomotive and 
railcar repair plants, material warehouses, and worker supply 
departments. With the massive shift to personal computers, 
industry has stopped producing such data preparation systems as 
the SPD-9000 and YeS-9003 (9005), which are used a great deal on 
railroad networks but which are outdated. 
  When beginning the development of standard multi-task and 
multi-terminal computer complexes, TOO SET counted primarily on 
the machine calculating stations of the railroad divisions; 
however, during the work, in which specialists from the 
Kuybyshev and Gorkiy IVTs [information and computer centers] and 
the MIIT [Moscow Railroad Transport Engineers Institute] 
actively participated, standardized solutions, which permit the 
computer complexes to be adapted to a whole number of 
technological processes involving the massive preparation of 
information even in other enterprises, are being found. At the 
present time, test models of multi-task and multi-terminal 
computer complexes have been delivered to the Kemerovo, 
Kuybyshev, Krasnoyarsk, and West Siberian Railroads. 
  At the initiative of TOO SET, the development of a standard 
system for automating the processes for processing information 
at freight stations is being carried out. The project is being 
worked on using share financing by TOO SET and the railroads. 
The experience from incorporating similar systems at freight 
stations and container sites is being considered during the 
development of the project. The basic difference from previously 
completed work is the completeness of the technological 
processes and the complete inclusion of all categories of 
workers participating in the planning of freight operations, the 
drawing up of transportation documents, and the carrying out of 
station accounting. In addition, the system provides an 
opportunity through automation to combine professions, expand 
service zones, and minimize the volume of information processed 
at work positions. The system provides a "friendly" interface 
for users with the computer and achieves the maximum clarity of 
the current situation at the stations. 
  The system is based on personal computers operating in the 
network multi-terminal mode. This makes for a low equipment cost 
in comparison with similar systems and is oriented toward 
stations with a small rail car turnover (up to 500-600 rail cars 
a day). TOO SET developments with respect to the portable 
information recorder and the multi-terminal computer complexes 
will find application in the most concentrated form. At the 
present time, the technical specifications for a standard 
automated system and a detail design are being developed. 
Introduction will take place during 1994 on the Gorkiy Railroad. 
  Within the TOO SET framework, a commercial computer network 
for rail transport (SKIT) has been established, is functioning 
and is being expanded. It provides for compiling and allocating 
information on the supply and demand for deliveries of 
production items, consumer goods, and agricultural products, and 
for supplying various types of services and other types of 
commercial activity to regional centers and network subscriber 
points. 
  Since the SKIT computer network is mated with the RIKO 
[expansion not given] network, it has available on a daily cycle 
more than 5,000 urgent requests from more than 60 regions of the 
former USSR. The SKIT computer network has nine regional 
centers, which are based on the information and computer centers 
of the railroads. This permits one to give supply-demand 
information to the material and technical supply and worker 
supply agencies of the railroads, and creates favorable 
conditions for their rooting in the market through the 
establishment of their own subscriber points in the regional 
stock exchanges, trading houses, brokerage offices, and large 
enterprises in the region. 
  In addition, the establishment of regional SKIT centers on 
the railroads provides an opportunity to obtain income from 
subsidiary and auxiliary activity, consisting of information 
servicing of the newly established non-transport user subscriber 
points. For these purposes, contracts can be concluded with 
enterprises in the regions to establish and operate subscriber 
points in the SKIT network and to rent underutilized computer 
resources and communications channels. The next general meeting 
of TOO SET founders will define ways to expand further. 
  Relying on cooperation with the railroads and scientific and 
engineering centers with respect to the development and 
production of computer equipment and coordinating plans for the 
development and incorporation of automated systems with the 
Russian Federation Ministry of Railways, TOO SET, besides 
standard work in the area of transport computerized information 
data processing, delivers computer equipment and accessory and 
operating materials at the requests of the railroads. In 1993, 
the volume of such equipment deliveries to the railroads 
exceeded R200 million for a products list of more than 40 
positions. 
  When organizing deliveries, the capabilities of the regions 
are considered, and special research is conducted to evaluate 
the reliability level of the equipment being acquired, prices 
and the conditions for warranty servicing. The results of the 
cooperation with the suppliers and producers of computer 
equipment for actual transport needs are discussed during 
seminars of specialists from the information and computer 
centers of the railroads. Information bulletins, which help the 
railroads orient themselves in the computer market, are 
published on a regular basis. 
  During the three years of the existence first of the 
association, and then of TOO SET, dependable partner contacts 
have been established with the suppliers and producers of 
computer equipment, and work has begun on establishing its own 
servicing service for the maintenance of computers. At the same 
time, it has failed to use all existing capabilities for the 
fuller satisfaction of the railroads' requirements for computer 
equipment and the expansion of computerized systems. Several 
reasons are not permitting this work to be conducted more 
actively. First, we have still not managed to establish special 
funds in the amount required to finance standard works. Second, 
from the time of the establishment of the SET Association, the 
charter fund was not indexed, and it acquired a purely symbolic 
value with inflation. Third, TOO SET does not have its own 
material and technical base--production premises, equipment and 
transport for expanding its own production. That is why the 
increase in work volumes takes place dependent on financial 
capabilities. 
  According to its status, TOO SET is related to enterprises 
engaged in commercial activity. At the same time, the TOO SET 
general meeting of founders and the Council of Empowered 
Delegates have established a number of limitations on economic 
activity that are used in state enterprises. 
  The production expansion fund and the special funds are 
expended for standard designing of computerized systems for the 
railroads' line enterprises. Using its own assets, TOO SET 
performs expert research, conducts conferences and network 
seminars, and publishes information bulletins. The mechanism for 
controlling TOO SET activity, the cooperation in carrying out 
the programs on an interested and mutually beneficial basis, and 
the established mutual settlement procedure put TOO SET 
completely under the control of the railroads. In turn, this has 
allowed for the avoidance of instances of failure to meet 
obligations for a long time. This has determined the railroads' 
trust in the measures being conducted within the TOO SET 
framework. 
  TOO SET is forming special-purpose funds for carrying out 
NIOKR [research and scientific work] from its own production 
expansion fund and the payments of the railroads participating 
in the share financing on matters that are of interest for this 
or that participant. The scientific item that is created through 
this fund becomes the property of the participants in the share 
financing. The sale of the produced scientific item to the 
railroad network is done at contract prices that support the 
planned level of profitability, including the replacement of the 
payments of the participants in the share financing together 
with a percentage of the profit from the sale of the scientific 
item in proportion to the percentage contributed to the 
special-purpose fund. Under these conditions, an item that 
enjoys demand on the railroads "survives" and quickly pays for 
itself. It becomes economically beneficial for the railroads to 
finance such research and development work. 
  Besides the NIOKR plan, however, the railroads' capabilities 
to finance a TOO SET subject are extremely limited, and this 
slows the rate of research and development. If the railroads and 
the Russian Federation Ministry of Railways, as well as the 
management boards of the railroads in the other countries of the 
former USSR, supported TOO SET initiatives more actively, 
everyone would win from this. Having extremely limited financing 
capabilities, TOO SET can select only a subject that does not 
require the investment of large assets and has an easily 
realizable technical solution and also evident effectiveness in 
its use. 
  At the present time, TOO SET is mobilizing all its existing 
resources so that work to incorporate new equipment on the 
railroads will become the basis for its activity during 1994. 
What is this intention built upon? First, on the correctness of 
the fundamental design selection, confirmed by world and 
domestic experience. Second, the confidence that transport 
science should not be locked into its own research and 
development. TOO SET is involving new creative collectives, 
which previously did not have any experience in participating in 
the solving of transport problems, in its subject matter. Here 
there are costs connected with the need to adapt to rail 
transport's specific conditions. However, the novelty of a 
design solution, which is not connected with a certain 
stereotype of thinking, is worth this. Third, on the conviction 
that a mechanism for financing NIOKR on a repayable basis will 
find application with time and that the principle of cost 
recovery will also be expanded to that portion of the NIOKR 
subject plan controlled by the Russian Federation Ministry of 
Railways which concerns research work undertaken at the 
initiative of the railroads. Fourth, on the hope that the 
urgency of the selected subject will be evaluated at its true 
worth and attract the attention and support of the railroads. 
  A similar situation is taking shape with the financing of 
capital investments in the development of computerized systems. 
Of the assets that have been allocated by railroads to the 
acquisition of computer equipment, from 5 to 40 percent are 
being assimilated within the TOO SET framework. The presence of 
numerous sources for the receipt of computer equipment and, in a 
number of cases, insufficiently qualified decisions in selecting 
suppliers, accessories, and delivery conditions are leading to a 
situation where equipment that is manufactured according to 
different standards and using a different element base is 
arriving in the railroad system. This is hindering the operating 
process and causes complications when expanding computerized 
systems. In addition, this situation does not permit one to 
conclude long-term contracts that are beneficial in a commercial 
respect; opportunities for selecting among competitive proposals 
of producers and suppliers of computer equipment are not being 
used; and complications arise with the delivery and safe-keeping 
of the delivered computer equipment and with the conducting of 
reclamation work during the warranty period. 
  TOO SET has definite experience in the area of delivering 
personal computers, peripheral and telecommunications equipment, 
and operating materials; however, it does not have the 
capability of using it fully, due to a shortage of working 
capital. It seems that this experience should be used more 
fully, especially when the struggle for large buyers is 
intensifying in the world's computer market. TOO SET can ensure 
beneficial delivery conditions--the more so since, when working 
with foreign firms, the delivery of computer equipment takes 
place according to contract prices, and TOO SET services are 
paid for in accordance with the delivery and at rates regulated 
by the Council of Empowered Delegates. 
  One cannot fail to point out also the opportunities which 
TOO 
SET has for organizing deliveries of computers in accordance 
with bank credits. Today, the practice of partial prepayment has 
already been introduced in TOO SET. This was done considering 
actual conditions where the railroads cannot accumulate within a 
short time significant payment assets for the purchase of large 
batches of computers. Naturally, it is unprofitable for the 
supplying firms to import unpaid-for batches of computers at 
their own risk. However, it is necessary to fight for a big 
customer. If the goods arrive at the moment of final settlement, 
the firm takes steps to accelerate the delivery periods and 
toughens the sanctions addressed to the customer for the delay 
in payments. 
  Under such conditions, the requirement for bank credit to 
purchase large batches of computers is reduced twofold. If one 
considers that the interest payment for short-term credit is 
compensated for by losses of working capital from inflation, the 
trade discount for consolidating batches of purchased computers 
makes the alternative of purchases for bank credit and partial 
prepayment profitable. With the availability of guarantors in 
the person of the railroads, the bank is prepared to offer TOO 
SET short-term credit. 
  Besides organizing deliveries of imported computer equipment 
to the railroads, TOO SET carefully studies the state of affairs 
with new works and the putting of domestic computer equipment 
into production in Russia and the CIS. For this purpose, 
cooperation with the Elektronmash Association, which is one of 
the TOO SET founders, is organized. Work is being performed with 
a whole range of scientific centers to develop computer 
equipment and with manufacturing plants. 
  The railroads of neighboring states in the near abroad--the 
Southwest, Lvov, Odessa, Latvian, Transcaucasian, Azerbaijan, 
Central Asian, and Tselina--are TOO SET founders. Their interest 
in participating in TOO SET measures is based upon a desire to 
use the standard designs for computerized systems that are being 
used on Russia's railroads. Within the framework of its 
activity, TOO SET has the capability of assisting them in this 
direction. Without having a clear branch program for automation, 
however, it does not seem possible to propose a form of 
interested participation in the work to them and provide them 
with the necessary recommendations. Existing programs contain 
the traditional subject matter, NIOKR amounts, and the periods 
for introducing them into the leading installations, and can be 
carried out only with clear financial support. This is difficult 
to do under present conditions. 
  The attempt to formulate its own program within the TOO SET 
framework has not been crowned with success. It is evident that 
only the Russian Federation Ministry of Railways can assume this 
work, involving qualified scientific collectives in the 
development of automation programs. TOO SET would like for a 
link between the level of automation, the capital investments to 
achieve the given level of automation, and the effectiveness 
obtained to be established as a result of this research. Having 
such recommendations, the railroads would be able to invest more 
soundly in information science considering the peculiarities of 
operating work, the extent of the avenues' equipment, financial 
situation, and so on. 
  A general meeting of TOO SET founders will sum up the work 
results for the first three years of activity. A third technical 
conference will also be held during the second half of the year. 
TOO SET would like the founders to firm up their plans for 
participation in TOO SET measures during the preparations for 
the conference and provide interesting recommendations for the 
subject plan based on their experiences. TOO SET also hopes that 
the Russian Federation Ministry of Railways and the management 
boards of the railroads in neighboring states, on their part, 
will suggest ways to expand cooperation in the area of rail 
transport information science. 
  COPYRIGHT: "Zheleznodorozhnyy transport," 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47125 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC &amp; SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Macroeconomic Indicators for January-April 1994 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Macroeconomic Indicators for January-April 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0928A Moscow EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN in Russian No 22, May 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0928A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article based on Russian Goskomstat Materials: "Will They </F>
Help To Take Us Away From the Brink of the Abyss?] 
  [Text] The economic crisis is not dying away. The 
materials of Russian Goskomstat are convincing indication of 
this. At the end of May, the President of Russia passed a group 
of edicts for a true breakthrough in the critical situation. 
<H5>  Macroeconomic Indicators </H5>
  The basic indicators characterizing the January-April 1994 
results are presented below: 


                  January-April    In % of corresponding   April    Reference. 
                  1994             period in 1993          1994     January-April 1993 
                                                           in %     in % of 
                                                           of       January-April 1992 
                                                           March 
                                                           1994 

Economic 
Indicators 

Gross domestic    142              83 
product -- trln 
rubles 

Industrial        77               74.6        73.1        93       81.4 
output volume 
-- trln rub. 

Retail            52.8             102         103         100      109 
commodity 
turnover -- 
total[.sup]1[/] 
-- trln rub. 

Including for     29.5             99          102         98       106 
officially 
registered 
trade 
enterprises 

Volume of paid    6.6              53          54          91       82 
services -- 
total[.sup]1[/] 
-- trln rub. 

Including for     4.2              50          55          91       81 
officially 
registered 
enterprises of 
the service 
sphere 

Export -- bln     12.5             106         109         98       104 
U.S. dollars 

Import -- bln     5.6              77          78          102      61 
U.S. dollars 

Index of          167[.sup]3[/]     7.1-fold    6.1-fold    110      9.7-fold 
producer prices 
for industrial 
output 

Social 
Indicators 

Real available                     112 
monetary 
incomes 

Amount of         15.9[.sup]2[/]    54          42          96 
population with 
incomes below 
subsistence 
minimum -- mln 
persons 

In % of entire    10.7 
population 

Average wage --   175[.sup]2[/]     7-fold      5.7-fold    106      10.2-fold[.sup]4[/] 
thous. rub. 

Operative index   159 [.sup]3[/] 
of consumer 
prices for 
goods and 
services 


<H5>  Production of Gross Domestic Product </H5>
  The gross domestic product, characterizing the value of 
goods 
and services produced by all sectors of the national economy and 
intended for ultimate consumption, accumulation and export, in 
the four months of this year, was 142 trillion rubles [R]. Goods 
and services hold approximately equal shares of its volume, and 
about 7 percent -- net (less state subsidies) taxes on products, 
and on imports to which added-value tax, excise and import 
duties apply. 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |Trln rub.         |In % of total     |Reference: 1993 i-| 
|                  |                  |                  |n % of total      | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Gross domestic pr-|142               |100               |100               | 
|oduct             |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|including: commod-|63.3              |44.6              |49                | 
|ity production    |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|service production|69.2              |48.7              |42                | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|net taxes on prod-|9.5               |6.7               |9                 | 
|ucts and imports  |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  The proportion of services in the structure of the GDP 
continues to increase, and the relative proportion of net taxes 
on products and imports continues to decrease. In the 1st 
quarter they constituted respectively 47.8 percent and 8 percent. 
  On the whole for January-April of this year, the decrease in 
the gross domestic product was 17 percent. The drop was caused 
by a further cut in output, work and services in the physical 
production sectors. 
  The composite price index (GDP index-deflator) in 
January-April of this year was 705 percent as compared to the 
January-April 1993 level. 
<H5>  Industry </H5>
  In January-April of this year, Russian industry produced 
goods worth R77 trillion at existing prices, including R21 
trillion worth in April. The physical production volume, as 
compared with January-April last year, decreased by 25.4 
percent, including a 26.9 percent decrease in April (in 
January-April 1993, it decreased by 18.6 percent, including a 
16.4 percent decrease in April). 
  The average daily output in April of this year, as compared 
with the same month last year, decreased by 25.2 percent, and as 
compared with March of this year -- by 3.3 percent. 
  The dynamics of industrial products output by months of 
1992-1994 can be seen from the following graph: 

<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-066-22A>      (in percent of the corresponding month of 1991) </FIG>


  The production volume decreased to the greatest extent in 
the 
sectors producing primarily goods for investment purposes and 
non-food consumer goods. For example, while in the fuel-energy 
sectors the output of goods, during the period of the year that 
had elapsed, decreased by 11 percent, and of the food industry 
-- by 21 percent, in machine building the decrease was 45 
percent, in chemicals and petrochemicals -- by 35 percent, the 
timber, woodworking and pulp-and-paper industry and industrial 
building materials -- by 32 percent and in the light industry 
sector -- by 39 percent. 
  The number of enterprises having prolonged shutdowns of all 
or some production facilities increased. While in January of 
this year they numbered 3,800, in April there were over 5,000. 
The main reason for the shutdowns were difficulties in selling 
the products because of the consumers' inability to pay. 
  In January-April 1994, of the 406 most important types of 
products, recorded in urgent returns, the production volume, as 
compared with January-April 1993: 
  Increased for 24 items (including iron-ore pellets, coking 
equipment, cash registers, sulfur, parquetry, ceramic floor 
tiles, cotton fabric, freezers, mayonnaise, sausage items, 
cheese and brynza [sheep-milk cheese], live and salted fish, 
cognac, toothpaste), or 6 percent of the total number; 
  Decreased for 377 items, or 93 percent of the total number. 
In this case, the output of 283 items (70 percent of the total 
number) decreased by one-fourth and over, among them: 
lubricating oil, rolled sheet metal, roll-formed steel, steel 
pipes, steam, gas and hydraulic turbines, diesels and 
diesel-generators, freight and passenger railcars, city 
telephone communication cables, metal cutting machine tools, 
press-forging machines, trolleybuses, tractors, rolling 
bearings, mineral fertilizers, pesticides, synthetic dyes, 
synthetic resins and plastics, chemical fibers and filaments, 
synthetic rubbers, motor vehicle tires, lumber, wood-fiber and 
wood-chip boards, cardboard, cement, prefabricated reinforced 
concrete structures, wall materials, asbestos board, asbestos, 
ceramic plumbing items, fabric of all types except cotton, 
hosiery items, knitted outer wear, garment items, footwear, 
sewing and washing machines, electric vacuum cleaners, tape 
recorders, radio-receiving devices, television sets, cereal and 
macaroni items. 
  No computer or computer-control complexes, cutters, shunting 
or industrial diesel locomotives, scrapers or harvesters were 
produced in the elapsed period of the year. 
<H5>  Standard of Living </H5>
  Income of the population. The monetary income of 
the population in January-April of this year amounted to R78 
trillion and was 8.5-fold higher than in the corresponding 
period of 1993. 
  The available monetary income (income less compulsory 
payments), based on the consumer price index, rose by 
approximately 12 percent. 
  In April 1993, 26 percent of the population had average per 
capita monetary incomes of up to R10,000 a month, 40 percent -- 
from R10,000-R20,000, 27 percent -- from R20,000 to R40,000 and 
7 percent -- over R40,000. 
  The coefficient of concentration of incomes (Dow Jones 
index) 
in April 1994 was 0.311 (in April 1993 -- 0.353). 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Distribution of Total Volume of Monetary Income by Population Groups (in p-| 
|ercent)                                                                    | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |April                                                   | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |1992              |1993              |1994              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|All monetary inco-|100               |100               |100               | 
|mes of the popula-|                  |                  |                  | 
|tion              |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|including groups of the population (20% each)                              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|first (with lowes-|10.6              |6.8               |7.8               | 
|t incomes)        |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|second            |15.3              |11.6              |12.7              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|third             |19.2              |16.4              |17.3              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|fourth            |23.8              |23.2              |23.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|fifth (with highe-|31.1              |42.0              |38.8              | 
|st incomes)       |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  The mass of monetary income of the fifth group of the 
population exceeded the mass of monetary income of the first 
group in April 1992 by a factor of 2.9, 1993 -- by a factor of 
6.2 and 1994 -- a factor of 5. 
  The change in amount of the subsistence minimum for the 
population of the Russian Federation in 1994 (determined in 
accordance with the methodology of the Russian Ministry of 
Labor) is shown in the following table (on the average -- thous. 
rubles per month): 


---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|              |              |including                                   | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|              |Entire popula-|Fit for work  |Pensioners    |Children      | 
|              |tion          |              |              |              | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|January       |47.2          |53.1          |33.3          |47.7          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|February      |54.8          |61.6          |38.6          |55.3          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|March         |60.4          |67.9          |42.6          |61.0          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|April         |66.5          |74.8          |46.9          |67.2          | 
---------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  The incomes of 11 percent of the population (16 million 
persons) in April 1994 were below the subsistence minimum, 
including the incomes of 3 percent of the population not 
reaching the produce "basket" value, which, in estimating the 
subsistence minimum, was R45,400. 
  According to the estimate, the average wage put down for 
workers, on the whole for Russia in April of this year, was 
R175,000, and rose by 6 percent as compared with March of this 
year and by a factor of 1.3 as compared with January. 
  The monthly increase in wages in March of this year in the 
sectors of the material sphere was 15 percent, nonproduction -- 
11 percent. 
  The amount of social payments and benefits in March of this 
year, calculated per worker, was R14,700, and increased by a 
factor of 1.5 as compared with February. The highest payments of 
a social nature were for extending credit and insurance -- 
R105,100, material-technical supply and sales -- R47,200. At 
public health and education institutions, they were respectively 
R6,900 and R7,400, calculated per worker. 
  The consumer basket. The value of the "basket" 
made up of the 19 basic food products at the end of April was 
R47,600 estimated for the month. During the month it rose by 7.5 
percent, and since the beginning of the year -- by 55 percent. 
The differentiation in the value of the basket for individual 
regions in April was 4.5-fold. The minimum value of the basket 
was recorded at Ulyanovsk (R28,700), and the maximum -- in 
Magadan (R128,400). In Moscow and St. Petersburg, its value in 
April was respectively R52,500 and R49,800. 
  Employment. The number of unemployed in the 
Russian Federation at the end of April was 4.5 million people, 
or 6.0 percent of the economically active population. They 
included about 1.2 million people with the official status of 
unemployed in the state employment agencies (1.5 percent of the 
economically active population). In addition, the number of 
persons forced into partial work-week conditions and on leave 
without pay or with partial pay was estimated at 4.5 million 
people. 
  Therefore, in April of this year, the total potential of 
unemployed was 9.0 million people (in March of this year -- 8.8 
million people). 
Footnotes 
  1. Data on the volume of sales of consumer goods and 
services 
to the population are presented on the basis of an expert 
evaluation of the volumes of sale at unregistered enterprises, 
and also on the basis of unorganized import and sale of consumer 
goods by private persons. 
  2. April 1994. 
  3. April 1994 as compared to December 1993. 
  4. April 1993 (in % of April 1992). 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47126 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   25 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC &amp; SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   DELOVOY MIR Economic Statistics, 25 May </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    DELOVOY MIR Economic Statistics, 25 May </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0902A Moscow DELOVOY MIR in Russian 25 May 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0902A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow DELOVOY MIR </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report on the Russian Federation economic statistics, by </F>
Valeriy Galitskiy, Aris Zakharov, and Aleksandr Frenkel, the 
Russian State Committee on Statistics: "Production Output and 
Price Dynamics as of 17 May"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Prices for Consumer Goods and Services </H5>
  Over the period from 10 to 17 May 1994 prices for 
consumer goods and services rose at a faster rate than over the 
preceding weeks--by 2.5 percent, including for foodstuffs and 
nonfood items--by 2.3 percent, and for-fee services for the 
population--by 4.7 percent. 
  The highest rate of increases in food prices were registered 
in the Urals region (5.2 percent), and the lowest in the 
Northwestern and East Siberian regions (1.3 percent). Increases 
in prices for nonfood items ranged from 1 percent in the 
Northwestern region to 2.6 percent in the Urals region. The cost 
of for-fee services for the population went up by more than 5 
percent in the West Siberian, Far Eastern, and Northwestern 
regions, but remained practically unchanged in East Siberia. 
  Indices of prices for consumer goods and services in the 
consumer market were as follows (as a percentage of the 
preceding date): 


                 05/04       05/10       05/17       Average daily price 
                                                     rise 

                                                     May        April 

Consumer goods   102.2       101.6       102.5       0.28       0.30 
and services 

including: 

foodstuffs       101.9       101.9       102.3       0.27       0.23 

nonfood items    102.3       101.2       102.3       0.28       0.25 

for-fee          103.8       101.9       104.7       0.45       1.27 
services for 
the population 



  Since the beginning of the month, the current consumer 
price index measured 105.0 percent, including that for 
foodstuffs--104.7 percent, nonfood items--105.0 percent, and 
for-fee services for the population--108.0 percent. 
  If the current rate of price increases remains at the same 
level, prices for consumer goods and services in May will 
rise overall by 8-9 percent. 
<H5>  Foodstuffs. </H5>
  Over the period of 10 to 17 May, prices in organized and 
nonorganized trade rose by 1.9 percent and 4.3 percent. 
  Price changes by main categories of food products are shown 
below (as a percentage of the preceding date): 


                     Total           Including: 

                                     in organized        in nonorganized 
                                     trade               trade 

All food products    102.3           101.9               104.3 

including: 

Meat and meat        102.3           102.4               102.0 
products 

Fish and fish        100.3           100.4               96.3 
products 

Milk and milk        100.9           101.1               99.9 
products 

Eggs                 99.9            99.9                100.5 

Sugar                100.6           100.6               101.2 

Bread and bakery     102.9           102.9               - 
products 

Cereals and          101.7           101.7               101.7 
macaroni items 

Vodka                100.0           100.0               100.2 

Potatoes and         105.3           104.4               106.1 
vegetables 

Fruit                117.4           116.9               117.7 


  In organized trade over the elapsed week fresh 
produce prices continued to rise at an anticipatory rate: 
cabbage and onions by 10-14 percent, and apples by 23 percent. 
As compared to the preceding week, prices for meat, bread, and 
bakery items rose at a perceptibly higher rate--2.6-4.4 percent. 
There was no significant change in prices for certain dairy 
products, sugar, tea, eggs, butter, vegetable oil, vodka, and 
potatoes. 
  Since the beginning of the month, prices rose the most with 
respect to vegetables and fruit--by 10-26 percent. Since the 
beginning of the year, their prices increased 2.3-fold and 
1.7-fold, respectively; milk prices increased 2.1-fold, and meat 
prices--1.5-fold. 
  Similar to organized trade, the greatest price rises in 
nonorganized trade were registered with respect to fresh 
produce. Prices for apples rose by 20.5 percent; cabbage, beets, 
and carrots--by 10-14 percent; and onions and garlic--by 4-5 
percent. 
  Since the beginning of the month, prices for vegetables 
increased by 17 percent, and for fruit--1.4-fold; since the 
beginning of the year, these prices increased 2.7-fold and 
2.6-fold, respectively. 
  The cost of the consumer basket of 19 basic 
foodstuffs increased over the week by 3 percent and as of 
17 May amounted to R51,100, calculated on a monthly basis. Since 
the middle of March, the price differential between monitored 
cities had been increasing gradually and measured a factor of 
4.7 on 17 May as compared to 3.6 on 15 March of this year. The 
highest cost of the basket was registered in Magadan (R141,300) 
and the lowest in Ulyanovsk (R30,000). In terms of the cost of 
the consumer basket, Moscow and St. Petersburg ranked 34th and 
46th among 132 monitored cities (R55,400 and R51,500 on a 
monthly basis). 
  The practice of price controls with respect to food 
products persisted in April. While there were no price 
controls on the federal level, in 104 of 132 monitored cities 
(100 in December 1993) regional administration influenced the 
process of price formation. 
  At the same time, the extent to which various forms of price 
control were applied to the consumer market varied. For 
instance, in the cities of the Volgo-Vyatka and North Caucasus 
regions, prices on practically all food staples are controlled, 
while in the Northern and Northwestern regions, price control 
with respect to basic food staples is limited to several cities 
(mainly the cities in Komi Republic, Cherepovets, and Pskov). 
  The data on the scale of price controls with respect to 
basic 
food staples in December 1993-April 1994 are presented below: 


               As % of the total number of monitored cities 

               1993                       1994 

               December      January      February      March      April 

Beef           49            53           46            45         45 

Bologna        48            50           41            41         42 

Butter         42            38           34            42         39 

Vegetable      28            30           33            32         32 
oil 

Milk           67            71           74            68         69 

Baby food      33            32           29            31         37 

Eggs           40            40           43            41         42 

Sugar          39            33           28            32         29 

Salt           29            27           30            28         28 

Flour          35            39           30            33         37 

Bread          74            77           78            73         75 


  The most commonly used kind of price control is putting a 
limit on trade organization's mark-up (about 50 percent of all 
instances of price control). In approximately 5 percent of the 
cities, limits are set on profitability of food processing 
industry enterprises. Much more rarely, subsidies from local 
budgets were used to keep prices at a certain level; the 
practice of setting a maximum limit on prices is still used in 
Voronezh (meat products, butter, and milk) and Lipetsk (butter, 
eggs, and vodka). In some cities of Russia (Syktyvkar, Orel, 
Kazan, Ulyanovsk, Nalchik, Ufa, and Omsk) several kinds of price 
control were used simultaneously. 
  By the end of April of this year, prices for products 
subject 
to price control and for those sold at market prices rose at 
practically the same rate. At the same time, the level of 
regulated and market prices did differ. For instance, regulated 
prices for wheat bread made from category I and II flour ranged 
from R213 per kg in Ulyanovsk to R750 in Tomsk, while market 
prices ranged from R641 in Arkhangelsk to R1,274 per kg in 
Yuzhno-Sakhalinsk. With respect to milk, on the contrary, market 
prices in Ivanovo (R419 per liter) were lower than controlled 
prices in Kostroma (R484). 
<H5>  Nonfood Items </H5>
  Over the period from 10 to 17 May prices for nonfood items 
rose at a moderate rate. There was practically no change in 
prices for personal and household goods or tobacco. At the same 
time, there was a considerable increase in prices for natural 
silk fabrics, synthetic detergents, wallpaper, and certain 
categories of medical supplies (by 4-10 percent). 
<H5>  For-Fee Services for the Population </H5>
  Over the elapsed week, rates and fees for for-fee services 
for the population increased on average in Russia by almost 5 
percent. There was a substantial increase in the cost of fares 
in suburban trains (by 18.2 percent) and city buses (by 8.6 
percent); among municipal services, electric power rates 
increased by 12.6 percent. The cost of suburban train fares in 
Tomsk and the cities of Nizhniy Novgorod Oblast increased 
twofold or more, and in St. Petersburg--fivefold. Electric power 
rates doubled over the elapsed week in Nizhniy Tagil, Orenburg, 
Syktyvkar, Vorkuta, Ukhta, and St. Petersburg. 
<H5>  Industry. </H5>
  Over 15 days of May 1994, of 163 categories of products 
counted in periodic reports, the average daily production, 
  as compared to the corresponding period of May 1993: 
  --increased with respect to 6 items, (including 
diesel generators, city telephone cables, front-wheel drive 
passenger cars, high fat-content cheeses and feta cheese), or 4 
percent of the total number; 
  --decreased with respect to 148 items, or 91 
percent of the total number; 
  as compared to the corresponding period of April 1994: 
  --increased with respect to 31 items, (among them 
oil, including gas condensate, automotive gasoline, iron ore, 
pig iron, coke, caustic soda, synthetic ammonia, potassium 
fertilizer, polyvynilchloride resin, drop forges, traveling 
electric cranes and self-propelled cranes, trolley buses, grain 
harvesting combines, cardboard, motorcycles, commercial edible 
fish products, butter, canned milk products, confectionery 
items, and salt), or 19 percent of the total number; 
  --decreased with respect to 123 items, or 76 
percent of the total number. 
  The output of main categories of industrial products over 15 
days of May 1994 is shown below: 


                            Produced over     As % of the corresponding period 
                            15 days of May    of (in terms of average daily 
                            1994              production) 

                                              May 1993         April 1994 

Electric power--billion     29.5              93               82 
kW/hr 

Oil, including gas          11.9              85               103 
condensate, million 
tonnes 

Natural gas, billion        24.2              96               91 
cubic meters 

Coal, million tonnes        8.3               81               79 

Steel, million tonnes       1.9               77               98 

Finished rolled metal,      1.4               77               90 
including semi-finished 
product for 
export--million tonnes 

Steel pipe, thousand        68.7              30               90 
tonnes 

Large electric machinery,   23                18               28 
units 

Metal-cutting machine       60                18               56 
tools, units 

Passenger cars, thousand    21.5              68               93 
units 

Tractors, thousand units    429               13               86 

Chemical filament and       5.9               40               84 
fiber, thousand tonnes 

Mineral fertilizer          332               70               92 
(recalculated as 
100-percent nutrients), 
thousand tonnes 

Automotive tires for        194               18               31 
agricultural vehicles, 
motorcycles, and 
motorollers, million 
units 

Commercial timber,          1.3               64               77 
million cubic meters 

Lumber, thousand cubic      236               60               85 
meters 

Paper, thousand tonnes      83.7              74               85 

Cement, million tonnes      1.2               63               91 

Roof slate, million         17.1              14               47 
standard tiles 

Construction brick,         208               52               74 
million units of standard 
brick 

Rolled roofing and          14.6              70               91 
insulation materials, 
million square meters 

Fabrics, total, million     32.9              38               54 
square meters 

Hosiery, million pairs      5.9               48               65 

Knitwear, million units     2.6               43               55 

Footwear, million pairs     1.3               36               82 

Television sets, thousand   20.4              24               40 
units 

Radio receiving devices,    6.5               14               42 
thousand units 

Refrigerators and           44.4              43               64 
freezers, thousand units 

Electric vacuum cleaners,   16.6              27               90 
thousand units 

Washing machines,           22.8              26               47 
thousand units 

Meat, including             43.5              70               97 
byproducts, category I, 
total, thousand tonnes 

Whole-milk products,        240               82               97 
recalculated as milk, 
total, thousand tonnes 

Butter, total, thousand     15.6              65               118 
tonnes 

Granulated sugar, total,    18.9              18               49 
including from 
customer-supplied 
material--thousand tonnes 



  Over the elapsed period of May 1994, there has been no 
production of forge presses with a numeric program control, 
processing centers, bulldozers, automotive graders, tower cranes 
with the lifting capacity of eight or more tonnes, truck 
trailers and semi-trailers, tractor hitches, passenger railcars, 
and magnetic tape. 
<H5>  The Agro-Industrial Complex </H5>
  By the middle of May, in the country as a whole, spring 
crops 
were planted on 29.6 million hectares, including 10.4 million 
hectares over the past week. The lag as compared to proceeding 
years so far persists. Last year by this time, spring crops were 
planted on 32.7 million hectares, and in 1992--38.1 million 
hectares. 
  The progress of the spring planting campaign at agricultural 
enterprises as of 16 May is characterized by the following data 
(in thousands hectares): 


                      1992           1993           1994           1994 as % 
                                                                   of 1993 

All spring crops,     38.1           32.7           29.6           91 
million hectares 

of that: 

Grain and legume      23.5           21.1           20.8           99 
crops (without 
corn), million 
hectares 

Corn--total           3,924          2,841          1,542          54 

including for grain   631            575            449            78 


Sugar beet            1,285          1,125          916            81 
(industrial) 

Long-fiber flax       207            211            79             38 

Sunflower for seed    2,386          1,980          1,745          88 

Potatoes              436            349            131            38 

Vegetables            172            130            104            80 

Annual grasses,       4.2            3.5            3.0            88 
million hectares 


  The data is available now on the extent of ruin of winter 
crops sown for the current year harvest. As of 16 May of this 
year winter crops at Russian Federation farms were ruined on 2.9 
million hectares (19 percent of the total area sown), including 
grain crops--2.8 million hectares (20 percent). Last year winter 
crops were ruined on 1,7 million hectares (8 percent). 
  The remaining 1994 harvest winter grain crop area at 
agricultural enterprises comprises about 12 million hectares as 
compared to 15 million hectares sown for last year's harvest. 
  The total area of grain crops sown, counting the surviving 
winter crops, is smaller by approximately 4 million hectares (11 
percent) than that as of the same date a year ago. 
  Spring planting is almost completed on the territories of 
the 
Central Chernozem region, Krasnodar and Stavropol Krays, Rostov, 
Orel, Tula, Volgograd, Penza, and Ulyanovsk Oblasts, Mordovia, 
and Tatarstan, where spring grain planting areas exceed those of 
last year. 
  Spring grain crops were planted on a substantially smaller 
area in Kirov, Nizhniy Novgorod, and Saratov Oblast, and the 
Republic of Mari El (by 20-40 percent); the same is also true of 
winter grain crops planted here last fall. 
<H5>  Construction </H5>
  In keeping with the federal investment program, in the 
current year it is envisaged to commission 128 facilities 
financed from the budget, and 332 facilities financed by credit 
investment resources. By and large, the developers plan to 
commission the facilities in the fourth quarter (96 percent). 
  The utilized volume of capital investment in budget-financed 
facilities amounted to R114 billion, with the annual limit of 
R772 billion as set by the Russian Ministry of Economics, and 
those financed through credit resources--R256 billion and R872 
billion, respectively. No construction was under way at one in 
six facilities in January-February of this year. 
  The progress of construction work on the facilities in the 
federal 1994 start-up program by national-economic complex is 
characterized by the following data (units): 


                    At objects financed through: 

                    budget means                                  credit resources 

                    planned to be   commissioned    capital       planned to be   commissioned    capital 
                    commissioned    (including      investment    commissioned    (including      investment 
                    this year       commissioned    utilized,     this year       commissioned    utilized, 
                                    in part         billions of                   in part         billions of 
                                                    rubles                                        rubles 

Total for Russia    128             1               114.3         322             2               256.4 

including by 
economic complex: 


Fuel and energy     22              -               43.3          21              -               59.4 

Machine-building    5               -               38.9          67              -               59.2 

Metallurgical       1               -               0.4           52              1               60.8 

Chemical and        72              1               16.1          71              -               48.9 
timber 

Construction        -               -               -             54              1               22.7 

Transportation      26              -               14.5          8               -               0.6 
and 
communications 


<H5>  Past-Due Back Pay Liabilities </H5>
  The number of enterprises having liabilities with respect to 
back pay and other labor remuneration-related pay-outs dropped 
somewhat in the beginning of May as compared to the beginning of 
April; the ratio of past-due liabilities in relation to 
enterprises' payroll also dropped. In absolute terms, past-due 
back pay liabilities increased insignificantly over April. 
  The data on the number of enterprises having past-due back 
pay liabilities and the volume of liabilities are represented in 
the following table: 


                        As of        As of        05/01/94     For 
                        04/01/94     05/01/94     as % of      reference: 
                                                  04/01/94     as of 
                                                               05/01/93 

Number of enterprises   32.2         30.3         94           10.9 
with back-pay and 
other pay-out 
liabilities--total, 
thousands 

including: 

in industry             6.9          6.6          96           3.2 

in construction         6.2          5.9          97           2.4 

in agriculture          19.4         17.8         93           5.3 

Volume of past-due      2,341.5      2,435.0      104          51.4 
back pay and other 
pay-out liabilities 
to enterprise 
employees--total, 
billions of rubles 

including: 

in industry             1,311.1      1,405.5      107          27.5 

in construction         414.1        459.1        111          11.3 

in agriculture          616.3        570.4        93           12.7 

Past-due back pay and   130.1        121.9        52.2 
other pay-out 
liabilities as a 
percentage of total 
payroll calculated 
for the month at 
enterprises having 
such 
liabilities--total 

including: 

in industry             108.7        112.9        46.1 

in construction         145.5        107.5        61.4 

in agriculture          199.5        175.0        61.5 


  The bulk of past-due back pay liabilities was owed by 
state-owned enterprises and organizations--41 percent, mixed 
ownership (without foreign participation)--32 percent, and 
privately-owned--32 percent; enterprises and organizations in 
municipal ownership and those owned by public associations and 
organizations accounted for less than 1 percent of it. 
  A considerable part of past-due back pay liabilities was 
owed 
by enterprises in machine-building and metalworking (30 percent 
of the total volume of liabilities owed in industry), fuels (24 
percent), timber, woodworking, and pulp and paper industries (11 
percent), and in ferrous metallurgy (8 percent). 
  Back pay owed for more than one month as of 1 May 1994 in 
all 
three economic sectors amounted to R1.1015 trillion, or 45 
percent of all back pay liability, including in industry--R546.6 
billion (39 percent), construction--R212.7 (46 percent), and 
agriculture--R342.2 billion (60 percent). 
  The main cause of past-due back pay and other pay-out 
liabilities is insufficient funds, or lack thereof, in operating 
accounts of enterprises and organizations. The greatest amounts 
not paid out in time have been registered at enterprises and 
organizations in industry, construction, and agriculture in 
Tyumen Oblast (R252.5 billion), Krasnoyarsk Kray (R118.9 
percent), Kemerovo Oblast (R113.9 billion), Chelyabinsk Oblast 
(R99.6 billion), Republics of Tataria (R88.3 billion) and 
Bashkiria (R66.4 billion), Altay Kray (R54.5 billion), Rostov 
Oblast (R50.2 billion), and the Komi Republic (R49.5 billion). 
<H5>  Fulfillment of Inter-Government Agreement With CIS Countries </H5>
  Russia's foreign trade turnover with CIS countries in the 
first quarter of the current year amounted to an estimated R6.8 
trillion (in current prices). Exports accounted for R4.2 
trillion, or 62 percent of the goods turnover (63 percent in the 
first quarter of 1993), and imports--R2.6 trillion, or 38 
percent (37 percent). 
  The volume of shipments of most important categories of 
producer goods from Russia under inter-government agreements in 
the first quarter of 1994 was as follows: 


                      Delivered         As % of fulfillment of   As % of the 
                                        annual                   first quarter 
                                        inter-government         of 1993 
                                        agreements 

Finished rolled       98                12                       25 
ferrous metals, 
thousand tonnes 

Steel pipe,           17                6.7                      21 
thousand tonnes 

Polyethylene,         9.2               54                       46 
thousand tonnes 

Caustic soda,         15                30                       57 
100-percent, 
thousand tonnes 

Synthetic rubber,     21                40                       29 
thousand tonnes 

Commercial timber,    186               6.3                      34 
thousand cubic 
meters 

Lumber, thousand      110               9.8                      39 
cubic meters 


  The main consumers of material resources are Ukraine, 
Belarus, and Kazakhstan, which account for 86 percent of the 
total rolled ferrous metal delivered to CIS countries, 64 
percent of steel pipe, 76 percent of commercial wood, and 56 
percent of lumber. 
  Deliveries of certain goods to the Russian market in the 
first quarter of 1994 are characterized by the following data: 


                     Received         As % of fulfillment of   As % of the 
                                      annual                   first quarter 
                                      inter-government         of 1993 
                                      agreements 

Meat and meat        17.6             12                       47 
products 
recalculated as 
meat, thousand 
tonnes 

Milk and milk        35.9             14                       49 
products 
recalculated as 
milk, thousand 
tonnes 

Hosiery, million     1.4              12                       116 
pairs 

Carpeting and        153.4            153                      0.1 
rugs, thousand 
square meters 


  In the first quarter of this year, Ukraine delivered 8 
percent of the annual agreed-upon volume of meat and meat 
products; Belarus--31 percent of meat and meat products, and 14 
percent of milk and milk products; and Kazakhstan--2 percent of 
meat and meat products. 
  In 1994, in keeping with inter-government agreements, in the 
category of consumer goods Russia is to deliver only household 
and facial soap and synthetic detergents. In the first quarter 
of this year, their deliveries to CIS countries comprised 1 
percent, 2 percent, and 25 percent, respectively, of the total 
agreed-upon volume for the year. 
  This report was prepared on the basis of materials of 
the Russian State Committee on Statistics. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47127 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   13 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC &amp; SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Yeltsin Speaks to Intelligence Service </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Yeltsin Speaks to Intelligence Service </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944F0816A Moscow KURANTY in Russian 13 May 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0816A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KURANTY </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Maksim Polinin: "Yeltsin's Excursion into </F>
Intelligence"] 
  [Text] It is claimed that nothing like this ever 
happened before in the history of Russia and the USSR. For the 
first time, the head of state visited the headquarters of the 
Russian Federation's Foreign Intelligence Service. He gave a 
30-minute speech to the operational staff, and he spent more 
than two hours in a circle of the service's managerial 
personnel. The KURANTY editorial staff learned about some of the 
details of this meeting and the impressions and opinions of its 
eyewitnesses. On the whole, the experts give a very high 
evaluation to Yeltsin's excursion into intelligence. 
  However, to make the picture complete and to realize the 
importance of this meeting, we will look back two and a half 
years ago. Iron Feliks did not last on what seemed to be his 
permanent pedestal. He crashed to the ground in such a way that 
the subunits of the once monolithic KGB went flying in various 
directions. The elite intelligence service--the First Main 
Directorate--which was called on to resolve extremely important 
tasks, mainly abroad, was also knocked out of it. A serious 
reform of the special institution was started--it began to be 
called the Central Intelligence Service when the Soviet Union 
was still in existence. The Gorbachev-Yeltsin dyarchy generated 
the idea of creating "an original Russian" intelligence service 
under the conventional designation "Federal Security Agency." 
Specialists note that the period of time from Putsch No. 1 to 
the Belovezha Agreement is marked by black days on the calendar 
of the country's intelligence service. The operational staff 
basically remained silent, although it can be imagined what went 
on in the heads of the employees. Many could not take it--they 
went into civilian work. But, in one way or another, a nucleus 
of professionals was preserved nonetheless. They were all 
assembled under the abbreviation FIS [Foreign Intelligence 
Service] and were told: "Get down to work." However, doubts 
among the workers remained--what did the high leadership of the 
country have in mind for them? Moreover, these doubts were 
somehow stirred up little by little both at home and abroad. 
  Bayonets in the Ground? It was said "Get down to 
work." But how? All of the foreign political guidelines were 
disrupted, there were no enemies, including the principal one, 
which was presumed to be the United States. The "fraternization" 
of Moscow with Washington led to a sharp drop in Russian 
intelligence activity not only in the United States, but also in 
practically all of the countries of the world. The financial 
squeeze forced the FIS to reduce to a minimum the level of work 
in Africa, Asia, and Latin America. There were persistent rumors 
that the Americans are insolently pressuring the Russian 
leadership with respect to a reduction in intelligence functions 
of the FIS against them, but R. Gates, director of the CIA at 
that time, bluntly told his Russian colleague, Ye. Primakov, of 
the need to veto agent and operational work of the Russian 
intelligence service on U.S. territory. 
  In assessing those "cursed days," professionals recognized 
that the lack of demand for intelligence was very clearly felt 
then, and this brought on gloomy predictions regarding its 
future. Approximately the same mood prevailed among employees of 
the Russian intelligence service right up until Yeltsin's visit. 
  The Paralysis Is Being Abolished. And so, on the 
sunny day of 28 April, a presidential motorcade drove up to the 
FIS headquarters--a complex of buildings whose main building 
resembles the NATO citadel in Brussels. The 800-seat hall is 
over filled, although the operational personnel who remained in 
their offices were not deprived of the opportunity to hear the 
president on a local radio relay. 
  According to the testimony of eyewitnesses, Yeltsin, dressed 
in a perfectly tailored blue suit, headed for the rostrum 
without hurrying. Thousands of eyes gazed intently at the 
powerful figure of the president in the expectation--what has 
the eminent guest brought with him? 
  The tension in the hall was replaced by goodwill and 
approval 
from sentence to sentence. In the middle of the speech, the 
attendees, with an expression of pleasant surprise on their 
faces, listened to the speaker and agreed with him in a majority 
of cases. "You know better than I that there are forces abroad 
that would like to keep Russia in the condition of a manageable 
paralytic," Yeltsin said. "But I am convinced that only a 
powerful, democratic, and prosperous Russian state will become a 
factor in acquiring new prospects peacefully. It is our common 
task to make Russia such a state." 
  Diversity of Opinions. One common positive moment 
exists in the rather broad range of evaluations of Yeltsin's 
speech among intelligence employees: The president for the first 
time openly recognized the importance and necessity for such a 
specific service as the FIS. His speech can in full measure be 
called conceptual. Yeltsin demonstrated real knowledge of the 
subject, and he assessed the functions of the intelligence 
service and the quality of its information very highly. 
  Global problems facing the country were publicly tied in 
with 
the tasks of intelligence for the first time. The importance of 
such a statement of the question was that the president, in a 
rather tough form, made clear the need to receive valuable, 
timely, warning intelligence information. "I expect that in the 
future your operational information, analytical conclusions, and 
recommendations will receive only good marks... We expect 
intelligence data from the FIS that are necessary for making 
fundamental state decisions on questions of Russia's foreign and 
domestic policy, the conduct of our economic policy, and the 
support of scientific-technical progress." (From B. Yeltsin's 
speech of 28 April in the FIS.) 
  At the same time, although encouraging statements were made 
and firm guarantees were given of the "necessary concern for 
each intelligence officer," no one will say now how all of this 
in fact will be implemented. Some specialists think that the 
train has already left--the outflow of qualified personnel from 
the intelligence service has assumed an irreversible character, 
and many of the functional directorates of the service have been 
bled white. But, to continue to keep intelligence on a financial 
hunger ration is equivalent to transforming it into something of 
a toothless department. It is not accidental, after all, that 
CIA patriarch Allen Dulles in his work "The Craft of 
Intelligence" wrote that a poor intelligence service cannot 
achieve hoped for results. 
  It is also not entirely clear to professionals how it is 
possible to fulfill the task assigned by the president to 
systematically keep abreast of the situation along the entire 
perimeter of the Russian borders with neighboring countries. The 
fact is that Moscow has signed numerous treaties with a majority 
of the now independent states surrounding Russia about not 
conducting intelligence activities against each other. 
  Yeltsin talked about the legal basis for the FIS, but 
experts 
emphasize that the Law of the Russian Federation on Foreign 
Intelligence, under which the signature of a "nonpolitician," 
Khasbulatov, still stands, requires significant revision. For 
example, Article 9 of this act concerning contacts of the FIS 
organs with the Russian public became outdated a long time ago. 
  Diverting Parallels. But what about our overseas 
friends-rivals? Judging by everything, they did not like the 
fact that their recommendations on stopping all Russian 
intelligence activity on U.S. territory were not heeded in 
Moscow. Then the Ames case came to light, which seemed to form 
Washington's position on this score: They said, we seemed to 
have come to an agreement, but you, so-and-sos, are recruiting 
CIA employees. 
  In the meantime, there was no mention on the part of the 
United States about any reduction in the work of the American 
intelligence services against Russia. The U.S. President 
regularly visits Langley, and not just once a year, in order to 
give his blessing to the intelligence activity of CIA agents. 
Here is what he said, for example, during his last visit to CIA 
headquarters on 4 January of this year: "The conclusion of the 
Cold War has strengthened the security of the United States, 
but, after all, it is precisely intelligence, acting in very 
different ways, that helped gain victory in this confrontation." 
But what follows further is a quotation from Yeltsin's speech, 
and compare: "The period of global confrontation in 
international politics has ended, but its inertia is strong 
today. The Cold War has turned into a scattering of hot and 
smoldering conflicts... Military force factors can once again be 
activated at any moment." Curious coincidences in the views on 
what is occurring, is it not true? 
  And again Clinton: "But today's renewed peace also remains 
full of dangers and, judging by many events, it is becoming even 
more complicated and difficult to correctly understand the 
processes that are occurring." He is seconded by Yeltsin: "I 
understand very well that, perhaps, there has not been a more 
difficult period for the FIS than the present one. And this is 
determined most of all by the present international situation. 
Its main feature is the large scale and the high speed of 
changes that continuously further complicate an already 
complicated world." 
  These theses were pronounced at different times by the 
leaders of different countries, but their thoughts are 
absolutely identical. Somebody, probably, can reproach Yeltsin 
for plagiarism (he made his speech almost five months later than 
Clinton). But it is exactly this kind of plagiarism, it seems, 
that the FIS employees expected from the Russian 
president--there is a desire, at least in words, to be on an 
equal footing with colleagues from the CIA. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47128 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC &amp; SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Labor Minister Melikyan on Subsistence Means for Consumer </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Labor Minister Melikyan on Subsistence Means for Consumer </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Needs 

<F P=102>   944E0900A Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian 27 May 94 p 8 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0900A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Russian Federation Minister of Labor </F>
Gennadiy Georgiyevich Melikyan, by OBSHCHAYA GAZETA commentator 
Aleksandr Protsenko; place and date not given: "No One Wants To 
Soak a Natural Person"] 
  [Text] Last week, Russian Labor Minister Gennadiy 
Melikyan reported: The ministry has prepared a draft of the 
presidential edict "On the Regulation of Assets Directed Toward 
Consumption." This news provoked hostile responses in Moscow's 
political and parapolitical circles. The market liberals were 
startled: All the same, the government intends to carry out its 
long-standing threats to "freeze wages," ignoring the natural 
right of the workers to "earn according to their abilities." The 
opponents of the ultra-liberals, the proponents of state 
"regulation of consumption," on the other hand, consider the 
measures promised by the edict to be cunning, the latest proof 
of the fact that the state is persistently deviating from its 
sacred duty to regulate social relations. 
  According to the official version, the future edict 
realizes one of the points of the president's message to the 
parliament, as well as the state program approved at the end of 
April in the area of social policy. This does not preclude the 
fact, however, that this document has been called upon to play 
another role: to postpone a long-overdue decision. The 
technology of this matter is simple: A deliberately unacceptable 
circular is prepared, its content becomes public property, and a 
negative "public reaction" follows, after which the unapproved 
circular is filed away in the folder for the unpublished and the 
forgotten, while the authorities find the moral right to 
"postpone the matter" until better times. 
  This version has already been partially confirmed: On 
Monday, the edict "On the Regulation..." was, among others, 
submitted for approval to Yeltsin and, in contrast to the other 
six edicts, was not signed. As to why the authorities have been 
compelled periodically to turn to the problem of control over 
incomes and why this always comes to naught, the reader can 
judge, based on the conversation between OBSHCHAYA GAZETA 
commentator Aleksandr Protsenko and Russian Federation Minister 
of Labor Gennadiy Melikyan. 
  [Protsenko] Gennadiy Georgiyevich, the most graphic result 
of 
the state's noninterference in social processes is the 
staggering and simply insane differentiation of the incomes of 
the populace. As far as I know, the difference in the earnings 
of the most highly paid 10 percent of the Russian citizens and 
the lowest-paid 10 percent has reached a factor of 27. 
  [Melikyan] It has already passed 30. According to this 
indicator, we have "surpassed" the civilized countries and have 
come much closer to the Third World. But after all, we are a 
country of extremes! It is true that it is not necessary to 
think that the situation differs greatly from the period of the 
"heyday of stagnation." Although then the difference in the 
wages of a party oblast committee secretary or the manager of a 
large plant and those of, for example, a cleaning lady was only 
a factor of four or five, the difference in incomes was not less 
than currently. It is just that all this was due to things other 
than wages. 
  Today there are more rich people, and this is noticeable. 
But 
we cannot get away from an increase in the differentiation of 
incomes--especially during the period of the initial 
accumulation of capital. This is an inevitable and objective 
process, although I agree that it is proceeding too rapidly, 
which is intensifying social tension. Our country is accustomed 
to life under wage leveling, but here we have this colossal 
difference. And it frequently bears no relationship to the 
amount and quality of the labor expended. 
  Currently in Russia, 40 percent of the children are living 
in 
families with incomes below the subsistence minimum. As a rule, 
these are young families--the backbone of the state. They are 
supposed to support themselves and their children, yet it is 
through their labor that the country is supporting the 
pensioners. 
  [Protsenko] Add the fact that these people are supposed to 
be 
the basic customers in our stores, and their rubles are supposed 
to stimulate the production of domestic goods. But in our 
country, to put it crudely, the populace is dividing into two 
classes: the poor, who buy nothing, and the rich, who buy only 
imported goods. As a result, domestic production is losing 
sales, while its workers continue to live in poverty. Is this a 
closed circle? 
  [Melikyan] This is all true. This also testifies to the fact 
that the state is not performing its regulatory function--it is 
supposed to limit the excessive incomes of a monopolist producer 
and to support the workers of enterprises of promising sectors 
and the budget-controlled sphere. But to support them not by 
handing out subsidies, but rather by establishing a normal wage. 
Indeed, currently in a number of sectors, and first and foremost 
in the budget-controlled ones, wages have been artificially 
understated. If a family consisting of two workers and two 
children cannot support itself and turns out to be below the 
poverty line, this is proof of an absolutely incorrect wage 
system. 
  [Protsenko] Which is supposed to change now that the prime 
minister has finally signed the decree on the governmental 
program in the area of social policy. Incidentally, at the 
presidium's meeting on this matter, you were the main speaker. 
What can we expect? 
  [Melikyan] In the area of the regulation of incomes, there 
are a few changes--if you talk about the number of items 
introduced into the program. There is the indexing of the 
guaranteed minimum incomes in connection with an increase in 
prices and, first and foremost, an increase in the minimum wage. 
There is the change in the system for figuring the wages for the 
managers of state enterprises (and enterprises where the state 
has the controlling block of shares). And finally, there is the 
improvement of the system for taxing individual incomes. There 
are several more items, but these are the main ones. 
  [Protsenko] Fine, let us talk about the main ones--for 
example, about the minimum wage. Your predecessor in the labor 
minister's post and now your curator with the rank of deputy 
prime minister, Aleksandr Nikolayevich Shokhin, moaned back in 
November of 1990 that the minimum wage was less than the 
subsistence minimum by at least a third. Today it amounts to 
approximately 20 percent of the subsistence minimum. How is it 
possible to pay a person, quite legally, an amount on which it 
is impossible to exist? 
  [Melikyan] Well, actually, no one is being paid this 
minimum, 
and it is more for calculation purposes--proceeding based on it, 
wages are calculated according to a wage scale in the 
budget-controlled sphere. It is true that, according to the 
statistical data, in public education 1.2 percent are being paid 
according to the second category, but this is only 30 percent 
more than the minimum. But for this money, people are working a 
partial work day and holding down jobs, as a rule, in several 
places. Usually they are pensioners. There is, unfortunately, 
one more use of the minimum wage--it is paid to people who are 
sent on forced leaves if an enterprise is on the brink of 
bankruptcy. 
  [Protsenko] This seems familiar to us: "They pretend to pay 
us, and we pretend to work." Payment of the minimum wage to 
people on forced leaves helps the managers, under whose 
leadership the enterprises were brought to the point of 
bankruptcy, to survive, does it not? 
  [Melikyan] Theoretically, this is all true, but in 
practice.... In our country, we are used to the fact that wages 
perform not so much a stimulating role as the function of social 
security. Do you want to break down this system? Fine, let us 
raise the minimum wage, for example, sixfold and let the plant 
manager decide if he can pay these wages to the people or if he 
needs to fire a third of the workers. Is there any guarantee 
that a social explosion will not occur at the enterprise and in 
the city where a mass of unemployed people appears? 
  Of course, the minimum wage should be as close as possible 
to 
the subsistence minimum and, in the program adopted by the 
government, provision has been made for raising it, 
but--gradually. Remember: In order to give to one, it is 
necessary to take from another! 
  [Protsenko] But is it not impossible to take from those 
managers who have no money for workers' wages, but whose own 
salaries are figured in "lemons" [millions]? Incidentally, such 
information appeared in the press about the general manager of 
the ZIL plant [motor vehicle plant imeni Lenin], is this true? 
  [Melikyan] I do not know how it was with Brakov, but there 
have actually been and still are instances when the workers are 
paid R80,000-R100,000, while the manager and his closest circle 
are paid millions. At the end of last year, many executives 
awarded themselves and their retinues completely outrageous 
bonuses! Proceeding on the basis of this "experience," we 
prepared proposals for regulating the executives' wages--they 
also went into the governmental program. Now, based on a 
contract with the state, a firm salary will be set for a manager 
in relation to the type of production and the type of collective 
he manages. And an executive can receive a salary supplement 
only in an instance when the enterprise has derived a 
substantial profit. The higher the profit, the higher the 
supplement. At the same time, an item has been inserted into the 
governmental program about strengthening control over the 
distribution of funds for consumption--so that capital stock 
will not be eaten up. At the same time, we proposed one more 
measure--a temporary one which would permit restraining an 
increase in the wage fund at enterprises where the wages already 
exceed significantly the average for the sector. We also 
proposed imposing certain restrictions for such enterprises: If, 
for example, the price index rises over a quarter by 30 percent, 
then the wage fund will increase by only 21 percent. 
  At first, some trade unions came out sharply against this 
idea: We are, so they say, against any regulation of incomes! We 
asked the dissenters: Do you realize that an enormous and 
unfounded difference in incomes exists? "We do!" Do you 
understand that the taxation mechanism, through which it would 
be possible to solve these problems, will not begin working 
either today or tomorrow? "We do!" Well then, shall we let this 
madhouse be for the time being? "Let it be!" 
  So it is necessary to fight for social justice. As a result, 
we then persuaded the trade unionists with the condition that 
prices for a number of necessities will be regulated. Of course, 
we had in mind not a direct restriction of prices, but rather 
economic regulation, having proposed reducing the tax rate for 
those commercial enterprises that increase the sale of goods. 
And it can be increased by reducing (or at least not increasing) 
retail prices. The budget would also gain--as sales increase, 
the amount of tax receipts increase--and the consumer would gain 
as well. And we would at least partially have solved the problem 
of excessive differentiation of incomes. Unfortunately, for the 
time being, this idea of ours has not been supported. It is true 
that the presidential edict "On the Regulation of Assets 
Directed Toward Consumption" has now been prepared: Enterprises 
that have an average wage higher than 20 times the minimum wage 
will have an additional tax imposed, which will go into the 
local budget for rendering assistance to poor. The edict also 
stipulates other measures for limiting excessive incomes. 
  [Protsenko] But does it not seem to you that you are looking 
for a solution where there is none? The entire world is 
combating the abnormal differentiation of incomes using an 
income tax. There exist, as you know, taxes on wealth and real 
estate taxes. "Poor Russia" is currently buying more Mercedes 
than the entire civilized world--where is this purchasing power 
coming from? Note: our entrepreneurs love very much to complain 
about the "production" taxes: They say they are too high and 
they make business expansion impossible. But complaints about 
high taxes on personal incomes is something I have not heard. I 
also do not know of an instance when a citizen who decides one 
fine day to buy himself, let us say, an establishment for a 
couple of hundred million has been asked by someone--no, not 
about the source of his revenues--but rather, about whether or 
not he had paid taxes on them. 
  [Melikyan] The root of this evil lies in the absence in our 
country of normal taxation of natural persons. It is precisely 
by these taxes that excessive incomes are regulated and 
low-income people are supported. In the West, taxes from natural 
persons amount to more than half of all budget receipts, while 
they amount to only 8-10 percent in Russia. I will not even 
mention the fact that the taxes are being collected very poorly 
even from the enterprises. It is commonly believed that only 70 
percent of taxes are currently being collected throughout the 
country. Unfortunately, I fear it is just the opposite: 70 
percent are remaining uncollected. We do not know how. Russian 
citizens are not accustomed to paying taxes or even to figuring 
out their incomes. 
  By the way, the tax on wealth is also a form of tax from 
natural persons. We have inserted into the governmental program 
an item on improvement of the system for taxing individual 
incomes--we are hoping to prepare in the third quarter of this 
year changes in the Law on the Income Tax from Natural Persons. 
But we are not entertaining any particular illusions--both time 
and our own standard of culture are needed for a radical change 
in the tax system. Yet in our country even the tax service is 
not ready, from a purely technical standpoint. Although, of 
course, it is necessary to begin at some point.... 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-47129 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr066___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-066 </AU>
JPRS 


</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 June 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC &amp; SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Aleksashenko Refutes Gloomy Predictions of Economic Collapse </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Aleksashenko Refutes Gloomy Predictions of Economic Collapse </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   944E0930A Moscow MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI in Russian No 21, 22-29 
May 94 p A5 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0930A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MOSKOVSKIYE NOVOSTI </F>
<F P=105>  Russian </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Sergey Aleksashenko: "Who Predicts a Collapse?"] </F>
  [Text] At a recently held meeting with managers of 
industrial enterprises the president said: "Unfortunately, the 
economy is close to a collapse." 
  At first glance it is difficult to understand from where the 
president took the information on a collapse. For example, 
inflation confidently remains at between 8 to 10 percent per 
month, which, as compared with last year's level, looks quite 
proper. The dollar has risen so lazily that pictures, when the 
"green" began even to dive down, are revived in the memory of 
many people. One can enter a store (and not only in Moscow) 
without fear and buy not only sprats in tomato sauce, but 
something more appetizing. The population's income (officially 
recorded by the State Committee for Statistics) is growing at 
the rate of 10 to 12 percent. Of course, it is growing from a 
low level, but it is really growing, that is, not merely in 
rubles--the commodity content of these earned rubles is not 
weakening. 
  Perhaps, the president possesses some additional 
information? 
Perhaps his advisers have at their disposal something that is 
inaccessible to all the rest? However, as a result of my own 
contacts with two directors of expert analytic groups in the 
presidential administration, it is difficult to conclude that 
they feel special pessimism. 
  Very likely, however, the president was not imbued with an 
alarmist mood for nothing. He communicated with someone, someone 
told him all this! Let us try to guess... 
  Managers of a number of the country's largest industrial 
enterprises, for the most part, not the most successful, were 
present at the meeting with the president. On the other hand, 
almost all of them held the post of director for more than 1 
year: under Leonid Ilich, under Yuriy Vladimirovich, under 
Konstantin Ustinovich, under Mikhail Sergeyevich, and under 
Boris Nikolayevich. Moreover, they were personally acquainted 
with all of them and had entree to their offices. This is a 
great deal for the protection of their interests in state 
structures. I believe that the hitch lies in these very 
interests. 
  The slow improvement in the economy places all enterprises 
under new conditions, when it is necessary "to be in a whirl," 
to compete, and not to count on old contacts. Of course, it 
would be much simpler to drop in to a familiar office and have 
everything handed to you on a platter. However, today people 
ask, but nothing is handed to them on a platter, or very rarely. 
Perhaps this is a collapse? Perhaps, only not of the economy, 
but of the vestiges of the old system. 
  Meanwhile, there is a sector in the economy, which does not 
complain about nonpayments and does not ask the state for 
preferential credit. If it asks for something, it is to lower 
taxes a little bit (how can they be lowered if there is a whole 
line of those wishing to have everything handed to them on a 
platter!). This sector has a name--private business. Private not 
only because it belongs to private individuals, but also because 
it lives for private interests. It is not concerned with the 
needs of an abstract "state"--it needs profit. But one obtains 
profit only when one's products are bought. 
  However, people with entree to the president think "in a 
state manner": "The country needs combines, trucks, tanks, 
rockets, airplanes, cast iron, and steel." And it is not 
important that no one wants to pay for these things. The people 
do not understand their needs and, consequently, someone has to 
think and decide for them. 
  For example, someone took it to his head "to add" something 
for defense and to increase the defense order--it will be better 
right away! We will spend on defense not every fifth ruble, as 
last year, and not every fourth, as during the first quarter of 
this year, but every third and, even better, every second! Even 
if all these rubles will have to be printed in three shifts and 
inflation will jump up to previous heights, it does not matter. 
Why, of course, lads were taken out of tekhnikums without being 
permitted to study for another 2 or 3 months in order to get the 
diploma. Now they have to be fed, clothed, and armed and a 
warrant officer and a captain over them have to be supported. 
With regard to the fact that no one has said from where the 
potential threat for us comes and how the army will cope with 
this threat and with what arms--this is what a military secret 
is for. 
  Nor is there a word about the fact that all these plants are 
overloaded with mobilization capacities and with programs for 
mobilization preparation, which for about 10 years (no less) no 
one examined, but expenses must be borne. Free ZIL [Moscow Motor 
Vehicle Plant imeni I.A. Likhachev] from this burden and perhaps 
it will spread its wings. But for sure it will breathe more 
freely and then will manufacture more refrigerators. In 
addition, if one or two directors are removed, in order to teach 
others not to run to offices, then perhaps in 3 or 4 years ZIL 
motor vehicles will run not only on our, but also on foreign, 
roads. Without anything being handed on a platter to anyone. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
